United States of America,US,07/May/2016:14:19:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Erie, PA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-erie-pa-us-159710073.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,091cec58f5f1ad43a9ea2679f1f4949f
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:13:47:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Put Your Forklift, Machine Operator and Technician Skills to Work!Searching for an exciting light industrial opportunity that will keep your career progressing? Spherion®, a locally owned staffing company, is seeking skillful forklift drivers, machine operators and technicians for our automotive client’s facility in the Mansfield area. Partnering together, our team will help you put your skills to work in a rewarding position that keeps you successfully moving forward. We currently have a wide variety of flexible, temp-to-hire and permanent opportunities with various shifts available! Job Description:Operate a forklift or industrial machine or provide technical support to equipment in a warehouse setting, which may include: Safely and efficiently operating a forklift to stack, un-stack, pick and distribute materials to fulfill ordersSetting up, running and adjusting manufacturing equipmentPerforming quality checks on machinery and equipmentSkillfully operating industrial machinery As their staffing partner, Spherion offers a competitive compensation and benefits package. Requirements:·         Proven ability to operate a forklift or specified industrial machine ·         Technical expertise required to repair and maintain equipment·         Meticulous about complying with company safety policies·         Able to stand/walk for extended periods of time·         Thorough understanding of shop math and machine processes·         Follows instructions and established guidelines for operating, repairing and maintaining equipment·         Able to work independently with minimal supervision ·         Safety conscious and strong attention to detail·         Punctual, reliable and solid attendance record·         Able to work flexible schedules  ·         Experience operating a forklift, industrial machinery or providing technical support to manufacturing equipment or machinery",Forklift Operator - Warehousing Job in Mansfield,Full Time,"Mansfield, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-warehousing-job-mansfield-oh-us-167299760.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=15,,,1cb9a4ca5c46490c5d1fea87593de066
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:13:46:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Level 2 Remote Support Engineer Area of Interest: Engineering Department: 960000 - All Covered City: Atlanta State: Georgia Job Description: All Covered, a division of Konica Minolta, is focused on enabling the success of small and medium-sized businesses through the effective use and management of technology. The company is the US industry leader in the provision of IT Services for companies with between 10 and 100 employees. Our company serves 37 of the top 100 cities in the US and has thousands of clients across every major industry.Our comprehensive services, including network, server and desktop support, are delivered by a world-class team of technical experts. They possess a broad-based knowledge and take a vendor neutral approach. Our success with over 1,000 contracted clients has created a need for outstanding IT talent looking for exciting and lucrative career opportunities.Our culture is based on a core team of professionals always striving to deliver the best solutions for our clients. We value honesty, enthusiasm, respect, ownership, excellence and a service oriented attitude. This culture is essential to our success, distinguishing us from our competition and enabling us to hire and retain the best and brightest people in this business.The Remote Support Center Level 2 Engineer position is a mid-level technical position based in one of our Remote Support Centers (RSC). The RSC is a group focused on resolving issues remotely for our nationwide client base. The L2 position responds to, resolves and escalates incoming technical client issues and requests submitted by phone, e-mail, or our client portal.Duties and Essential Job Functions:Provide expert remote desktop support, expert systems administration, and intermediate to advanced systems engineering support with a focus on:- Client satisfaction.- Service delivery quality.- Technical excellence.Drive to meet and exceed organizational goals for:- Cost Per Contact.- Utilization.- Customer Satisfaction.- First Contact Resolution Rate.- Employee Satisfaction.- Average Speed to Answer.Demonstrate strong customer service skills to provide phone support including:- Listening to the customer to gain an accurate understanding of the situation.- Being empathetic to the customer’s situation and having a sense of urgency to resolve the issue.- Producing accurate, detailed documentation at the client, problem and incident level.- Resolving conflict.Provide remote support for Level 2 issues (desktop, server and infrastructure support).Follow task creation, work, closure, and escalation procedures.Support team members with resolving client issues.Meet or exceed position Key Performance Indicators (KPIs).Serve as a technical escalation point and mentor to Level 1 Engineers.Producing and providing technical training to team members.Excel in the areas of:- Remote troubleshooting skills.- Client service skills.- Professionalism.- Punctuality.- Technical competencies defined for the position. Qualifications: Qualifications: Call center experience. 3 or more years of experience with troubleshooting and providing remote support. BA, BS or similar degree in computers/electronics or relevant experience. At least one of the following industry certifications is required:- MCTS/MCP Server 2008 or above- MCTS/MCP Exchange 2007 or above- CompTIA Server+- Cisco Certified Network Administrator (CCNA)- Apple Certified Technical Coordinator (ACTC) 3+ years of experience troubleshooting the current versions of the Windows Desktop Operating Systems. 3+ years of experience with administering of the following technologies is preferred:- The most current versions of the Windows Server family operating system.- The most current versions of Microsoft Active Directory.- The most current versions of Microsoft Exchange Server. A working knowledge of the following technologies:- Current desktops, laptops, servers and networking basics.- Current Windows Desktop Operating Systems.- Current Windows Server Operating Systems and services.- Windows Active Directory (User Management/Administration/Group Policy).- Current Exchange Server.- Current firewalls and security.- Common server tape and online backup solutions.- Common desktop applications including Microsoft Office Suite.Common TCP/IP services including HTTP, FTP, DNS, and DHCP. Hands-on software and hardware troubleshooting experience. Strong interpersonal, written and oral communication skills, attention to detail. Adept at reading, writing, and interpreting technical documentation and procedure manuals. Ability to present ideas and solutions in user-friendly language. Highly self-motivated and directed. Proven analytical and problem-solving abilities. Strong customer service orientation. Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment. Ability to type between 30 to 45 words per minute.Success Characteristics Honest, Enthusiastic, Respectful, takes Ownership, achieves Excellence, and consistently delivers quality. Service to team members and customers alike. Team player, flexible, adaptable, responsible, punctual, proactive, and self-sufficient. Affinity for and successful experience with small to medium size business environments. Ability to adapt and thrive in a constantly changing work environment.Konica Minolta offers: Competitive compensation program Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, life insurance) 401(k) plan with matching company contribution Excellent holiday/vacation plans. Tuition reimbursement. Employee Referral Bonus Program. Ongoing training opportunities. Visible, exciting work supporting the sales of cutting edge technology and workflow solutions.KMBS is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",Level  Remote Support Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/level-2-remote-support-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-167245477.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,,e89b2b19a3bacbe7222e6bdfbc73b459
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:13:18:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"KAG West, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Mechanics out of Richmond,CA. Apply Today!Advantages to joining our teamCompetitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental, & Vision plans Paid vacations & holidays 401K with company match Paid training Paid uniforms Tool allowance Mechanic/Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!We hope your career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your career, consider a position that fits your life with Kenan Advantage Group.Mechanic High school diploma or GED equivalent 1 year minimum verifiable experience performing general mechanical work including maintenance and repair experience or equivalent qualifications Complete set of hand and air powered tools up to, and including, "" drive Valid driver's license Technical school experience preferredCall 800-871-4581 for more information or apply today!Kenan Advantage Group, and its subsidiaries, is North America's largest liquid bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum and specialty products industries. We operate in 125 fixed based, over 175 satellite locations and over 5,900 trucks.",Mechanic - KAGW Job in Brisbane,Full Time Employee,"Brisbane, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanic-kagw-job-brisbane-ca-us-167862504.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=9,,Logistics/Transportation,a19dbe7735734dc7e0ac6f0fe902bfd0
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:13:06:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Logistics Management Specialist III - Item Management (G4-16-0786-F)Bowhead is hiring a LOG Mgmt Spec III - Item Management professional responsible for the operation and supervision of the Warehousing Management Systems (WMS). Must have ability to apply and train the basic concepts of efficient supply chain management. This candidate will be responsible for onsite surveillance/management of all material assets with a focus on sensitive items and all items specifically cited by the customer. Routinely assesses processes and procedures to ensure compliance with DOD regulations within all stages of the operation.Supervises the material management team. Receives records from GCSS-Army to identify declared excesses within the US Army Reserve. Identifies and contacts the responsible wholesale item manager to request disposition instructions. Employs a variety of communication methods to include email and telephonic communication to obtain and track disposition instructions from wholesale item managers. Uses Microsoft Outlook, Microsoft Excel, Army ILAP, GCSS Army, and Decision Support Tool (DST), to manage reports of excess for Class II, IIIP, IV, VII, and IX supplies and equipment posted to GCSS Army.Essential functions will include:• Provide technical analysis for specialized logistical related projects or activities in the fielding and implementation of the GCSS• Develops technical briefings and presentations; delivers presentations to peers, subordinates, and user representatives• Identify problem areas and develop training materials to instruct system users at all levels and report problems to US Army GCSS fielding services. Training materials developed would be further developed for US ARMY, US ARMY RESERVE, and Other DoD users• Identify, track, and manage items into the system to perform analysis on the GCSS work flow to ensure correctness in the handling of all inventory components and to identify problem areas in the system• Once issues, concerns, and problem areas are identified in the GCSS, develop corrective actions and recommendations for the total implementation to US Army Reserve users.• Act as a single point of contact for technical matters to ensure system deployment and user satisfaction with end product, act as the technical representative for assigned customers• Provide supervision and management responsibilities to material management deployment team• Degree a plus, not required• 10 years’ experience in a Logistics Environment performing business processes to include Tactical Logistics Systems, GCSS-Army, supply, maintenance, transportation/distribution, funding, force structure, organization, mission and logistical processes.• Education Knowledge and experience working within the Army Reserve Global Combat Services Support – Army (GCSS-Army) Supply Operations, Gateway/Department of Defense Activity Address Code (DODAAC) Operations, and Property Book Unit Supply Enhanced (PBUSE)/Unit Supply Enhanced (USE) Support Operations.• Experience in supporting tactical and non-tactical logistics activities in support of Active Army, National Guard, and the US Army Reserve Components.• Possess knowledge of and experience applying key Army business processes for item managers: review and maintain data, perform demand planning, perform supply planning, execute supply actions, process requisitions and orders, and perform budget stratification.SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIRED: Must be able to maintain a security clearance at the Secret level. US Citizenship is a requirement for Secret clearance at this location.Physical Demands: The office environmental conditions consist of computer stations and desks with adequate and adjustable lighting. Chairs are designed to fit the various individuals and the tasks being performed. Ergonomic evaluations are completed as needed, to provide up to date modifications to all work stations.Applicants may be subject to a pre-employment drug & alcohol screening and/or random drug screen, and must follow UIC’s Non-DOT Drug & Alcohol Testing Program requirements. If the position requires, an applicant must pass a pre-employment criminal background history check. All post-secondary education listed on the applicant’s resume/application may be subject to verification.Where driving may be required or where a rental car must be obtained for business travel purposes, applicants must have a valid driver license for this position and will be subject to verification. In addition, the applicant must pass an in-house, online, driving course to be authorized to drive for company purposes.UIC is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, age, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics EOE/AA/M/F/D/V. In furtherance, pursuant to The Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act 43 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq., and federal contractual requirements, UIC and its subsidiaries may legally grant certain preference in employment opportunities to UIC Shareholders and their Descendants, based on the provisions contained within The Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act.All candidates must apply online at www.uicalaska.com, and submit a completed application for all positions they wish to be considered. Once the employment application has been completed and submitted, any changes to the application after submission may not be reviewed. Please contact a UIC HR Recruiter if you have made a significant change to your application. In accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (ADA), persons unable to complete an online application should contact UIC Human Resources for assistance (http://www.uicalaska.com/contact-us/human-resources/).UIC Government Services (UICGS / Bowhead) provides innovative business solutions to federal and commercial customers in the areas of engineering, maintenance services, information technology, program support, logistics/base support, and procurement. Collectively, the fast-growing Bowhead Family of Companies offers a breadth of services which are performed with a focus on quality results. Headquartered in Alexandria, VA, we are a fast-growing, multi-million-dollar corporation recognized as one of the top 25 8(a) companies for government contracting.^ Link to Apply: https://rn21.ultipro.com/UKP1001/jobboard/NewCandidateExt.aspx?__JobID=16221",Logistician III Job in Fort Bragg,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Bragg, NC",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/logistician-iii-job-fort-bragg-nc-us-167861956.aspx?mescoid=1300084001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,c3aee90c9702c9d821227925ec479471
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:13:06:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Carbondale, IL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-carbondale-il-us-159709970.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=4,,Logistics/Transportation,8f8af92b116c8f5490490fec425c8c61
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:13:00:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Level 1 Remote Support Engineer Area of Interest: Engineering Department: 960000 - All Covered City: Atlanta State: Georgia Job Description: All Covered, a division of Konica Minolta, is focused on enabling the success of small and medium-sized businesses through the effective use and management of technology. The company is the US industry leader in the provision of IT Services for companies with between 10 and 100 employees. Our company serves 37 of the top 100 cities in the US and has thousands of clients across every major industry.Our comprehensive services, including network, server and desktop support, are delivered by a world-class team of technical experts. They possess a broad-based knowledge and take a vendor neutral approach. Our success with over 1,000 contracted clients has created a need for outstanding IT talent looking for exciting and lucrative career opportunities.Our culture is based on a core team of professionals always striving to deliver the best solutions for our clients. We value honesty, enthusiasm, respect, ownership, excellence and a service oriented attitude. This culture is essential to our success, distinguishing us from our competition and enabling us to hire and retain the best and brightest people in this business.The Remote Support Center Level 2 Engineer position is a mid-level technical position based in one of our Remote Support Centers (RSC). The RSC is a group focused on resolving issues remotely for our nationwide client base. The L2 position responds to, resolves and escalates incoming technical client issues and requests submitted by phone, e-mail, or our client portal.Duties and Essential Job Functions:Provide expert remote desktop support, expert systems administration, and intermediate to advanced systems engineering support with a focus on:- Client satisfaction.- Service delivery quality.- Technical excellence.Drive to meet and exceed organizational goals for:- Cost Per Contact.- Utilization.- Customer Satisfaction.- First Contact Resolution Rate.- Employee Satisfaction.- Average Speed to Answer.Demonstrate strong customer service skills to provide phone support including:- Listening to the customer to gain an accurate understanding of the situation.- Being empathetic to the customer’s situation and having a sense of urgency to resolve the issue.- Producing accurate, detailed documentation at the client, problem and incident level.- Resolving conflict.Provide remote support for Level 2 issues (desktop, server and infrastructure support).Follow task creation, work, closure, and escalation procedures.Support team members with resolving client issues.Meet or exceed position Key Performance Indicators (KPIs).Serve as a technical escalation point and mentor to Level 1 Engineers.Producing and providing technical training to team members.Excel in the areas of:- Remote troubleshooting skills.- Client service skills.- Professionalism.- Punctuality.- Technical competencies defined for the position. Qualifications: Qualifications: Call center experience. 3 or more years of experience with troubleshooting and providing remote support. BA, BS or similar degree in computers/electronics or relevant experience. At least one of the following industry certifications is required:- MCTS/MCP Server 2008 or above- MCTS/MCP Exchange 2007 or above- CompTIA Server+- Cisco Certified Network Administrator (CCNA)- Apple Certified Technical Coordinator (ACTC) 3+ years of experience troubleshooting the current versions of the Windows Desktop Operating Systems. 3+ years of experience with administering of the following technologies is preferred:- The most current versions of the Windows Server family operating system.- The most current versions of Microsoft Active Directory.- The most current versions of Microsoft Exchange Server. A working knowledge of the following technologies:- Current desktops, laptops, servers and networking basics.- Current Windows Desktop Operating Systems.- Current Windows Server Operating Systems and services.- Windows Active Directory (User Management/Administration/Group Policy).- Current Exchange Server.- Current firewalls and security.- Common server tape and online backup solutions.- Common desktop applications including Microsoft Office Suite.Common TCP/IP services including HTTP, FTP, DNS, and DHCP. Hands-on software and hardware troubleshooting experience. Strong interpersonal, written and oral communication skills, attention to detail. Adept at reading, writing, and interpreting technical documentation and procedure manuals. Ability to present ideas and solutions in user-friendly language. Highly self-motivated and directed. Proven analytical and problem-solving abilities. Strong customer service orientation. Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment. Ability to type between 30 to 45 words per minute.Success Characteristics Honest, Enthusiastic, Respectful, takes Ownership, achieves Excellence, and consistently delivers quality. Service to team members and customers alike. Team player, flexible, adaptable, responsible, punctual, proactive, and self-sufficient. Affinity for and successful experience with small to medium size business environments. Ability to adapt and thrive in a constantly changing work environment.Konica Minolta offers: Competitive compensation program Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, life insurance) 401(k) plan with matching company contribution Excellent holiday/vacation plans. Tuition reimbursement. Employee Referral Bonus Program. Ongoing training opportunities. Visible, exciting work supporting the sales of cutting edge technology and workflow solutions.KMBS is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",Level  Remote Support Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/level-1-remote-support-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-167490715.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=14,,,e6f891b6da2a83ea3c941a50a190429f
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:12:59:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Route Service Merchandiser Original Posting Date: May 25, 2016 Refresh Post Date: May 27, 2016 Region: Charlotte, North Carolina Schedule: Full-time; not listed Salary: $12.50 per hour National Entertainment Network (NEN), a private equity backed company, is the nation’s dominant amusement vending service provider. Over its 29-year history, NEN has defined front-end retail and restaurant entertainment with a diverse portfolio of offerings including skill-crane games, capsule toy/confection stands, video games, and kiddie rides. NEN has over 55,000 machines in over 15,000 locations across the country.Starting compensation is $12.50/hour; after completing a training period, the compensation structure will be changed to a commission-based program which benefits RSMs who perform well.Essential duties and responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following: Drives company vehicle during scheduled daily distribution of product to machines at various locations on the route. Collects money from machines and records amount. Keeps daily record of product distributed to each machine, calculates number of vends and vend ratios. Provides quality customer service through regular interaction and communication with account managers, owner, employees, and player. Communicates status of machines and customer accounts to Territory Managers. Accounts for the security of all money, machines, and merchandise on the route. This includes reporting machine vandalism and theft as well as researching shortages/overages of money collected. Keeps machines cleaned and maintained in proper working order. This includes route maintenance as needed. Keeps daily inventory record of merchandise taken from warehouse stock. Maintains company tools in proper working condition. Listens to and resolves service complaints. Places product in machines to maximize presentation and sales. Cleans and performs routine maintenance on vehicle. Helps install and remove equipment from locations.Qualifications and Experience: Must be at least 18 years of age High school diploma or general education degree (GED) required Saturday work is required Cell phone is required, including the ability to text and/or email Basic computer skills is required Possess a valid driver’s license Successfully pass a Pre-employment Motor Vehicle Record check for the past 3 years Successfully pass a pre-employment fit for duty physical Successfully pass a pre-employment criminal background check Successfully pass a pre-employment drug screen Ability to regularly lift and/or move up to 10 pounds, frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds, and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds or more Be willing to work extra hours, weekends, and holidays as neededIn addition to a rewarding career, National Entertainment Network offers competitive compensation, a team environment, on-going training, casual dress code, health benefit insurance package, 401(k), PTO, holiday, and partially paid maternity leave!**To apply for this position please go to the following link to submit your resume https://home.eease.adp.com/recruit/?id=15284071 or call our toll free job line at 877-690-7266.If you are a current employee of National Entertainment Network and would like to be considered for this position, please contact your manager or Human Resources for information on our internal applicant process. An Equal Opportunity Employer: NEN does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, disability, genetic information or any other status protected by law or regulation. It is NEN’s intention that all qualified applicants are given equal opportunity and that selection decisions be based on job-related factors.",Route Service Merchandiser Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/route-service-merchandiser-job-charlotte-nc-us-167864760.aspx?mescoid=2700412001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,b9347e09394766f96bc242f91ad76d65
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:11:49:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Trojan Battery Company is hiring for the following positions at our Lithonia, GA plant.Currently, our open positions are: Oxide/Barton Machine Operators  Finishing Operators Formation Operators Here’s what is required: Experience in a hazardous material production environment Ability to work 1st, 2nd, or 3rd shift (shift premium available where applicable). Ability to work in extreme temperatures and heavy environment is a plus. Must be committed to safety excellence and have ability to wear all required PPE (including a respirator). You must be able to lift up to 50 lbs and stand for long periods of time. Ability to use hand tools and learn specific machine controls, gauges, etc. Ability to solve problems and recommend solutions. Ability to complete any required documentation. Highly dedicated with a proven record of excellent attendance. Forklift experience required for Oxide/Barton Operators; preferred for other positions. ***Please no phone calls.***  Feel free to visit our web site at www.trojanbattery.com to find out more about our company. To apply, please submit your resume via Monster for consideration.",Production Operators,Full Time Employee,Position Information,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/production-operators-job-atlanta-ga-us-141167062.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=3,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,dc7e09eae62e8e3f30812b17ab19433f
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:11:48:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-dublin-ca-us-167323015.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=12,,Logistics/Transportation,014ea1cb8f7c64c99f5d6ce077de5590
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:11:11:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"The  Account Director provides direction and hands-on leadership to the regional corporate recruiting function and owns accountability for the outcomes. Acting as the central point for planning, leading, and executing Pontoon RPO talent acquisition strategies to support immediate and future recruiting needs of the client business, identifying opportunities for growth and managing risk.  The key interface for this role is the client’s Regional Talent Acquisition Leader and the Pontoon regional Recruitment Manager.   The overriding objective of the role is to run the regional RPO business as an independent business unit, accountable for hitting the Pontoon budget for the year, client facing SLA and KPI targets and implementing strategies to grow the business with the client in the region. KEY RESPONSIBILITIES Key Responsibilities will include, but are not limited to:Collaborate with Regional Client stakeholders and functional leaders to develop and execute annual hiring plans.Sponsor initiatives to drive the availability of top quality talent within the region to ensure the delivery of high quality talent portfolio management decisionsDelivers in-house recruiting metrics portfolioCollaborates with Regional client stakeholders to build a competitive advantage through a strong internal and external employment brandManages regional recruitment budget.Ensure the Pontoon team develop and execute candidate pipelining best practices to support filling current Pontoon RPO staffing requirementsProactively manages, coaches, and develops internal recruiting team members to achieve Pontoon RPO business objectives and professional career goalsServe as primary escalation point for internal and external stakeholdersMeet regularly with client to ensure satisfaction and resolves customer service issues.Manage and motivate a team of on-site Recruiters (across multiple locations) and Support Centre Recruitment team to achieve prompt, effective and high quality service according to agreed SLAs and KPIs.Review metrics, reports, and pipelines to ensure SLAs/KPIs are met or exceeded.  Prepare and presents quarterly business review meetings with the client.  Cultivate deep understanding of recruitment best practices, recruitment law/policy, and emerging trends/changes in the industry/market.  Regularly communicate news to clients and proposes and works to implement innovations.Prepare and manage a set of monthly financial projections.  Review weekly performance to target. Participate in special projects and performs other related duties as required. QUALIFICATIONS & EXPERIENCE Essential Qualifications and Experience:Extensive experience in recruiting and/or talent acquisition, including in-depth knowledge of employment laws and regulationsExtensive experience of managing recruiters in multiple locations across a highly complex, fast-paced environment. Demonstrable experience of strengthening recruiting practices, developing recruiting strategies and implementing recruiting plansDemonstrated ability to hold people accountable for performance and resultsProven ability to collaborate and influence effectively across internal and client organizations, breaking down any existing barriers or resistance to change, and working across multiple countries.Developing and managing a recruiting budgetDomain expertise with current and emerging recruitment technologies.Industry expertise within the Software, Telecoms and Consulting space. Demonstrable personal expertise in candidate screening, assessment, and competency-based selection program development and implementationTechnical proficiency with MS Office suiteAbility to develop and deliver executive level presentationsExperience of working within Latin America.  Desirable Qualifications and Experience:Bachelor Degree in a relevant field, Master Degree preferred but not requiredStrong project management and organizational skills. Ability to balance competing priorities, complex situations, and tight deadlinesDeveloping and managing recruitment shared service environmentIntra-company collaboration with exceptional problem-solving abilitiesMix of Agency and In-house recruiting experience preferred but not required KNOWLEDGE & SKILLSKnowledge:Understanding of RPO and RPO ProcessesClient KPIs and SLAs; creation and monitoring; client and supply chain end to end recruitment process; Delivery channels; supply chain; direct; campaigns Recruitment technology; Recruitment industry; market knowledge; competitor knowledge; relevant recruitment sector and industry Relevant employment legislation Essential Competencies:CommunicationService Delivery FocusInfluenceTeamworkPro ActivityFlexibility  Skills:Leadership skills and business presence in an executive setting to better align with organizational peers and potential candidates for employmentAbility to build trust and maintain relationships with all stakeholders Relationship management; ability to build and maintain relationships at operational and strategic level.Negotiation and closing skills Preparing and delivering presentations, Report and Proposals writing Analyze and extract data, highly numeratePrioritizing and time managementAssertiveness; handling conflictAdapting communication styles; written and verbal Click Here to Apply!Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledAll qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability. ",Account Director - RPO Job in Norcross,Full Time,"Norcross, GA 30092",,http://jobview.monster.com/account-director-rpo-job-norcross-ga-us-167488750.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=9,,,266eb2ffd444dbfaaecc2072243143dd
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:10:55:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"International cosmetic surgery practice seeks an energetic Nursing Supervisor for our Atlanta, GA surgical office. Bosley can offer you an exciting alternative to the rigors of hospital nursing. Unlike traditional hospital work, you'll be able to develop one-on-one relationships with healthy appreciative patients. And you'll work daytime hours only, with no Sundays, holidays, no double shifts, no emergencies and no on-call.The ideal candidate must have 3-5 years of nursing experience. Plastic surgery or other outpatient surgical settings a plus. This is a hands-on nursing position where you will supervise nurses, medical assistants and other medical staff as well act as a hardworking role model. Must be a professional, team player, and willing to take initiative.Our excellent compensation package includes medical, dental, vision, life insurance, LTD, 401k, credit union and monthly bonus program.Must have current LPN or LVN license.This is a non-smoking facility during working hours. Excellent communication, coaching and mentoring skills are a must.Must be willing to take drug test and submit to a background investigation.Must have unrestricted work authorization to work in the United States.",Nursing Supervisor (LPN or LVN) Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30326",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/nursing-supervisor-lpn-or-lvn-job-atlanta-ga-us-166323850.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=14,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),21031108fada050653588d4e01b9dc15
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:10:54:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details:Position Title       : Project Manager - Business Ops / Service Improvement AnalystLocation               : Atlanta, GA 30319Duration               : 6 months – Temp to Perm Job Description: Requesting a 6 month contract with a potential to convert to permanentMid-level project manager (3-5 years experience)Customer Operations experience desired (contract fulfillment  and call center)Motivated, creative self-starter with strong interpersonal skills Requirements:The Service Improvement Analyst supports the organization by planning, executing and delivering initiatives that impact the Business Operations and Customer Care team.  The SIA documents current business processes and recommends, communicates and implements solutions for an improved future state that is required to support an initiative launch. This role interacts with business owners, training, communications and other stakeholders.  He/she uses sound project management, change management and business process analysis tools leading to increased customer satisfaction, higher revenue opportunities, and improved operational efficiencies. ResponsibilitiesSuccessfully manages projects according plan-of-record (e.g., expected outcomes, timelines, deliverables, budget)Manages stakeholder expectations & project progress using proven project management methods & toolsDefines, manages, & delivers project requirements by identifying key stakeholders, project deliverables, & forming an effective team that drives toward completion of assigned tasks according to the project scheduleOwns and delivers project  communication to all levels of Client Minimum QualificationsBachelor's degree in a technical, business, management, or engineering discipline preferredMinimum of 3 years’ experience in a sales/service or customer service environmentStrong knowledge of business support applications such as MS Office (Word, Power Point, Excel, Visio) requiredExperience in project management methodologiesMotivated, creative self-starter with strong interpersonal skillsMust possess excellent writing and presentation skillsDemonstrated ability to multitask successfully Thank you again for your time. If you are interested, please reply back with a latest copy of your resume in WORD format to my email id vikasv@askstaffing.com  along with expected pay rate. If you have anything to ask you can reach me at my direct number 678-487-8561. Looking forward to hear from you soon. Thanks and  Regards,Vikas VaishnavIT Resource SpecialistASK Staffing Inc., | Global Delivery CenterEmail: vikasv@askstaffing.com ",Project Manager - Business Ops / Service Improvement Analyst Job in Atlanta  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Atlanta 30319,Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-business-ops-service-improvement-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-167808210.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=15,,Project/Program Management,b7832fc6be4485c4b54f1b3f5eb896a9
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:09:47:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tittle: SAP HANA DeveloperLocation: Atlanta GALength: 6 months  Only on W2 Qualifications: • BA/BS in information technology or related field, MS preferred • At least 10 years of software development experience • 2+ years of Native SAP HANA Developer experience; experience with the latest SAP HANA versions is required • Deep understanding and experience with SAP Modeling techniques • Knowledge of HANA Security • Additional experience with front-end development, to include Javascript and CSS • Experience with Agile methodology and JIRA   Preferred Skills: • SAP HANA certification • Experience with a variety of leading reporting and business intelligence platforms across the SAP product portfolio and the overall BI and Reporting landscape",SAP HANA Developer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Tittle: SAP HANA DeveloperLocation: Atlanta GALength: 6 months  Only on W2 Qualifications: • BA/BS in information technology or related field, MS preferred • At least 10 years of software development experience • 2+ years of Native SAP HANA Developer experience; experience with the latest SAP HANA versions is required • Deep understanding and experience with SAP Modeling techniques • Knowledge of HANA Security • Additional experience with front-end development, to include Javascript and CSS • Experience with Agile methodology and JIRA   Preferred Skills: • SAP HANA certification • Experience with a variety of leading reporting and business intelligence platforms across the SAP product portfolio and the overall BI and Reporting landscape",,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-hana-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-167630700.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,8994e1b0c0ae952053f0bdd7796d4bac
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:03:45:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our client is looking for an Accounting Clerk with experience in accounts payable transaction processing, providing contract administration support and assisting with the month-end close process. Essential Duties and Responsibilities:Performs a variety of activities in accounts payable, and other general ledger accounts as assigned, Maintains all accounts payable records in orderly filing systemMust possess strong interpersonal skills and have the ability to effectively collaborate with other business functions both internally and externally!Minimum Education and Experience:High school diploma required and some college study preferred, with a minimum of three (3) years Accounts Payable experience is required.Must be authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis for any employer. Please forward resume to Saundra. PLEASE, NO PHONE CALLS We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1069535 Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office Suite 2010 & 2013Years of Experience Required:",Accounting Clerk Job in Suffolk,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Suffolk, VA 23435",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-clerk-job-suffolk-va-us-171807235.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3a68aa8c06039b1e02c8e2c37caf41a0
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:03:47:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., one of the world's largest insurance brokers, provides a full range of retail and wholesale property/casualty (P/C) brokerage and alternative risk transfer services globally, as well as employee benefit brokerage, consulting, and actuarial services in the United States. We also offer claims and information management, risk control consulting, and appraisal services to clients around the world.   Arthur J. Gallagher Risk Management Services, Inc. is the U.S. retail property/casualty brokerage division of Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Our advisors specialize by industry and coverage types—developing solutions uniquely tailored to individual client requirements. We deliver a full range of insurance and risk management products and services, including traditional and loss-sensitive coverages, captives, alternative risk solutions, and financial products to clients around the world. For additional information, please refer to Career Opportunities with Arthur J. Gallagher & Co. Position Summary: The Branch Client Service Associate is accountable for delivering high quality and efficient service to both internal and external clients by assisting with the Branch’s overall workflow processes and providing routine client support.  This role reports directly into either the Branch Client Service Management Manager or the Branch Client Service Supervisor.  The Branch Client Service Associate contributes to key business outcomes such as client retention, client satisfaction, enhancing AJG’s value to our clients and prospects, achieving operating/margin targets and fostering a culture of performance and continuous improvement.  Supporting the business priories of Production team members and the Client Service function. Adhering to efficiency/productivity and process standards such as data and documents requirements, timelines, tool usage, etc.  Assists with the Branch’s overall workflow processes. Creates documents, certificates, etc. using appropriate systems and resources, which may include communications, forms, certificates, reports, etc Additional Considerations:  Required:High school diploma or GED 1+ years directly applicable experience Proficiency in Microsoft Office Basic Math skillsDesired: Associate's degree, professional certification, or equivalent training and experience preferred.   Previous experience managing client relationships.Work Traits: Exceptional organizational skills.  Proficient in using technology as a tool to maximize productivity and quality.   Strong written and verbal communication skills.U.S. Eligibility Requirements:Interested candidates must submit an application and resume/CV online to be considered Must be 18 years of age or older Must be willing to submit to a background investigation; any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background investigation Must have unrestricted work authorization to work in the United States.  For U.S. employment opportunities, Gallagher hires U.S. citizens, permanent residents, asylees, refugees, and temporary residents. Temporary residence does not include those with non-immigrant work authorization (F, J, H or L visas), such as students in practical training status. Exceptions to these requirements will be determined based on shortage of qualified candidates with a particular skill. Gallagher will require proof of work authorization Must be willing to execute Gallagher's Employee Agreement or Confidentiality and Non-Disclosure Agreement which requires, among other things, post-employment obligations relating to non-solicitation, confidentiality and non-disclosure Gallagher offers competitive salaries and benefits, including: medical/dental/vision plans, life and accident insurance, 401(K), employee stock purchase plan, educational expense reimbursement, employee assistance program, flexible work hours (availability varies by office and job function) training programs, matching gift program, and more.   Gallagher believes that all persons are entitled to equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against nor favor any applicant because of race, color, religion, sex, age, veteran status, disability, national origin, or any other legally protected status.  Equal employment opportunity will be extended in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship, including, but not limited to, recruitment, hiring, training, promotion, transfer, demotion, compensation, benefits, layoff, and termination.  In addition, Gallagher will make reasonable accommodations to known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant with a disability, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the operation of our business. ",Client Service Associate Job in Burbank,Full Time Employee,"Burbank, CA 91501",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/client-service-associate-job-burbank-ca-us-171912614.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,909b2928faae69eda64c8bc6ae45f511
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:03:48:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior Financial Analyst in Washington, DC. The Senior Financial Analyst is an integral part of the development, management, and achievement of financial goals by: Analyzing reports to ensure accuracy Creating SQL queries Preparing reports Forecasting Assisting with the annual budget processREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Finance or a related field 3+ years of directly related analytical experience Experience with SQL Advanced Excel skills",Senior Financial Analyst Job in Washington,Full Time Employee,"Washington, DC 20004",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-financial-analyst-job-washington-dc-us-171745148.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=6,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),e3bd7b56c0126aa6b7a11a981ef3c777
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:04:10:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"AMG is looking for a knowledgeable qualified retirement plan expert to provide white-glove service and management of our client plans!  In addition to client plan support, you will also provide thought-leadership and guidance to AMG staff regarding qualified plan topics.We need someone who will: Develop, manage, maintain and grow strong client relationships Educate clients about plan operational, legal, regulatory and fiduciary requirements Consult with clients about appropriate plan designs, recommending plan changes as appropriate Prepare or review plan documents to ensure that plan language reflects client desires Plan and execute communications with plan sponsors and participants, including new participant notices, blackout notices, etc Train clients on use of online plan systems Plan, develop and execute participant education and enrollment meetings Provide client support for annual compliance testing, audits and regulatory filings Assist in client billing Coordinate selection of appropriate available plan investments Monitor plan investment returns Assist in resolving client issues including IRS and DOL correction filings  We are looking for someone with the following qualifications: Bachelors Degree Advanced knowledge of qualifed retirement/ERISA plans Certification(s) preferred; CRSP, ASPPA CPC or AIF designee 10+ years of experience in the retirement plan arena Advanced written and oral presentation skills Ability to research, synthesize and explain IRS and DOL regulations Knowledge of permissible plan investments Excellent attention to detail and organizational skills   AMG offers a professional work environment. Benefits include paid time off, multiple medical plan offerings, dental and vision coverage, company-paid short- and long-term disability and Life/AD&D 2x annual salary, Medical Flex and Dependent Care Reimbursement accounts, 401(k) Plan and bank holidays!    ",Manager,Full Time,"Greenwood Village, CO 80111",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-client-qualified-retirement-plans-job-greenwood-village-co-us-171748006.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=8,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),997cb147ce6caf618d1f5260e099d466
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:04:12:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Lending Compliance Officer who will implement and monitor the internal compliance audit monitoring program for the following departments: Residential Real Estate, Consumer Loan Center, Dealer Loan Center, Loan Services, Loan Documentations, Loan Adjustment and Commercial Hub’s to ensure regulatory reporting and documentation requirements are met. This position will also serve as the primary lead for all credit-related regulatory compliance, consumer, and commercial:This job will have the following responsibilities:Policies and procedures Risk assessments Implement new laws and regulations Monitoring- fair lending, TILA, adverse notices, flood, credit bureau reporting, data integrity, etc. The LCO consults and coordinates with Business Unit Compliance Officers, senior management, and internal audit department personnel regarding new and revised legislations and regulations, and revisions and new additions to policies, procedures and products. This position must maintain working relationship with the Compliance Departments and participate as a member of Bank’s Regulatory Compliance Committee.Qualifications & Requirements:Undergraduate degree desirable.  Mortgage banking courses highly desirable.  Possess strong analytical, communication, interpersonal, organizational and presentation skills.Work experience within the mortgage and consumer lending functions of a financial institution where the incumbent has gained an in-depth working knowledge of the following lending regulations: Equal Credit Opportunity Act (REG B); Truth in Lending Act (REG Z); Home Mortgage Disclosure Act (REG C); Real Estate Settlement Procedure Act (RESPA & REG X); Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA); Flood Insurance Regulation; Fair Lending Act; Fair Housing Act; State Banking lending laws, Fannie Mae/Freddie Mac/FHA/VA guidelines and the loan process from, underwriting through servicing. Incumbent must have a working knowledge of the lending function from product development to implementation. Audit, underwriting and secondary market documentation knowledge is required.",Lending Compliance Officer Job in Fairfield,"Full Time, Employee","Fairfield, CA",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lending-compliance-officer-job-fairfield-ca-us-171867774.aspx?mescoid=1300073001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e58c2aef7570fcc766f466a8c5231d48
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:04:56:22,No,jobs.monster.com,".TAD PGS, INC. is currently seeking an Financial Analyst (FP&A) for one of our clients in San Leandro, CA **Per Government Sector, U.S. Citizenship is required.** Company Description: Go Beyond. It’s more than a phrase. It’s the way our client lives and the way they work, the way they are seen by our customers and our employees. They never compromise on their promise to Go Beyond. It is who they are, for more than a decade they have delivered superior performance. They are known for our ability to combine know-how and technology quickly and effectively to create solutions. Join their team and their proven promise of integrity, accessibility and continuity. They want you to join them and Go Beyond. Job Overview: Take the lead role in managing the monthly, quarterly and annual financial reporting responsibilities, ensuring that the data is correct and that deliverables are met by the due dates. Manage the annual budgeting process, including both the direct and indirect elements of the business. Take the lead role in managing monthly Short-Term Forecast (STF) process, including maintaining consolidated STF file and input/submission into the HFM financial system. Major Responsibilities:Coordinate and prepare monthly variance analysis for Director of Finance.Manage and maintain indirect budgets, including working with budget managers to ensure targets are met.Provide senior leadership with current, accurate and complete data for making critical decisions.Prepare and brief weekly report to division and sector senior management.Perform indirect rate calculations, including absorption analysis and how it impacts the P&L.Maintenance of the direct and indirect rates, including interfacing with the DCAA.Development and maintenance of a man power financial model that compares the anticipated program demand with current headcount (supply).Updating quarterly Corporate Business Review.Development of complex financial models to support changing business needs.SOX reporting as required to ensure controls are met as well as ensuring documentation is updated.Participate and lead special projects, perform ad hoc analysis and drive process improvements within the Finance organization.Support internal and external customers, focusing on developing relationships that help bridge the Finance organization to those customers.TAD PGS, INC. specializes in delivering secure, reliable and rapidly implemented workforce solutions to the U.S. Federal marketplace, including U.S. Government agencies and their prime contractors. With more than 50 years of experience, TAD PGS, INC. has earned a reputation for accountability, a value that government agencies and prime contractors both demand and deserve.TAD PGS, INC. sources professionals for the full spectrum of federal positions, from administrative to management, and those contracts requiring extremely niche-oriented technical skills and the highest levels of security clearance.Apply Online $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Financial Analyst (FP&A) Job in San Leandro,,"San Leandro, CA 94577",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-fp-a-job-san-leandro-ca-us-171916153.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=16,,,f9d7c975293c22cb7d24f0d5bac48df2
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:04:57:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Grand Rapids, Michigan (MI) that is seeking a Junior Accountant. Summary: This position will focus on projects, ad hoc reporting, and general ledger. It will support multiple divisions, business ventures, and investments from a financial transaction perspective. Duties will range from accounting data entry, vendor set up, accounts payable, financial tracking and reporting, general ledger, account reconciliations, journal entries, and projects.REQUIREMENTS: Candidates qualifying for this position will have similar experience along with the skills and abilities to perform the duties mentioned Any relevant education and / or training will be considered a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Junior Accountant Job in Grand Rapids,Full Time Employee,"Grand Rapids, MI 49503",,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-accountant-job-grand-rapids-mi-us-171912385.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=14,"33,000.00 - 36,000.00 $ /year",Entry Level,a4706dda4c055931ff4f7049c58179e6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:05:47:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking an Accounting Manager in Alexandria, VA. Main Duties: Manage the day-to-day accounting function, including cash activity, investment reporting, AR and AP functions, preparing and recording journal entries, and preparing required financial activity reports Work closely with corporate accounting and federal budgetary accounting groups to facilitate seamless flow of data across groups for monthly financial reporting Perform analysis over financial data to help ensure the accuracy of reported balances Conduct monthly, quarterly, and year-end book close Prepare financial statements for fiscal and calendar year ends Prepare and deliver quarterly financial reporting packages as well as federal government financial activity reports as required Prepare and deliver semi-annual financial projections for the department to the federal government; to include monthly updates of actual results to projections Interface with all users of financial data, including the Internal Audit Division, Financial Operations, Support Mechanisms, Leadership, and external auditors Ensure compliance with corporate and FCC external audit requirements Implement and sustain an effective internal control environment around financial activity and reporting Work across divisions and support mechanisms to effectively accomplish team objectives Responsible for the management and operation of the Great Plains general ledger system Develop and maintain accounting systems that will accommodate various reporting requirements of GAAP, FedGAAP, and GASB Hire, train, and promote development of accounting personnel through direct management and corporate employee development programsREQUIREMENTS: 5 - 7 years direct work experience in the accounting field CPA certification strongly desired",Accounting Manager Job in Alexandria,Full Time Employee,"Alexandria, VA 22301",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-job-alexandria-va-us-171745154.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=4,"80,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),ed6e4d14aa5664e80af3b28207f84f4e
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:05:48:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We have an immediate need for an Accountant seeking employment with a Fortune 500 company, where you will have the opportunity for advancement with a company invested in your success! A Bachelor's of Science in Accounting, high attention to detail and a love for a fast paced environment will be the keys to success in this prestigious, well-known organization. As Accountant, you will be responsible for managing accounting systems and conducting financial audits, preparing budgets, reports, forecasts and statutory returns, and managing the organization taxation affairs. Great benefits and compensation - earn up to $55k! Do not wait on this opportunity - apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1070044 Job Experience:,,, accountant, accounting, accountYears of Experience Required:",Accountant Needed Immediately - $k - Work For A Fortune  Company!! Job in Newport News,Full Time Employee,"Newport News, VA 23606",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-needed-immediately-55k-work-for-a-fortune-500-company!!-job-newport-news-va-us-171913684.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fcb5f123bc8b4df260527f54ba29e904
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:06:55:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Great career opportunities at Fresno/AppleOne. We are recruiting for a local well known company, seeking top-notch payroll professionals. The company is currently recruiting for a Payroll Tax Specialist and Customer Service Rep. with payroll experience. These payroll professionals will provide support to business groups and assist with prep and completion of payroll and quarterly payroll reports. These positions will require strong knowledge of payroll for the CSR and payroll and payroll tax filing, preparation of amended 941/943 returns, quarterly & annual reconciliation of tax payments and returns, electronic file uploads to state agencies, filing for the Payroll Tax Specialist position. The ideal candidates must have the ability to meet deadlines & work with accuracy under volume pressure, excellent analytical, mathematical & organizational skills. Candidates with 3-5 plus years of outstanding payroll experience can forward their resume to the Fresno AppleOne office or apply at appleone.com, attention Mike Marmolejo. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Candidates with 3-5 plus years of outstanding payroll and payroll tax experience.Years of Experience Required:",WANTED Payroll Professionals: Customer Service Rep's to Payroll Tax Specialist Job in Fresno,Full Time Employee,"Fresno, CA 93730",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/wanted-payroll-professionals-customer-service-rep's-to-payroll-tax-specialist-job-fresno-ca-us-171916971.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),497bf8a5d1498b771db153472eb6c1a1
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:06:56:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking a Senior Internal Auditor in Reston, Virginia (VA).Responsibilities: Developing risk-based audit programs and performing audits to review accounting Preparing work papers Leading presentations or meetings to discuss audit results or provide overview of audit processes Writing clear/ concise audit reports that communicate risk management issues and internal controls deficiencies Reviewing the controls of new systems and services prior to implementation Conducting special examinations and projects and appropriately documenting the results of that work Identifying and developing auditing procedures and techniques that improve audit coverage and efficiency Coordinating with external entities to optimize annual independent audits of OF/ FICO/ REFCORP as well as annual SOC1 review Assisting with the development of the annual audit risk assessment and annual audit plan Preparing reports/documents for Audit Committee presentations, and assisting in organization wide efforts to prepare for annual regulatory examinationsREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Finance or Accounting from an accredited college or university 5+ years of experience working on assurance or internal audit assignments (Public Preferred) Experience in IT auditing preferred Experience in capital markets including securities issuance preferred",Senior Internal Auditor Job in Reston,Full Time Employee,"Reston, VA 20190",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-internal-auditor-job-reston-va-us-171745151.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=5,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),99dac6ad213ec82d55c5213c9a963a60
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:07:49:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Account Executive, Partner Management   -   ( 497121 )     Description   First Data is a global leader in commerce-enabling technology solutions, serving more than six million business locations and 4,000 financial institutions in 118 countries around the world. Our 23,000 owner-associates are dedicated to helping companies, from start-ups to the world’s largest corporations, conduct commerce every day by securing and processing more than 2,300 transactions per second and $1.9 trillion per year. First Data is committed to staying at the forefront of our industry, and we are innovating a wide range of next-generation commerce technology solutions to help our clients better detect fraud, gain insights into consumer spending patterns and build customer loyalty. There are many exciting opportunities for talented individuals who would like to join our team and play a meaningful role in helping us shape the future of global commerce. First Data Global Business Solutions (GBS) provides our millions of business clients around the world, large and small, with a broad range of commerce-enabling solutions to help them more effectively manage, market and grow their businesses. GBS solutions include acquiring, eCommerce, mobile commerce, marketing, analytics, and next-generation commerce innovations, including mobile payment services, webstore-in-a-box solutions and Clover, our cloud-based point-of-sale operating system that includes a marketplace for proprietary and third-party business apps. Position Description Overview Integrated Solutions Strategic Relationship Manager is the lead relationship owner providing strategic and consultative management and driving revenue with our ISV/Middleware and VAR/Dealer partners.. The candidate will have responsibility for client relationship growth,development and initiation of strategies to enhance and grow the partner relationship. This role is focused on increasing product adoption, growing revenue with existing Integrated Partners. Job Responsibilities Experience in sales and/or relationship management role with documented successful track record • ISV, Middleware, Var/Dealer experience with a proven track record of solution selling and ability to differentiate and drive value/revenue • Experience working with internal and external executive management • Demonstrated performance against quota assignments for multiple years • Possess a fundamental understanding of solution selling. Demonstrated ability to build and sustain relationships at a senior level with partners gaining trusted advisor status • Strong influencing and negotiation skills • Prior experience with ISV's, Middleware or VAR/Dealers preferred • Excellent verbal and written communication, negotiation and project management skills. Proficient with Powerpoint and other presentation software. Scope of Job Long sales cycle. C-Level (CEO, CFO, COO) sales. Autonomy Works with minimal guidance.   Job Requirements Bachelors degree or equivalent with 10 years sales related experience preferred. Degrees Bachelor of Arts First Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Females/Vets/Disabled/LGBT)   Primary Location :   United States-New Jersey-Jersey City-Jersey-101 Hudson Street Other Locations :   United States-Georgia-Atlanta-Atlan-5565 Glenridge Connector, United States-Texas-Dallas-Dalla - 1010 W. Mockingbird Ln, United States-New York-New York-New York-225 Liberty Street Job Field :   Long Cylce Sales Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Aug 31, 2016 Manager Level :   L4 - Upper Mid Mgmt/Director Employee Status :   Regular",Senior Account Executive,Full Time Employee,"Jersey City, NJ",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-account-executive-partner-management-job-jersey-city-nj-us-171788635.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6ede62895559939345758ac2190bbd53
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:07:50:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for supervising team and overseeing front-end depositing and posting of incoming money, as well as reconciling payments received. Team Lead will both supervise and actively participate in front-end processing procedures and tasks. Essential Job Functions (includes but is not limited to):Perform or assist in a variety of tasks related to maintaining the accounts receivable records, such as preparing customers statements, invoices and handle basic and escalated client inquiries. Additional responsibilities may include the following:Assist in the receipt and application of cash to customer accounts and invoices.Responsible for disputes in relation to Draw Accounts and Invoicing Statements.Verifies detail of transfer transaction, such as fund received and total account balances.Contact customers regarding payments, billing options, account reconciliations, and collections.Interact with other departments and perform special tasks to obtain and/or coordinate customer billing.Prepare and post refunds, credit and debit memos.Work with collections personnel to verify status on delinquent accounts.Open or close Draw Accounts as required.Analyzes and reports financial information timely and ensures accurate reporting for areas of responsibility.Follow and enforce all company protocol and controls.Ensure operational standards are followed in the accounts receivable and billing duties.Prepare monthly status reports for senior management.Report timely to upper management on all issues affecting successful processing and collection of accounts receivable.Develops good and productive working relationships with internal and external teams to Finance impacting area of responsibility.Adapts departmental plans and priorities to address business and operational challenges.Monitor team workload to ensure proper staffing to minimize overtime requests.Work with team to streamline manual process while ensuring audit controls are in place and working.Document procedures and changes to SOP.Participate in the selection and hiring of new employees.Provide training and guidance/coaching to staff and other department specialists.Set and monitor individual goals and performance measures, direct/coach and appraise job results. Provide timely performance and process improvement feedback to employees and facilitate ongoing training as neededConducts monthly one on ones, at minimum, and team meetings focusing on production and sharing of best practices. Participates in the scheduling of team building activities. Note: In addition to the Essential Functions, also performs similar work-related duties as assigned. Required Skills: Required Skills:Strong working knowledge of billing and financial processes, systems, controls and work streamsAbility to work collaboratively in finance environmentAdvanced knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite including Word and Excel. Knowledge of Microsoft Access is helpfulStrong leadership, organizational and time management skills.Meet firm deadlinesStrong attention to detailMust be able to multi-taskDemonstrate excellent oral and written communication skills with customers and colleaguesSelf-Starting abilityExcellent customer services skills Qualifications, Education and Experience: Bachelors degree in accounting or business related field, or equivalent work experience.5+ years of billing and invoicing experience.Experience with Great Plains or other billing and accounting software is preferred Required Experience: Travel Requirement, Working Conditions and Physical Demands: Travel not required General office environment. The work area is adequately lighted, heated, and ventilated. Working conditions may vary considerably based on assigned location. Office environment where the employee may sit comfortably to do the work. Some walking, standing, bending, reaching, and carrying of light items such as papers, books. Requires eye-hand coordination and manual dexterity sufficient to operate a keyboard, photocopier, telephone, and other office equipment. Normal range of hearing and vision required. The work requires light physical effort with frequent lifting and/or moving of materials in the 10-30 pound range. Must be a US Citizen, without dual CitizenshipsMorphoTrust is an equal opportunity employer.We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex,sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics",Supervisor Billing Team (-) Job in Franklin,"Full Time, Employee","Franklin, TN","Computer Software, Computer/IT Services",http://jobview.monster.com/supervisor-billing-team-2853-758-job-franklin-tn-us-171173449.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e3d9adf854b00c96a354938dc8b9c1b1
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:08:22:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 17568BR Job Title West Central Delivery Lead Location Texas - Houston Office Location Houston, TX Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description CDM Smith has an exciting opportunity for a West Central Delivery Lead.  This position is part of the leadership team of the West Central Group of the North American Unit (NAU) reporting to the West Group's Delivery Director, Ian Stott.  We are presently considering candidates who are currently based, or will relocate to a CDM Smith office residing in the West Central Area.  The key responsibilities of this position will be to: Lead, train, and develop project delivery teams working on West Central Group service and construction projects, such that annual revenue, profit and cash management goals are met Drive clilent satisfaction and repeat busienss opportunities through pre-eminent project execution Drive project quality through proactive, preemptive, and preventative business processes Manage the West Central Group's Project Portfolio Leaders and take on a Project Portfolio load equal to $20 to $30 million in annual revenue Support the sales process through the active development of leads as a part of the project delivery process Work effectively with West Central Group sales teams to support area sales and business development goals Identify, avoid and mitigate project delivery risks and know how to appropriately price residual risk Engage NAU, TSU, CCI, and OGC business partners, as applicable, and in a timely manner, to assist in project execution (e.g. legal reviews of RFPs and contracts, teaming agreements, JV agreements, financial reviews of potential teaming partners, quality reviews, pricing strategy, resource identification ect.) Foster a learning organization through teaching, coaching, and implementation of lessons learned Provide input and leadership during the annual budget process Drive staff retention, hiring and growth through improved staff engagement Manage the human capital needs of the West Central Group's delivery organization (ie. Project Portfolio Leaders, Project Managers, Financial Manager, and Administrative Personnel) Foster collaboration between TSU and CCI on project delivery issues, including the mentoring and development of TSU and CCI staff that may migrate to NAU in the future Manage the P&L of the West Central Group  in partnership with the West Central Group's Sales Leader Drive the business case for change in your own words and deeds **We are open to considering candidates to be based in one of the following West Central offices  - Houston, Dallas, Austin, El Paso, San Antonio, Ft. Worth, Oklahoma City, Wichita, Omaha,  Helena,  Denver, Albuquerque, Salt Lake City, St. Louis, or Kansas City**  Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree in an engineering discipline At least 15 years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management experience in Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors PE License or AICP Certification Demonstrated abiltiy to communicate and operate effectively with peers in a matrix-type organization Demonstrated leadership experience in organizations associated with Water, Environmental, and/or Infrastructure sectors Demonstrated understanding of financial project management tools and project execution policies, procedures, and best practices. Knowledge and understanding of Profit and Loss Statements. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Self-directed, motivated, mission-driven with a positive attitude. Preferred Qualifications Master's degree in an Engineering discipline and/or Business Administration 15+ years of professional experience in a project delivery leadership role and engineering management in Water, Environmental and Infrastructure sectors  PMP Certification Experience with Project Delivery Systems Experience in Program Management Systems Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 40% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",West Central Delivery Lead Job in Houston,,"Houston, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/west-central-delivery-lead-job-houston-tx-us-171209265.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=16,,,c0b4fd63ba3f705e76c1a4dc98e383da
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:08:59:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job The successful office of Grace Advisory Group is seeking a highly motivated Financial Advisor. Candidate must have experience in financial planning and / or investment services along with a CFP certification and Life Health, Series 65 licenses.If you are hardworking enthusiastic professional financial advisor but could use assistance in prospecting, we’ve solved that problem for you!  The key traits desired are the ability to proactively serve our clients, provide financial planning and asset management services along with the core fiduciary objective of helping clients understand and meet their financial needs. This is an excellent opportunity for someone who enjoys working hard while maintaining a balanced lifestyle.  This position offers significant earning potential.We are a boutique firm in the top 1% of financial planners in Florida with over 4,000 clients.  We offer proprietary products and strategies providing the highest lifetime income streams with the lowest taxes.  We offer life insurance, estate planning, tax preparation and legal document preparation.  Our Assets Under Management Division that offers institutional money management services.  Most of our team members are highly credentialed, i.e. PH.D., JD, CLU, ChFC, RFC and RICP®. Key responsibilities:Prepare financial planning materials for client meetingsCreate financial plans and proposals for new clientsManage client accounts, research and analyze investment opportunities.Continually evaluate existing investments, look for new opportunitiesHelp grow the business by hosting seminars Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree requiredCFP certification and FINRA 65 requiredHealth Life & Variable licenses Strategic thinker, proactive, self-starterAbility to manage self, priorities and client needsStrong computer skillsSuccessful track record    Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 239-481-5550 Address 13450 Parker Commons Blvd Suite 101Fort Myers, FL 33912",Insurance; Legal Services; Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-advisor-job-fort-myers-fl-us-170743682.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=18,,,3af29ec67dae7c00e6f44027052a2b76
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:09:00:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Sr Associate AccountingRequisition ID:150156TJob Category:Accounting and PayrollPrimary Location:USA-TX: TEXAS-IRVINGSchedule:Full-timeJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:RegularTravel:Yes, 10 % of the TimeJob Posting:Jan 20, 2016Description:Essential Job FunctionsAssist in the Insurance Premium Department, transaction recording, research and other dutiesDistributes invoices, posts batches, receives payments, processes accounts payable invoices, and mails accounts payable checks.Calculates moderately complex commissions, interest, and payments for each transaction; creates and distributes moderately complex commission statements for each transaction for closing.Assists in completing special report requests from internal and external partners.Assists in determining methods and procedures for new assignments to ensure alignment with department policies and procedures.Contacts other departments and/or outside agencies to resolve problems. Collaborates with other department in researching and escalating current and potential problems.Reports problems and other issues and makes recommendations to management to improve procedures.Maintains customer specific program information in tables, auditing orders and reporting; makes necessary corrections to vendor claims, and answers queries about the program.May provide procedural assistance to less experienced accounting staff to ensure company policies and procedures are learned and followed.Prepares and may post routine journal entries for company accounts in order to keep accounting systems accurate and up to date.Assists in and/or reconciles balance sheet and income statement accounts to general ledger; researches basic discrepancies and determines appropriate course of action.Develops spreadsheets for account analysis and journal entries in order to keep records organized and standardized.QualificationsBasic QualificationsHigh school diploma or G.E.D.Six or more years of finance administration experienceExperience working with generally accepted accounting principlesExperience working with bookkeepingExperience working with financial software packagesOther Qualifications3+ years experience with accountingBA Accounting preferred or Business related OR applicable experience Self motivated, detail oriented, Strong communication skills, both oral and written requiredComputer skills are a must, including experience working with Microsoft products such as Word, Excel and Access. Willingness to learn, follow detailed instructions and work in a fast paced office environment Ability to multi-task and stay on top of several tasks at the same time Previous insurance knowledge is a plus, but not required Organizational skills to balance and prioritize workLeadership skills Interpersonal skills to interact with team membersAnalytical and problem solving skillsAbility to work in a team environmentRemote Work Authorized:NoRelocation Assistance:Not AvailableClearance Level:NoneDivision:Global Business Services & Regions",Sr Associate Accounting Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 22042",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-associate-accounting-job-irving-tx-us-171695349.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6c81b50eb45dda9b0a498bf4bb18f09f
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:09:03:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mature Services, a nonprofit organization providing social services for older adults, is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Accounting Manager. Reporting to the Chief Financial Officer, the Accounting Manager supervises assigned personnel, and is responsible for various aspects of agency financial management, including AP, AR, payroll and cash receipts. This position prepares financial analyses, billings and reports, and is responsible for preparation of financial statements. Additionally, the Accounting Manager assists with budgets and audit workpapers. QUALIFICATIONS: A minimum of a Bachelor's Degree in accounting or a related field and at least two year's accounting experience is required. Previous supervisory experience is required; must be proficient in accounting software and have excellent Excel skills. The successful candidate will be a self-starter and have the ability to analyze accounts and financial statements; an understanding of detailed nonprofit allocations is a plus. Located close to downtown Akron, Mature Services provides high-quality programs to empower the economic, social, physical and mental well-being of adults as they age. We offer competitive wages, comprehensive benefits and the opportunity to ""make a difference!"" Visit our website (www.matureservices.org) and click the link to ""Join Our Team"" for more information! STARTING WAGE RANGE: $53,286 58,553 annually Source: Akron Beacon Journal",Accounting Manager Job in Akron,Full Time,"Akron, OH 44308",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-job-akron-oh-us-171809529.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=9,"53,286.00 - 58,553.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),b127de903d18db311678fb5e04b94c0c
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:09:55:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Management Analyst-Finance ***The deadline to apply is September 20, 2016 by 5:00 p.m.or when a sufficient number of qualified applications have been received. This recruitment may close at any time without notice.***The City of South Pasadena is seeking a dynamic, team-oriented individual who will work under the general direction of the Finance Director or Assistant Finance Director. The Management Analyst performs a wide variety of complex analytical, grant administration and administrative support activities in the Finance Department. Positions in this class may provide general direction to subordinate staff as assigned.Examples of DutiesThe duties listed below are examples of the work typically performed by employees in this class. An employee may not be assigned all duties listed and may be assigned duties that are not listed below:  Assists in the development and implementation of policies, programs and procedures through research and analysis; manages or completes a variety of projects involving research and analysis. Coordinates administrative activities for a variety of programs. Makes recommendations on policy procedures, workflow, employee training needs, and other work related projects.Researches, analyzes and makes recommendations on potential programs for funding under special grant programs. Administers grant programs, tracks, processes, maintains grant reimbursements. Prepares and administers grant budgets. Completes financial and narrative reports regarding grant-funded activities. Interfaces with finance and other city departments, outside auditors and funding agencies on grant activities. Assists in administering citywide programs and projects.Analyzes and interprets data collected and prepares periodic or special reports. Prepares written reports, visual aids, letters, contracts and other written documents and computerized reports as needed. May make verbal and written presentations to the City Council and to other public and private groups.Coordinates interdepartmental activities and issues as directed. Answers questions and provides information to City staff and the public regarding city policies, procedures and contracts.Conducts surveys, performs research and statistical analysis on administrative, fiscal/budgetary, personnel, and operational problems. Assists in the preparation of requests for proposal/qualifications services required by Department.May serve as a representative or staff on committees, review boards and management study teams. Coordinates committee activities, meetings, related responsibilities and assigned projects. Represents city with other governmental agencies and community groups as assigned.Education/Experience:Graduation from accredited college or university with a bachelor's degree in public administration or policy, political science or a related field.  Degree in Business Administration, Accounting or Finance preferred. At least one-year of increasingly complex analytical and administrative experience with a governmental agency, preferably within a municipal setting.  A master's degree is desirable and may be substituted for one year related experience. Grant accounting experience with an emphasis on governmental accounting and/or auditing governmental entities preferred.  Extensive experience with PC-based accounting software programs and Microsoft Office is preferred.1.    Grants AccountingReconcile grant expenditures with general ledger to ensure appropriate allocation of grant funds.Prepare journal entries for grant related income/expenditures.2.    Grants ReportingPrepare financial reports for regulatory agencies and maintain financial records.Prepare financial reports and reimbursement requests.Prepare monthly, quarterly and/or annual internal financial reports.Analyze grant expenditures for adequate documentation and compliance with state and federal requirements.Audit internal grant processes and functions for compliance with federal, state, and local requirements.Ability to:Communicate effectively both verbally and in writing; work independently; understand, interpret and apply related concepts; independently complete a variety of assignments; prioritize multiple work projects and meet deadlines; establish working relationships with other city departments, agencies, and the public.",Management Analyst-Finance Job in South Pasadena,Full Time,"South Pasadena, CA 91030",,http://jobview.monster.com/management-analyst-finance-job-south-pasadena-ca-us-171921179.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=10,"5,153.00 - 6,264.00 $ /month",Experienced (Non-Manager),53fec8c4f59fac359ae71352b6a4bb75
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:09:56:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Senior Internal Controls Analyst in Reston, VA. Principal duties will include, but are not limited to: Analyze key business processes, risks, and internal controls identifying risks or opportunities to further strengthen existing internal controls and/or make recommendations to management for new controls Oversee the tracking and trending of internal audit action plans through the assessment and reporting the adequacy of current corrective action taken Coordinate with process owners in preparation for corporate internal audits Conduct SOX management testing ensuring documented tests performed and peer-review results in order to maintain a high standard of quality allowing for reliance and independent re-performance by external auditors Maintain process documentation and test procedures in order to ensure accuracy and adequacy of test of results Develop short-term and long-term remediation steps to mitigate risk and assist with process owners the implementation of action plansREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting Minimum 5+ years of experience in public accounting and/or internal audit/Sarbanes-Oxley experience Strong understanding of internal controls, the financial reporting process and operations that impact financial statements Proven interpersonal and relationship management skills Demonstrated commitment to teamwork and partnerships across departments",Senior Internal Controls Analyst Job in Reston,Full Time Employee,"Reston, VA 20190",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-internal-controls-analyst-job-reston-va-us-171745157.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,"90,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),862fbea1804e1520d1f9985aee00f3d2
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:10:00:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"University - Finance & Accounting Majors (Recent & New Graduates)   -   ( 160000GB )     Description   About First Data           First Data Corporation is a global payment technology solutions company. We simplify the connections that make commerce possible through merchant transaction processing services, fraud protection and authentication solutions, credit reporting agency services, as well as Internet commerce and mobile payment solutions. Around the world, every second of every day, we make payment transactions secure, fast and easy for financial institutions, merchants and their customers. We leverage our unparalleled product portfolio and expertise to deliver solutions that drive our customers’ revenue and profitability. First Data currently has 23,000 employees worldwide, providing excellent customer service to over 6 million merchants and 3,500 financial institutions. Come join the team and help shape the future of global commerce.   Job Description: First Data is looking for university graduates with drive and enthusiasm.  The best & brightest will be the framework of the firm’s future; a pipeline of top talent for positions in our Finance, Accounting, Audit and Compliance groups.  Within these teams, you will have the opportunity to participate in complex projects that can have a significant impact on the business. Training curriculum, mentoring, and on the job learning will be offered in these entry level opportunities. Specific activities vary by assignment but could include: Assist with month-end financial reports; Balance sheet reconciliation Post journal entries, help with accounts receivable, payable and bank statement reconciliation Assist with audits and ensure compliance Work with the finance team on yearly forecasting efforts Preparation of various financial & analytical reports on monthly & quarterly basis Maintenance of client files & records Other duties as assigned.   Qualifications & Education Requirements: Recent graduate of a bachelor’s degree program or will graduate by May 2017. Finance, Accounting, Business Administration and Economic majors preferred. Minimum GPA of 3.0 (3.5 or above preferred) Must have advanced Excel and PowerPoint knowledge and have a technical aptitude to learn new applications quickly. Able to handle multiple assignments simultaneously and effectively meet deadlines Strategic and creative thinking; distinguished written and oral communications skills Must possess unrestricted work authorization and pass drug test/background check Please note: This is an advertising requisition. Our First Data Talent Acquisition team will contact applicants when a requisition becomes available in which recent college graduates can be considered.   First Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Females/Vets/Disabled/LGBT).   Primary Location :   United States-Nebraska-Omaha-Omaha - 6855 Pacific St Other Locations :   United States-Georgia-Atlanta-Atlan-5565 Glenridge Connector, United States-Florida-Coral Springs-Coral - 3975 NW 120th Avenue, United States-Maryland-Hagerstown-Hager - One Western Maryland P, United States-Nebraska-Omaha-Omaha - 6902 Pine Street Job Field :   Admin and Business Support Schedule :   Full-time Travel :   No Job Posting :   Sep 1, 2016 Manager Level :   L1 - All Other Position Employee Status :   Regular",University - Finance & Accounting Majors (Recent & New Graduates) Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/university-finance-accounting-majors-recent-new-graduates-job-omaha-ne-us-171788626.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3f14c5512bdc59c697e285640f5918b6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:10:02:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:We have an immediate need for 5 Mortgage Specialists, located in Minneapolis, MN. Below are some of the everyday duties you can expect to perform:-Receive and review all incoming documents, and verify for accuracy-Contact appropriate sources as needed for both inquires and follow up correspondence-Prepare, edit, distribute, and correct specialized documents for imaging-Basic data entry as needed Are you able to remain confidential when working with sensitive documents and information? Do you enjoy working in a fast paced, high energy environment? If you are interested in joining and exceptional team, dedicated to helping business thrive, please APPLY NOW! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Mortgage Loan Processor - Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Employee,"Minneapolis, MN 55402",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/mortgage-loan-processor-job-minneapolis-mn-us-171922430.aspx?mescoid=4300722001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8027c2788194db71b498b69a56e55be5
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:10:02:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounting Principals is currently working with a Parsippany, NJ client who is looking to fill an Accounts Payable/AP Specialist job in order to add to their growing team.  This position requires 1-3 years of previous full cycle accounts payable experience.  This is a long term indefinite temporary opportunity with great networking potential. Responsibilities for Accounts Payable job: •  Receive and verify invoices and requisitions for goods and services.•  Sort & match invoices with backup.•  Review all invoices & check requests to ensure compliance•  Prepare batches of invoices for data entry.•  Process backup reports after data entry.•  Resolve invoice discrepancies.•  Correspond with vendors and respond to inquiries.•  Prepare manual checks as and when required. The qualified candidate will have 1-3 years + of Accounts Payable/AP experience, excellent data entry skills, and strong computer skills including MS Excel.  BA degree is strongly preferred. If you are interested in this or any other Accounts Payable/AP Specialist opportunities in Parsippany, NJ or surrounding areas, please apply at www.AccountingPrincipals.com today!!  ",Accounts Payable Job in Parsippany,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Parsippany, NJ 07054",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-job-parsippany-nj-us-171916578.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=9,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,9b14bc4359c16b0e517fd70e6df4ef3c
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:10:55:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Staff Accountant - Global Company (Up to $57k)Global Hotel Chain is looking for a talented Staff Accountant to join their Corporate Headquarters located in Newton. The Staff Accountant will be responsible for all aspects of day-to-day accounting as well as the monthly close process for a portfolio of hotels. This will be a highly visible role with close collaboration with the Accounting Manager as well as Hotel General Managers. This is a great opportunity with an amazing team/culture and a clear growth track for career development. Free Parking provided! Responsibilities: Must be familiar with GAAP Accounting and have a strong understanding of the general ledger process.Handle the month-end close for a portfolio of hotels, including publishing financial reports and completing balance sheet reconciliations.Prepare and maintain monthly bank reconciliations.Review and research account discrepancies.Prepare monthly tax schedules for the state, county and local authorities.Review and approve hotel invoices.Assist in the hotel budgeting process.Assist with the internal and external audits.Perform special projects as needed and provide support to the accounting team.Other duties and responsibilities may be assigned. Requirements: Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Finance or equivalent field 1-5 years accounting experience Excellent communication and interpersonal skills Proficient with spreadsheets and Excel Strong analytical skills Ability to work independently Compensation: $50,000-$57,000 + 10-20% Bonus Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Staff Accountant - Global Company (Up to $k) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",BankingReal Estate/Property ManagementAccounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-global-company-up-to-57k-job-boston-ma-us-171792862.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,"50,000.00 - 57,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,099fbfde466e0e0dd1bb4287cd183d98
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:10:56:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in the Coventry/West Greenwich, Rhode Island (RI) area that is seeking a strong Staff Accountant to join their team on a long term temporary basis.Responsibilities: Responsible for application of all cash receipts via Treasury/Cash Management module in SAP Verify daily paid check file Research account coding through SAP personnel for cash receipts/check deposits which cannot be immediately identified Retrieve previous day bank activity for Lockbox and Bank accounts not uploaded into SAP via Internet Verify input of domestic site invoices via AR module for accuracy Coordinate with Accounts Payable to ensure all outgoing foreign transfers are recorded Prepare or coordinate preparation of all corporate bank reconciliations for domestic and international bank account on a monthly basis Archive Link administrator for Accounts Receivable department, (i.e., scan domestic and international invoices, link images in SAP, and verify that all SAP documents have corresponding image) Archive Link point of contact between users and IT for transaction, user issues and maintenance Responsible for the maintenance of general ledger cash accounts, including open item management accounts in SAP Prepare and maintain various general ledger account analysis, (i.e., unclaimed property, security deposits, and petty cash on monthly basis) Assists with monthly financial closing, (i.e., prepares month end journal entries to record reconciling items, ensure all items on bank statement have been posted, and verify that open item general ledger accounts have been cleared) Assists International Sites with cash application and provide support on research efforts Prepares certain schedules required for the annual financial statements' audit Assists in specific legal subpoenas to provide cancelled check documentation using two bank applicationsREQUIREMENTS: Associates degree in Accounting and two years related work experience Very good computer skills, including Microsoft Excel and Outlook Knowledge of SAPKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Staff Accountant Job in Providence,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Providence, RI 02903",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-providence-ri-us-171612251.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),dc13e2f4fae0371c12d978bdbd56b41f
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:11:49:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"var leftVal = (screen.width - 800) / 2; var topVal = (screen.height - 550) / 2; var winOpts = ""resizable=yes,scrollbars=yes,width=1000,height=550,left="" + leftVal + "",top="" + topVal; var winOpts2 = 'resizeable=yes,scrollbars=yes,width=500,height=600'; function popUp(pPage) { var popUpWin = window.open(pPage, 'popWin', winOpts); popUpWin.focus(); } function popUp2(pPage) { popUpWin = window.open(pPage, 'popWin', winOpts2); popUpWin.focus(); } var addthis_config = {""data_track_addressbar"":true}; Job Description About ACTIVE ACTIVE Network® is the leading global marketplace for activities and events, connecting participants and activity organizers, while offering unparalleled business intelligence through our industry-leading data solutions and insights platform that helps organizers drive increased participation and revenue.  ACTIVE Network annually processes nearly 100 million registrations and more than $3B in payments for over 42,000 organizers and 650,000 activities and events worldwide. Our enterprise-level ACTIVEWorks® platform offers organizers leading-edge SaaS technology that streamlines the administration of activities and events.  Our ACTIVE Network Activity Cloud™ platform combines data analytics and business intelligence tools to provide actionable insights that help organizers better manage their events and increase participation.  Founded in 1999, ACTIVE Network is headquartered in Dallas, Texas with offices throughout North America, Europe, Asia and Australia.  For more information, please visit ACTIVEnetwork.com and follow us on Twitter. Summary: ACTIVE is looking for a seasoned Data Analyst  to provide thought leadership in its Product Management Team. We are seeking an individual with high technical competencies who can drive best practices, building reporting efficiency, applied research and insight discovery. This is an exciting position in which you will be solving high-impact real-world business problems. Roles & Responsibilities: Partner with business and product team stakeholders to interpret analytics needs, identify KPIs and implementation requirements, monitoring results and deliver analytical findings Influence product and feature priorities by providing actionable insights and recommendations Deliver executive dashboards and reports, working closely with leadership and management Create process efficiencies through automation (report delivery, dashboard creation and data management) Drive a pipeline of challenging data analysis, while managing expectations with stakeholders Keep up to date with web analytics trends and best practices Skills & Requirements Experience, Skills & Qualifications: Minimum 3 years of experience designing web analytics solutions for Adobe Analytics/SiteCatalyst Experience with Adobe Analytics report builder Deep knowledge and understanding of how Adobe Analytics works in terms of the variables and their relationship to each other Ability to accurately and efficiently translate a client's reporting needs into a viable web analytics solution Ability to determine what the client's reporting needs actually are rather than simply taking a request and implementing it. Thorough understanding of how the solution flows through to reporting. Ability to review the tagging implementation and troubleshoot with tagging specialist to ensure the correct metrics are being collected. Demonstrated ability to work with both the client/business in eliciting requirements, and with developers to implement the solution. Experience successfully communicating with developers to ensure proper and timely implementations. Experience with implementing Google Analytics (especially Universal) preferred. Other Desired Skills and Experience: Experience with data analysis tools, stats packages (Excel, Access) Ability to work independently and in a team to produce innovative solutions to challenging business problems Attention to detail and data accuracy Strong client services mentality and consultative skills Superior collaborative and communications skills (written and verbal)  A minimum of Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or equivalent is required for this position. MS or PhD is preferred ACTIVE Network Perks & Benefits Competitive Benefits State-of-the-art office space in Downtown Dallas including an indoor park, tavern, ACTIVE Tech Shop and more! On-site yoga classes, groups runs, Daily Dose workouts/training programs and Morning Milers through our ACTIVEx Corporate Wellness Program Hookups and discounts for races, events, tickets, activity gear, bike purchase program and more! Give back with our ACTIVEx Charity Challenge partnership benefitting Kids in the Game Active Network is an equal opportunity employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.   ",Data Analyst Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-171838567.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d516c5972729c7a0d7a6f32e07f93d76
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:11:50:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition ID 17277BR Job Title Electrician Location Arkansas - El Dorado Office Location Dallas, TX Why CDM Smith? CDM Smith provides lasting and integrated solutions in water, environment, transportation, energy and facilities to public and private clients worldwide. As a full-service consulting, engineering, construction, and operations firm, we deliver exceptional client service, quality results and enduring value across the entire project life cycle. Job Description Location: El Dorado, ArkansasObjective: Under general supervision, plans layouts, installs, troubleshoots, and maintains all electrical components of industrial construction projects. Primary Responsibilities: *Electrical installation and testing of power generating and distribution equipment, rotating equipment and their associated digital and analog controls including micro-processor based controls, devices and systems, utility protective relays and controls, fiber optic cable, terminations and devices, communications and signaling systems, standby and emergency power sources, and other electrical equipment found in wastewater collection and treatment facilities. Build raceways, pull wire, terminate electrical runsTest and troubleshoot electrical systemsRead blue prints and electrical diagrams to determine scope, layout, and requirements of the jobGather necessary tools, materials, and equipmentComplete general paperwork as requiredGeneral housekeeping, clean work site when job completed* All CDM Smith employees must: Follow all requirements of the company safety program. Take personal responsibility for Safety in working environment. Promote safety among peers, subordinates and supervisors. Follow all requirements of the company quality management system. Take personal responsibility for Quality in working environment. Promote quality among peers, subordinates and supervisors.   Minimum Qualifications High school diploma or equivalent Experience: Completion of electrician apprenticeship;Minimum 4 years' related industrial experience; Area specific certifications and licenses as required;A current Texas Master Electrician license desiredOSHA required certifications;Thorough knowledge of electrical controls and distribution wiring;Ability to read blueprints and schematics;Familiarity with and ability to use the various tools required for the trade May require valid driver’s license; Preferred Qualifications Physical working conditions: construction site conditions - noise, dust, equipment exhaust, hazardous materials, outdoor weather conditions. This pPosition requires strenuous physical work: heavy lifting, pushing or pulling of objects up to 100 pounds occasionally and/or up to 50 pounds frequently. Equipment Used: Manual and power hand tools operating capability with light-duty and heavy-duty field equipment, backhoes, dozers, trenchers etc. Assignment Category Fulltime-Regular Amount of Travel Required 30% EEO Statement We attract the best people in the industry, supporting their efforts to learn and grow. We strive to create a challenging and progressive work environment. We provide career opportunities that span a variety of disciplines and geographic locations, with projects that our employees plan, design, build and operate—as diverse as the needs of our clients. CDM Smith is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status. Agency Disclaimer All vendors must have a signed CDM Smith Placement Agreement from the CDM Smith Recruitment Center Manager to receive payment for your placement. Verbal or written commitments from any other member of the CDM Smith staff will not be considered binding terms. All unsolicited resumes sent to CDM Smith and any resume submitted to any employee outside of CDM Smith Recruiting Center Team (RCT) will be considered property of CDM Smith. CDM Smith will not be held liable to pay a placement fee.",Electrician Job in El Dorado,,"El Dorado, AR",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/electrician-job-el-dorado-ar-us-171021854.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=3,,,8142682afd3016cabc99ecaf577094a4
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:12:58:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Accountant - Various levels of exprience neededRequisition ID:16004M4Job Category:Accounting and PayrollPrimary Location:USA-IL: ILLINOIS-JACKSONVILLESchedule:Full-timeJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:RegularJob Posting:Mar 2, 2016Description:CSC is looking to expand there already successful BPO Accounting Group that supports large Fortune 500 Insurance Clients in the Irving, TX and Jacksonville, IL locations. There are currently multiple openings at various levels. Candidates will be considered for each level based on experience. #1 ASSOCIATE ACCOUNTANT: Performs data entry, filing, and maintenance in order to support the department. Deviates from routine policies and procedures when required. Verifies cost accounting, accounts payable, and accounts receivable records in order to ensure accuracy. Uses office automated systems to input data to facilitate accounting tasks, generate basic and moderately complex financial reports, and respond to general inquiries. Balances complex ledgers to ensure accuracy. Collaborates with other departments and/or outside agencies to resolve problems. Reports problems and other issues and makes recommendations to management to improve procedures. Provides assistance and general guidance to less experienced personnel.#2 SENIOR ASSOCIATE/ SUPERVISOR ACCOUNTANT:Assist in the Insurance Premium Department, transaction recording, research and other duties. Distributes invoices, posts batches, receives payments, processes accounts payable invoices, and mails accounts payable checks. Calculates moderately complex commissions, interest, and payments for each transaction; creates and distributes moderately complex commission statements for each transaction for closing. Assists in completing special report requests from internal and external partners. Assists in determining methods and procedures for new assignments to ensure alignment with department policies and procedures. Contacts other departments and/or outside agencies to resolve problems. Collaborates with other department in researching and escalating current and potential problems. Reports problems and other issues and makes recommendations to management to improve procedures. Maintains customer specific program information in tables, auditing orders and reporting; makes necessary corrections to vendor claims, and answers queries about the program. May provide procedural assistance to less experienced accounting staff to ensure company policies and procedures are learned and followed. Prepares and may post routine journal entries for company accounts in order to keep accounting systems accurate and up to date. Assists in and/or reconciles balance sheet and income statement accounts to general ledger; researches basic discrepancies and determines appropriate course of action. Develops spreadsheets for account analysis and journal entries in order to keep records organized and standardized. #3 PROFESSIONAL ACCOUNTANT:Business Admin/Accounting individual to assist with functions related to client projects: reconciliations, special projects, issue resolution, creating reports, etc. Accounting and/or Life Insurance experience highly desired. Good organizational skills required. Computer literate (specifically MS Office) required. Lite travel required. Assists the business process outsourcing development teams in gathering and summarizing data to assist in client evaluation. Accompanies the sales team, as needed, to client sites. Provides analysis and documentation of client requirements to provide appropriate data to outsourcing project development and implementation teams for client(s). Prepares work plans, documents project scope and reviews with client to ensure accuracy. Monitors project schedules to ensure timelines and deliverables are met. Demonstrates system setup to clients before system is finalized. Tests and analyzes system configuration against requirement documents during implementation and administration. Monitors processes and resolves participant issues; escalates as appropriate. QualificationsEXPERIENCE NEEDED:#1 ASSOCIATE ACCOUNTANT: Basic Qualifications High school diploma or G.E.D. Four or more years of administrative experience Experience working with generally accepted accounting principles Experience working with bookkeeping Experience working with financial software packages Other Qualifications Insurance Industry Knowledge: Life Policies-Experienced1+ year experience with accounting experience is desirable Previous insurance knowledge is a plus. Good personal computer and business solutions software skills Organizational skills to balance and prioritize work Good communication skills to interface with company employees Ability to work in a team environment #2 SENIOR ASSOCIATE/ SUPERVISOR ACCOUNTANT: Basic Qualifications High school diploma or G.E.D. Six or more years of finance administration experience Experience working with generally accepted accounting principles Experience working with bookkeeping Experience working with financial software packages Other Qualifications 3+ years experience with accountingBA Accounting preferred or Business related OR applicable experience Self motivated, detail orientedStrong communication skills, both verbal and written requiredComputer skills are a must, including experience working with Microsoft products such as Word, Excel and Access. Willingness to learn, follow detailed instructions and work in a fast paced office environment Previous insurance knowledge is a plus, but not required #3 PROFESSIONAL ACCOUNTANT: Basic Qualifications Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience Bachelor's degree in business administration, information technology, computer science or related field preferred Two or more years of business process outsourcing, consulting or systems implementation experience Experience working with information technology applications and infrastructure Other QualificationsInsurance Industry Knowledge preferred Life Policies Training requiredBA in accounting, MBA or CPA preferred 3+ years experience in auditing or accounting, emphasis in insurance accounting/SOX auditing preferred Experience with GAAP and STAT accounting preferred PC Literacy in Microsoft Office Suite Good interpersonal skills Good communication skills for communicating with support personnel and managementGood analytical and problem solving skillsPlanning and organizational skills to balance and prioritize workLeadership skills to provide assistance to less experienced personnelAbility to work independently and as part of a teamRemote Work Authorized:NoRelocation Assistance:Not AvailableClearance Level:NoneDivision:Global Business Services & Regions",Accountant Various levels of exprience needed Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, IL 22042",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-various-levels-of-exprience-needed-job-jacksonville-il-us-171606631.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),df258385566eaab13cd4344ce86765a2
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:13:00:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Seeking a talented individual to handle A/R Billing. This position consists of processing heavy billing and extensive customer service. All candidates must be detail oriented, self-motivated, organized, and a team player. You must have excellent computer, data entry skills (must be ACCURATE) and 2-3 years experience. This is a very high volume and fast pace office and candidate needs to be able to meet daily deadlines. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1070030 Job Experience:,, Must be highly proficient in MS Office: Word, Excel, Windows, Access. QuickBooks or comparable software a must.Years of Experience Required:",Accounts Receivable - Earn up to $k/yr Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time Employee,"Virginia Beach, VA 23464",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-earn-up-to-35k-yr-job-virginia-beach-va-us-171913721.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),20d118b0da1f5d35ade93ae04d3f20bc
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:13:47:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"var leftVal = (screen.width - 800) / 2; var topVal = (screen.height - 550) / 2; var winOpts = ""resizable=yes,scrollbars=yes,width=1000,height=550,left="" + leftVal + "",top="" + topVal; var winOpts2 = 'resizeable=yes,scrollbars=yes,width=500,height=600'; function popUp(pPage) { var popUpWin = window.open(pPage, 'popWin', winOpts); popUpWin.focus(); } function popUp2(pPage) { popUpWin = window.open(pPage, 'popWin', winOpts2); popUpWin.focus(); } var addthis_config = {""data_track_addressbar"":true}; Job Description About ACTIVE: ACTIVE Network® is the leading global marketplace for activities and events, connecting participants and activity organizers, while offering unparalleled business intelligence through our industry-leading data solutions and insights platform that helps organizers drive increased participation and revenue. ACTIVE Network annually processes nearly 100 million registrations and more than $3B in payments for over 42,000 organizers and 650,000 activities and events worldwide. Our enterprise-level ACTIVEWorks® platform offers organizers leading-edge SaaS technology that streamlines the administration of activities and events.  Our ACTIVE Network Activity Cloud™ platform combines data analytics and business intelligence tools to provide actionable insights that help organizers better manage their events and increase participation.  Founded in 1999, ACTIVE Network is headquartered in Dallas, Texas, with offices throughout North America, Europe, Asia and Australia.  For more information, please visit ACTIVEnetwork.com and follow us on Twitter.   Job Summary: We are looking for a Payroll Specialist, Supervisor that will ensure accurate processing and recording of company’s payroll, provide timely and accurate financial information, participate in daily data entry Payroll processing. This position will impact a rapidly growing organization and offers career development opportunities for the right candidate. Responsibilities: Perform daily payroll department operations Manage workflow to ensure all payroll transactions are processed accurately and timely Reconcile payroll prior to transmission and validate confirmed reports Understand proper taxation of employer paid benefits Process correct garnishment calculations and compliance Process accurate and timely year-end reporting when necessary (W-2, W-2c, etc) Develop ad hoc financial and operational reporting as needed Process manual check and relocation metric’s Respond to payroll related inquiries   Skills & Requirements Bachelor's Degree Required CPP preferred but not required. 4-6 years experience processing multi-state and International payroll. Working knowledge of payroll best practices. Strong knowledge of federal and state regulations. Strong PC skills including proficiency in Excel. Working knowledge of ADP. Strong work ethic and team player. High degree of professionalism. Ability to deal sensitively with confidential material Strong interpersonal (verbal and written) communication skills. Ability to communicate with various levels of management. Decision-making, problem-solving, and analytical skills. Organizational, multi-tasking, and prioritizing skills. ACTIVE Network Perks & Benefits Competitive Benefits State-of-the-art office space in Downtown Dallas including an indoor park, tavern, ACTIVE Tech Shop and more! On-site yoga classes, groups runs, Daily Dose workouts/training programs and Morning Milers through our ACTIVEx Corporate Wellness Program Hookups and discounts for races, events, tickets, activity gear, bike purchase program and more! Give back with our ACTIVEx Charity Challenge partnership benefitting Kids in the Game Active Network is an equal opportunity employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.   ",Payroll Supervisor Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-supervisor-job-dallas-tx-us-171838574.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),60fb175a262d523bcaa8b45cfccd7b7f
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:13:47:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Newark,Full Time,"Newark, NJ 07102",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-newark-nj-us-171595083.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,e3acf34d3932498da7a42ca0e0a2a1f7
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:14:12:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job <!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536859905 -1073711037 9 0 511 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 268435456 0 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Cambria Math""; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1107305727 0 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-520092929 1073786111 9 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1073743103 0 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-font-alt:""ＭＳ 明朝""; mso-font-charset:128; mso-generic-font-family:modern; mso-font-pitch:fixed; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1791491579 18 0 131231 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-parent:""""; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:17.3pt; margin-bottom:.0001pt; text-indent:-17.3pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:11.0pt; font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p {mso-style-priority:99; mso-margin-top-alt:auto; margin-right:0in; mso-margin-bottom-alt:auto; margin-left:0in; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-fareast-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11, li.ColorfulList-Accent11, div.ColorfulList-Accent11 {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpFirst, li.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpFirst, div.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpFirst {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11CxSpFirst""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpMiddle, li.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpMiddle, div.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpMiddle {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11CxSpMiddle""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpLast, li.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpLast, div.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpLast {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11CxSpLast""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} .MsoChpDefault {mso-style-type:export-only; mso-default-props:yes; font-size:10.0pt; mso-ansi-font-size:10.0pt; mso-bidi-font-size:10.0pt; font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri;} @page WordSection1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.WordSection1 {page:WordSection1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:1774745527; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:172395062 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} @list l0:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l0:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} @list l0:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l0:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} @list l0:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> Financial Analyst - DFAS Reconciliation and Financial Services Support (Columbus, OH)  Ideal candidates will possess the following: ·      Experience with DoD accounting systems, DoD entitlement systems, audit readiness, and/or FIAR methodologies.·      Understanding of system/data flows and related internal controls.  Ability to analyze and evaluate accounting discrepancies/differences.·      Data analysis skills with ACL, SQL, Access, Excel, and/or other tools.  Experience analyzing and reconciling large volumes of data preferred.·      Familiarity with USSGL and DoD general ledgers·      Experience with performing DoD financial reconciliation  Requirements:  ·      Ability to multitask and work independently·      Highly skilled in Microsoft Office programs (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Visio, MS Project)·      Experience with conducting reconciliation of DoD financial systems ·      Analyze complex data sets to formulate trends ·      Compile data analysis to provide actionable intelligence results for leaders Experience & Education: Perform a reconciliation validation/gap analysis assessment. Determine the roles and responsibilities for each required reconciliation. Develop reconciliation remediation plan of action and milestones (RR POAM) for identified gaps.  Implement a standardized and audit compliant reconciliation process to remediate identified gaps. Develop, implement, document and perform a process for researching and determining root causes for identified variances. Education requirement is a four year degree from an accredited university or college with preferred requirements of a Business, Public finance, Accounting or related field. Practical years of experience may waive the educational requirement. The level of work experience is between 3-5 years. Primary Location:  DFAS Columbus, DFAS Cleveland, and DFAS Indianapolis, IN. Security Clearance:Candidates must be a US citizen and process an active Secret Clearance. “St. Michael’s is An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Vet” Report",St. Michael's Inc. Job Application for Financial Analyst - DFAS Reconciliation and Financial Services Support | Monster.com requirejs.config({ baseUrl: 'http://jobview.monster.com/v/Assets/release/js' }); var DYNAMIC_S_ACCOUNT = 'newjobsProdSeekerUS'; var DYNAMIC_S_CURRENCYCODE = 'USD'; requirejs.config({ paths: { //'amc': '//media.monster.com/js/sc/sitecatalystLL' 'amc': '//securemedia.newjobs.com/mm/rainbow/coda/ubd/js/siteCatalystLL' } }); require(['at'],"Full Time, Employee","<!-- /* Font Definitions */ @font-face {font-family:""Courier New""; panose-1:2 7 3 9 2 2 5 2 4 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536859905 -1073711037 9 0 511 0;} @font-face {font-family:Wingdings; panose-1:5 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0; mso-font-charset:2; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:0 268435456 0 0 -2147483648 0;} @font-face {font-family:""Cambria Math""; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1107305727 0 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:Calibri; panose-1:2 15 5 2 2 2 4 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-520092929 1073786111 9 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:Cambria; panose-1:2 4 5 3 5 4 6 3 2 4; mso-font-charset:0; mso-generic-font-family:auto; mso-font-pitch:variable; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1073743103 0 0 415 0;} @font-face {font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-font-alt:""ＭＳ 明朝""; mso-font-charset:128; mso-generic-font-family:modern; mso-font-pitch:fixed; mso-font-signature:-536870145 1791491579 18 0 131231 0;} /* Style Definitions */ p.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal {mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-parent:""""; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:17.3pt; margin-bottom:.0001pt; text-indent:-17.3pt; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:11.0pt; font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p {mso-style-priority:99; mso-margin-top-alt:auto; margin-right:0in; mso-margin-bottom-alt:auto; margin-left:0in; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-fareast-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11, li.ColorfulList-Accent11, div.ColorfulList-Accent11 {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpFirst, li.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpFirst, div.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpFirst {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11CxSpFirst""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpMiddle, li.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpMiddle, div.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpMiddle {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11CxSpMiddle""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} p.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpLast, li.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpLast, div.ColorfulList-Accent11CxSpLast {mso-style-name:""Colorful List - Accent 11CxSpLast""; mso-style-priority:34; mso-style-unhide:no; mso-style-qformat:yes; mso-style-type:export-only; margin-top:0in; margin-right:0in; margin-bottom:0in; margin-left:.5in; margin-bottom:.0001pt; mso-add-space:auto; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:12.0pt; font-family:Cambria; mso-fareast-font-family:""MS Mincho""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} .MsoChpDefault {mso-style-type:export-only; mso-default-props:yes; font-size:10.0pt; mso-ansi-font-size:10.0pt; mso-bidi-font-size:10.0pt; font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri;} @page WordSection1 {size:8.5in 11.0in; margin:1.0in 1.25in 1.0in 1.25in; mso-header-margin:.5in; mso-footer-margin:.5in; mso-paper-source:0;} div.WordSection1 {page:WordSection1;} /* List Definitions */ @list l0 {mso-list-id:1774745527; mso-list-type:hybrid; mso-list-template-ids:172395062 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693 67698689 67698691 67698693;} @list l0:level1 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level2 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} @list l0:level3 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l0:level4 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level5 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} @list l0:level6 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} @list l0:level7 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Symbol;} @list l0:level8 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:o; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:""Courier New""; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman"";} @list l0:level9 {mso-level-number-format:bullet; mso-level-text:; mso-level-tab-stop:none; mso-level-number-position:left; text-indent:-.25in; font-family:Wingdings;} ol {margin-bottom:0in;} ul {margin-bottom:0in;} --> Financial Analyst - DFAS Reconciliation and Financial Services Support (Columbus, OH)  Ideal candidates will possess the following: ·      Experience with DoD accounting systems, DoD entitlement systems, audit readiness, and/or FIAR methodologies.·      Understanding of system/data flows and related internal controls.  Ability to analyze and evaluate accounting discrepancies/differences.·      Data analysis skills with ACL, SQL, Access, Excel, and/or other tools.  Experience analyzing and reconciling large volumes of data preferred.·      Familiarity with USSGL and DoD general ledgers·      Experience with performing DoD financial reconciliation  Requirements:  ·      Ability to multitask and work independently·      Highly skilled in Microsoft Office programs (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Visio, MS Project)·      Experience with conducting reconciliation of DoD financial systems ·      Analyze complex data sets to formulate trends ·      Compile data analysis to provide actionable intelligence results for leaders Experience & Education: Perform a reconciliation validation/gap analysis assessment. Determine the roles and responsibilities for each required reconciliation. Develop reconciliation remediation plan of action and milestones (RR POAM) for identified gaps.  Implement a standardized and audit compliant reconciliation process to remediate identified gaps. Develop, implement, document and perform a process for researching and determining root causes for identified variances. Education requirement is a four year degree from an accredited university or college with preferred requirements of a Business, Public finance, Accounting or related field. Practical years of experience may waive the educational requirement. The level of work experience is between 3-5 years. Primary Location:  DFAS Columbus, DFAS Cleveland, and DFAS Indianapolis, IN. Security Clearance:Candidates must be a US citizen and process an active Secret Clearance. “St. Michael’s is An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Vet”",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-dfas-reconciliation-financial-services-support-job-columbus-oh-us-171796798.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=7,,,7b6313fcb904f3ec9fddcdaceaac0282
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:14:25:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client, a mid sized telecom company has an opening for a Sox Manager in Alexandria, VA. Essential Functions: Analyze and document SOX issues, including root cause analysis, control failure identification, level of significance assessment for deficiencies and remediation plans Develop and initiate a risk assessment process; evaluate and make recommendations on results Develop and enhance accounting policies as required Drive policy compliance for all accounting policies Work with Change Management Office (CMO) to document key business processes, develop process flows, and identify and document appropriate controls. Identify key controls and then develop and update test plan for testing of these key controls Drive process quality improvements into the close process Assist in coordinating with external auditors and the SOX compliance function to eliminate duplicative efforts to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of audit activities Maintain a current level of expertise relating to professional standards and emerging industry and technical developments, including US GAAP, and emerging technologies and best practices Work effectively with department heads throughout the company while performing operational reviews for compliance, process improvement and/or cost reduction Ability to work independently, with limited required direction and guidance, and provide appropriate direction to other internal audit project team members Own SOX controls related to the Financial Statement Close process, including coordination and support for SOX processes and testing Understand the systems and applications integral to the close and their interdependencies Participate in critical cross functional initiatives which contribute to systems and process standardization and enhancement including optimization opportunitiesREQUIREMENTS: Demonstrated ability to work with all levels including senior management team Strong understanding of U.S. GAAP and application to a broad range of areas Highly motivated with the ability to drive to solutions and results Strong organizational skills; ability to work multiple priorities in parallel Problem solving approach and ability to work across organizations to resolve cross-functional issues Experience with ERP systems, MRI a plus Experience initiating process improvements Detail-oriented with strong analytical skills Excellent verbal/written communication, analytical, collaboration and leadership skills Education: BS degree and 7+ years of related accounting experience CPA preferredKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Sox Manager Job in Alexandria,Full Time Employee,"Alexandria, VA 22314",,http://jobview.monster.com/sox-manager-job-alexandria-va-us-171912376.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=16,"75,000.00 - 115,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),eb5d906e2071254a4beb3317e936bb89
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:14:25:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director Audit Data Analytics   -   ( 502371 )     Description   First Data is a global leader in commerce-enabling technology solutions, serving more than six million business locations and 4,000 financial institutions in 118 countries around the world. Our 23,000 owner-associates are dedicated to helping companies, from start-ups to the world’s largest corporations, conduct commerce every day by securing and processing more than 2,300 transactions per second and $1.9 trillion per year. First Data is committed to staying at the forefront of our industry, and we are innovating a wide range of next-generation commerce technology solutions to help our clients better detect fraud, gain insights into consumer spending patterns and build customer loyalty. There are many exciting opportunities for talented individuals who would like to join our team and play a meaningful role in helping us shape the future of global commerce. First Data’s Shared Services organization, which includes the Human Resources, Finance, Legal, Marketing, Communications, Finance, Strategy, Compliance, Legal, Security, Sourcing, and Properties functions, supports our mission to drive our clients’ success with industry-leading solutions, consultative advice and service. The Shared Services teams align with our customer-facing teams in a model that drives consistency, yet also provides the flexibility needed to meet unit-specific goals. Our Shared Services employees bring the domain expertise that helps First Data retain and grow our base of owner-associates, drive profitable growth, navigate complex channel partnerships, and build First Data’s brand equity. Position Description Overview This position will be responsible for the creation and delivery of accurate, relevant and convincing data analysis results to the Internal Audit team members and members of First Data management. The majority of the workload will involve creating analytics from scratch. The selected candidate must research and understand the application generating the data, map the data to the risk assessment and audit engagement objectives, build trust relationships with the data custodians and data owners, navigate logistical and technical hurdles in obtaining the data and then apply skills and tools to the data to provide the desired insights to support the audit engagements. This position can be involved with any data analysis task to support Internal Audit risk assessment, control testing or other assignments as needed for any subsidiary and any platform or system in the organization. This position will support knowledge sharing. both within the DA team and with the larger department Job Responsibilities Work with the audit teams to obtain data, design tests to support the audit plan. Scope of Job Any application or system in the FDC organization that contains data that would facilitate electronic controls testing supporting the annual audit plan. Autonomy To fulfill audit requirements, the candidate must work independently with the teams on an audit or assessment engagement to obtain and process any data not already in the Data Analytics team catalogue.   Job Requirements A bachelors degree is required with a major of business administration or computer science. Masters degree candidates will be given preference ten or more years experience in data analytics in a business environment with a progression in responsibilities. Competencies Statistic Analysis & Measure Degrees Bachelor of Business Admin Licenses & Certifications Certified Internal Auditor First Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Females/Vets/Disabled/LGBT)   Primary Location :   United States-Nebraska-Omaha-Omaha - 6902 Pine Street Job Field :   Audit Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Sep 2, 2016 Manager Level :   L4 - Upper Mid Mgmt/Director Employee Status :   Regular",Director Audit Data Analytics Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/director-audit-data-analytics-job-omaha-ne-us-171788572.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d18681e11282d84c7b56a74bb28daa22
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:14:48:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Seeking a Long Term Office Manager/Comptroller for a Restaurant Group! Meat Up Restaurant Group is a family owned business, which owns FlameStone American Grill.  We’re growing and are seeking an experienced, organized, honest, motivated and long-term office manager/comptroller to come join our team! This is for full time employment with a standard, 8am-4pm or 9am-5pm workday, Monday-Friday. We are looking for an office manager/comptroller with these qualities: -          Office Manager/Comptroller Experience (Restaurant Office Experience is a Plus)-          Experience with QuickBooks & Basic Bookkeeping -          Highly Organized, Detail Oriented & Able to Multi-Task-          Prepare Financial Reports (P&Ls), Bank Deposits & Handle Account           Payables/Receivables-          Computer Savvy & Knowledgeable in Word, Office, Bill Pay, Email, etc.-          Be Able to Perform Miscellaneous Job Duties & Tasks-          Be Able to Work Somewhat Independently But Be a Team Player & Work Well With Others-          Must Be Excited, Pleasant, Motivated & a Pleasure to Work With-          Looking for Long Term Employment & Have “Ownership” Mentality  As our Office Manager you’ll enjoy great benefits such as: -          Very Competitive Pay (Based on Experience)-          Health Insurance-          Paid Vacation-          Free Lunch & Other Meal Discounts-          Fun, Happy & Exciting Work Environment-          Working in a “Non-Chain” Environment But With Structure & Growth We invite you to bring your enthusiasm and experience to our team & we look forward to having you join our Meat Up Restaurant family. We want this to be the last job you ever have! Check out www.FlameStoneGrill.com for more information on FlameStone. __________________________________________________________________ PLEASE EMAIL YOUR RESUME TO | npappas@MeatUpRestaurants.com Corporate Office is Located in Oldsmar, FL.- Meat Up Restaurant Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer -  Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 813-336-6355 Address 3980 Tampa Rd Suite 205Oldsmar, FL 34677",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/seeking-a-long-term-office-manager-comptroller-for-a-restaurant-group!-job-oldsmar-fl-us-171800201.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=20,,,62d608f8643f4c7f8ded2748d0bac307
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:14:56:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Bookkeeper/Staff Accountant:Traditional CPA firm located in Franklin, TN desires to hire a comprehensive bookkeeper/accountant to be part of our growing team.  A good understanding of basic accounting fundamentals and financial statement preparation is essential to perform this function.Duties include (but are not limited to):Gather, organize and input accounting data from various sources (paper and electronic) into Quick-books and/or Accounting CS systems. Journal entry necessary accruals and related month-end or year-end items. Track and update fixed asset changes. Prepare and file applicable sales/use tax filings; payroll tax filings; business tax filings; 1099's/W2's. Reconcile bank/investment account activity. Work closely with other team members and Partners on various group projects. Engage firm clients in a professional and courteous manner.We emphasize team building and cooperation.  All candidates will interview initially with the firm Partners and subsequent interview will be with various team members.  Professional conduct, a positive attitude and a passion for serving others are the expectation of all firm members. Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 6157948881 Address 1650 Murfreesboro RoadFranklin, TN 37067",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bookkeeper-job-franklin-tn-us-171744685.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=10,,,5fe1aa417203b742e8faa6c5730b57a8
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:14:57:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"The St. Joseph School District is now hiring for the following position: Director of Communications The St. Joseph School District is seeking qualified applicants for the position of Director of Communications. Reporting to the Superintendent or designee, this position is essential to effectively integrating the SJSD ' s marketing and communications. Candidates should be committed to the mission & vision of the SJSD; have demonstrated leadership managing public relations and publication programs and possess persuasive oral, written and interpersonal communication skills. Apply: www.sjsd.k12.mo.us EOE As published in the St. Joseph News-Press",Director of Communication Job in Saint Joseph,Full Time,"Saint Joseph, MO 64501",All,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-communication-job-saint-joseph-mo-us-171833687.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=5,,,93c0118edeb7ccdfff7c104acdec6638
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:09:46:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Atlanta, Georgia (GA) that is looking for a Senior Node Developer to help them build their off-platform applications for content. This is a 6-month contract that could go permanent.REQUIREMENTS: Must have at least 5 years of experience on frontend and backend Must have full-stack knowledgeExperience with: JavaScript Node HTML5 CSS API",Senior Node Developer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30303",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-node-developer-job-atlanta-ga-us-167654201.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a26ebd751314e1fa6c57aadf3905350c
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:09:09:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Local Sort Supervisor (Part-time) trains and supervises daily activities of package handlers and clerks to ensure that all assigned duties are accomplished safely and timely.  Supervisors typically work Monday through Friday: however, weekend work may be required based upon the location and business needs.  Part-time management employees are generally expected to work 5 1/2 hours per day and are paid weekly.  Medical, dental, and vision benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents.  Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock purchase program, and paid vacations/holidays.Job Duties/SkillsCustomer service skills (internal/external)Phone etiquetteAbility to work varying shifts, additional hours and/or overtime depending on service needsMulti-tasking skillsPerform general office tasks such as paperwork, typing, and/or use of a computer, filing, calculating and use of telephoneGood cognitive reasoning skillsSelf motivationMicrosoft Office knowledge (ie. excel, word, wordperfect) Work cooperatively in a diverse work environmentAbility to direct the work of the other employees effectively Verification and submittal of timecards              Perform other functions that may be assigned                                             UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Part-time Local Sort Supervisor Job in Stevens Point,,"Stevens Point, WI 54481",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-part-time-local-sort-supervisor-job-stevens-point-wi-us-167857293.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,d0a0b49551a5835acdd1dc6e729619f5
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:09:09:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Train and supervise daily activities of package handlers and clerks to ensure that all assigned duties are accomplished safely and timely.  Supervisors typically work Monday through Friday: however, weekend work may be required based upon location and business needs.  Part-time management employees are generally expected to work 5 1/2 hours per day and are paid weekly.  Medical, dental, and vision benefits are offered to employees and their eligible dependents.  Additional benefits include educational assistance, 401K, discounted stock, and paid vacations/holidays. Job Requirements:Customer service skills (internal/external)Phone etiquetteAbillity to work varying shifts, additional hours and/or overtime depending on service needsMulti-tasking skillsPerform general office tasks such as paperwork, typing, and/or use of a computer, filing, calculating and the use of telephoneGood cognitive reasoning skillsSelf motivationMicrosoft Office knowledge (ie. excel, word, wordperfect)Work cooperatively in a diverse work environmentThe ability to work in adverse weather conditionsAbility to direct the work of the other employees effectivelyVerification and submittal of timecardsPerform other functions that may be assignedUPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS PT PRELOAD SUPERVISOR Job in Lakeland,,"Lakeland, FL 33801",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-pt-preload-supervisor-job-lakeland-fl-us-167857249.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Logistics/Transportation,d2bc47b465f7f90b0fe7961b4f3192d9
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:08:59:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a leading boutique investment bank located in Nashville, TN is looking for an experienced Investment Banking Senior Analyst to join their Healthcare team.Client DetailsOur client is a leading boutique investment bank located in Nashville, TN.DescriptionThe Senior Analyst is responsible for the analytical work in support of new business development and transaction execution, as well as assisting Senior Bankers in the development and delivery of value-added investment banking products and services to clients and prospects.Senior Analysts should expect a great deal of client exposure and will develop skill sets in the fundamentals of valuation, business strategy and client communication skills. Due to the entrepreneurial spirit of the firm, Senior Analysts are allowed to take on as much responsibility as they can successfully handle. In addition, given the firm's belief in staffing deals with smaller teams, Senior Analysts have daily contact with senior bankers. Additionally, Senior Analysts will have the opportunity to gain exposure to private equity investing through involvement on projects devoted to the firm's merchant banking efforts.The successful candidate will be responsible for the following:Performing valuation analysis and financial modeling for prospective and live transactions;Assisting in the development and production of proposals and presentations to clients and prospects;Maintaining M&A precedent transaction database;Industry and business research;Executing detailed tasks involved in all phases of M&A and private placement engagements;Interacting with members of corporate management teams and financial sponsorsPerform financial, business and market analysis with a special emphasis on reformatting financial statements and benchmarking key performance metrics;Other responsibilities and projects as assigned.ProfileMinimum 2-3 years of relevant full-time experience (ideally in a M&A capacity)BA/BS with demonstrated coursework in finance, accounting, or mathematicsExcellent computer skills (Excel, PowerPoint)Strong quantitative and analytical skillsJob OfferCompetitive Base Salary + Bonus + Excellent Benefits",Investment Banking Senior Analyst - Healthcare Job in Nashville,"Full Time , Employee","Nashville, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/investment-banking-senior-analyst-healthcare-job-nashville-tn-us-171258614.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=10,,,6d9ccdfc0ea56fb2606d3da3e3703a1c
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:08:58:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION PURPOSE-The District Human Resources Manager(DHRM)plays a key role in establishing a customer service culture by driving the effective execution of HR processes. The DHRM is responsible for the planning and delivery of processes for talent management, performance management, and associate engagement for a district of 6-12 stores, with the goal of developing a workforce that achieves excellence in driving business results, customer service, and Company Values. DHRMs provide coaching and advisement to district/regional leaders, store leaders, and Associate Support Department Supervisors (ASDS). The DHRM also works as a contributing and flexible member of the district team by assisting other team members in meeting workload demands.MAJOR TASKS, RESPONSIBILITIES AND KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES – Ensuring effective HR Review, succession planning, and development of the leadership pipeline for the district –Ensuring consistent quality in selection, assimilation and training of salaried managers within the district –Providing coaching and consulting on development planning for district and store leaders –Improving workforce diversity – Coordinating hourly job fairs, facilitating RMA forums, and maintaining local hiring partnerships –Partnering with store managers on the selection and ongoing training of Associate Supports Department Supervisors –Monitoring the effectiveness of planning and executing for salaried and hourly training plans – Facilitating, monitoring, and supporting the performance management process in a timely and effective manner, including code calibration –Providing partnership and counsel on all terminations and demotions –Partnering with store leadership to engage and coach associates on the floor to facilitate a customer service culture –Ensuring effective use of Company recognition and communication processes –Conducting store HR Town Hall meetings and following up to ensure effective execution on issues –Supporting leaders in Employer of Choice survey administration, feedback, and action planning –Partnering with the HR Service Center on staffing, associate relations, and other transactional processes –Taking a leadership role in the execution of organizational change initiatives impacting the district or stores – Serving as a first responder for labor, workplace violence, and other similar events and partnering with the Regional Associate Relations team to determine next steps and ensure final resolution –Partnering with district leaders on strategic plans to drive business results, customer service, and alignment with Company Values – Supporting all aspects of HR during new store openings, closings, or relocations –Actively participating in store walks, district staff meetings and other operations activities with DM NATURE AND SCOPE DHRM position reports to a Regional HR Director. 6-12 ASDSs have a dotted-line reporting relationship to the DHRM. ENVIRONMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTSTypically located in a comfortable indoor area. There may be regular exposure to mild physical discomfort from factors such as dust, fumes or odors, temperature extremes, loud noise, strong drafts, or bright lights.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSMust be eighteen years of age or olderMust pass the Drug TestMust pass MVRMust pass pre-employment tests if applicableEDUCATION REQUIRED The knowledge, skills and abilities typically acquired through the completion of a high school diplomas and/or GED. YEARS OF RELEVANT WORK EXPERIENCE - 03CERTIFICATES/LICENSESPHYSICAL JOB REQUIREMENTS Frequent periods are spent standing or sitting in the same location with some opportunity to move about; occasionally there may be a need to stoop or lift light objects (typically less than 8 pounds). ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS Ability to work a flexible schedule PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS– Bachelors degree in human resources or related field – Analytical, with knowledge and experience in operational, sales and management. – Bilingual.KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, ABILITIES AND COMPETENCIES -Demonstrate Business AcumenDevelop TalentDrive Customer ServiceCommunicate EffectivelyManage ChangeInfluencing OthersHuman Resources ExpertiseStaffingTraining & DevelopmentPerformance Management $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",DISTRICT HR MGR- Broomall,Full Time,"Broomall, PA 19008",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/district-hr-mgr-broomall-pa-job-broomall-pa-us-171136624.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=14,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),faf60d9b84cac1609c87241f9d70a33a
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:07:48:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accountant– Plant Accounting A chemical company in Saddle Brook NJ is looking to hire an Accountant who is interested in a specialty chemical manufacturer, a well know company and leader in the business. The individual will be promoted and would need to relocate in the US within a year. Accountant Job responsibilities: Assist with the month end close as well as budgeting/forecastingCost Accounting: accurate inventory costing, review of manufacturing order reports for costing and investigate variancesPlanning, studying, and collecting data to determine costs of business activity such as raw material purchases, inventory and labor.Analyzing changes in product design, raw materials, manufacturing methods or services provided, to determine effects on costAnalyzing actual manufacturing costs and preparing periodic reports comparing standard costs to actual production costsReconciles finished goods inventories  Accountant Job Qualifications: Bachelor degree in Accounting or related fieldExperience in a manufacturing environment is must1-3 years of experience in accounting esp with cost and inventoryAbility to work and communicate with all levels of the organization is criticalAbility to lead a team and work well with cross functional teams  Please email your resume to inga.yusufov@parkerlynch.com for immediate consideration  ",Accountant Job in Saddle Brook,Full Time Employee,"Saddle Brook, NJ 07663",,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-saddle-brook-nj-us-167291567.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=13,"55,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,04a97fe36decc495dac0a4e4088bd3a2
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:07:47:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"SEC, Inc is seeking a motivated, self-starter eager to fill a role in our growing company.  We are seeking qualified applicants to fill a Civil CAD Technician position.  Qualified candidates possess the following: • Degree from a 2-year Technical Drafting Program or equivalent experience and civil drafting experience• Experience in residential subdivisions, commercial sites, roadway a plus.• Experience with AutoCAD is required, experience with Carlson Civil is a plus• Must enjoy working in a team environment and have stellar work ethic, good communication and organizational skills Will enjoy the freedom to complete projects with minimal supervision.  Benefits include:• Employer paid health, vision, and dental insurance • Paid vacation and sick time • Compensation will commensurate with experience SEC, Inc is located in Murfreesboro, TN and is an Equal Employee Opportunity EmployerInterested parties should submit a resume and references to mtaylor@sec-civil.com    ",Civil CAD Technician Job in Murfreesboro,Full Time,"Murfreesboro, TN 37129",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/civil-cad-technician-job-murfreesboro-tn-us-167304128.aspx?mescoid=1700204001001&jobPosition=1,Compensation will commensurate with experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),0ff89a37098f9d694a536255f8de48e5
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:06:56:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Finance Director - Travel Industry, ERP Implementation, Audits Job in Schaumburg 60173, Illinois US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Finance Director - Travel Industry, ERP Implementation, Audits Apply Schaumburg, IL Unspecified Job Details If you are a Finance Director with experience, please read on!Based in Schaumburg, IL, we are an established leader in the Travel industry. We are looking for a talented Finance Director to join our growing team. The ideal candidate must come from the Travel/Leisure/Service industry and have experience working in corporate finance in a multi-location setting. This role is heavily focused on our ERP deployment/implementation of our shared services center as well as data integrity, accuracy, and system controls.What You Will Be Doing- Assist the Corporate Controller in producing accurate and timely financial statements. - Assist in the month end closing and financial reporting process including account analysis and reconciliation. - Managing periodic financial audits as well as state sales/use tax audits. - Delivering critical data and analysis for budgeting, forecasting, and management reporting.- Assist in treasury management. - Finalize the creation of the accounting and finance shared services center and deploying the ERP across the organization.- Liaison between finance and sales, account management, and operations departments.- Assist in further system implementations or upgrades by becoming a subject matter expert.- Managing operational and financial data and ensuring data integrity and accuracy.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 7-10 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Travel Industry a Must- ERP Deployment/Implementation- Corporate Finance in a Multi-Location Setting- Data Integrity/System Controls/Accuracy- Accounting & Finance Shared Services Center- Month End Close/Treasury Management- Financial Reporting- Audits/Budgets/Forecasting- State Sales/Use Tax Audits- Financial Modeling/Problem Solving/Excel- Unit4 Business World/Agresso and Sabre Central Command preferred- Bachelor's degree in Accounting or FinanceWhat's In It for You- Competitive salary (DOE)- Bonuses - PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k)***Please apply today if interested or you can send your resume to me directly (Word format please): katy.bruce@cybercoders.comSo, if you are a Finance Director with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Katy Bruce is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: KB2-1287005 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Katy.Bruce@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: KB2-1287005 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Katy Bruce | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",Finance Director - Travel Industry,,"Finance Director - Travel Industry, ERP Implementation, Audits Job in Schaumburg 60173, Illinois US CyberCoders Search. Apply. Done. Learn more about CyberCoders Finance Director - Travel Industry, ERP Implementation, Audits Apply Schaumburg, IL Unspecified Job Details If you are a Finance Director with experience, please read on!Based in Schaumburg, IL, we are an established leader in the Travel industry. We are looking for a talented Finance Director to join our growing team. The ideal candidate must come from the Travel/Leisure/Service industry and have experience working in corporate finance in a multi-location setting. This role is heavily focused on our ERP deployment/implementation of our shared services center as well as data integrity, accuracy, and system controls.What You Will Be Doing- Assist the Corporate Controller in producing accurate and timely financial statements. - Assist in the month end closing and financial reporting process including account analysis and reconciliation. - Managing periodic financial audits as well as state sales/use tax audits. - Delivering critical data and analysis for budgeting, forecasting, and management reporting.- Assist in treasury management. - Finalize the creation of the accounting and finance shared services center and deploying the ERP across the organization.- Liaison between finance and sales, account management, and operations departments.- Assist in further system implementations or upgrades by becoming a subject matter expert.- Managing operational and financial data and ensuring data integrity and accuracy.What You Need for this PositionMore Than 7-10 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Travel Industry a Must- ERP Deployment/Implementation- Corporate Finance in a Multi-Location Setting- Data Integrity/System Controls/Accuracy- Accounting & Finance Shared Services Center- Month End Close/Treasury Management- Financial Reporting- Audits/Budgets/Forecasting- State Sales/Use Tax Audits- Financial Modeling/Problem Solving/Excel- Unit4 Business World/Agresso and Sabre Central Command preferred- Bachelor's degree in Accounting or FinanceWhat's In It for You- Competitive salary (DOE)- Bonuses - PTO- Medical- Dental- Vision- 401(k)***Please apply today if interested or you can send your resume to me directly (Word format please): katy.bruce@cybercoders.comSo, if you are a Finance Director with experience, please apply today! Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S. Are you a good fit for this position? Katy Bruce is recruiting for this position. Apply Job ID: KB2-1287005 Clicking the green apply button is the best way to apply, but you may also email me your resume in Word: Katy.Bruce@CyberCoders.com **Please do NOT change the email subject line in any way. You must keep the JobID: CC MonsterAp: KB2-1287005 -- in the email subject line for your application to be considered.** Thank you, Katy Bruce | Executive Recruiter | CyberCoders CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire. Copyright © 1999 - 2016. CyberCoders, Inc. All rights reserved.",,http://jobview.monster.com/finance-director-travel-industry-erp-implementation-audits-job-schaumburg-il-us-168163513.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=2,,,0796d67a4385937e05426b137b2408f2
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:06:55:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Payable Manager Job Opportunity in West Los Angeles - Ocean view!  Parker + Lynch is looking for an Accounts Payable Manager with 5+ years of experience for a booming retail company in West Los Angeles.  This is an excellent opportunity to supervise and gain valuable hands on experience with an expanding international company that offers a laid-back work environment just steps from the ocean!  Responsibilities: Oversee full-cycle Accounts Payable process Manage vendor relations and be the main point of contact for any vendor inquiriesManage travel expenses, and employee credit card reconciliations Assist with month-end close as it relates to Accounts PayableSupervise AP staff  Requirements: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance or related field5+ years of experience in Accounts Payable experience with 2+ years of supervisory experience in a fast-paced environment Retail, apparel, restaurant, hospitality or consumer products industry experience a plus! Superb communication skills and excellent track record for vendor relations  Salary depending on experience ranging from $60,000 - $70,000 annually + bonus + 90% of employee benefits paid!  To apply for this Accounts Payable Manager job opportunity through Parker + Lynch, please click ""apply now"" and submit your resume in a word document format.   ",Accounts Payable Manager Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90025",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-manager-job-los-angeles-ca-us-166437582.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=8,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,192d5ce99adefde3dbcea3d64719d23f
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:06:01:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is hiring for a contract to hire Entry Level Accounting Clerk in Indianapolis, IN.  If you are currently pursuing your Bachelors’ degree in Accounting, Finance or related field and are looking for a company with opportunities post-graduation, consider this outstanding entry level accounting opportunity here in Indianapolis! You must have a minimum of two years’ experience in a fast paced office environment with administrative support in both email correspondence and data entry. You will be responsible for managing the accounting inbox and acting as the face of the company toward clients and vendors. The salary for this position is $10 per hour and once hired on benefits including major medical and dental will be provided. Entry Level Accounting Clerk in Indianapolis, IN Job Responsibilities: • Manage accounting inbox for all vendor and client relations. • High level of data entry for processing invoices in both Accounts Payable and Accounts Receivable. • Assistance in basic purchasing, as needed for data entry and order processing.• Acts as a backup for Assistant Buyer.• Manages weekly spreadsheets for various departments. Qualifications:• Bachelors’ degree in progress in Accounting, Finance or related field.• Strong communication skills both written and verbal.• Ability to not just multitask but to also anticipate processes before directed to do so.• Ability to run reports, analyze data and prepare spreadsheets.• Proficient in Microsoft Excel.• Experience managing a company inbox is crucial. • Ability to work independently with minimal supervision and to prioritize duties and use good judgment. If you are interested in the Entry Level Accounting Clerk job in Indianapolis, IN or other accounting opportunities then please email your resume directly to jessica.craig@accountingprincipals.com. ",Entry Level Accounting Clerk Job Indianapolis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Indianapolis, IN 46240",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-accounting-clerk-job-indianapolis-in-job-indianapolis-in-us-168039317.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,7503bd2a5c6bdb075f28c321780376d8
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:05:57:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Billerica, Massachusetts (MA) that is seeking a Senior Revenue Operations Accountant. This position will work with other members of the Revenue Operations Team as well as with stakeholders from Professional Services (Project Managers), Divisional Finance, AP, FP&A, North America accounting, and OM / AR, performing the monthly accounting close and related analysis, as well as participating in ad hoc projects as required.Responsibilities: Perform monthly and quarterly activities in support of the financial close process including importing and exporting data, analyzing and explaining variances from expectations, and reconciling associated general ledger accounts Assist internal customers to resolve issues / questions on projects and activities related to accounts Lead efforts to continuously drive cross-functional improvements associated with processes related to accounts owned by the revenue group Research and resolve reconciliation issues and discrepancies; take corrective measures to mitigate while enhancing procedures to prevent recurrence Support system conversions and integrations of acquired companies Work with Order Management to ensure proper set up of projects and work with Finance to discuss results of projects Prepare and input general ledger entries Support external audit activities and audit preparation Execute and maintain supporting documentation for Sarbanes-Oxley internal controls Provide management with financial reporting information and operational supportREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree in Accounting. MBA, CPA, and SOX experience all a plus 2+ years of experience in public accounting or corporate accounting within a publicly traded company Intellectual curiosity and creativity Demonstrated success driving measurable improvements to process and systems Broad knowledge of accounting practices and procedures Solid organizational skills with the capacity to prioritize and multi-task Possess strong MS Excel skills Possess excellent analytical skills, goal / deadline orientated Must be detail-oriented and have the ability to multi task and prioritize ERP System experience including Oracle systems is a plus Project Accounting Experience is also a plus",Senior Revenue Operations Accountant Job in Billerica,Full Time Employee,"Billerica, MA 01821",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-revenue-operations-accountant-job-billerica-ma-us-168168981.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),180576836b3c4eef606e4e81ddaccc15
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:05:55:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONRandstad Professionals has immediate Anti-Money Laundering/Compliance positions in the Boston area for more than one company. These roles are ideal for someone looking for a long term career path. Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision plan, healthcare reimbursement account, dependent reimbursement account and commuter benefits. Position Description:Overview: We have been required to find sharp, well-spoken professionals that are capable of interacting at all levels and possessing strong verbal and written communication skills. This client takes pride in its ability to retain, nurture and develop employees interested in long term career paths. This company offers a strong quality of work-life balance and very strong training.   Responsibilities:Process financial transactionsReview transaction for AML typologies, red flags, and suspicious activityPerform Due Diligence on Corporations, Individuals, and Firms associated with potential suspicious activityPosses a strong level of accountability required to verify critical informationReview departmental mailbox for Unusual Activity Reports and escalate when necessaryProactively identify opportunities to stream line day to day processes and escalate as needed Capable of managing a high volume of dataIndividual contributor/team playerAble to prioritize and multi-task in a fast paced high volume environment while adhering to critical deadlinesAssist with departmental training and new hire training as neededCommunicating professionally and constructively to effectively resolve issues in order to minimize risk and exposureContributing to Management ReportingProviding superior client service, research and resolution Executing transactionsBuilding expertise in specific function within Operations divisionGaining efficiencies to improve individual productivityContributing to Division or Firm process improvement activitiesCompensation summary: $20 to $30 per hour commensurate.  For immediate consideration, please contact Sarah Lemelman at Sarah.Lemelman@randstadusa.com – 617-737-6165 direct line.",Anti-Money Laundering Specialist Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02110",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/anti-money-laundering-specialist-job-boston-ma-us-168135704.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=6,20.00 - 30.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,80a88f4999c40052894ad35a93223971
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:04:57:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Land Acquisition Analyst Location: Monroe Township, New Jersey Join an award-winning company!Toll Brothers, Inc., America's Luxury Home Builder, seeks a Land Acquisition Analyst to assist in the investigation and assessment of land purchase opportunities in New Jersey. This position will be based in our office in Monroe Township, New Jersey. The Land Acquisition Analyst will work under a manager to assist in performing sophisticated land use and financial analyses, participate in due diligence, including concept land planning, environmental, utility system, and title analysis. The Land Acquisition Analyst will have a Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Economics, or Marketing, be detail-oriented and highly motivated. The Land Acquisition Analyst will be trained to understand the dynamics and challenges of the New Jersey land market in the current real estate climate. The successful candidate will have a solid background in finance, marketing, business, or sales. This is an excellent opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6) - 2016in Quality of Products/Services Offered(behind Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)- FortuneQualifications:A Bachelor's Degree in Civil Engineering, Urban Planning, or Business. A Master’s Degree would be a plusHighly organized with solid analytical skills and understanding of complex financial analysisIf you are an aggressive, forward-thinking real estate development professional, don't miss this opportunity to join our dynamic team as we continue to grow as one of America’s most elite real estate developers!We offer an excellent benefits package that includes comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match, discounted stock purchase, discounts on mortgages, homes, appliances, and much more!  Come see why Toll Brothers has been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry! APPLY ONLINE TODAY!  As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",LAND ACQUISITION ANALYST Job in Monroe Township,"Full Time, Employee","When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Land Acquisition Analyst Location: Monroe Township, New Jersey Join an award-winning company!Toll Brothers, Inc., America's Luxury Home Builder, seeks a Land Acquisition Analyst to assist in the investigation and assessment of land purchase opportunities in New Jersey. This position will be based in our office in Monroe Township, New Jersey. The Land Acquisition Analyst will work under a manager to assist in performing sophisticated land use and financial analyses, participate in due diligence, including concept land planning, environmental, utility system, and title analysis. The Land Acquisition Analyst will have a Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Economics, or Marketing, be detail-oriented and highly motivated. The Land Acquisition Analyst will be trained to understand the dynamics and challenges of the New Jersey land market in the current real estate climate. The successful candidate will have a solid background in finance, marketing, business, or sales. This is an excellent opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6) - 2016in Quality of Products/Services Offered(behind Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)- FortuneQualifications:A Bachelor's Degree in Civil Engineering, Urban Planning, or Business. A Master’s Degree would be a plusHighly organized with solid analytical skills and understanding of complex financial analysisIf you are an aggressive, forward-thinking real estate development professional, don't miss this opportunity to join our dynamic team as we continue to grow as one of America’s most elite real estate developers!We offer an excellent benefits package that includes comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match, discounted stock purchase, discounts on mortgages, homes, appliances, and much more!  Come see why Toll Brothers has been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry! APPLY ONLINE TODAY!  As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",AllReal Estate/Property ManagementEngineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/land-acquisition-analyst-job-monroe-township-nj-us-167192174.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,31655e2ab785d914b2ee395b9fb6a0eb
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:04:56:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Security Operations Analyst $15.60 Performs a variety of operational tasks for moderately complex securities or cash related transactions. Duties may include :Differentiating, processing and reconciling transactionsResearching inquiresResolving customer complaintsReviewing time sensitive and/or less complex to moderately complex documentsRevising departmental proceduresCoordinates situations that involve other departmentsHas moderate customer contact Requirements: 2+ years financial services, operations or related experienceMust have letter writing experience - duties will include writing detailed reject letters to customers for requests with transaction deficiencies.",Securities Operations Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Minneapolis, MN 55420",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/securities-operations-job-minneapolis-mn-us-168185000.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,15.60 - 15.60 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,f172f5fa4e04ec9c127b310cac0ae4fa
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:03:50:07,No,jobs.monster.com," Summary:     Under the general supervision of the SVP/Director Accounting Operations performs a variety of accounting and operational duties in support of the Finance department and other business lines throughout the Bank.  Position Requirements:   Candidate should have BS degree in accounting/finance and 3+ years accounting experience in a banking environment.Good problem solver with strong accounting/financial fundamentals. Working knowledge of Excel and Word. Goodcommunication and people skills and must be a team player.   Specific Job Functions: ·         Performs daily, weekly, and monthly operational functions·         Interacts with a variety of Bank personnel in resolving various balancing and related issues·         Develops full understanding of Bank’s financial systems and operations·         Performs the reconciliation of correspondent bank statements and general ledger accounts·         Supports routine bank accounting processes as directed, including all calculations, record keeping, proof and reconciliation functions·         Assists with the administration and execution of wire transfers·         Assists with department record retention requirements·         Manages the accounts payable, fixed assets, and prepaid items functions ·         Performs a variety of daily processing and reconciling activities·         Develops analytical methods to review income and expense activity·         Provides operational support to other business lines in the Bank·         Prepares ad hoc reports for management as needed·         Monitors certain expense accounts to ensure budget goals are being met Supports other accounting related projects as directed by management·         Works well in a team environment.We offer a progressive benefit program including an annual incentive plan, participation in the Employee Stock Ownership Plan, and up to 7 1/2% match on the 401k program.  Our generous low-cost health, dental and vision benefits are available on the date of hire.Submit your resume and cover letter to hr@belmontsavings.com.",Staff Accountant II Job in Belmont,Full Time,"Belmont, MA 02478",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-ii-job-belmont-ma-us-168168877.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=7,"401k match up to 7 1/2%, Employee Stock Ownership Plan of company stock, Annual Incentive Payout",Experienced (Non-Manager),bd050c00dc0ba31c00cc75f7797746ba
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:03:48:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Is It Time to Consider Something New?If you feel like you are moving too slowly along your career path and are inspired by the thought of helping people protect and enrich their lives, we can help you find your passion.With an average of 10,000 baby boomers reaching retirement age each day1, there has never been a better time to enter the financial services industry. Prudential is seeking professionals from a variety of backgrounds who are ambitious, people-oriented individuals with a desire to make a difference and own their own future. Overall Duties and Responsibilities ·Develop and implement sales and marketing plans·Prospect potential clients and discuss insurance and financial services·Build and execute strategies to help clients accumulate, preserve, and transfer their assets TrainingAt Prudential, you will receive coaching and mentoring from experienced managers to help you build a client network during a paid training program.Prudential provides individualized classroom training, as well as web-based learning resources that begin at the time of hire and provide continued development as you build your career. You will have the opportunity to work with dynamic teams to develop innovative solutions that address the diverse needs of clients.Compensation and BenefitsWe offer competitive compensation and generous work performance-based bonuses. This is an opportunity for you to potentially achieve a six-figure incomeNext StepsIf you are looking for a career with high earning potential – and are up for a new challenge – click “Apply” to connect with our management team. 1 Source: The Baby Boom Cohort  in the US:2012-2060,  accessed 2/27/2015,  *Candidates cannot be currently registered with another broker-dealer.  Securities products and services are offered through Pruco Securities, LLC.  Each is a Prudential Financial company located in Newark, NJ and is solely responsible for its own financial condition and contractual obligations. ©2015  Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc., and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Prudential is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. EEO IS THE LAW. The Prudential Insurance Company of America, Newark, NJ and its affiliates. Prudential is an Employer that participates in E-Verify.0272810-00002-00 Expires 10/10/2016                                                                      Version 1 – Revised 3/16/2015",Financial Professional Associate Job in Marlton,Full Time Employee,"Marlton, NJ 08053",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-professional-associate-job-marlton-nj-us-167635229.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=18,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,efe9a144f92944e6c0607b5097231556
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:03:47:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Supplier Quality Engineer - Manufacturing opening with a renewable energy manufacturer in Marlborough MA. The position will use hands-on Quality tools to continuously improve and support the company's R&D, manufacturing, and suppliers. This is a great opportunity for an Engineers to work across multiple functions internally and externally.Client DetailsThe Supplier Quality Engineer- Manufacturing located in Marlborough MA is with a rising renewable energy provider. This Boston-based manufacturer is rated one of Boston's best new companies to work for. The growing company has tripled its size in the past four years and has recently received a multimillion-dollar investment for further expansion.DescriptionThe Supplier Quality Engineer - Manufacturing located in Marlborough MA will find responsibilities including (but not limited to):Follow up of corrective action reports, including customer complaints.Calibration system maintenance.Advanced Product Quality Planning (APQP), including PPAP, FMEA, and Control Plan creation. Inspection and Test.Facilitate Continual Improvement efforts (e.g., six sigma as a green or black belt).Lead resolution of vendor quality problems coordinating all efforts that may be required with engineering, purchasing and the supplier.ProfileThe Suppler Quality Engineer - Manufacturing must have:BS Engineering requiredFour (4) + years of relevant engineering experienceAdvanced Product Quality Planning (APQP), Lean Manufacturing and six sigma knowledge and experienceAbility to travel up to 30%Job OfferOffer:Great exposure to multiple engineering functionsCompetitive base salaryStock optionsGreat opportunity to join a growth companyStrong benefits package",Supplier Quality Engineer - Manufacturing Job in Marlborough,"Full Time , Employee","Marlborough, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/supplier-quality-engineer-manufacturing-job-marlborough-ma-us-167746169.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=13,"80,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",,9f5f8e609cd2e495438dd46824d6d68a
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:02:48:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"A mid size consulting firm with a storied history and great reputation is looking for a new manager for their survey group!This firm has a strong backlog of work, and due to a retirement, they are in need of someone to lead the charge for all their survey activities.  A future partnership opportunity even exists for the right individual !!To qualify for this position, you MUST have the following:* Your survey license in NY* 7+ years of surveying experience in the U.S.* A strong background in surveying private development and municipal projects, to include the construction sideTo find out more about this great opportunity, contact Don Bills at 517-841-1336, or submit your resume to him at don@mrjackson.com  ",Surveyor - Department Manager Job in Albany,Full Time,"Albany, NY 12201",,http://jobview.monster.com/surveyor-department-manager-job-albany-ny-us-160251779.aspx?mescoid=1700160001001&jobPosition=15,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),4c2bc61dad2f59d60e957ca5e173874d
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:02:47:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a member of the IT team, the Business Analyst will be responsible for the project management, analysis, maintenance, testing and end-user training of the systems that support the Finance and Accounting operations teams.  The Business Analyst works closely with the Rumpke accounting teams of controllers, general ledger, billing, accounts receivable, accounts payable, collections, tax and reporting to identify, define, test and implement system solutions.  This role works to support the technology advancement within the finance organization.  RESPONSIBILITIES:•  Leads and managers development projects, integration projects, or selection of new software•  Formulates and defines system scope and objectives for assigned projects•  Conducts interviews with associates, management and department leaders to develop clear requirements for enhancements or projects•  Gathers business requirements and translates into technical requirements for the creation of application enhancements and features•  Functions as the liaison between the business line, operations, and the technical areas throughout the project cycle•  Creation of project estimation, detailed project plans, work assignments, vendor dates and other aspects of assigned projects•  Reviews, evaluates and develops recommendations for enhancements and support of applications•  Serves as functional expert on applications that are data intensive and will require integration•  Effectively manage change requests or requests for enhancements •  Ability to manage IT and business associates time within project selection, requirements gathering, and/or projects•  Works with programming resources to ensure that system enhancements follow the appropriate IT guidelines, meet or exceed user requirements and are completed in a timely fashion•  Assist in troubleshooting post implementation issues for large/complex projects•  Develops training plans for new application releases or changes•  Provide support and training as necessary for Rumpke employees•  Perform job duties in compliance with all local, state, and federal regulations and company policies•  Maintain a positive work atmosphere with a culture of respect for othersTESTING AND ANALYSIS:•  Runs Ad-hoc reports using SQL queries, Access, or other reporting tools•  Develop test plans or use case scenarios for testing•  Test and evaluate new or changed applications and functions and determine issues in work flow or software functionality•  Coordinate and assist user acceptance test, including reporting and documenting defects, and conducting complex root cause analysis•  Ability to identify failure in process and address with IT and the business•  Assists in the development and implementation of quality improvement of processes for IT department and the business•  Prepares technical reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends. REQUIREMENTS:•  Legally eligible to work in the United States•  Must successfully complete pre-employment testing.•  Build and nurture positive working relationships with the team, internal clients, and vendors•  Ability to organize and deliver presentations in front of groups•  Ability to train IT team and business employees•  Passion for customer service, efficiency, effectiveness, precision and quality•  Able to work flexible hours; expected to work nights and weekends as needed•  Ability to travel between offices, as required QUALIFICATIONS:•  Bachelor’s degree – Information Systems or other technology related discipline. (Equivalent experience acceptable)•  3 years of experience in a Business Analyst role•  Accounting and Finance focused preferred•  Knowledge Lean Six Sigma and/or a Project Methodology (Agile, Waterfall, or etc.) desired• Great Pay & Benefits!Apply online at: https://rumpkejobs.com/jobDesc.asp?JobID=716  No phone calls please Pre-Employment Testing EOE",IT Business Analyst Job in Cincinnati,Full Time,"Cincinnati, OH 45217",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/it-business-analyst-job-cincinnati-oh-us-167220614.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=16,,,b4861f02dced1d65c5bb5098f9d7001a
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:02:46:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in La Mesa,Full Time,"La Mesa, CA 91941",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-la-mesa-ca-us-167917901.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,f96d4a3fddaba0d8d69d92f2cefe486f
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:01:59:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated individuals to become independent insurance sales representatives, working in a professional business-to-business sales environment. As an independent insurance agent representing Aflac, you’ll have the opportunity to build your own business and enjoy a flexible work schedule, while being backed with the support of a Fortune 500 company and industry leader. Key Responsibilities: •Use your networking and consultative skills to help CEOs, business owners and HR managers determine which voluntary benefits programs suit their employees best•Provide service for policyholders•Retain current client relationships Benefits:•High brand awareness, supported by national advertising campaigns• Professional sales support from a friendly headquarters staff•Orientation, online and hands-on training, and certifications •Professional marketing materials •Competitive commissions & vested lifetime renewals•Generous stock bonus program•Management opportunities for qualified candidates Qualities of Aflac Benefits Consultants:•Desire to work with the leading provider of voluntary benefits at the worksite•Vibrant personality and professional presence•Drive and determination •Desire to help others•Entrepreneurial spirit•Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required About UsWhen a policyholder gets sick or hurt, Aflac helps make a difference by paying cash benefits fast. For nearly six decades, Aflac insurance policies have given policyholders the opportunity to focus on recovery, not financial stress. In the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. In Japan, Aflac is the number one life insurance company in terms of individual policies in force. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For eight consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere magazine as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2014, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 16th consecutive year. Also, in 2014, Fortune magazine included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 13th time, ranking the company number one in the life and health insurance category. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.",Entry Level Insurance Sales Job in Lascassas,Full Time,"Lascassas, TN 37085",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-insurance-sales-job-lascassas-tn-us-167918247.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,40a8820654d107fdbb4e0e8939eaead4
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:01:57:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learns how to conduct inspections to identify infestations or conditions conducive to infestations of wood destroying organisms and/or insects, birds, or other vertebrate pests for the purpose of making proposals and presentations to obtain sales contracts. Responsibilities • Attends company training programs and accompany other associates or managers during ride-alongs in order to learn job skills such as: • Recording accurate measurements and writing correct descriptions of property and/or other areas inspected • Preparing appropriate specs and treating instructions in accordance with existing laws, regulations, and company policy • Calculating job treating costs from company pricing instructions • Executing contracts on behalf of the company, observing company policy pertaining to credit terms of sale • Maintaining equipment, vehicle, and personal safety equipment in clean, working order • Learning sales techniques and product knowledge in order to sell termite control protection and renewals and/or monthly pest control protection to owners or agents of homes, stores, or industry • Gaining experience in dealing courteously with customers, leaving customers' premises and furnishings clean and as found • Passes all state licensing and/or company requirements • Attends call sessions to learn how to effectively collect on delinquent accounts of personal sales contracts • Contacts customers after service is performed to ensure satisfaction and develop additional prospects • Develops termite and/or pest control sales leads for each respective office lead furnished Education and Experience Requirements • High school education or general education degree (GED) required • Six to twelve months related experience and/or training in sales and dealing with the public or equivalent combination of education and experience is strongly preferred • Valid driver’s license from current state of residence required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals • Ability to calculate rate, ratio, and percent, and to draw and interpret bar graphs Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability 100713",Sales Rep / Outside Sales / Territory Sales Job in Sterling,"Full Time, Employee","Sterling, VA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-rep-outside-sales-territory-sales-job-sterling-va-us-167229125.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,b2a4f9ed3c6b299befa472c32ded5de8
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:01:33:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Financial Operations in Hillsboro, Oregon (OR). The nature of the work is focused on the monetary affairs of the company.Duties: Provide timely, accurate, and efficient administration of the appropriate finance applications to ensure accurate financial statements, appropriate internal controls, compliance with policies and delivery of value added information Administers appropriate security access of end users to the applications supported consistent with the company policies Perform periodic validation of system security to ensure compliance Participates in the preparation of timely and insightful financial reporting of pertinent information to determine progress against strategic plan, budget, and forecast Verifies that financial activity is recorded in accordance with GAPP Researches financial anomalies and makes corrections as necessary Provide initial technical support by telephone and email to business users Resolve the issue through systematic analysisREQUIREMENTS: Typically requires a Bachelor's degree and minimum of 0 - 1 year of directly relevant work experience; one of the following alternatives may be accepted: PhD or Law + 1 year; Masters + 0 - 3 years; Associates degree + 1 - 3 years; High School diploma or equivalent + 3 - 5 years SAP experience or equivalent ERP experience in Baan, Oracle, or PeopleSoft",Financial Operations Job in Hillsboro,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Hillsboro, OR 97123",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-operations-job-hillsboro-or-us-168191764.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),db56f3504e885d5fbd76934159bb93d5
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:00:33:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONSenior Accountant POSITION DESCRIPTION:The Senior Accountant position is responsible for managing the tactical and strategic financial and human resource aspects of VirPack’s business.  A suitable candidate will be a roll-up the sleeves accountant with experience in planning, delivering, and managing all financial and human resource aspects of a business.  The ideal candidate will have 5 or more years of experience working with the accounting and financial reporting of a software, IT services, or business with similar characteristics and dynamics of VirPack’s business.    S(he) will handle all aspects of the company’s bookkeeping, accounting,  financial reporting, and human resources  S(he) will continually look for ways to optimize profits, reduce costs, increase cash flow, and understand and report on financial drivers of the business. S(he) will also assist with preparing reports and presentations for current and future shareholders, and capital providers.  A focused, results oriented candidate will have the opportunity to advance into a Controller role and beyond in the future.RESPONSIBILITIES:·         Maintain and evolve financial processes needed to optimize the businesso       Payroll and Human Resourceso       Payableso       Receivableso       Invoicingo       Billable hours trackingo       Financial modeling, analysis and reportingo       Cost accountingo       P&Lo       Balance sheeto       Cash flow Analysiso       Quickbookso       Autotasko       Analysis of prospective customer contracts, partnerships, products and serviceso       Negotiating with vendors●       Software License Inventory  ·         Specific financial process responsibilities:o       Prepare monthly P&L and balance sheeto       Prepare monthly reports showing cost by project – Implementation and Development; Customer Profitability; Cost of Sales; Customer Trendso       Prepare  Cash flow projection report semi-weekly.o       Work with President and CEO  to create and update a financial model of the business; this will be a bottom up model based on existing and future customer contracts and revenues and business expenseso       Using cost data from Autotask, analyze the cost of key activities in the business e.g. base implementation; support costs by customer; hosting costs; cost of supporting customer hosted deployments●       Administer the settings in AutoTasko       Record all accounts payable invoices that arrive on a daily basis.o       On a weekly basis review outstanding Accounts Payable with managers and issue payments●       Review bank statement on a daily basis to confirm the amounts deducted are accurate and record all debit charges in QuickBooks.o       Prepare all monthly invoices for monthly subscriptions and per page/tier contracts on the 1st of each month.o       Invoice customers for bulk pages as required when notified by Support●       Invoice customers for customer support and professional services at the beginning of the month after reviewing with managers.o       Audit license issuance records and time records to ensure all monthly, per page/tier, bulk, third party licenses and professional and customer service fees have been invoicedo       Prepare initial customer invoice for all new customers.  Must invoice all items indicated in contract even if not charging customer for such itemso       Prepare all travel and expense charges for customers as requiredo       Review outstanding Accounts Receivables every Monday.  Contact all customers with invoices over 30 days via email with a copy of the invoice for back-up.o       Record all payments received from customers on a daily basis.  Review bank account to see if ACH / wire transfers has been received and record payments. o       Prepare deposit and scan checks using check scanner  as required.  All monies received must be deposited by weeks end and should be done daily.o       Prepare monthly 3rd Party revenue share reports by the 15th of each month and  forward to vendor as appropriate.o       Prepare monthly/quarterly reporting to 3rd Party vendors for license usage and payment and track the usage of 3rd party license inventory.o       Prepare monthly commission spreadsheet for COO and salesperson to review for commission processing on 1st  payroll of each month. o       Reconcile monthly credit card accounts.o       Enter all credit card charges with pertinent descriptions and notes as received from employees.o       Prepare semi-monthly payroll. Prepare quarterly and annual payroll reports and submit to government agencies for multiple states.●       Report 401k earnings and contributions and review annual Form 5500.o       Prepare Sales Tax reports and process payment using VA Sales Tax website.o       Update Section 125 spreadsheets as appropriate.●       Handle all benefit enrollments and processing as well as work with insurance company during open enrollment.o       Reconcile monthly bank statement each month.  o       Maintain all employee salary information as requiredo       Maintain complete filing system to support financial records.o       Maintain Master Customer Contract spreadsheet.o       Prepare yearly budget spreadsheet.  Each year prepare new year’s budget using prior year financial information.●       Assist with audit by outside auditing firm●       Track fixed assets.●       Prepare annual corporate filing reports, business license and personal property taxes for all locations.o       Other accounting and financial responsibilities as assigned.o       As the business grows, assist with hire and manage additional part time and\or full time accounting staffEDUCATION, EXPERIENCE and SKILLS REQUIRED:·         Minimum of 5 years of experience working with the accounting and financial aspects of a business(es) similar to VirPack·         Bachelor’s or higher level degree·         CPA not mandatory but preferred·         Minimum of five years of experience being responsible for accounting to include  experience with  accounts payable, accounts receivable, payroll, human resources, general ledger and financial reports.·         Critical thinking skills●       Detailed oriented·         Excellent skills with creating financial models with Google Docs ·         Experience with stock options, capital raising, and going public is a plus·         Hands on experience with Quickbooks for 2 or more years·         Mature, confident professional who has worked as part of a management team of a similar sized and type of business·         Knowledge or regulatory requirements of processing payroll accounting transactions, payroll returns and human resource matters.·         Ability to communicate clearly and concisely, verbally and in writing.·         Must be able to keep client matters strictly confidential.·         Must have excellent interpersonal skills and customer service skills.●       Must be able to multi-task.·         Knowledge of generally accepted accounting principles and procedures. ",Senior Accountant Job in West Mclean,Full Time,"West Mclean, VA 22102",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-west-mclean-va-us-124818353.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=3,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b2a98837f00731180ae5a01198c69678
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:00:30:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"System One is currently seeking a Designer II on a 24 month contract located in Amarillo, TX.  Responsibilities:Creates, updates and revises sketches, working drawings and contract documents using Computer Assisted Design (CAD) software or manual means of drafting to meet customer requirements.Prepares 2D and 3D models.Assignments will be completed utilizing information provided by project engineering, architectural, or technical services staff under the direction of a supervisor.Prepares documentation to support design drawings.Prepare bills of material, schedules, and assist engineering personnel with formal drawing transmittals and construction issues. Requirements:Must be able to present samples of both 2D line work and drawings created from 3D models.Minimum of two (2-years) of CADMicroStation V8 is preferredPreference will be given to applicants who have experience in transmission line design, PLS-CADD, ProjectWise and ArcMap (or GIS).Must be able to read and comprehend detailed customer requirements, data sheets and supplier specifications.Requires familiarity with drafting techniques and engineering concepts and terminology.Ability to read engineering drawing and blueprints.     Duration: 24 monthsLocation: Amarillo, TXRate: $27-33/hr*local candidates only*",Designer II Job in Amarillo,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","System One is currently seeking a Designer II on a 24 month contract located in Amarillo, TX.  Responsibilities:Creates, updates and revises sketches, working drawings and contract documents using Computer Assisted Design (CAD) software or manual means of drafting to meet customer requirements.Prepares 2D and 3D models.Assignments will be completed utilizing information provided by project engineering, architectural, or technical services staff under the direction of a supervisor.Prepares documentation to support design drawings.Prepare bills of material, schedules, and assist engineering personnel with formal drawing transmittals and construction issues. Requirements:Must be able to present samples of both 2D line work and drawings created from 3D models.Minimum of two (2-years) of CADMicroStation V8 is preferredPreference will be given to applicants who have experience in transmission line design, PLS-CADD, ProjectWise and ArcMap (or GIS).Must be able to read and comprehend detailed customer requirements, data sheets and supplier specifications.Requires familiarity with drafting techniques and engineering concepts and terminology.Ability to read engineering drawing and blueprints.     Duration: 24 monthsLocation: Amarillo, TXRate: $27-33/hr*local candidates only*",,http://jobview.monster.com/designer-ii-job-amarillo-tx-us-167749423.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=6,,Engineering,82107f9e8eb8f14e3a23fe6a8d9183f7
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:09:00:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"The nation's leading administrator of long term care insurance services is looking for YOU.  This is your opportunity to join a company with a culture that promotes respect for people, integrity, learning and initiative. WE ARE THE KIND OF EMPLOYER YOU DESERVE. LTCG is a leading provider of business process outsourcing for the insurance industry, managing over 1.3 million long-term care policies for the nation's largest insurers. We also provide clients with unique risk management insight built upon our proprietary long term care databases. This position is responsible for gathering and reviewing requirements for the purpose of determining initial and ongoing claimant and provider eligibility. RESPONSIBILITIES1. Assess claimant eligibility by reviewing medical records from all current providers and conducting phone assessments with the claimant or legal representative. In the event of noted inconsistencies in the claimant eligibility, coordinate a benefit eligibility assessment in order to make a final determination.2. In conjunction with plan language upon initial assessment and ongoing recertification, determine legitimacy and eligibility of service providers by requesting and reviewing provider licensing credentials, state-specific regulations, internet searches and phone assessments with the servicing provider.3. Effectively communicate, verbal and written, all aspects of the claim benefit determination process.4. Assist claimants with modifications to their current care plan, including changes in care needs as well as changes in provider. 5. Monitor daily, weekly and monthly reports to ensure claims are handled timely and appropriately.6. Attend case conferences, internally and with the client, to present claims recommendations.7. Meet quality and production metrics as established and communicated by the department.8. Other duties as assigned.Minimum Qualifications* Associates Degree or equivalent formal training program, or 2 years experience in a medical or insurance environment.* At least 3 years work experience with claims and insurance contract interpretation.* Intermediate level experience with Microsoft Office products. Preferred Qualifications* Experience working with healthcare, long-term disability or long term care claims.* Familiarity with nursing home and home care service providers and service delivery settings* Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Claims Care Coordinator,"Full Time, Employee","Eden Prairie, MN 55344",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-care-coordinator-woodbury-or-eden-prairie-job-eden-prairie-mn-us-173002070.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=6,,Administrative/Clerical,d3196a29c17dd9fe95eba4f5e43c274e
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:09:07:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known Company is looking for a Jr. Administrative Assistant who has at least two years experience. Responsibilities will include answering all incoming calls, receiving and sorting all incoming mail, calendaring, setting appointments, and working on various projects. Must be proficient in Word, Excel, and Outlook. Looking for a team player who can work in a fast paced environment. Email resume as a word attachment to Paris Goldfarb. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074507 Job Experience:,, excellent communication skillsYears of Experience Required:",JR. ADMINISTRATIVE ASSISTANT NEEDED! Job in Beverly Hills,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Beverly Hills, CA 90212",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/jr-administrative-assistant-needed!-job-beverly-hills-ca-us-172601565.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),400ac2718f14f5f915936345229233d6
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:09:46:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in Miami, FL is looking for a Manager, Workplace Experience for 3 days per week / temp to perm. If you are interested please reply to this post with your hourly rate, your availability and a copy of your most recent resume. OverviewThe Manager, Workplace Experience will report directly to the Sr. Manager, Workplace Experience, Americas as part of the Workplace Experience group and be the main point of contact for employees’ workplace related requests.Serving as one of the “faces” of the office, the Office Assistant will be expected to provide a high level of internal customer support while maintaining a professional and positive demeanor and completing assigned tasks in an efficient manner.  What will you be doing?Facilities and Space PlanningMaintain a comfortable and fun environment for employees.Plan, budget and manage all necessary upgrades to the office space.Serve as the main point of contact for the Landlord, security and building maintenance.Work with HR on new hire coordination and setup.Work with local managers on team and individual seating assignments.Resolve all requests via the JIRA ticketing system in a timely manner.Office Management and ProcurementManage current vendor relationships while also seeking out new vendor options and competitive pricing.Oversee inventory of office supplies, food, equipment and furniture.PO administration and creation through SAP.Track and maintain the overall local office budget.Order business cards as needed.Organize shipping and receiving.Enforce office, travel and purchasing policies with local employees.ITWork with the local IT Service Desk on any technical issues relating to phones, Xerox and the Lifesize video conferencing system.Coordinate with the local IT Service Desk on electrical and data installation.Provide support for IT relating to new employee laptops and monitor setup.MiscellaneousOverall responsibility for developing and maintaining office culture through planning of lunches, happy hours and team building events on a regular basis.Greet clients, business partners and candidates upon arrival.Receive and route all incoming calls and mail.Identify any and all areas where improvements and efficiencies can be implemented.Cleaning whiteboards.Setting up tables and chairs.Taking stock of and reporting broken furniture.Cable and wire maintenance.Coordinating new hire setup including:Preparing desks with all necessary equipment and company swag for new employee’s first day.Creating new hire’s security badge as well as arranging for the creation of their building security badge.Any other duties as required by the local Office Manager (or Regional Facilities Manager, Americas) deemed necessary for the functioning of the business.What do we NEED?At least 2-3 years of related office management experienceStrong knowledge of Microsoft Office/Outlook.Experience in a fast-paced, dynamic, start-up type of environment.Strong attention to detail and organizational skills.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Ability to prioritize and complete projects in a timely manner.Bachelor’s degree preferredAlso, please register on our website at: www.adaptiveprofessionals.com You can see other job opportunities there.Adaptive puts you in control of your FLEXIBLE CAREER, so applicants are expected to complete their profile by at least 50% in order to apply for positions.About Us:AdaptiveProfessionals. com is an online staffing company specializing in Accounting and Finance Professionals looking to start their FLEXIBLE CAREER - or just find that perfect bridge to a permanent job. With Adaptive you, the professional, is in control. Connect directly with clients, market your profile, name your rate, and build your portfolio of assignments. Why Be An Accounting Temp, When You Can Be An ADAPTIVE PROFESSIONAL? ",Office Manager - Part Time /  days per week Job in Miami,"Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Miami, FL 33101",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-part-time-3-days-per-week-job-miami-fl-us-172732534.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,4413df03f64f6da620a7fa5cae597101
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:09:46:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This **Administrative Assistant** Position Features:Company strives to provide a family-friendly and employee-friendly work environment with frequent employee appreciation events, friendly corporate culture, competitive salary, and achievable growth opportunities. In addition are the following generous employee benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision, 401K with company match, company-paid life insurance. If you have the following qualifications (listed below), we want to hear from you! We are always looking to bring on board the brightest and most qualified candidates.POSITION RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES:?Coordinates and performs a range of RA/QA support activities; serves as a liaison with other divisions/departments.?Provides administrative support for the staff such as answering telephones, assisting visitors, updating tracking systems, monitoring various accounts, and resolving and/or referring a range of administrative problems and inquiries.?Operates personal computer to compose and edit correspondence from dictation, verbal direction, or from knowledge of established division/department policies; may prepare, transcribe, compose, type, edit, and distribute correspondence.?Schedules and coordinates meetings, events, interviews, appointments, and/or other similar activities for supervisors.?Assists RA/QA team in problem solving, project planning, and development and execution of stated goals and objectives.?Establishes, maintains, and updates files, databases, records, and/or other documents.?Sorts, screens, reviews and distributes incoming and outgoing mail; composes, prepares, or ensures timely response to a variety of routine inquiries.?Runs miscellaneous errands as directed.?Maintains professional manner with clients/customers, co-workers, and employees.?May perform clerical duties such as but not limited to sorting, collating and routing documents, filing, making photocopies, assembling binders and files.?Performs other related duties as assigned by management.The preceding functions have been provided as examples of the type of work performed by employees assigned to this job classification. Management reserves the right to add, modify, change or rescind the work assignments of different positions and to make reasonable accommodations so that qualified employees can perform the essential functions of the job.Objectives or Goals to Measure Performance:?Timeliness in completing assignments.?Accurate work product.?Adherence to Company and Division policies and procedures.?Positive team attitude.?Taking initiative in unassigned tasks.?Excellent attendance and punctuality.?Maintains the confidentiality of data.Minimum Skills or Experience Requirements:?High School Diploma or GED.?Three years of office/clerical experience or equivalent.?Ability to keyboard 50-60 wpm accurately.?Word processing and/or data entry skills.?Proficient knowledge of general office procedures and office machines.?Proficient in English verbal communication skills, including professional telephone manner.**Bilingual Huge Plus**?Ability to make administrative/procedural decisions and judgments.?Ability to create, compose, and edit written materials.?Reliability, dependability and flexibility We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075863 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",**Administrative Assistant** - Job in Irvine,Full Time Employee,"Irvine, CA 92617",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-irvine-ca-us-172852818.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),83cf40b6318d7a9e492c78b9e582b26f
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:10:54:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Marketing Administrative AssistantThis role is responsible for assisting 2 marketing teams: (50%) Ethnic store marketing (50%) Mainstream store marketing This position assists marketing research analysis using internal sales data as well as well as external research data. It is also responsible for supporting the ongoing management of team?s various marketing efforts including administrative workKey Accountabilities:1. Help assist writing questions, setting up survey and help assist in analyzing results from primary research 2. Gather information from secondary research 3. Organize raw data from the internal sales database for the top management4. Format various data to help assist data analysis5. Create sales presentations by gathering information from internal & external source6. Create export/import reports using Datamyne7. Help assist to write sales stories from information collected8. Assist managing various creative assets for the department9. Assist various administrative work for the department 10. Assist managing various marketing activities11. Assist creating social media postsKnowledge, Skills and Abilities:? Knowledgeable about Chinese culture and language is required? Comfortable with ?numbers? is must. ? Strong MS Excel skills and PPT skills? Strong Photoshop and Illustrator skill? Ability to see various trends from numbers? Strong creative writing skills? Team player and comfortable to have multiple supervisors? Willing to tackle any projects not limited by the job descriptionsExperience/Education:? 3+ years experience or equivalent exposure to a corporate environment ? BA or BS with focus on communication: Advertising/Marketing/Research? Experience with social media platforms, including, but not limited to Facebook,, Pinterest, Twitter, YouTube We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076165 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Marketing Administrative Assistant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94104",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/marketing-administrative-assistant-job-san-francisco-ca-us-172927615.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1e3808e16ee986fe32c9ea5688b5f4d9
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:10:56:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative AssistantDEPARTMENT:Admin REPORTS TO:Project Manager NATURE OF WORK:This position performs a variety of administrative, office management, and clerical functions in support of construction.   Responsibilities include administrative support, calendar management, data entry, presentations, and correspondence. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS OF THE JOB:      Supports back office and construction management.      Composes and types routine memos, correspondence, bids, and presentations.      Prepares outgoing mail and correspondence, including e-mail and faxes.      Organizes and maintains file system and files correspondence and other records.      Maintains job list, proposal log, department logs,and electronic filing.      Enters, updates, and researches change orders as needed.       Makes copies of correspondence or other printed materials.      Order, print, and distribute construction/job drawings.      Conducts research, and compiles and types reports as needed.      Other duties and special projects as assigned. REQUIRED KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:            Minimum of 3-5 years of experience in administrative support             Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite with moderate Excel, Word, and Power Point skills.             Must be able to identify and resolve problems in a timely manner gather and analyze information skillfully and maintain confidentiality.            Ability to manage multiple assignments and projects independently and simultaneously.            Ability to handle unexpected projects and a demonstrated willingness to support others in a courteous,professional, and friendly manner.            Must be detail oriented, organized and customer service focused.            Excellent oral and written communication skills.            Have excellent phone and interpersonal skills. Jensen is an equal opportunity employer.  Jensen  does not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. General InformationThe above is a general outline of responsibilities of this position, it is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required for this position. Other functions may be assigned and management retains the right to add or change the duties at any time, at the Company's sole and absolute discretion with or without prior notice. We offer a competitive salary and benefits package  ",Administrative Assistant Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95131",All,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-san-jose-ca-us-172913729.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=18,,,d2b1b833f43d24e14b4024afcffbb1bc
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:11:46:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Looking for an Administrative Coordinator for a full time position in the West L.A. area. Great group of people to work with, and opportunities for advancement available. Will act as the liaison for all communications between the office and referring practices, and for processing all incoming and internal paperwork. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076187 Job Experience:,, MS OfficeYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Coordinator - Medical Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90024",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-coordinator-medical-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172927621.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2b8b00c8dfd270df5a789b73a2d12286
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:11:48:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"MIDTOWN is looking for an Administrative Assistant to join our Human Resources team. About Our Company MIDTOWN Corporate Office is a pleasant work environment serving our upscale athletic clubs and club management partners across North America. Our team of associates is committed to exceptional performance, delivering our promise to members, and supporting a workplace where everyone can reach their full career potential. MIDTOWN ATHLETIC CLUBS is an industry leader in upscale fitness and sports resorts. Founded in 1970 as a single tennis club in Chicago, Midtown now has 8 full-service tennis and fitness facilities in the United States and Canada. To learn more, read Our Story. MIDTOWN HEALTH, sister company to Midtown Athletic Clubs, is a leader in fitness center management and employee wellness solutions for medically-integrated and corporate fitness centers throughout the United States. To learn more, click here. Position Summary Our Administrative Assistant supports the VP of Human Resources, National Director of Recruiting, Associate Relations Director and National Director of Learning and Development and is tech savvy, highly organized, detail oriented, and demonstrates a sense of urgency and initiative. The incumbent will assume responsibility for a wide-variety of administrative functions while frequently interacting with corporate and club associates, managers, members and vendors. They will promote a positive corporate image and contribute to the organization’s success by: Maintaining and supporting applicant tracking system Reviewing resumes and arranging interviews Managing vendor calls and arranging meetings Overseeing administrative aspect of Associate Referral Program Screening telephone calls and reviewing mail Managing HR Leaders calendar, coordinating events, scheduling meetings, securing attendees, overseeing travel arrangements and preparing meeting materials Assisting with various human resource projects and initiatives Taking meeting notes and providing administrative follow up as needed Writing correspondence and ensuring information is distributed accurately, with good grammar and in a timely manner Preparing expense reports and completing reimbursement requests Our next Administrative Assistant: Is energetic and highly motivated with 5 or more years of relevant stable work experience Has a strong sense of urgency and attention to detail Demonstrates optimism, reliability, adaptability, curiosity and relentlessness Demonstrates exceptional written and verbal communication skills Possesses excellent time management and problem solving skills with significant experience effectively managing multiple projects simultaneously Has a proven track record of being calm and focused under pressure, resolving and diffusing sensitive situations, maintaining professional interactions with associates at all levels and establishing rapport quickly Has the ability to influence others and communicate tactfully to accomplish complex assignments requiring cross-organization cooperation Has the ability to learn quickly and apply knowledge to systems and processes to improve organizational efficiency Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office applications and operation of office equipment Professional attitude with a sense of humor, ability to have fun and interest in building a positive work environment Associate Benefits Full-time Midtown associates are eligible to receive a competitive compensation package and benefits plan including: group health, dental, life, vision, prescription drug program, flexible spending account, short/long term disability, matching 401k, professional development account, and a complimentary club membership. MIDTOWN is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Administrative Assistant Human Resources Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL 60618",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-human-resources-job-chicago-il-us-172838686.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b631de6bd400ac99a6af373bd4903787
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:11:49:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Service Order DispatcherProxy Personnel is actively seeking and experienced administrative professional to assist with property management responsibilities within a federal building. We are looking for an individual with exceptional organizational skills to perform clerical tasks such as these within a property management organization:Handle over 400 mechanical/custodial service requests a month.Reconcile and coordinate contractor payments and administer regulatory requirements.Act as a liaison between various agencies, property management and general contractors.Create documents and databases with Microsoft Suite, including Access.Answer phones and offer assistance with troubleshooting routine issues.Prepare business calendars; assist with scheduling of meetings, conferences and conference room.Utilize excellent writing skills in order to compose memos, instructions and other communications. Provide administrative support for office personnel and clientsMaintain, organize, and archive file planAssist Engineering Techs in administrative capacity, i.e. scheduling, faxes, copies, deliveries (sending and receiving)…Process outgoing UPS ground/air deliveries:Dispatch emergency/repair elevator requests and maintain Elevator logMaintain, disseminate Building Access Keys for cleared contractorsMaintain, and schedule, government vehiclesSupport procurement team functions during purchasing agent absences i.e. collect and scan documents for transmittal to procurement officeReceive and Disperse US Postal/ UPS for Office Personnel, Security Contractor, MFTTeam and Technical TeamOther administrative duties as requested by the Supervisory Property ManagerThis position will start ASAP. Apply Today.Please apply online here:  http://chm.tbe.taleo.net/chm03/ats/careers/requisition.jsp?org=PROXYPERSONNEL&cws=1&rid=870     or go to www.Proxy.jobs and search for Indianapolis jobs.Location: Indianapolis, IN 46249 Report","Proxy Personnel Job Application for Administrative Assistant - Service Order Dispatcher | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Service Order DispatcherProxy Personnel is actively seeking and experienced administrative professional to assist with property management responsibilities within a federal building. We are looking for an individual with exceptional organizational skills to perform clerical tasks such as these within a property management organization:Handle over 400 mechanical/custodial service requests a month.Reconcile and coordinate contractor payments and administer regulatory requirements.Act as a liaison between various agencies, property management and general contractors.Create documents and databases with Microsoft Suite, including Access.Answer phones and offer assistance with troubleshooting routine issues.Prepare business calendars; assist with scheduling of meetings, conferences and conference room.Utilize excellent writing skills in order to compose memos, instructions and other communications. Provide administrative support for office personnel and clientsMaintain, organize, and archive file planAssist Engineering Techs in administrative capacity, i.e. scheduling, faxes, copies, deliveries (sending and receiving)…Process outgoing UPS ground/air deliveries:Dispatch emergency/repair elevator requests and maintain Elevator logMaintain, disseminate Building Access Keys for cleared contractorsMaintain, and schedule, government vehiclesSupport procurement team functions during purchasing agent absences i.e. collect and scan documents for transmittal to procurement officeReceive and Disperse US Postal/ UPS for Office Personnel, Security Contractor, MFTTeam and Technical TeamOther administrative duties as requested by the Supervisory Property ManagerThis position will start ASAP. Apply Today.Please apply online here:  http://chm.tbe.taleo.net/chm03/ats/careers/requisition.jsp?org=PROXYPERSONNEL&cws=1&rid=870     or go to www.Proxy.jobs and search for Indianapolis jobs.Location: Indianapolis, IN 46249",,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-service-order-dispatcher-job-indianapolis-in-us-172771502.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=6,,,2c2e508d34b2fa25f1b986e40ae998ee
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:12:07:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is the nationâ€™s largest independent provider of e-discovery, managed document review, facilities management and knowledge process outsourcing. DTI serves the nationâ€™s leading law firms and Fortune 500 corporations through its 26 highly secure service centers located in major cities across the United States. We believe that we have achieved this success by providing our customers the highest level of quality and service. This reputation for quality and performance rests 100% on the efforts of our employees. In order to continue our growth and success, we must constantly look to add high-caliber individuals to our team. If you have a â€œcan doâ€ attitude, together with a â€œclient firstâ€ set of priorities, we guarantee that we have an opportunity for you. Position Description:External Description :  DTI is currently seeking experienced Office Services Associate to work onsite 12p -9p at a prestigious law firm in DC. Responsibilities include: Photocopying and scanning legal documents Printing documents needed by attorneys and paralegals for trials Burning CDs Processing and delivering mail Conference Room set up Reception duties: answering and routing calls/greeting visitors Ideal candidates will have: 2 - 5 years of office services and/or customer service experience Prior experience in law firm environment is a must!Great communication and customer service skills Digital and computer skills Attention to detail Organization Strong problem solving ability Strong litigation copy and scanning skills. Scan-to-PDF. IPRO and LAW are a huge PLUS. Qualifications:Must be able to work 12p-9pm and 2 Saturdays every 2 to three months.",Office Services Associate - Law Firm /  Job in Washington,"Full Time, Employee","Washington, DC 20006",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/office-services-associate-law-firm-2181-job-washington-dc-us-172625150.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=10,,Administrative/Clerical,38087b5dba94e812780b2ae26ea787f8
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:12:11:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary: Responsible for supporting Facility Manager’s efforts in day-to-day implementation of policies, procedures and programs that will ensure a well-managed, well-maintained building, placing maximum emphasis on positive response to the needs of the tenants, environmental health and safety, and quality programs, in coordination and conjunction with the client’s goals and objectives. Essential Job Duties: 1.      Supports the Facility Manager in the day-to-day operational management of all aspects of the property to assure maintenance of approved quality standards. 2.      Assists the Facility Manager in the preparation and coordination of fire, life safety and other safety programs.  Ensures that policies and procedures are followed. 3.      Assists the Facility Manager in the preparation and coordination of all maintenance programs relating to interior and exterior conditions and appearance of the properties.  4.      Support the Facility Manager to assure full compliance with standards established within the service agreement. 5.      Participates in the selection of contract services, vendor negotiation of service agreements.  Oversees day-to-day vendor performance to assure full compliance with standards established within the service agreement.  6.      Works with staff in the planning and organization of internal and building to building moves.  Involved with the selection of movers and other necessary specialty trade contractors/vendors.  Liaison to various in-house support groups for moves. 7.      Responsible for the completion of work order requests in a timely fashion and to the satisfaction of the requesting associate.  May coordinate with Chief Engineer or other maintenance staff to coordinate completion of requests. 8.      Assist and support the Facility Manager on the day-to-day financial management of the property and maintenance of financial records and files, as needed.  Assist with preparation of the budget, financial reviews and monthly management reports. 9.      Responsible for the positive and prompt response to requests from building tenants and client.  Continues ongoing communications with the Owner Representative to ensure needs are being met. 10.  Perform regular “sweeps” of the workspace(s) to identify areas/items/equipment/materials in need of repair, replacement or upgrade. Report all issues to the Facilities Supervisor, and/or Facilities Manager, so as to correct. Other Job Functions: 1.      On-call 24/7 to respond to property events, emergencies or incidents 2.      May review leases to ensure compliance with lease provisions.  3.      Actively participate in the development and management of the account Skills, Education And Experience: ·         Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience ·         Minimum of 3-5 years of real estate/facility coordination or management experience required ·         Ability to work well with a variety of different individuals both inside and outside of the company ·         Ability to handle multiple complex tasks with minimal supervision while also adhering to the policies and procedures and Owner objectives ·         Strong computer, writing and communication skills ·         Proven analytical abilities ·         May perform other duties as assigned Physical Requirements Rarely (0-12%) Occasionally (12-33%) Frequently (34-66%) Regularly (67-100%) Seeing: Must be able to read reports and use computer       X Hearing: Must be able to hear well enough to communicate with co-workers       X Standing / Walking       X   Climbing / Stooping / Kneeling     X     Lifting / Pulling / Pushing     X     Fingering / Grasping / Feeling: Must be able to write, type and use phone system       X   Working Conditions:         Normal working conditions with the absence of disagreeable elements.   Note:  The statements herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees, and are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.   Newmark Grubb Knight Frank is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V Req. Code : 4516",Assistant Facility Manager Job in New York,"Full Time, Employee","New York, NY 10011",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-facility-manager-job-new-york-ny-us-172597902.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=15,,Property Management,10afdcaedd7754f0db276ba656f596e6
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:13:38:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is the nationâ€™s largest independent provider of e-discovery, managed document review, facilities management and knowledge process outsourcing. DTI serves the nationâ€™s leading law firms and Fortune 500 corporations through its 26 highly secure service centers located in major cities across the United States. We believe that we have achieved this success by providing our customers the highest level of quality and service. This reputation for quality and performance rests 100% on the efforts of our employees. In order to continue our growth and success, we must constantly look to add high-caliber individuals to our team. If you have a â€œcan doâ€ attitude, together with a â€œclient firstâ€ set of priorities, we guarantee that we have an opportunity for you. Position Description:DTI Global, LLC provides management solutions for Law Firms all over the world- including but not limited to: Data Management, Court Reporting, Accounting and IT Support, and On-Site Legal Administrative Support.This is a full-time, permanent position that consists of copy/print/mail and other various office duties in high-volume Copy Center in a Law Firm. The ideal candidate has previous experience and good knowledge of copy machine equipment, scanning, printing, binding, and has also had prior experience with corporate/legal mail responsibilities.Duties include:Mail: Receiving, documenting, sorting, distributing, collecting, plus outgoing itemsReception Duties: Answering calls, redirecting, note taking, etc.Copy Services: Copy/scan/print projectsHospitality: Setup/cleanup kitchens, conference rooms, etc.Facilities: Coordinating and assisting with office moves, furniture rearrangement, etc.Maintain a positive team-player mentalityQualifications:HS Diploma or equivalentComputer literatePrevious Customer Service experience Flexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to function with a high level of patience, tact and diplomacy in handling any ""complaint"" situationsAbility to lift or move 40 lbs. or greaterAbility to grasp, lift and/or carry or otherwise move packages on a standard wheeled cart with a load capacity of 100lbsAbility to walk, bend, kneel, stand, and/or sit for an extended period of timeHospitable attitudeWilling to grow within the organization Qualifications:.   ",Copy/Mail Clerk â€“ Law Firm /  Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80202",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/copy-mail-clerk-%C3%A2%E2%82%AC%E2%80%9C-law-firm-2048-job-denver-co-us-172765334.aspx?mescoid=4300757001001&jobPosition=10,,Administrative/Clerical,93d50f795543bd75b6a7c8cfc4e7b6e5
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:13:45:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) - Ebensburg GetGo Job in Ebensburg,Full Time Employee,"Ebensburg, PA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-ebensburg-getgo-job-ebensburg-pa-us-173007132.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=7,,Administrative/Clerical,15aede3736086c9a9f32b211f386ed19
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:13:46:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Outstanding opportunity to put your E commerce sales support experience to use. You will take on the role of assisting in the implementation and data analysis of this leading firm's e commerce site. Your prior admin support role is a plus especially if you have been dealing with any Amazon projects. Great atmosphere in a family oriented firm make this a great situation to look into. You will need a solid skill set with MS Office with a heavy emphasis on Excel. Free parking and a business casual environment await the new team member. If you have a solid admin background and have experience dealing with web sites then contact us asap. Please send a short cover letter with your resume and apply today. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075398 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",E commerce Customer Services Specialist to $K - Job in Bellevue,Full Time Employee,"Bellevue, WA 98004",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/e-commerce-customer-services-specialist-to-60k-job-bellevue-wa-us-172751482.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),de27feeeb443062315a39df10442b1de
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:14:55:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is an administrative function, requiring excellence in data entry, file management, and record keeping skills. Individual must have a positive disposition and customer service experience. The position reports to the Manager of Corporate Business Operations. Inventory and track company vehicles and associated license plates. Perform data entry. Manage invoice process for vehicles and audit discrepancies. Maintain hard and soft copies of various departmental files. Pick-up/drop-off vehicles as needed. Order vehicles when needed. Track and issue vehicle keys. Other departmental duties including supporting back-up coverage of lobby desk, as needed creating visitor badging, and catering meetings. Overseeing and managing the executive coffee machine and area. Work on other duties as assigned by Department Manager Skills & Attributes MS Office including proficiency with Excel Excellent communications skills Positive attitude, friendly Attention to details Excellent organization skills Work with a sense of urgency Education & Experience Minimum 4 years of administrative work experience At least 4 years of previous experience in data entry, file management, and record keeping Excellent written and verbal communication Excellent planning, scheduling and organizational skills Well-developed interpersonal and social skills Computer literacy, specifically MS Office, Excel, Word, Access Experienced in quality assurance reviews Must like cars and is a confident driver Special Skills Required: Must have a valid CA drivers license and no vehicle code violations in the last 3 years. Position requires candidate on occasion to drive company vehicles.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Senior Operations Clerk Job in Sunnyvale,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Senior Operations Clerk,"Sunnyvale, CA",http://jobview.monster.com/senior-operations-clerk-job-sunnyvale-ca-us-172994995.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=3,,Administrative/Clerical,162edbe580c82c3b250672ae9e4d6534
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:14:57:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) - St Marys GetGo Job in St. Marys,Full Time Employee,"St. Marys, PA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-st-marys-getgo-job-st.-marys-pa-us-173003939.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=18,,Administrative/Clerical,a758907a90b59d57c0ed8027cfc1587b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:14:58:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Frontline Source Group has an excellent contract to possible hire opportunity as a Data Entry Specialist! Company Profile:As a global leader in their industry, this company is passionate about innovating new ways to make business work better! If you are interested in helping this team grow, this could be a great opportunity for you. This client is looking for a Data Entry Specialist on a contract to possible hire basis for their office in Nashville, TN. Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insuranceBenefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouse Features and Benefits of Client:Great benefitsProfit sharingBonus opportunitiesVacation and holiday pay  Data Entry Specialist Role:The Data Entry Specialist will take information from different locations and enter it into the electronic data system for storage and analysis. Responsibilities include reading the information to ensure accuracy and making any needed corrections, entering the data and store the hard copies and electronic data in the proper place, process and coordinate authorizations according to company policy. Other duties include assisting the office staff with general tasks such as managing phone lines, fax machines, and emails. Data Entry Specialist Background Profile:1-2 years experience in office settingHigh School diplomaExperience working with ExcelGreat time-management is a mustAttention to detail is a must  Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com   Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas. Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC) ",Data Entry Specialist Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Employee","Nashville, TN",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-specialist-job-nashville-tn-us-172838834.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=17,13.00 - 16.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,85fabae6130f1ea53bfbe00440924356
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:14:59:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Our well establish financial organization is currently in need of an Office Manager!Salary: Up to 65K DOEHours: Full Time - Monday-Friday/ 8:00AM-5:00PMBenefits: Fortune 500 Benefits Package!!! Job Duties Include: ? Administrative duties ? Tenant relations? Lease administration? Maintain property databases and produce reports? Coordinate property maintenance ? Read and understand complex lease and contract terms and make recommendations? Handle sensitive and confidential information Qualified candidate must possess:? A minimum of 5+ years? experience in property management or commercial real estate environment? 5+ years of recent Office Management experience ? Personality will be a KEY component to this positionKey Competencies? Basic Accounts Payable, Basic Accounts Receivable, Intermediate MS Excel.? Keen sense of accuracy and attention to detailWe are moving quickly on this position! Don't wait and apply with your resume today!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Bilingual in Mandarin Chinese is a HUGE plus!!!Years of Experience Required:",Office Manager - Canoga Park Job in Canoga Park,Full Time Employee,"Canoga Park, CA 91304",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-canoga-park-job-canoga-park-ca-us-172656405.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3c80b7774d6464c56814f9b0a8b4dcc1
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:15:48:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Medical Billing Assistant   JOB REQUIREMENTS       ·         High school diploma or equivalent.·         Working knowledge of Microsoft Excel, Word, and Outlook.·         Experience in healthcare billing and coding preferred. ·         Experience with automated billing systems preferred.·         Highly organized. ·         Candidates MUST be bilingual in English & Spanish  Candidate should possess excellent written and verbal communication skills as well as possess basic knowledge of insurance industry. ABOUT THIS OPPORTUNITY  ·         In this role, you are responsible for reviewing and processing all medical claims to the health plan in a timely and accurate manner.·         Answering customer calls and answer electronic service requests.·         Providing customers with professional, quality and timely support regarding practice management software issues.·         Performing customer software application configurations.·         Managing multiple assigned accounts.·         Properly documenting case details and relevant actions performed. JOB DETAIL Base Pay - Starting rate $10.00-$12.00/HourEmployment Type - Full-TimeEducation - High SchoolExperience - Not SpecifiedManages Others - NoRequired Travel - NoneJob ID - Insurance Verification Billing  TO LEARN MORE ABOUT US visit BillnetSolutions.net Send Us Your Resume to: careers@billnetsolutions.net Report","Billnet Job Application for Medical Billing Assistant | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Phone 888-235-32558 Address 13575 SW 134TH AVE STE 107MIAMI, FL 33186",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-billing-assistant-job-miami-fl-us-171269546.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=7,,,c9dde0d6ed257c146e3d478759d406c7
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:15:49:34,No,jobs.monster.com," Full-Time Direct Hire Sales Administrator Position in Bergen County Seeking Full-time direct hire Sales Administrator for our client in Bergen County.  They are a large global electronics company. This is a great place to work and they have a fantastic benefit package. We are looking for a candidate to support the Sales Director. This candidate will need:   Prior sales administration experienceStrong Excel Good communication skills- heavy interaction with internal and external customersSome travel required.   If you have the above qualifications, please apply here.  Feel free to browse our open positions at www.Ajilon.com",Sales Administrative Assistant Job in Paramus,Full Time Employee,"Paramus, NJ 07652",,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-administrative-assistant-job-paramus-nj-us-173000592.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Administrative/Clerical,9d0c948d3ac16864602964443ff38f3c
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:16:24:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have some legal and administrative experience? Are you in need of a career change or your next opportunity? If so, this might be the right fit for you! Ajilon Professional Staffing is currently hiring for a Part-Time Legal Administrative Assistant position for our client in Princeton, New Jersey. This job will pay from about $15-$25 an hour. If interested, please apply now!  Responsibilities: • Scheduling appointments for management • Clerical duties as assigned by superiors • Execute office goals, objectives and systems • Assist with firm department management on all legal projects assigned Qualifications: • 2-3 years of experience in legal/administrative field • Bachelor’s degree preferred • Strong interpersonal skills• Detail orientated • Ability to work independently and efficiently • Ability to work with Microsoft applications (Especially: Outlook, Excel, & Word)• Knowledge of legal practices, legal terms, and of “NJ Courts”  If you are interested in this Part-Time Legal Admin Assistant job in Princeton, NJ or other jobs available through Ajilon, please click “apply” below or visit our website www.ajilon.com  ;",Part-Time Legal Admin Assistant Job in Princeton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Princeton, NJ 08540",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-legal-admin-assistant-job-princeton-nj-us-172435618.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=15,,Administrative/Clerical,78034ef80ac05b7a7d6a7295d061c478
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:16:57:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Bilingual Secretary /Non-Bilingual  SecretaryJob Purpose:Enhances effectiveness by providing information management support.Duties:* Produces information by transcribing, formatting, inputting, editing, retrieving, copying, and transmitting text, data, and graphics.* Organizes work by reading and routing correspondence; collecting information; initiating telecommunications.* Maintains department schedule by maintaining calendars for department personnel; arranging meetings, conferences, teleconferences, and travel.* Completes requests by greeting customers, in person or on the telephone; answering or referring inquiries.* Maintains customer confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidential.* Prepares reports by collecting information.* Maintains office supplies inventory by checking stock to determine inventory level; anticipating needed supplies; placing and expediting orders for supplies; verifying receipt of supplies.* Keeps equipment operational by following manufacturer instructions and established procedures.* Secures information by completing database backups.* Provides historical reference by utilizing filing and retrieval systems.* Maintains technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reading secretarial publications.* Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Administrative Writing Skills, Reporting Skills, Supply Management, Scheduling, Microsoft Office Skills, Professionalism, Confidentiality, Organization, Travel Logistics, Typing, Verbal Communication Report",Amazing Grace Nursing Services,"Full Time, Employee",Phone 713-777-1151 Fax 713-484-6318,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-secretary-non-billingual-secretary-job-houston-tx-us-172916852.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=19,,,affb9f14a5cf3177c46b1f5e0e13aa4b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:16:58:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Front Desk Receptionist Position Features:? Great growth potential? Medical Benefits ? Great Pay to $35KTerrific opportunity for a professional individual ready to move ahead in a great career. We are seeking a front desk receptionist for a stable company in the Northern Virginia area for over 50 years. A great role for someone who thrives on being on the positive side. The right candidate must be able to be the smiling, professional face to greet the diverse clientele passing through the front doors everyday.Ideal candidate must have:Previous work experience in an OFFICE settingProficient knowledge of Microsoft Office programsPolite phone etiquette and ability to work multi line phone systemClear communication skills, written and verbalAbility to complete basic office tasks including filing, data entry, and use of office equipment; fax, copier, printer If you love providing friendly, helpful service and desire good job stability and growth potential, apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075824 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Front Desk Receptionist - Pay to $K Job in Herndon,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Herndon, VA 20171",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/front-desk-receptionist-pay-to-35k-job-herndon-va-us-172849876.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),53298d45a9ecb57a45f411ae63a1c833
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:17:25:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Administrative Coordinator Position Features:? Immediate? Benefits? Salary? Great Pay to $45KSuccessful Incumbent should have 3 plus years working in this capacity ideally supporting projects.To be successful in this role, ideal candidate should be proactive, and detailed: - Accurate, detailed travel arrangements - Maintaining both electronic and paper files - Creating and editing documents as needed. Additional duties will include assisting the team with various ad hoc requests or projects such as budget tracking, compiling monthly reports,and Continuously learning updated company policies & procedures and navigating new processes.The omission of specific duties does not preclude the Supervisor from assigning duties that are logically related to the position. Company offers room for growth.Salary will commensurate qualifications. Apply for this position today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075278 Job Experience:,, Bachelors is desired-will take some Colleges CoursesYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Coordinator - Immediate Job in Reston,Full Time Employee,"Reston, VA 20190",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-coordinator-immediate-job-reston-va-us-172748193.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ea2b9f76751d5cce6b35b9ad5d816e76
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:17:33:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative Assistant (42-45K) A large commercial real estate management and development company is seeking a proactive Administrative Assistant with Adobe InDesign & Adobe Acrobat experience to support the Corporate Executive Team in Tyson’s Corner, VA. They are looking for a trustworthy, detail-oriented individual with proven experience in prioritizing responsibilities with minimal supervision.  Duties and Responsibilities: -Meeting and Calendar coordination·         -Travel arrangements for the executive team·         -Supporting Corporate/Partner functions·         -In charge of advertisements/announcements·         -Create business plans/presentations·         -Ability to meet deadlines effectivelyRequirements:·         -Working knowledge with Adobe Acrobat/InDesign·         -Knowledge of MS Office Suite·         -2+ years of Administrative ExperienceBenefits:·        - 401K Plan·        - Health/Life Insurance·         -Long/Short Term Disability Insurance·         -Vision/Dental InsuranceAPPLY TODAY, INTERVIEW TOMORROW!!!",Administrative Assistant (-K) Job in West Mclean,Full Time,"West Mclean, VA 22102",All,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-42-45k-job-west-mclean-va-us-166282521.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=3,"42,000.00 - 45,000.00 $ /year",Entry Level,5ec20644452674f9a264b14d9e9cbe3b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:17:42:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Medical Administrative Assistant III needed to work in the Patient Financial Service department in Los Angeles. English composition/grammar. Personal Computer literacy: File management, labels, Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel, Microsoft PowerPoint, and Visio. Excellent writing and proofreading skills. Problem solving for complex situations. Good interpersonal skill with managers and administrative staff. Highly professional demeanor. Good time management and prioritizing skills. Demonstrates attention to details while multi-tasking a variety of projects. Please send your resume as an MS doc to VIVIAN and place a follow up call. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1076041 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Medical Administrative Assistant - Needed ASAP in Los Angeles!!! Job in Los Angeles,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Los Angeles, CA 90071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-administrative-assistant-needed-asap-in-los-angeles!!!-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172921169.aspx?mescoid=4300748001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6667396556a9150c755c46c0a95abae1
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:17:47:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Office Services Associate is a member of the on-site Williams Lea team delivering exceptional customer service at our client locations. Responsibilities include mail distribution, copy services, hospitality and conference room set-up, reception assistance and other general office duties as needed.Job Responsibilities:Process high volumes of incoming and outgoing mail. Deliver mail and packages throughout the client location, following applicable distribution procedures.Complete large numbers of reprographics requests according to job ticket instructions.Bind, cut, and/or assemble reprographics jobs as necessary.Load copiers with paper and toner as needed.Set-up conference rooms including audio/visual equipment, furniture configuration, and food/beverages as needed.Assist with reception coverage, including managing multiple phone lines and visitor check-in.Handle sensitive and/or confidential documents and information.Communicate with manager and client on job or deadline issues.Job Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent.Minimum of one-year office service experience, preferably in a legal, banking or large corporate environment.Ability to work in a fast-paced team environment.Attention to detail with emphasis on accuracy and quality.Ability to prioritize work to balance multiple projects and deadlines.Excellent verbal and written communication skills.Exceptional customer service skills.Basic computer skills required.Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs. on a regular basis.Must be able to work standing up all or most of the time.It is the policy of Williams Lea to ensure equal employment opportunity without discrimination or harassment on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, alienage or citizenship status, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity of expression, marital or domestic/civil partnership status, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law.Williams Lea is a drug-free workplace and performs pre-employment substance abuse testing.WLRSR",Office Services Associate Job in Austin,"Full Time, Employee","Austin, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/office-services-associate-job-austin-tx-us-172784052.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=12,,Administrative/Clerical,8d8b211d7653aeaa9335a66d02435fb8
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:17:48:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a healthcare organization located in Burbank, is searching for an Administrative Assistant to join their Member Services Department on a temp-to-hire basis. The ideal candidate must be a dedicated and focused individual who has healthcare industry experience and excels at prioritizing, completing multiple tasks simultaneously, and following through to achieve project goals  Primary responsibilities include: • Handling department inbound calls, emails, and patient inquiries• Updating patient information on Electronic Health Record system• Oversee administrative duties including; edit letters, create memos, expense reports, supply requisitions, operation budget reports• Maintain and order office supplies• Assist with department luncheon planning when needed  Requirements and Experience • Bachelors Degree preferred, will consider experience• 3-5 years experience • Advanced skills with Microsoft Office, specifically Word, Excel and PowerPoint• A high degree of professionalism and strong work ethic coupled with a sense of responsibility and integrity required.• Ability to work under minimal supervision under tight time constraints as needed• Ability to work independently but also partner as a team player  This opportunity is starting out on a temporary-hire basis, offering full-time hours along with health, vision, and dental benefits. Hourly pay will range between $14-17 per hour. Submit your resume for consideration; interviews will take place next week!",Healthcare Administrative Assistant Job in Burbank,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Burbank, CA 91505",,http://jobview.monster.com/healthcare-administrative-assistant-job-burbank-ca-us-172371919.aspx?mescoid=4300748001001&jobPosition=18,,Administrative/Clerical,44c594154b109c47a1a68bcab4921410
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:18:26:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Administrative Assistant is needed for a prestigious Fortune 500 Company. The company is stable, yet swiftly growing, and has been established for over 50 years. They have been awarded one of the top companies to work for in their industry for the last 5 years. If you are a solution-oriented individual who possesses a natural mindset for resourcefulness, optimization, and cost savings, then this position may be the perfect match for you. Top qualities for this role include a proactive work style, natural interpersonal skills, and an eagerness to learn and lead. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074869 Job Experience:,, For immediate consideration, please send your updated resume in Word format to Kristi at knacino@appleone.com Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant for Fortune  Company Job in Beverly Hills,Full Time Employee,"Beverly Hills, CA 90212",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-for-fortune-500-company-job-beverly-hills-ca-us-172665048.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e518d5515f1923a03819478ce1dcbca4
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:18:57:17,No,jobs.monster.com,Receptionist needed immediately. Busy dental office in Guthrie. Mon-Thurs 8-5 and every other Friday 9-12. Competitive pay and benefits. Previous medical / dental office experience preferred. Please fax resume to 405-282-0298.This job listing brought to you by The Edmond Sun,Receptionist needed immediately Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,73044,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-needed-immediately-job-guthrie-ok-us-172976100.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b7b4d18433715f302d77a6d70809e525
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:18:58:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Arbor Management, LLC is seeking an effective Regional Property Manager to oversee apartment communities in Central Pennsylvania, Delaware, New Jersey and West Virginia.  The Regional Manager must be people-focused and have demonstrated ability to attract, motivate and retain the best employees in the multi-family, affordable housing industry.Responsibilities include the general administration, supervision of personnel, budget preparation, direction and monitoring of the overall physical and financial performance of a portfolio of HUD/Section 8 and Tax Credit multi-family sites.   Specific duties include:*      Review various reports. (HAP, month-end packages, payroll, property occupancy, weekly occupancy and marketing reports, to name a few.)*      Prepare various reports including budget variances, and agency inspection responses.*      Mentor Property Managers with regard to policies and procedures, fair housing practices, agency guidelines, and general career development.*      Written employee performance appraisals, disciplinary actions and compensation recommendations.*      Conduct regular site visits (travel required) in addition to agency inspections and ownership/investor meetings.*      Drive the annual budgeting process.*      Respond to resident concerns, agency notices and requests. Experience/Requirements:*      5-7 years proven, effective property management experience in the multi-family industry, preferably Regional Manager experience in HUD/Section 8 and/or Tax Credit Housing programs.*      Undergraduate degree or related work experience in lieu of education.*      Strong oral and written communication skills including the ability to communicate with all levels of the organization and the public.*      Strong organizational skills including the ability to set priorities and meet deadlines.*      Computer proficiency including MS Word, Excel, and Outlook.  *      General bookkeeping, AP/AR knowledge helpful.*      Must have a proven track record of developing an excellent on-site management team. We offer a competitive benefits and compensation package. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer.NON-SMOKING ENVIRONMENT For confidential consideration, please submit resume AND SALARY REQUIREMENTS to 4 Denny Road, Wilmington, DE 19809; Fax (800) 517-0485 or use the Apply feature below.  Responses that do not have the required experience or salary information will not be considered. Report",Arbor Management,"Full Time, Employee","Fax 800-517-0485 Address 4 Denny RoadWilmington, DE 19809",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-property-manager-job-wilmington-de-us-173001617.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=8,,,5d8c7a586cd5af342c8419922dc65226
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:19:18:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Administrative Assistant Position Features:? Great PayI have an immediate opening for an administrative assistant in the entertainment industry. We are looking for someone who is presentable, reliable, and looking for stability. This position offers great pay, benefits and opportunity for growth. If you are a customer service oriented person, than this position is for you!! Please apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1075922 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant Job in Woodland Hills,Full Time Employee,"Woodland Hills, CA 91367",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-woodland-hills-ca-us-172855079.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b4780105eb163e4ecaa71a7d910958c7
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:19:44:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Job Overview:The AST’s primary responsibilities are to organize the Store Management Office, execute operational administrative functions, oversee scheduling maintenance, balance the vault and other cash functions daily, distribute reports from My Macy’s Portal to management team, facilitate the screening/hiring process, handle HR functions, and act as the HR liaison for store employees. Performs other duties as assigned. The summary below may not include all the essential functions and qualifications for this position. For more information, we encourage you to review the complete job description by clicking here. Essential Functions: Coordinate distribution of all incoming communications (including faxes, e-mails, memos, letters, newsletters, and phone calls) whether from customers, employees, management, or the general publicMaintain a professional attitude with sincerity and enthusiasm reflecting Macy’s commitment to our customerCoordinate all functions of the hiring process including prescreening applicants, correspondence with applicants, and scheduling interviews with store managementBalance vault and store checkbook and perform other cash functions on a daily basisAct as MST liaison and train associates and GSMs on how to call in repairs;Regular, dependable attendance and punctuality Qualifications:Education/Experience: High School Diploma or equivalent. Some college is desirable. Minimum of two years administrative experience. Communication Skills: Effective written and verbal skills, ability to interpret instructional documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Excellent written and verbal communication skills. Mathematical Skills: Basic math functions such as addition, subtraction, multiplication, and division. Able to use a calculator. Other skills: Typing minimum of 60 wpm. Working knowledge of Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Exchange, and Lotus Notes. Able to handle multiple tasks simultaneously. Self-motivated. Excellent organizational, prioritization, and time management skills. Ability to collaborate and function as a member of a team. Must possess a strong sense of urgency. Should be comfortable with the use of computers and frequent use of RF equipment. Work Hours: Flexible with scheduling and available to work retail hours, which may include day, evening, weekends, and/or holidays. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment. Primary Location:United States-Utah-Salt Lake CityJob:Administrative/Clerical.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",**Retail Administrative Support Team** Part Time: Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Salt Lake City, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-administrative-support-team-part-time-salt-lake-city-ut-macy%E2%80%99s-city-creek-center-job-salt-lake-city-ut-us-172607801.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=4,,Administrative/Clerical,af16633eb05167f23db64a86ec051754
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:19:45:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Part Time Receptionist Position Features:? Weekend Only Work? Excellent work environment? Great hours? Great Pay to $0KImmediate need for a part-time Receptionist who is seeking a fast-paced environment working directly with customers. This Receptionist will be responsible for answering phones, greeting guests as they arrive, and data entry. Previous receptionist, customer service and computer experience are required. Will be working each Saturday and Sunday. Apply today for this weekend receptionist role. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074841 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Part Time Receptionist - Weekends Job in Palm Beach Gardens,Part Time,"Palm Beach Gardens, FL 33410",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-receptionist-weekends-job-palm-beach-gardens-fl-us-172665045.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f0acd020591adcc6953604f333d6b490
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:15:47:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location  US-TX-San Antonio ID  86536 Category  Finance/Accounting Posted Date  9/1/2016 Employment Type  Fulltime-Regular Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Aramark is searching for a Senior Unit Controller who will oversee the accounting and financial operations for a Healthcare System in the San Antonio area. In this role, you will be responsible for the preparation of financial and operating reports, working closely with the managers of the facility, our client, and Aramark corporate office. Provides support to the Regional Finance Director and frontline management team on existing business, forecast and budget, monthly operating results, etc. This requires a “hands-on” financial operator who is comfortable rolling up the sleeves with the ability to multitask between accounting and finance.   Duties and Responsibilities: Establish and maintain control systems for financial accounting functions on a unit level. Compiles monthly, quarterly and annual financial and operating information and ensures the accuracy and integrity of all financial reports and internal control requirements. Ensures contract compliance, creates biweekly and monthly client invoices and tracks the collection of receivables. Plans, directs, and organizes the accurate and timely reporting and forecasting of financial information. This includes preparation of the annual operating budget, updating monthly projections and managing the close process. Investigates variances to plan and projections, analyzes monthly trend reports, develops solutions, communicates and implements corrective action plans. Ensure proper payroll processing, vacation/time off, workers compensation, STD and LTD. Resolve any discrepancies relative to payroll. Provides support on major projects by gathering and analyzing detailed information. Highly collaborative with the Aramark Vice President of Operations, Resident District Manager, Directors and Managers. Facilitates on-going trainings for Aramark operations managers to develop financial acumen. Facilitate clear, accurate and timely communication of information to the Senior Members of the Client Team. Direct interaction with the Corporate Controller and various Financial and Department Heads. Assures that all company, corporate and normal business and ethical standards are closely adhered to and correct any deviations encountered. Maintains compliance with Aramark's standards of operation.  Adheres to Aramark's Business Conduct Policy at all times.  Maintains all records and reports to ensure compliance, with all local, state and federal regulations and codes. Maintains compliance with all requirements of Federal, State and local regulations and guidelines including the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, as amended, and the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended. Performs other related duties as directed by Regional Finance Director, VPO or Resident District Manager. Through the use of the Healthcare Operating Template, compile and review monthly financial and statistical data to perform analysis of operating metrics compared to industry benchmarks to identify and correct operational inefficiencies. Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers. Is responsive to customer needs. The ability to write reports, business correspondence, and the ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, and customers is required.   Aramark is searching for a Senior Unit Controller who will oversee the accounting and financial operations for a Healthcare System in the San Antonio area. In this role, you will be responsible for the preparation of financial and operating reports, working closely with the managers of the facility, our client, and Aramark corporate office. Provides support to the Regional Finance Director and frontline management team on existing business, forecast and budget, monthly operating results, etc. This requires a “hands-on” financial operator who is comfortable rolling up the sleeves with the ability to multitask between accounting and finance.   Duties and Responsibilities: Establish and maintain control systems for financial accounting functions on a unit level. Compiles monthly, quarterly and annual financial and operating information and ensures the accuracy and integrity of all financial reports and internal control requirements. Ensures contract compliance, creates biweekly and monthly client invoices and tracks the collection of receivables. Plans, directs, and organizes the accurate and timely reporting and forecasting of financial information. This includes preparation of the annual operating budget, updating monthly projections and managing the close process. Investigates variances to plan and projections, analyzes monthly trend reports, develops solutions, communicates and implements corrective action plans. Ensure proper payroll processing, vacation/time off, workers compensation, STD and LTD. Resolve any discrepancies relative to payroll. Provides support on major projects by gathering and analyzing detailed information. Highly collaborative with the Aramark Vice President of Operations, Resident District Manager, Directors and Managers. Facilitates on-going trainings for Aramark operations managers to develop financial acumen. Facilitate clear, accurate and timely communication of information to the Senior Members of the Client Team. Direct interaction with the Corporate Controller and various Financial and Department Heads. Assures that all company, corporate and normal business and ethical standards are closely adhered to and correct any deviations encountered. Maintains compliance with Aramark's standards of operation.  Adheres to Aramark's Business Conduct Policy at all times.  Maintains all records and reports to ensure compliance, with all local, state and federal regulations and codes. Maintains compliance with all requirements of Federal, State and local regulations and guidelines including the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, as amended, and the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended. Performs other related duties as directed by Regional Finance Director, VPO or Resident District Manager. Through the use of the Healthcare Operating Template, compile and review monthly financial and statistical data to perform analysis of operating metrics compared to industry benchmarks to identify and correct operational inefficiencies. Maintains friendly, efficient, positive customer service attitude toward customers, clients and co-workers. Is responsive to customer needs. The ability to write reports, business correspondence, and the ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, and customers is required.   This is a hands-on position which requires individuals to “roll up” the sleeves and actively participate in day to day activities such as inputting data, reconciling accounts, creating journal entries and accruals. This position will work with individuals at all levels of Aramark and the client organization. Position requires a Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Finance or related field. Advance Degree or Certifications desirable. Requires 5-7 years’ experience in budgeting, financial control, and forecasting with exposure to AR/AP, payroll, G/L and P&L management. The ability to work with mathematical concepts is required. Excellent oral and written communication skills, strong attention to detail and the ability to work under strict deadlines are essential. Individual must be organized, demonstrate initiative and have strong problem solving skills. Strong computer skills, specifically in Microsoft Excel, are required. Oracle Discoverer experience is helpful. Experience in food and/or labor management is a strong plus. Apply: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Senior Controller Unit - Healthcare Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-controller-unit-healthcare-job-san-antonio-tx-us-171813223.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,0a57761fc7bfb05a32a00913686d1eae
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:15:48:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Staff Auditor to join a dynamic team in Arlington, VA. The Senior Auditor is responsible for executing audits and drafting audit scope. Other Responsibilities Include: Assisting in drafting of Audit reports SOX control testing Attending audit meetings including opening and closing meetingsREQUIREMENTS: Four-year college degree in business or related field 2-4 years of audit related experience Ability to work well in a team Strong communication skills- both written and oral Ability to prepare reports based on collected information",Senior Auditor Job in Arlington,Full Time Employee,"Arlington, VA 22201",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-auditor-job-arlington-va-us-171745145.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=7,"90,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),bc259d79a721517ee4fa19865f81ba9c
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:16:05:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a rewarding career with a nonprofit? Would you enjoy working in property construction? Our client is hiring a Development Accountant in Downtown SF. You will spend your days dealing with invoices and charges, reconciling, and auditing statements. Our ideal candidate will have exceptional organizational skills and be ready to collaborate with a great team. Responsibilities: Monitors bank account before invoice paymentsPrepares monthly billing statementsCalculates and prepares invoicesManages month-end reconciliation schedules as required  Requirements: BA/BS in AccountingMinimum 2 years Accounting experience MS Excel and Yardi experience preferred  If you feel that this position is a match for you, please apply below, and submit your resume to Sara at sara.neuville@accountingprincipals.com For more opportunities, visit the Accounting Principals website at www.accountingprincipals.com Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity! ",Development Accountant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94104",,http://jobview.monster.com/development-accountant-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-171752064.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,04c7d422eb2fcd896e603b54b05f9ec7
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:16:57:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Great career opportunities at Fresno/AppleOne. We are recruiting for a local well known company, seeking top-notch payroll professionals. The company is currently recruiting for a Payroll Tax Specialist and Customer Service Rep. with payroll experience. These payroll professionals will provide support to business groups and assist with prep and completion of payroll and quarterly payroll reports. These positions will require strong knowledge of payroll for the CSR and payroll and payroll tax filing, preparation of amended 941/943 returns, quarterly & annual reconciliation of tax payments and returns, electronic file uploads to state agencies, filing for the Payroll Tax Specialist position. The ideal candidates must have the ability to meet deadlines & work with accuracy under volume pressure, excellent analytical, mathematical & organizational skills. Candidates with 3-5 plus years of outstanding payroll experience can forward their resume to the Fresno AppleOne office or apply at appleone.com, attention Mike Marmolejo. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:Candidates with 3-5 plus years of outstanding payroll and payroll tax experience.Years of Experience Required:",WANTED Payroll Professionals: Customer Service Rep's to Payroll Tax Specialist Job in Fresno,Full Time Employee,"Fresno, CA 93730",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/wanted-payroll-professionals-customer-service-rep's-to-payroll-tax-specialist-job-fresno-ca-us-171916971.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6e2532513579a03c68157a4e791ebd9b
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:16:58:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you an accounting professional who doesn't just enjoy digging into the numbers but also making decisions that directly impact the organization's bottom line? If so, this is the accounting job for you! In this Credit and Collections Specialist role you will work hand and hand with the sales team as well as your customers to ensure that account balances are at a satisfactory level. This will involve studying the aging report in depth, placing calls and sending emails to customers, negotiating balances that satisfy all parties, and reconciling AR accounts when payment is received. In return for doing this, you will be a part of a rewarding and growing Grand Rapids, MI team. This is a contract to hire role with very competitive salary.  Job Duties: - Work closely with the account executives and managers as well as your customers to ensure that account balances are at a satisfactory level based upon the aging report- Contact customers by placing phone calls and sending emails- Negotiate account balances and reconcile accounts upon receiving payment  Job Qualifications: - 1 year of previous experience in a credit/collections role minimum - Associate's degree required, Bachelor's degree preferred - Customer focused mentality with a friendly demeanor and effective communication skills- Strong technical skills within Microsoft Office and the ability to learn new software quickly- Team player mentality and able to work effectively with others  If you are a goal oriented and motivated accounting professional, this is the credit and collections role for you! Apply today to be considered.",Credit and Collections Specialist job in Grand Rapids,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Grand Rapids, MI 49546",,http://jobview.monster.com/credit-collections-specialist-job-in-grand-rapids-mi-job-grand-rapids-mi-us-171808956.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=2,14.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,9f6e523e5dca510c319328456b3aa61a
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:17:48:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Internal Audit - Limited Travel (Up to $110k)Multi-billion-dollar Insurance company is seeking a Senior Internal Auditor to join there Boston Team. The Senior Internal Auditor will be responsible for performing internal audit projects, as part of the comprehensive internal audit plan. This will be a blended role focusing on financial, Operational and IT audit testing and will be reporting directly to the Director of Internal Audit. Great opportunity to gain cross-over experience into different areas of audit coupled with an amazing work/life balance (NEVER staying past 5:30pm!). Responsibilities: Responsible for independently conducting and documenting complex audit projectsPerforms audit testing verifying the effectiveness of established processes and procedures and verbally communicates and confirms audit findings/observations identified through detailed testing. Develop internal audit scope, perform internal audit procedures, and prepare internal audit reports reflecting the results of work preformed Cover all functional and operating units, focusing on financial, IT and operational processes Perform follow-up on the status of outstanding internal audit issues Play a strong role in providing ongoing internal controls consulting, establishing strong partnerships with management in support of key initiatives Ad hoc projects Travel, less than 10% Required Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, or Business 3+ years of Audit, experience in Insurance or Financial Services preferred but not required Understanding of internal auditing standards, SOX, COSO and / or risk assessment practices Attainment or progression towards CPA, CIA or CISA a plus Strong organizational and analytical skills Strong working knowledge in using ACL or other data analysis tools Compensation: Up to $110,000 (DOE) + Bonus Great work/life balance Excellent Benefits Hollister Staffing and all its related entities provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, genetic information, disability, or veteran status or other categories protected by applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Senior Internal Audit - Limited Travel (Up to $k) Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",InsuranceAccounting and Auditing ServicesFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-internal-audit-limited-travel-up-to-110k-job-boston-ma-us-171792091.aspx?mescoid=4100678001001&jobPosition=13,"0.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,368f7b3e341e35b605e81029a13aef0b
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:17:49:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Description:Leidos is currently seeking an experienced Department of Army financial analyst with skills and expertise in GFEBS and some experience in support of Army Audit Readiness testing and logistics/financial processes associated with the Second Destination Transportation (SDT) program.  The ideal candidate will have extensive GFEBS skills & experience and some experience with, Wide Area Work Flow (WAWF), Defense Personal Property System (DPS), Third Party Payment System (TPPS) (commonly referred to as Syncada Freight and Syncada Household Goods), Electronic Document Access (EDA) and RSW-online.  Candidate will be able to effectively communicate with clients and project team members, prepare and manage historical files to support financial management business transformation projects, research audit samples and financial transactions, identify problems and defects, support data collection and analysis, recommend solutions and process improvements, and prepare and deliver presentations and documents for delivery to the client.  We will support the Army in their efforts to conduct audit readiness testing of the Second Destination Transportation program so that it can achieve full audibility by 2017, the deadline established by Congress in the National Defense Authorization Act of 2010.  The specific tasks include research and analysis of financial transactions and audit samples.  We will provide technical recommendations for improving and enhancing the classification and execution of transportation expenditures, improving data quality, assisting in the identification of incorrect usage of SDT accounts, assisting in the identification of potential over-payments, duplicate payments, or fraudulent payments.TA_2Qualifications:Bachelor's degree in a related field from an accredited college or university, and 10+ years of experience.   (Other education, commensurate experience and demonstrated experience may be substituted.)Required Experience:   Proven skills and expertise in working with GFEBS Proven experience working as a Department of the Army financial analyst Familiarity with general Government Accounting and Transportation Working Capital Fund (TWCF) processes and procedures Working knowledge of the following automated systems: General Fund Enterprise Business System (GFEBS), Electronic Document Access (EDA), and Wide Area Work Flow (WAWF) and the Defense Enterprise Accounting and Management System (DEAMS)• Familiarity with current Army guidance regarding the Schedule of Budgetary Activity (SBA) and Statement of Budgetary Resources (SBR) • Demonstrated ability to perform research, critical analysis, and assist with resolution of problems.• Excellent verbal and written communications skills and leadership abilities.• CDFM or another financial certification is a plus.Desired additional Experience: Proven experience supporting Army Audit Readiness testing to include familiarity with Army guidance regarding the Schedule of Budgetary Activity (SBA) and Statement of Budgetary Resources (SBR) Working knowledge of the following automated systems: Defense Personal Property System (DPS), and Third Party Payment System (TPPS)/Syncada  Proven skill working with processes for reconciling general ledger defects, accounting errors and unmatched transactions Proven ability to research and analyze SDT financial transactions, identify incorrect use of SDT funds, assist with identification of over-payments, duplicate and/or fraudulent payments Familiarity with the 10 distinct functional operations and associated financial processes impacting the SDT-CMA program (See paragraph 4.1.1.d. for listing) Excellent verbal and written communications skills with above average skills in basic Microsoft Office (especially Excel), Outlook and SharePoint Proven ability to prepare and deliver presentations, as required CDFM or another financial certification is desired but is not mandatory• Preparing and coordinating deliverables with Army military and civilian personnel• Knowledge of general Government Accounting Processes and Procedures and Transportation Working Capital Fund (TWCF) Billing Processes and Procedures.Primary Location: United States-Alexandria VA or New Cumberland PALeidos Overview:Leidos is a global science and technology solutions leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company�s 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported pro forma annual revenues of approximately $10 billion for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2016 after giving effect to the recently completed combination of Leidos with Lockheed Martin's Information Systems & Global Solutions business (IS&GS). For more information, visit www.Leidos.com The company�s diverse employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Qualified women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged to apply. Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Description:Leidos is currently seeking an experienced Department of Army financial analyst with skills and expertise in GFEBS and some experience in support of Army Audit Readiness testing and logistics/financial processes associated with the Second Destination Transportation (SDT) program.  The ideal candidate will have extensive GFEBS skills & experience and some experience with, Wide Area Work Flow (WAWF), Defense Personal Property System (DPS), Third Party Payment System (TPPS) (commonly referred to as Syncada Freight and Syncada Household Goods), Electronic Document Access (EDA) and RSW-online.  Candidate will be able to effectively communicate with clients and project team members, prepare and manage historical files to support financial management business transformation projects, research audit samples and financial transactions, identify problems and defects, support data collection and analysis, recommend solutions and process improvements, and prepare and deliver presentations and documents for delivery to the client.  We will support the Army in their efforts to conduct audit readiness testing of the Second Destination Transportation program so that it can achieve full audibility by 2017, the deadline established by Congress in the National Defense Authorization Act of 2010.  The specific tasks include research and analysis of financial transactions and audit samples.  We will provide technical recommendations for improving and enhancing the classification and execution of transportation expenditures, improving data quality, assisting in the identification of incorrect usage of SDT accounts, assisting in the identification of potential over-payments, duplicate payments, or fraudulent payments.TA_2Qualifications:Bachelor's degree in a related field from an accredited college or university, and 10+ years of experience.   (Other education, commensurate experience and demonstrated experience may be substituted.)Required Experience:   Proven skills and expertise in working with GFEBS Proven experience working as a Department of the Army financial analyst Familiarity with general Government Accounting and Transportation Working Capital Fund (TWCF) processes and procedures Working knowledge of the following automated systems: General Fund Enterprise Business System (GFEBS), Electronic Document Access (EDA), and Wide Area Work Flow (WAWF) and the Defense Enterprise Accounting and Management System (DEAMS)• Familiarity with current Army guidance regarding the Schedule of Budgetary Activity (SBA) and Statement of Budgetary Resources (SBR) • Demonstrated ability to perform research, critical analysis, and assist with resolution of problems.• Excellent verbal and written communications skills and leadership abilities.• CDFM or another financial certification is a plus.Desired additional Experience: Proven experience supporting Army Audit Readiness testing to include familiarity with Army guidance regarding the Schedule of Budgetary Activity (SBA) and Statement of Budgetary Resources (SBR) Working knowledge of the following automated systems: Defense Personal Property System (DPS), and Third Party Payment System (TPPS)/Syncada  Proven skill working with processes for reconciling general ledger defects, accounting errors and unmatched transactions Proven ability to research and analyze SDT financial transactions, identify incorrect use of SDT funds, assist with identification of over-payments, duplicate and/or fraudulent payments Familiarity with the 10 distinct functional operations and associated financial processes impacting the SDT-CMA program (See paragraph 4.1.1.d. for listing) Excellent verbal and written communications skills with above average skills in basic Microsoft Office (especially Excel), Outlook and SharePoint Proven ability to prepare and deliver presentations, as required CDFM or another financial certification is desired but is not mandatory• Preparing and coordinating deliverables with Army military and civilian personnel• Knowledge of general Government Accounting Processes and Procedures and Transportation Working Capital Fund (TWCF) Billing Processes and Procedures.Primary Location: United States-Alexandria VA or New Cumberland PALeidos Overview:Leidos is a global science and technology solutions leader working to solve the world's toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company�s 33,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Virginia, Leidos reported pro forma annual revenues of approximately $10 billion for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2016 after giving effect to the recently completed combination of Leidos with Lockheed Martin's Information Systems & Global Solutions business (IS&GS). For more information, visit www.Leidos.com The company�s diverse employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Qualified women, minorities, individuals with disabilities and protected veterans are encouraged to apply.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/gfebs-deams-dfas-financial-analyst-job-alexandria-va-us-171860797.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=6,,,314dca800944699ee276c20651a184a6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:18:57:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"WellPoint is the nation's leading health benefits company serving the needs of approximately 28 million medical members nationwide. Your Talent. Our Vision. At National Government Services (NGS), an independent subsidiary of Anthem, Inc. and one of the largest Medicare contractors in the country, it’s a powerful combination.  It’s the foundation upon which we’re creating greater care for our members, greater value for our customers and greater health for our communities. Join us and together we will drive the future of health care. This is an exceptional opportunity to do innovative work that means more to you and those we serve. The Mgr. Internal Audit position is responsible for managing a team of auditors for a specific location. Primary duties may include, but are not limited to: Designs and implements audit procedures. Schedules, prepares, performs and reports on the functions of assigned team members. Directs the work of auditors assigned to the team, reviews their work for sufficiency of scope and for accuracy. Reviews and approves working papers developed by audit team. Reviews audit reports and updates audit programs. Hires, trains, coaches, counsels and evaluates performance of direct reports. background. Requires a BS/BA in accounting or finance; CPA or CIA certificate required; minimum of 10 years experience performing financial audits of large, complex, highly automated functions and systems; 3+ years of leadership experience; or any combination of education and experience, which would provide an equivalent background. Significant experience with HHS/CMS programs strongly preferred. Experience with healthcare management or auditing Audit experience with a government contractor. Certified Government Audit Professional designation a plus. Anthem, Inc. is ranked as one of America’s Most Admired Companies among health insurers by Fortune magazine and is a 2014 DiversityInc magazine Top 50 Company for Diversity. To learn more about our company and apply, please visit us at antheminc.com/careers. EOE. M/F/Disability/Veteran.",Mgr Internal Audit -  Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,Location:,InsuranceAccounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/mgr-internal-audit-114881-job-indianapolis-in-us-171868176.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,98f75c46562e35d158010e327881e36c
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:18:58:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network. Location: Denver, CO Job Overview:This position focuses on acquiring new logo accounts in a B2B target market through an aggressive no nonsense sales approach, to quickly understand needs, issues and strategies so an appropriate solution bundle can be deployed. Job Responsibilities:Accountable for meeting and/or exceeding assigned sales objectives and monthly revenue quotas, and building new revenue by selling telecommunications products and services to small and mid-market (SMB) accounts with an average telecom spend of $500-$5,000/ month.Responsible for cold calling, prospecting, both on the phone and face-to-face, in a high activity sales model to an assigned zip code based territory.Manage sales funnel to analyze and manage pipeline activity and monitor sales activity against assigned quotas.Individual will not be responsible for post sale account support or renewals.Must be self-motivated, self-disciplined, and provide prompt follow-up to all customer inquiries.Must be organized and maintain accurate records on daily activities and results.Minimum Qualifications:Bachelor's Degree or equivalent with typically 0-1 years experience. Experience in building strategic plans for sales team growth and development including account and activity planning and development.Experience mentoring, training and developing high performance sales teams.Proficiency with PC-based applications such as MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint and sales performance/tracking programs.Ability to travel for sales training, kick-off meetings, etc. is required for this position.Must have a valid driver's license and satisfactory driving record.Successful completion of Sales Professional Assessment. Preferred Qualifications:Prior Sales Management experience.Experience with and knowledge of the customer base in the local market.Demonstrated stable track record of success in Sales, with 4 years consecutive experience within one company within the last 5 years. Job Segment: SalesAlternate Location: US-Colorado-DenverRequisition #: 91808 This job may require successful completion of an online assessment. A brief description of the assessments can be viewed on our website at http://find.centurylink.jobs/testguides/ EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Senior Commercial Account Executive Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80202",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-commercial-account-executive-job-denver-co-us-171784407.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,,2272603991e49ac8e1fbcf93d83bc4f9
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:20:00:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Arthur J. Gallagher & Co., one of the world's largest insurance brokerage and risk management services firms, provides a full range of retail and wholesale property/casualty (P/C) brokerage and alternative risk transfer services globally, as well as employee benefit brokerage, consulting and actuarial services. Gallagher also offers claims and information management, risk control consulting and appraisal services to clients around the world. If you're looking for a professional career with an industry leader then you have come to the right place.  Wherever your interests lie, we're sure you will agree on one thing: our continued prosperity hinges on our greatest resource - our people.Position SummaryPrimarily focused on maintaining effective overall operations at the Gallagher Headquarters Conference Center including coordination and execution of all onsite meetings and events held on the premises. Incumbent will lead both the initial setup and the ongoing administration of the Condeco system and serve as principal liaison for key conference center vendors and support personnel including  food services (catering), maintenance (room set up), AV specialists, janitorial and others as needed.  This position may be responsible for supervising two “receptionist/meeting concierge” support staff in addition to managing the overall conference center to ensure smooth execution of all in-house conferences and meetings from initial booking requests through to meeting attendees’ departure.   Key responsibilities will also include:   Developing conference center booking and utilization processes and procedures including setup and ongoing management of the Condeco system  Supporting clients and guests with effective usage of the Condeco application, including assisting with initial employee training Ongoing responding to questions Modifying and adjusting the system configuration based on user feedback and recurring questions and issues Proactively managing the meeting rooms/spaces-monitoring changes and cancellations to ensure maximum utilization, appropriate occupancy and seamless turn-around Developing and fostering efficient processes and collaborative relationships with key related service departments and personnel (catering, AV specialists, janitorial, etc.) Essential duties consist of:  Working with food service and janitorial on a weekly reconciliation of billing to make certain that all costs are accurate and are charged to the correct cost center Developing procedures for reserving hoteling positions in Condeco and train employees on reserving hoteling positions Providing weekly “look ahead” schedules to the food service vendor and review special requests  Required: Bachelor's  degree 1 or more years business experience Recent firsthand fluency with Condeco Conference technology suite or similar Meeting/conference planning/hospitality backgroundDesired: Excellent communication skills Strong computer skills/ programs (Microsoft excel, word and outlook, etc.) Demonstrable troubleshooting and problem solving techniques Strong organizational skills and acute attention to detail .  U.S. Eligibility Requirements:Interested candidates must submit an application and resume/CV online to be considered Must be 18 years of age or older Must be willing to submit to a background investigation; any offer of employment is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background investigation Must have unrestricted work authorization to work in the United States.  For U.S. employment opportunities, Gallagher hires U.S. citizens, permanent residents, asylees, refugees, and temporary residents. Temporary residence does not include those with non-immigrant work authorization (F, J, H or L visas), such as students in practical training status. Exceptions to these requirements will be determined based on shortage of qualified candidates with a particular skill. Gallagher will require proof of work authorization Must be willing to execute Gallagher's Employee Agreement or Confidentiality and Non-Disclosure Agreement, which require, among other things, post-employment obligations relating to non-solicitation, confidentiality and non-disclosureGallagher offers competitive salaries and benefits, including: medical/dental/vision plans, life and accident insurance, 401(K), employee stock purchase plan, educational expense reimbursement, employee assistance program, flexible work hours (availability varies by office and job function) training programs, matching gift program, and more.    Gallagher believes that all persons are entitled to equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against nor favor any applicant because of race, color, religion, sex, age, veteran status, disability, national origin, or any other legally protected status.  Equal employment opportunity will be extended in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship, including, but not limited to, recruitment, hiring, training, promotion, transfer, demotion, compensation, benefits, layoff, and termination.  In addition, Gallagher will make reasonable accommodations to known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant with a disability, unless the accommodation would impose an undue hardship on the operation of our business.",Concierge Lead Job in Schaumburg,"Full Time, Employee","Schaumburg, IL 60173",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/concierge-lead-job-schaumburg-il-us-172995324.aspx?mescoid=3900655001001&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,b48126b2d68112c581d0b1017fbf649a
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:20:26:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are a motivated and self-driven individual, keep reading! Ajilon Professional Staffing is looking to hire someone for a Full Time Legal Administrative Assistant job in Princeton, New Jersey. This individual should be detail orientated, have knowledge of legal practices, New Jersey Laws and the states court systems. The pay rate for this job is $15 to $20 an hour. If interested, apply now!  Job Responsibilities: • Coordinating appointments with clients • Managing firm’s calendar • Help firm’s management on legal projects • Other administrative duties as assigned by superiors  Qualifications: • 3 or more years of experience in legal/administrative field • Bachelor’s degree preferred, but not required • Detail Orientated • Ability to work effectively independently and on a team • Strong communication and professional skills • Knowledge of legal practices and the New Jersey Court System• Proficient at Microsoft Excel, Outlook, and Word  If you are interested in this Part-Time Legal Admin Assistant job in Princeton, NJ or other jobs available through Ajilon, please click “apply” below or visit our website www.ajilon.com  ;",Full Time Legal Adminstrative Assistant Job in Princeton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Princeton, NJ 08540",,http://jobview.monster.com/full-time-legal-adminstrative-assistant-job-princeton-nj-us-172435705.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,cfb2567f487b6a7e3ca6c1ae527d929f
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:20:57:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryResponsible for providing all Direct Territories with administrative support focused on the facilitation of new sales associate agreements, customized reporting, partnering with other functional areas to aid in growing the business.Principal Duties and Responsibilities•Works across various functions and departments (e.g. Commissions, IT, Customer Service, Sales Ops., etc.) to ensure organization alignment, issue resolution and value creation for all US Direct Territories.•Prepare, administer, and manage Sales Associate Agreements for Direct Territories as well as update respective document repositories and coordinate with other departments (Commission and AP) to ensure alignment and proper commission payments. •Lead the standardization /optimization with other functions through completion and ongoing maintenance of existing handbooks, policies and manuals specifically targeted at Direct Territories. •Ensure compliance with all governmental agencies, such as OIG/SAM exclusion requirements including annual reporting, audits, and monitoring. •Proactively manage Sales Associate Agreements and compensation plans for plan expirations and changes to ensure accurate commission processing and payments.. •Drive the development of reporting capabilities to provide TGMs with critical rep level infromation.•Lead the development and implementation of Key Performance Dashboards for sales management review•Other duties, projects and assignments as assigned.Expected Areas of Competence•Ability to work independently and as a team member•Highly motivated, self-starter willing to meet strict deadlines and time constraints•Ability to communicate both orally and in written form to multiple departments and levels of the organization.•Ability to perform under pressure and demonstrate problem solving/trouble shooting skills•IT / Computer savvy (e.g. Microsoft Office Suite)•Willingness to do what it takes to get the job done•Excellent planning and organizing skills and the ability to deal independently with many issues at one time and prioritize accordingly•Must perform work with accuracy and have a proven work history of accurate, precise work; detail oriented•Results driven and customer focused (internal & external)Education/Experience Requirements•A Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting, Business, Engineering or other related field is preferred. 3 plus years of experience in a related field where strong demonstration of key competencies is required.Travel RequirementsUp to 15%Additional InformationEOE M/W/Vet/Disability",Direct Territory Sales Admin Senior Analyst Job in Warsaw,Full Time Employee,"Warsaw, IN 46581",,http://jobview.monster.com/direct-territory-sales-admin-senior-analyst-job-warsaw-in-us-172956256.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=14,,Administrative/Clerical,f33ca11ec41cb9ba06d2b71f253af44b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:20:58:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for a Laboratory Billing Specialist in North Miami Summary: This position will be responsible for timely submission of technical or professional medical claims to insurance companies including physician office, hospital or health care facilities.  Responsibilities:• Monitors laboratory billing and registration processes, resolves discrepancies and makes correction as needed• Manages the timely and accurate posting of laboratory charges• Acts as a resource to facilitate communication between the business office, coding department and laboratory staff.• Provides data entry and billing support to the laboratory• Handles billing inquiries and assists with reimbursement audits. Requirements:• 1 or more years Laboratory experience, registration skills, billing procedures and requirements for Medical, Medicaid, and third party payers• ICD 10 coding a plus but not required• Proficient in Microsoft Office (Outlook, Word, and Excel)• Excellent communication skills, telephone, verbal, and written.• Consistently seeking opportunities to improve billing process Education: • High School and above If you feel that this position is a match for you, please submit your resume to Jennifer Cubas at Jennifer.Cubas@ajilon.com with “LAB BILLING” in subject line. Check out more opportunities on Ajilon professional staffing website at www.ajilon.com   ",Laboratory Billing Specialist Job in Miami,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Miami, FL 33161",,http://jobview.monster.com/laboratory-billing-specialist-job-miami-fl-us-172523255.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=5,,Administrative/Clerical,58b0f20aa61658dc7236bfbd5e0eccf4
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:21:46:17,No,jobs.monster.com,The Town of Bargersville is looking for a Utility Customer Service Representative / Bookkeeper Preferred Skills / Requirements / Experience: Billing and Accounting Software Cash Management Advanced Customer Service Billing Intermediate Excel Bookkeeping Education requirements: Minimum High School Degree Preferred Compensation & Benefits: Rate: $15 - $17 p/hr Exc. benefit package Please remit resume via email to: nkehl@ townofbargersville.org,The Town of Bargersville is looking for... Job in  function wrap(EL,,46131,All,http://jobview.monster.com/the-town-of-bargersville-is-looking-for-job-franklin-in-us-172919157.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=8,,,1eca75f85dfc5ec55a6e77550dda3a6f
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:21:47:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for an Experienced Admin who has 10+ years of experience with at least 4+ years supporting C-Level Executives.  This opportunity is a direct hire and would be in Pleasanton with a medical diagnostics company.  Responsibilities: Supports the executive level management for the Molecular Diagnostics Unit with a variety of highly advanced and complex administrative and business support activities including but not limited to scheduling and coordination of onsite/offsite meetings and/or larger scale events, maintaining schedules, executive travel itineraries and conference calls, channeling communication and/or materials to and from the Executive Office, and other special projects.Represents themselves in a highly polished and professional manner, supporting the Molecular Diagnostics as a key liaison to other executive leaders both internal and external to the company by fostering and maintaining effective relationships with high level internal and external stakeholders.Serves as a business partner to executives, providing analysis and recommendations on company-wide administrative topics and/or policies; compiles and/or reviews highly confidential business, legal and financial presentations and reports.Exercises considerable discretion, judgment and latitude in handling highly confidential business matters.Manages budget for the Executive Office.Leads, manages and oversees the development and/or delivery of administrative services training materials and tools. As the Sr. Executive Administrative Associate, incumbents in this role will be expected to: Lead, manage and oversee company-wide administrative project initiatives, promoting new ways of working and fostering an exchange of ideas and support among colleagues Serve as the escalation point for other Sr. Executive Administrators, requiring exceptional knowledge of local departmental and global organizational policies and procedures Effectively work with and lead others without direct authority Ensure effective training, on-boarding, and communication of job expectations for new administrative staff, in collaboration with other Sr. Executive Administrators Interview and participate in selection process of other administrative staff Coach and mentor other administrative staff including providing general feedback on performance directly to the individual and their manager You're someone who wants to influence your own development. You're looking for a company where you have the opportunity to pursue your interests across functions and geographies. Where a job title is not considered the final definition of who you are, but the starting point.           Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalentAdministrative professional accreditation and certifications in office administration and management, preferred.10 or more years of advanced administrative work, with at least 4 years supporting a C-level executives.Highly advanced business and financial acumen; has an in-depth and through understanding of business operations and capable of performing financial and other business analyses and reporting.Proven track record and advanced experience in developing and/or delivering group presentations, administrative services training materials and tools.Exceptional leadership skills and ability to drive process improvement best practice initiatives across an organization.Exceptional computer skills with Microsoft Office applications, e-mail and calendaring applications.Exceptional organizational and planning skills, including the coordination of multiple activities.Outstanding attention to detail.Exceptional verbal and written communication skills. Communicates clearly, concisely, thoroughly and in a highly professional and timely manner with all internal and external partners/stakeholders.Proven track record and experience handling highly confidential or sensitive information in a consistently appropriate and effective manner.Exceptional problem solving and decision-making skills.Exceptional partnering and negotiation skills and ability to influence others without authority and partner with other staff.Exceptional interpersonal skills and considerable organizational savvy; able to guide other on how to navigate internally to find the appropriate resources and contacts in an expeditious and effective manner.Preferred:Associates Degree and above.Experience supporting a C-level executive and department/functional team in the life sciences/biotechnology industry is strongly preferred.",Sr. Executive Administrative Associate Job in Pleasanton,Full Time,"Pleasanton, CA 94566",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-executive-administrative-associate-job-pleasanton-ca-us-172996411.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b6b2aa6ed57923338b0b8895031b1e01
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:22:02:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"CompanyLillibridge is a Chicago-based healthcare real estate firm. Our parent company is Ventas Inc., a Fortune 500 REIT (www.ventasreit.com). As an industry leader, Lillibridge has decades of experience in healthcare real estate and specializes in advisory services, acquisition and development, and property management and leasing of medical office and ambulatory healthcare properties nationwide. One of the largest firms in this sector, we own / manage 24M sf across 450 healthcare properties in 32 states, 200+ markets and 160+ cities. More than 10M people a year visit our buildings to maintain their good health and get well.PositionOversee the daily operations of medical office buildings. Key areas of responsibility include tenant relations, property operations, construction, lease and contract administration and financial management/analysis. Conduct all property activities in coordination with the General Manager/Regional Manager and Owner.ResponsibilitiesDirect and supervise building staff and vendors and monitor performance in accordance with the Company and Owners' policiesSupport the planning, budgeting and control of operating and capital expendituresPrepare (or assist in the preparation of) annual budgets, quarterly reforecasts, and monthly financial statementsActively participate in accounts payable and accounts receivable processConduct regular building inspections as assignedPrepare bid specifications, request proposals, and evaluate bidsCoordinate contractor activities and oversee all construction projects as requiredSupervise tenant move-ins, and move-outsMaintain service agreements and assure tenant and vendor certificates of insurance meet all requirementsAssist with the leasing process and preparation of the lease submission package as neededParticipate with General Manager and Leasing Manager (if applicable) on periodic market toursAttend monthly hospital meetings with General ManagerAssure life safety programs are in place and meet all company guidelines and legal requirements for tenants and employees of propertiesMaintain the property tenant handbooks and emergency procedures and review with each new tenantOther duties and special projects as assignedRequirementsHigh School Graduate required; B.A. or B.S in related field preferredMinimum of 3 years commercial property management experience with medical office buildings experience preferredReal estate salesperson preferred, broker’s license a plusCommercial leasing experience a plusDemonstrated proficiency in Microsoft Excel, Microsoft Word, Yardi, Nexus and other relevant software programsProperty management accounting software experienceEffective written and verbal communication skillsStrong customer service skills to promote positive client/tenants relationsAbility to work independently in a highly visible position and to supervise efforts of direct reportsAbility to multi-task and prioritizeStrong knowledge of building mechanical systems and construction management requiredLillibridge offers a competitive compensation and benefits package to the successful candidate.Lillibridge is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Lillibridge does not accept unsolicited resumes from staffing agencies, search firms or any third parties.",Property Manager,"Full Time, Employee","St. Louis, MO",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/property-manager-lhs-job-st.-louis-mo-us-172181150.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=2,,Administrative/Clerical,171b6d407b047ea0f84d0d579e2556ad
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:22:02:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionThe role of the Medical Office Specialist is to provide exceptional service to patients and customers while providing outstanding support to physicians and healthcare providers.  The Office Specialist ensures that patient needs and visit expectations are met. Office Specialists are responsible for ensuring the smooth operations in the fast paced environment of the clinic with the goal of a positive patient experience with every encounter.   Key ResponsibilitiesGreets all patients and visitors to ensure a friendly, welcoming and professional clinic atmosphereChecks in patients in a timely manner, explains financial requirements and collects payments for office visits and clinic proceduresVerifies patient insurance information and obtains insurance authorizationsCoordinates with clinic staff to ensure a positive patient flow and waiting room experienceTimely responses to patient inquiries and timely completion of assigned tasksAnswers telephones, forwards telephone messages and under the direction of licensed staff schedules appointments, procedures and diagnostic testsAssists in routine clerical functions such as filing of medical information in patient's records, locating and preparing department charts, obtaining medical records from other providers and entering charges for billing purposesMay assist with front and back office duties as assigned simultaneouslyFacilitates timely closing of clinic and follows closing proceduresCompletes assigned training and educationPerforms other duties as determined by the Practice Manager or Clinic Director Minimum Requirements: Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively on the phone, in writing and via emailAbility to exercise discretion on sensitive and confidential mattersDemonstrated computer skills with data entry softwareMust be able to flex schedule in accordance with patient and provider schedulesHigh School diploma or GED equivalent is required  Institutional accreditation and degree obtainment will be verified upon hire Preferred Qualifications:One or more years of demonstrated office or reception experienceOne or more years experience in an outpatient clinic or other healthcare setting Experience with Electronic Medical Records (EMR) systemsDemonstrated knowledge of medical terminologyBilingual in English and Spanish Physical Requirements:Standing, sitting, walking, speaking, listening, bending, reaching, pushing, pulling, lifting, grasping and manipulating tools, typing, using peripheral computer tools.Please Note:All positions subject to close without noticeEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled",Medical Office Specialist Wasatch Brai Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,"Salt Lake City, UT 84101",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-office-specialist-wasatch-brai-job-salt-lake-city-ut-us-172645735.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,f4649d8c380a17f1f45c8c04160739e7
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:22:32:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - $/hr Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-15-hr-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172926013.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a461a933df77aeffaf903866a26b442d
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:22:54:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Frontline Source Group is on the hunt for an Administrative Assistant on a direct hire basis! Company Profile:Our client, located in Houston, TX is actively seeking an Administrative Assistant on a direct hire basis. This location is great, and the tenure is phenomenal! Features and Benefits:Full Medical, Dental, and Vision401 k company matchShort and long term disabilityImmense room for company growthVolunteer opportunities  Administrative Assistant Role:The Administrative Assistant will perform general office duties such as streamlining phone calls, taking messages, and handing incoming/outgoing mail. Other responsibilities include producing and distributing company memos, letters, faxes and forms, book travel arrangements, Administrative Assistant Background Profile:3+ years experience in office settingAssociates DegreeProficient in ExcelCan thrive in busy atmosphereWorks well with othersAdaptable to change  Please visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com   Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas. Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Administrative Assistant Job in Houston,"Full Time, Employee","Houston, TX",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-houston-tx-us-172231115.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=11,"32,000.00+ /year",Administrative/Clerical,5a4be5845c183659605be13e02a9bf3b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:22:55:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Company in Los Angeles is looking for an Administrative Assistant to be the point of contact and administrative support in the Medical Division. Will be responsible for managing all daily operations of the office, scheduling, taking meeting minutes, composing correspondence and must have experience using MS Office. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076189 Job Experience:,, MS OfficeYears of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - University Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90017",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-university-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172927620.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1b6e8db69e7810bf704e0a016e4882e5
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:23:58:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Well known company is looking to hire a Jr. Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator. Duties:Will program telephones, screen and direct a high-volume number of calls; greet persons entering the office; provide general administrative and clerical support; prepare letters and documents; and receive and sort mail and deliveries. Orders and maintains coffee and office supplies. Successfully operates a variety of standard office machines, including a personal computer and a variety of computer applications, phone, fax, and shredding and photocopy machines. You will assist with special events with the back end administrative duties such as scheduling, ordering materials, processing invoices and helping with the set up for the events. Skills The candidate must have excellent computer/typing, verbal and interpersonal skills and be detail oriented, able to multi-task, work independently in a fast-paced environment, plan meetings, and be available to work overtime as needed. Must be punctual and dependable. Professional, motivated, energetic.Requirements: Proficiency with PC and/or MAC. Must be proficient with Word, Excel and Outlook. Knowledge of PowerPoint and Adobe programs a PLUS!Education: Minimum High School Diploma or equivalent. Associates or Bachelors preferred. Apply for this great position as a Jr. Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator today! Email resume as a Microsoft word attachment to Azuri Ross for immediate consideration. Call the Downtown Los Angeles Act-1 office and ask for Azuri Ross. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.act-1.com/?sc=11&id=1074533 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Junior Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator Job in Pasadena,Full Time Employee,"Pasadena, CA 91101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-administrative-assistant-office-coordinator-job-pasadena-ca-us-172601542.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8b9504e5fabe45d0f5a0367210e5fb18
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:23:59:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"What to work for one of the Tri-County Top Non-Profits? We are hiring for a Bilingual Secretary for an amazing opportunity! If you have the skills, apply today!-Generate reports, correspondence, documents, and memoranda using software programs-Transcription-Data entry-General office (photocopy, fax, file)-Create tables, forms-Gather data and compile reports-Chart and/or administrative filing, purging, locating-Relieve and/or rotate on switchboard and perform reception duties-Schedule appointments and meetings-Organize and maintain filing systems-Update information, lists, reports, contracts-Maintain logs and keep records-Assist with computer and printer problems-May distribute mail and prepare charts and information for mailing-May coordinate intake process-May order, distribute and maintain office supplies, agency forms and information-May develop and maintain databases-May assist with all aspects of records maintenance.-May take minutes at meetings-May assist with planning and implementing special functions and training sessions-May assist with facility issues such as building repair or service calls to vendors.-Additional or different functions may be assigned from time to timePlease send your resume to Valorie Cota at VCota@Volt.com For immediate consideration for this position, please call the office for an appointment. As a convenience, Volt can email you the application to be completed in advance for your appointment.Volt Is An Equal Opportunity Employer-Able to prioritize work and meet deadlines-Knowledge of medical/psychological terminology (preferred)-Communication skills-Appointment scheduling experience-Maintain confidentiality-Problem-solving skills-Interpersonal skills-Organizational skills-Prompt follow-up-Able to work with minimal supervision-Customer service oriented-Attention to detail-Tact, initiative, discretion, good judgment",Bilingual Secretary - $ per hour - SLO! Job in San Luis Obispo,Full Time Employee,"San Luis Obispo, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-secretary-16-per-hour-slo!-job-san-luis-obispo-ca-us-172924811.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=11,,General/Other: Administrative/Clerical,9bbfbdf2f51b70b2312e88b1a51bddc3
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:14:05:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionNEW CDL CLASS A CAREER OPPORTUNITIES in ATLANTA, GA"" MAXIMIZE YOUR HOURS OF SERVICE! ""• $900 - $1,000 Weekly Average + Benefits• Regional Runs Out 2-3 Nights• OTR - Home Weekly• Local - Home Daily - All Shifts• Some Touch Required & Some WeekendsAPPLY NOW or CALL Michelle at 770-923-2825 or Debbie & Karen at 678-213-2932*** IMMEDIATE PLACEMENT FOR QUALIFIED CANDIDATES ***TransForce Drivers are Respected Professionals. Join the TransForce TeamThousands of TransForce Drivers - 53 Branch Offices - 24 Years of Service!• We have an excellent reputation with our drivers and our customers.• TransForce shows genuine concern for your career objectives.• Safety is our priority. We comply with DOT and FMCSA.BENEFITS:• Competitive Weekly Pay - Direct Deposit or Debit Card• Medical - Dental - Vision Insurance• Life & Disability Insurance• Paid Time Off• 401KREQUIREMENTS:• 2 years of recent tractor trailer driving experience• No more than 3 moving violations in the previous 3 years• Not cited for a D.O.T. defined accident in the previous 3 years• No serious offenses in the previous 7 years or pattern of unsafe practicesTruck Driver - CDL Driver (Transportation)As a CDL Truck Driver you will be responsible for the safe operation of a commercial vehicle and the reliable delivery of our clients… products.TransForce, Inc. is seeking full time and part time local and regional CDL Truck Drivers at our 53 branch offices located throughout the U.S. We are the nation…s leading transportation staffing company and our drivers are respected professionals; safe, reliable, and profitable. Join TransForce and see why our 3,500 drivers are proud to be on the TransForce team. We offer steady pay, benefits, and good equipment. In addition you…ll enjoy assignment flexibility that you won…t find anywhere else. With TransForce you have the unique ability to consider a change in assignment rather than a change in employment if situations change.Keywords: tractor trailer driver, commercial driver, Class A cdl driver, professional driver CDL-A Driver, CDL A Truck Driver, Class A CDL Driver, Class A CDL Truck Driver, CDL Truck Driver, CDL Commercial Truck Driver.*cb*",TRUCK DRIVER - CDL Class A Local Driver (Transportation) Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-class-a-local-driver-transportation-job-atlanta-ga-us-167889804.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,c7546ccda6b00af6ea6828c0b24e7205
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:07:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you’re passionate about working with animals – and giving pet parents exceptional service – Petco is the place for you. At Petco, you can take your skills and passion and build a career that you’ll love with a strong, growing leader in the pet care industry. Working at Petco will open up a world of opportunities for you to pursue your professional goals – the kinds of opportunities only possible with a retail leader with over 1,300 stores covering the entire country and Puerto Rico. At this exciting event, you’ll be able to explore multiple opportunities in our Romeoville area Petco store, including: •Guest Experience Specialist•Pet Stylist - $500 sign on bonus for qualified applicants •Grooming Salon Apprentice•Merchandise Operations Specialist We are interviewing for the Romeoville Petco! Take the first step! Apply on-line at www.mypetcocareer.com before attending one of the below events.Interviews will take place on Saturday October 29th from 11am-3pm and Sunday October 30th from 11am-3pm at the location listed below:        Petco #1979 Romeoville   369 SO. Weber Rd     Romeoville, IL 60446       815-838-2368 As a key member of our team, you’ll work in a fast-paced and fun environment with other great people who share your values. You’ll also enjoy our ""Total Rewards"" package that includes competitive compensation and many attractive benefits: • Medical, Dental and Vision Plans • Flexible Spending Accounts • Paid Time Off (PTO) • 401(k) with Company Match • Employee Discounts $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","Petco - SP/BB Job Application for Petco- Romeoville Il Job Fair! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Employee,"Address Romeoville, Illinois 60446",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/petco-romeoville-il-job-fair!-job-romeoville-il-us-172921649.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,,,1241ee5cc8110187d6ef135d2d716c15
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:07:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title Administrative Assistant Auto req ID 1703BR Address 1 7707 SW 44th Street City Oklahoma City State/Province Oklahoma Zip Code 73179 Job Description - Overview Mardel Christian & Education a privately-held company based in Oklahoma City, Oklahoma, is seeking a qualified and dependable individual to fill the position of Administrative Assistant in the Mardel Layout Department.  This full-time hourly position is located in Mardel corporate offices and will report to the Visual Merchandising Manager.  Operating hours are Monday through Friday 8:30am to 5pm; minimal travel required.The ideal candidate will possess the following experience, skills, and attributes: Proven administrative or assistant experience Provide solid work references Computer skills with software proficiency    Excellent time management skills and ability to multi-task and prioritize work Exceptional attention to detail and problem solving skills Excellent written and oral communication and customer service skills Perform and manage general clerical duties such as phone calls and messages, copies, faxes, filing and scanning documents Desire to learn and remain a positive attitude Job Description - Requirements Ability to prioritize work flow and meet deadlines Ability to read and comprehend instructions, regulations and memos Proficient in Microsoft Office including Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook Ability to multitask in a fast pace environment and relay information in a timely manner Data entry experience preferred, AS400 experience preferred but not required Inter-personal skills and ability to work in a team environment Accurately prepare and complete reports and documents as requested Merchandising experience a plus Other tasks as assigned  Benefits include: 401(k) Plan Medical, Dental, and Flexible Spending Benefits Corporate Clinic Access Life Insurance LTD Insurance Paid Vacations Personal Paid Time Off (PPTO) Paid Holidays Employee Discounts Casual Dress Code Great Work Environment To be considered for this position, an applicant must provide a cover letter, relevant experience and wage requirements, along with a current résumé. Applicants who fail to comply with these requirements will be rejected. EOE - Drug/Alcohol testing compliant with applicable statutes.For reasonable accommodation of disability during the hiring process call (877) 303-4547.",Administrative Assistant Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time Employee,"Oklahoma City, OK 73179",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-oklahoma-city-ok-us-172096000.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,01d19cf6e7e5c4ae1e95dfab9f222834
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:08:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) Beechwood & State GetGo Job in Alliance,Full Time Employee,"Alliance, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-beechwood-state-getgo-job-alliance-oh-us-173003967.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=17,,Administrative/Clerical,b200d69b2ff5147ac262a8a4464cbc53
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:08:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"2014 Pillar Award winner - Multifamily Development Firm of the Year! At NRP Group, we successfully develop, build, own, manage and have partnered in numerous projects in multifamily, senior housing, single-family infill, and commercial and retail sites. From high-density urban infill sites to more suburban settings, our focus is to make every building we develop, construct and/or manage a true reflection of the special needs and desires of our customers and residents, with a commitment to excellence from concept to completion. In fact, we developed nearly 17,000 single-family and multi-family homes and apartments in the past 16 years with our eye on more to come.We develop, construct, and operate high quality market-rate and affordable rental properties. We are a dynamic and growing company that works in conjunction with many financial institutions, partners, and non-profit organizations to pursue the development and financing of real estate properties. Currently, The NRP Group has assets and operations in Ohio, Texas, Louisiana, North Carolina, Virginia, Arizona, New Mexico, Michigan, and Indiana.We are currently seeking a Leasing Specialist. This position will assist site management and be responsible for: ensuring a professional leasing atmosphere; developing and maintaining all elements of the community marketing and outreach plan; maintaining occupancy levels, collections and delinquencies; ensuring positive tenant relations; and complying with related reporting requirements. Ideal candidate will have:• Strong property operations knowledge with at least two (2) plus years’ experience.• Knowledge/experience in Low Income Housing Tax Credit (LIHTC), Section 42, or other affordable housing programs preferred. • Proficiency with entering data into YARDI (or similar) software.• Solid MS Office skills (Word, Outlook, Excel).• A positive attitude and willingness to be a team player. • Eagerness to learn and develop professionally. • Ability to take direction and listen. • A passion for helping and assisting people. •I ndustry certifications or credentials such as ARM, CPM, COS, or HCCP a plus.• Hold a valid driver's license.We offer a competitive pay rate plus bonus opportunities and a benefit package that includes: medical, dental, prescription, life and disability insurance, paid time off, and 401(k) retirement plan. Qualified candidates, please apply now. You will be required to pass a criminal background and drug test.",Leasing Specialist Job in Trenton,"Full Time, Employee","Trenton, MI 48183",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/leasing-specialist-job-trenton-mi-us-172947713.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=4,,Administrative/Clerical,15b64445c5d8cdbba6b93055f3e93ce3
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:19:45:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:AppleOne is currently recruiting for an experienced Full Charge Bookkeeper for an established law firm located in Chesapeake, VA. This position Features: - Great benefits package- Monday-Friday schedule- Great pay up to $52KRequirements: - Has worked in a legal office doing bookkeeping. - Proficient with Excel and QuickBooks. - Familiar with trust/escrow accounts. - Experience doing reconciliations. - Experience with Payroll Tax. Serious inquiries only. Please apply by September 12 in order to be considered. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1070317 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Bookkeeper,Full Time Employee,"Chesapeake, VA 23320",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bookkeeper-up-to-52k-job-chesapeake-va-us-171922397.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4e68ab06e4602504319f6ab7f2eb30cd
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:19:46:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Needs someone that is a self starter, can work independently and be responsible for their own accounts.WHAT DOES THIS JOB ENTAIL?Firm handles accounting for small to medium firms (90% of businesses are S-corps). During Tax season their business is 80% Businesses-20% Individual Tax returns.DOES NOT WANT ANYONE THAT HAS WORKED IN MANUFACTURING!!Must be extremely organized and expect perfection from selfGood Computer Skills: Quick books, Pro Series, (for 1040s and Corporations)Good with Microsoft, Word, and ExcelAccounting Theories: “Tie Out” Balance Sheets numbers by analyzing the accounts and prepare AJEs as requiredTax/Small Business Strategies: S CorporationsProblem SolverManaging Budgets and ProductionClient ManagementIS IT RIGHT FOR YOU?Must have 3 to 5 years CPA experience ( no less than 3 verifiable years CPA or EA required)This position does require lots of overtime during tax season, 32 hour week (off Fridays) during off season.POSITION REQUIRES A CPA OR EA DEGREE. .Please Submit Resumes TO:Email: dwilliams@hartmanpersonnel.com Fax: 440-974-6627or Call 440-974-0800 ",Certified Public Accountant Job in Mentor,Full Time Employee,"Mentor, OH",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/certified-public-accountant-job-mentor-oh-us-171220885.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=14,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,02423be8f6b57c7b20998a1cb79da923
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:20:57:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Franklinville,Full Time,"Franklinville, NY 14737",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-franklinville-ny-us-171595132.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1c74e8b98d3bb534d843a0929cc997eb
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:20:58:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Washington, DC that is seeking an energetic and highly responsive Editorial Assistant.Summary:The ideal candidate will provide day-to-day administrative tasks related to the monthly magazine and assists with other Communications Department projects and initiatives as needed. Specific responsibilities include corresponding with the editor and associate editors, maintaining the Inbox, preparing check requests, meeting agendas, and generating article ideas.REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree required At least one year of work experience is preferred Strong writing, proofreading and editing skills Organizational skills Strong Administrative background working in a nonprofit organization, preferred Experience with desktop publishing and graphic design is highly preferred Experience with desktop publishing, graphic design (Quark and/or InDesign, Photoshop) and HTML coding is a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Editorial Assistant Job in Washington,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Washington, DC 20036",,http://jobview.monster.com/editorial-assistant-job-washington-dc-us-171699826.aspx?mescoid=4300760001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),789d9101b482f27d895387f4682cef65
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:21:30:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Accountant - Varoius Levels of experience neededRequisition ID:16004M3Job Category:Accounting and PayrollPrimary Location:USA-TX: TEXAS-IRVINGSchedule:Full-timeJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:RegularJob Posting:Mar 2, 2016Description:CSC is looking to expand there already successful BPO Accounting Group that supports large Fortune 500 Insurance Clients in the Irving, TX and Jacksonville, IL locations. There are currently multiple openings at various levels. Candidates will be considered for each level based on experience. #1 ASSOCIATE ACCOUNTANT: Performs data entry, filing, and maintenance in order to support the department. Deviates from routine policies and procedures when required. Verifies cost accounting, accounts payable, and accounts receivable records in order to ensure accuracy. Uses office automated systems to input data to facilitate accounting tasks, generate basic and moderately complex financial reports, and respond to general inquiries. Balances complex ledgers to ensure accuracy. Collaborates with other departments and/or outside agencies to resolve problems. Reports problems and other issues and makes recommendations to management to improve procedures. Provides assistance and general guidance to less experienced personnel.#2 SENIOR ASSOCIATE/ SUPERVISOR ACCOUNTANT:Assist in the Insurance Premium Department, transaction recording, research and other duties. Distributes invoices, posts batches, receives payments, processes accounts payable invoices, and mails accounts payable checks. Calculates moderately complex commissions, interest, and payments for each transaction; creates and distributes moderately complex commission statements for each transaction for closing. Assists in completing special report requests from internal and external partners. Assists in determining methods and procedures for new assignments to ensure alignment with department policies and procedures. Contacts other departments and/or outside agencies to resolve problems. Collaborates with other department in researching and escalating current and potential problems. Reports problems and other issues and makes recommendations to management to improve procedures. Maintains customer specific program information in tables, auditing orders and reporting; makes necessary corrections to vendor claims, and answers queries about the program. May provide procedural assistance to less experienced accounting staff to ensure company policies and procedures are learned and followed. Prepares and may post routine journal entries for company accounts in order to keep accounting systems accurate and up to date. Assists in and/or reconciles balance sheet and income statement accounts to general ledger; researches basic discrepancies and determines appropriate course of action. Develops spreadsheets for account analysis and journal entries in order to keep records organized and standardized. #3 PROFESSIONAL ACCOUNTANT:Business Admin/Accounting individual to assist with functions related to client projects: reconciliations, special projects, issue resolution, creating reports, etc. Accounting and/or Life Insurance experience highly desired. Good organizational skills required. Computer literate (specifically MS Office) required. Lite travel required. Assists the business process outsourcing development teams in gathering and summarizing data to assist in client evaluation. Accompanies the sales team, as needed, to client sites. Provides analysis and documentation of client requirements to provide appropriate data to outsourcing project development and implementation teams for client(s). Prepares work plans, documents project scope and reviews with client to ensure accuracy. Monitors project schedules to ensure timelines and deliverables are met. Demonstrates system setup to clients before system is finalized. Tests and analyzes system configuration against requirement documents during implementation and administration. Monitors processes and resolves participant issues; escalates as appropriate. QualificationsEXPERIENCE NEEDED:#1 ASSOCIATE ACCOUNTANT: Basic Qualifications High school diploma or G.E.D. Four or more years of administrative experience Experience working with generally accepted accounting principles Experience working with bookkeeping Experience working with financial software packages Other Qualifications Insurance Industry Knowledge: Life Policies-Experienced1+ year experience with accounting experience is desirable Previous insurance knowledge is a plus. Good personal computer and business solutions software skills Organizational skills to balance and prioritize work Good communication skills to interface with company employees Ability to work in a team environment #2 SENIOR ASSOCIATE/ SUPERVISOR ACCOUNTANT: Basic Qualifications High school diploma or G.E.D. Six or more years of finance administration experience Experience working with generally accepted accounting principles Experience working with bookkeeping Experience working with financial software packages Other Qualifications 3+ years experience with accountingBA Accounting preferred or Business related OR applicable experience Self motivated, detail orientedStrong communication skills, both verbal and written requiredComputer skills are a must, including experience working with Microsoft products such as Word, Excel and Access. Willingness to learn, follow detailed instructions and work in a fast paced office environment Previous insurance knowledge is a plus, but not required #3 PROFESSIONAL ACCOUNTANT: Basic Qualifications Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience Bachelor's degree in business administration, information technology, computer science or related field preferred Two or more years of business process outsourcing, consulting or systems implementation experience Experience working with information technology applications and infrastructure Other QualificationsInsurance Industry Knowledge preferred Life Policies Training requiredBA in accounting, MBA or CPA preferred 3+ years experience in auditing or accounting, emphasis in insurance accounting/SOX auditing preferred Experience with GAAP and STAT accounting preferred PC Literacy in Microsoft Office Suite Good interpersonal skills Good communication skills for communicating with support personnel and managementGood analytical and problem solving skillsPlanning and organizational skills to balance and prioritize workLeadership skills to provide assistance to less experienced personnelAbility to work independently and as part of a team Remote Work Authorized:NoRelocation Assistance:Not AvailableClearance Level:NoneDivision:Global Business Services & Regions",Accountant Varoius Levels of experience needed Job in Irving,Full Time,"Irving, TX 22042",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-varoius-levels-of-experience-needed-job-irving-tx-us-171606634.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f897380954b1aac89274c6a6e21ef633
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:21:46:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales AgentWhile a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings.Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers.Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team.Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today.About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com.1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Aflac Insurance Sales Agent Job in Fairfield,Full Time,"Fairfield, NJ 07004",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/aflac-insurance-sales-agent-job-fairfield-nj-us-171595085.aspx?mescoid=4100673001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,85f70bf73d58b3934e3dbaba268479a6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:21:47:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Franklin, MA that is looking for a 3+ year experienced Staff Accountant on a part-time temporary basis.Primary responsibilities for this role include: Balances, reviews and proofs branch work and back office closings, including reconciliation, and Accounts Payable Maintain accurate, up-to- date records of daily journals, bank balances and posting to the GL Completes monthly GL reconciliations for assigned accounts, verify monthly inventory for Official Checks and Money Orders, reconciles VISA cash advances and payments daily Utilizes tact and experienced-based knowledge to resolve accounting problems, explaining specific policies and procedures Provide assistance to other Accounting staff membersREQUIREMENTS: Degree preferred 3+ years of experience Banking Industry highly desired Demonstrated knowledge of GAAP, CU regulations, legislation and financial reporting Experience with Fiserv a plusKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Staff Accountant Job in Mansfield,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Mansfield, MA 02048",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-mansfield-ma-us-171609219.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2e35a80d7440153e7a1776f4cdfab201
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:22:55:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Supervisor Position Features: ? International Company ? Excellent Benefits ? Number One In Their Industry Worldwide ? True Leadership/Mentorship/Partnership Company Culture, and Endless Growth Opportunity. Salary $78K and great benefits. ?This international transportation company is looking to hire a degreed accountant ready for the next step in their career. Ideal for someone looking to make the change from public accounting firm, to private industry with global firm. Will oversee payroll team, and will be directly responsible for billing, a/p, a/r, and ensuring compliance on all accounting and finance policies and procedures. ?Will be responsible to manage the reconciliation process and oversee revenue transactions, preparation of month end accruals and analysis, while assisting in preparing monthly P&L, forecasting, and budgeting. ?Responsible for final monthly general ledger, analyzing P&L statement, making corrections and providing variance explanations. ?Assists in annual budget process ?Bachelor?s degree in Accounting or Finance a MUST, and 3-5 years of accounting/supervisory experience. ?Knowledge of Internet applications, networks, Microsoft Office applications (Word, Excel, Outlook, etc.), ?Ability to make decisions independently, set priorities, develop individual goals, measure progress, implement rewards or discipline as required. ?Ability to use diplomacy and tact in dealing with the client, peers and subordinates. ?Excellent written and verbal communication skills; interpersonal and communication skills. ?Ability to build and motivate teams. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1070161 Years of Experience Required:",Accounting Supervisor- Job in Capitol Heights,Full Time Employee,"Capitol Heights, MD 20743",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-supervisor-job-capitol-heights-md-us-171920137.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9492dcadcf181936f5a98bbfd80e320e
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:22:56:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Accounting Manager in Boston, Massachusetts (MA).Responsibilities: Create and review business and data requirements for automation of Regulatory reports FR Y-9C, FFIEC 031, FFIEC 041 and CCAR reports (FR Y-14Q/A) within Axiom Assist in managing multiple stakeholders including IT, QA, etc. through creation of actionable stories in the back log Coordinate and participate in Issue Resolution meetings Assist in stakeholder communications / project status and other essential project documentation Assist in ensuring Data Governance compliance while assisting in data quality issue remediation Assist in enhancing the internal control framework over the automated regulatory reporting frameworkREQUIREMENTS: Axiom knowledge is a plus Relevant education and/or training will be considered a plus Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Accounting Manager Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02111",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-job-boston-ma-us-171602624.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=10,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),0fc62a2eae423896157aad8c91f53eb9
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:08:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"XLA is looking to fill the position of Administrative Assistant supporting a Federal Agency within the Department of Justice. This person will report daily to a Government facility, must be able to obtain at least a secret clearance, and is equipped to handle sensitive and personal identifiable information. Responsibilities:Serves as the intermediary between Federal Examiners and Human Resources to process, review, and validate key components of Federal employment applicationsConducts data entry of key information received from various sources into a single IT system for applicant tracking and ensure zero error ratesFiles and maintain archival records, log books, charts and display boardsUses Microsoft Excel (formulas, creating tables, V-Look-ups, formatting for client presentation) and other Microsoft Office toolsDuplicates, shreds and files correspondenceAnswers and responds to telephone inquiriesPrepares investigative, statistical reports with input and assistance from othersAssists in preparing travel requests, making travel and lodging arrangements, and in the submission of travel vouchers for the Unit the contractor supports3+ years of relevant work experienceExperience with data entry and administrative functionsSuperior understanding of Microsoft Office Suite including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc.Federal Government experience is desired, but not required.Education Requirements:High school diploma or equivalent Clearance Requirements:Secret Clearance preffered, not required. PI95415758Apply Here",Administrative Assistant Job in Lorton,Full Time,"Lorton, VA 22079",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-lorton-va-us-172657235.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,,,ef265ce6abb0b88b8a7e47d2de5106ea
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:10:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are in search of a professional Corporate Receptionist.Client DetailsWith an excellent reputation globally this top tier investment firm pride themselves on their outstanding reputation in the market place. They are seeking a professional and experienced Receptionist to represent the company in delivering an exceptional service to their clients at all times.DescriptionAs Receptionist, you'll be the face of the company welcoming Executive level staff and VIP clients. You'll work with a small team in order to provide administrative support to the CEO including typing, formatting, collating data, travel arrangements and ad hoc tasks delegated by management. The role will involve assisting the team in projects undertaken as well as ensuring the office and kitchen area are clean and tidyProfileYou will possess previous Receptionist experience within a corporate office dealing with Executive level staff. Your corporate presentation will be flawless along with your professional demeanor and capacity to handle sensitive information. You will have a positive attitude coupled with a willingness to assist the wider team where needed. You will also have a proven eye for detail and excellent Microsoft Office skills.Job OfferYou'll be offered the opportunity for a permanent position at a competitive salary. You will work within an excellent and cohesive working environment with excellent career opportunities. The role will offer you variety and the opportunity to develop your skills within an encouraging and supportive office.",Receptionist Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10017",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-job-new-york-ny-us-172998601.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=3,,"Senior Executive (President, CFO, etc)",66eaf2d518c5dc252a238e9959bcb1a7
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:44:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Company has urgent need for a Administrative Assistant Part-time (3 days per week) 24 hrs. a weekResponsibilities will include general adm - filing, faxing, scanning, inbound & outbound phone calls in addition to calendering, scheduling, and maintaining excel spreadsheets.Eligible candidates Must have *3-5 years experience working as an Administrtaive Assistant to a CEO *College degree*Excellent verbal and written communication and organizational skills,Proficient in Microsoft office Word, Excel, Outlookand possess time management skills, ability to multi-task and work with little to no supervision.Apply for this great position as a Administrative Assistant today earning up to $40,000 We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074490 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Seeking Part time Administrative Assistant- $,Full Time Employee,"Sherman Oaks, CA 91403",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/seeking-part-time-administrative-assistant-40-000-year-job-sherman-oaks-ca-us-172601512.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a7e1eea95cab0a3a923d3855540166a5
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:44:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Job requires:- Answer phones and emails- Some knowledge of Microsoft Office - Schedule appointments and calendar- Light Clerical- Bubbly PersonalityCompany offers excellent benefits, great company perks, awesome work environment. Great opportunity to learn and grow. Apply now!!!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. Please contact Van @ AppleOne Pasadena for this specific position! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074859 Job Experience:,, Bilingual Spanish or Mandarin is a plus!Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant-Up to K!!! Job in Pasadena,Full Time Employee,"Pasadena, CA 91101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-up-to-48k!!!-job-pasadena-ca-us-172665065.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d03051b2ee0ae7ceff5a4e62745b1673
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:58:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"DATA ENTRY CLERK / OFFICE HELP Off Lease Only is growing in West Palm Beach and is seeking a candidate for a high volume data entry role. Full time M-F 2pm-10pm, $10-$12 per hour. Local candidates only. Please apply at Jobs@offleaseonly.com",DATA ENTRY CLERK / OFFICE HELP Job in Lake Worth,Full Time,"Lake Worth, FL",All,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-clerk-office-help-job-lake-worth-fl-us-172936746.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=17,,,9653663b0f026323a3e5622e9d8394db
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:00:59:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Administrative Assistant ? Executive Assistant Client overview:Our client is a major pharmaceutical firm located in North Jersey. They are seeking a talented administrative and executive assistant caliber for their supporting team. This is a challenging and dynamic role, high exposure environment and a strong career development opportunity. Role overview:Qualifications:Qualifications: ? Minimum of (8) years Administrative Assistant experience ? Advanced computer skills using MS Office Suite (Outlook, Word, Excel, Power Point etc.) and operation of other peripheral devices ? SAP experience processing: Expense Reports; Purchase Orders and Payment Requests; Vendor Add Forms, as well as the capability to run reports within SAP ? Experience scheduling complex travel arrangements including multi-leg domestic and international travel ? Demonstrated experience with processing of Visas/Passports. ? Advanced secretarial/clerical abilities with a history of high performance ? Documented experience as a strong performer in current and past positions ? Ability to handle and prioritize a large number of simultaneous assignments ? Experience with event planning and coordination ? Extraordinary attention to detail ? Outstanding communication and people skills ? Experience with financial and budget tasks Preferred Experience: ? Minimum of (3) years Executive Administrative experience supporting executives (Associate Director, Director, Executive Director, VP or above) Responsibilities: Responsibilities: The primary activities include and are not limited to the following: ? General Secretarial/Clerical duties ? Work requires the coordination and performance of multiple tasks while understanding the project principles and technical skills related to own work assignments. ? Work priorities and activities are reviewed with little supervision. ? Produces/completes various work assignments requiring advanced analytical ability, independent judgment, creativity and problem solving skills. ? Schedules complex, multi-leg and international travel ? Supports the use of Team Sites ? Communication Skills must be at a level to effectively interact with the executives and internal/external clients both on-site and remotely to maintain workflow. ? May coordinate special projects within the division/area. Location: Lebanon, NJDuration: 6+ monthsSalary: $15-20.00/hour (based on experience)?All qualified candidates will be contacted immediately? We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076087 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant ? Executive Assistant Job in Lebanon,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job Description:Administrative Assistant ? Executive Assistant Client overview:Our client is a major pharmaceutical firm located in North Jersey. They are seeking a talented administrative and executive assistant caliber for their supporting team. This is a challenging and dynamic role, high exposure environment and a strong career development opportunity. Role overview:Qualifications:Qualifications: ? Minimum of (8) years Administrative Assistant experience ? Advanced computer skills using MS Office Suite (Outlook, Word, Excel, Power Point etc.) and operation of other peripheral devices ? SAP experience processing: Expense Reports; Purchase Orders and Payment Requests; Vendor Add Forms, as well as the capability to run reports within SAP ? Experience scheduling complex travel arrangements including multi-leg domestic and international travel ? Demonstrated experience with processing of Visas/Passports. ? Advanced secretarial/clerical abilities with a history of high performance ? Documented experience as a strong performer in current and past positions ? Ability to handle and prioritize a large number of simultaneous assignments ? Experience with event planning and coordination ? Extraordinary attention to detail ? Outstanding communication and people skills ? Experience with financial and budget tasks Preferred Experience: ? Minimum of (3) years Executive Administrative experience supporting executives (Associate Director, Director, Executive Director, VP or above) Responsibilities: Responsibilities: The primary activities include and are not limited to the following: ? General Secretarial/Clerical duties ? Work requires the coordination and performance of multiple tasks while understanding the project principles and technical skills related to own work assignments. ? Work priorities and activities are reviewed with little supervision. ? Produces/completes various work assignments requiring advanced analytical ability, independent judgment, creativity and problem solving skills. ? Schedules complex, multi-leg and international travel ? Supports the use of Team Sites ? Communication Skills must be at a level to effectively interact with the executives and internal/external clients both on-site and remotely to maintain workflow. ? May coordinate special projects within the division/area. Location: Lebanon, NJDuration: 6+ monthsSalary: $15-20.00/hour (based on experience)?All qualified candidates will be contacted immediately? We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1076087 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-executive-assistant-job-lebanon-nj-us-172924480.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b1ab2ac79c40b65dbd038fa625a1aee8
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:02:55:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job If you’re passionate about working with animals – and giving pet parents exceptional service – Petco is the place for you. At Petco, you can take your skills and passion and build a career that you’ll love with a strong, growing leader in the pet care industry. Working at Petco will open up a world of opportunities for you to pursue your professional goals – the kinds of opportunities only possible with a retail leader with over 1,300 stores covering the entire country and Puerto Rico. At this exciting event, you’ll be able to explore multiple opportunities in our Paramus area Petco store and other surrounding stores, including: •Pet Stylists- $1,000 sign on bonus for qualified applicants                                  •Grooming Salon Apprentice •Dog Training Apprentice •Guest Advisor •Merchandise Operations Leader•Merchandise operations Specialist •Companion Animal Leader •Guest Experience Specialist We are interviewing for the Paramus and surrounding area Petco locations! Take the first step! Apply on-line at www.mypetcocareer.com before attending one of the below events.Interviews will take place on Tuesday November 8th from 11am-6pm at the location listed below:Petco #789 Paramus-NJ450 Route 17 NorthParamus, NJ 07652201-261-6306Hiring for Multiple Locations! As a key member of our team, you’ll work in a fast-paced and fun environment with other great people who share your values. You’ll also enjoy our ""Total Rewards"" package that includes competitive compensation and many attractive benefits: • Medical, Dental and Vision Plans • Flexible Spending Accounts • Paid Time Off (PTO) • 401(k) with Company Match • Employee Discounts $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } }); Report","Petco - SP/BB Job Application for Petco-Paramus and surrounding locations Job Fair! | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Employee,"If you’re passionate about working with animals – and giving pet parents exceptional service – Petco is the place for you. At Petco, you can take your skills and passion and build a career that you’ll love with a strong, growing leader in the pet care industry. Working at Petco will open up a world of opportunities for you to pursue your professional goals – the kinds of opportunities only possible with a retail leader with over 1,300 stores covering the entire country and Puerto Rico. At this exciting event, you’ll be able to explore multiple opportunities in our Paramus area Petco store and other surrounding stores, including: •Pet Stylists- $1,000 sign on bonus for qualified applicants                                  •Grooming Salon Apprentice •Dog Training Apprentice •Guest Advisor •Merchandise Operations Leader•Merchandise operations Specialist •Companion Animal Leader •Guest Experience Specialist We are interviewing for the Paramus and surrounding area Petco locations! Take the first step! Apply on-line at www.mypetcocareer.com before attending one of the below events.Interviews will take place on Tuesday November 8th from 11am-6pm at the location listed below:Petco #789 Paramus-NJ450 Route 17 NorthParamus, NJ 07652201-261-6306Hiring for Multiple Locations! As a key member of our team, you’ll work in a fast-paced and fun environment with other great people who share your values. You’ll also enjoy our ""Total Rewards"" package that includes competitive compensation and many attractive benefits: • Medical, Dental and Vision Plans • Flexible Spending Accounts • Paid Time Off (PTO) • 401(k) with Company Match • Employee Discounts $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/petco-paramus-surrounding-locations-job-fair!-job-paramus-nj-us-172921647.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,,a9984999ac10963c399a9c3b123440c0
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:02:57:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities ESSENTIAL TASKS & RESPONSIBILITIES: Process invoices in accounts payable systems Verify cash banks, complete daily deposits, and perform safe audits Maintain a constant sense of cost control Adhere to all safety regulations for sanitation, food handling, and storage Promote good public relations Adhere to the uniform policy as set by FSD Other related office duties as assigned Qualifications MUST BE ABLE TO: Skillfully use hand tools or machines needed for your work Read instructions for items to be made Use math to calculate change Work with client(s) with tact and diplomacy Perform work that is routine and organized Present professional appearance Pass a criminal background check High School diploma/GED   PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Lifting twenty (20) pounds unassisted and more with assistance; frequent lifting and/or carrying of objects weighing up to twenty (20) pounds Reaching, handling, fingering, feeling, seeing, standing, walking Inside Job (defined as spending approximately 75% or more of the time inside.  Temperature changes: variations in temperature, which are sufficiently marked and abrupt to cause noticeable bodily reactions.",Student Worker - Office Assistant - Univ. of Delaware-Perkins Job in Newark,"Part Time, Employee","Newark, DE 19716",,http://jobview.monster.com/student-worker-office-assistant-univ-of-delaware-perkins-job-newark-de-us-172736244.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=11,,Administrative/Clerical,05759c0fc60d8df561dfaebe87e8e8c1
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:03:46:02,No,jobs.monster.com," Perinatology Research Branch/ National Institutes of Health/Eunice Kennedy Shriver National Institute of Child Health and Human Development (NIH/NICHD) in partnership with Wayne State University in Detroit, Michigan, seek a qualified candidate for the position listed below. Our premiere maternal and infant health and disease research group is made up of world experts dedicated to the pursuit of excellence in education and research leading to the improvement of the understanding, diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of disorders related to infant mortality.   We are seeking highly skilled staff members to work as part of a team providing high-level support in a fast paced, demanding environment. Candidates must be able to:Handle sensitive and/or confidential documents and informationAnalyze and prepare documents to be scannedConvert hardcopy documents to electronic images using sheet-fed imaging equipmentFollow standard operating procedures to ensure the quality of the images and data integrityMeet weekly productivity standardsPerform regular scanner maintenanceCommunicate with manager or supervisor on job or deadline issuesAdditional duties as assignedIn order to learn more about this position, and to directly apply online, please click here: https://prbwsu.hyrell.com/VirtualStepPositionDetails.aspx?TemplateId=65034 Thank you for your interest in this position. The Hiring Manager ",Data Entry Coordinator Job in Detroit,Full Time,"Detroit, MI 48201",,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-coordinator-job-detroit-mi-us-148271522.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=13,,,de4e128480e84aa4f95d60f50339dd92
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:03:55:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, an elite consulting firm, seeks an upbeat and professional receptionist for their growing DC office.About You:Must have a Bachelor's degree to be considered for this role.Must be outgoing, personable, who can work in a fast paced environment.At least 1 year of professional office experience.Experience using MS Office Suite (Outlook, Word, PowerPoint, and Excel). The role:Answer phones, greet guests, distribute office mail, schedule in Outlook, order office supplies.Assist with various MS Office Suite projects within Word, Excel, and PowerPoint.Maintain a clean lobby space, as well as assist staff with a variety of special projects.This is a direct hire position ranging between $40k-50k annually. If you are interested in working for a premiere consulting firm with opportunity for career advancement, please apply today with your resume in MS Word format!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Find Us on Facebook!Follow Us on Twitter!Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Receptionist - $-K - Washington DC! Job in District Of Columbia,Full Time Employee,District of ColumbiaDC,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/receptionist-40-50k-washington-dc!-job-district-of-columbia-dc-us-172966030.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=17,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Administrative/Clerical,60ace09b0b0bc73d6015f3c80d2ace91
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:03:56:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Deli team, your primary responsibility will be servicing the customers by filling their orders and ensuring they have the freshest products available. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Prepared Foods and Meat Departments. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by greeting customers in the department and ensuring their orders are filled to meet their expectations. Deli team members are also expected to make suggestions to our customers to enhance their shopping experience. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Smiles and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product in the deli cases, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Accurately record and assist in preparation of deli special orders to ensure the customer is delighted with the finished product. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Assist in maintaining deli cooler efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customers safety. Assist in other areas as required. Responsible for controlling some expense within a department. Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $1 - $100k Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Education and Training Desired High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Weighing Equipment Used Bizzerba slicer Cardboard Baler Compactor Knives Pressure Hose Safety Cutter Scale Labeler Shrink Wrapper Slicer U-Boats",Deli Clerk (Part-time) - Jamestown Giant Eagle Job in Warren,Full Time Employee,"Warren, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/deli-clerk-part-time-jamestown-giant-eagle-job-warren-oh-us-173004240.aspx?mescoid=3500612001001&jobPosition=15,,Administrative/Clerical,1de4fde74c628e6eee3996d306836406
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:04:14:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"NRT LLC is the nation’s largest owner and operator of residential real estate brokerages operating in more than 50 of the 100 largest metropolitan areas in the United States, with approximately 47,000 independent sales associates in approximately 790 office locations. Most operations are affiliated with Realogy’s franchise brands Coldwell Banker®, Sotheby’s International Realty® and ZipRealty® though it also operates powerful regional and local brands such as The Corcoran Group® and Citi Habitats. NRT quick facts:  Posted approximately $164.9 billion (pro forma) in total residential real estate sales volume in 2015  Ranked No. 1 nationally in real estate sales volume and transaction sides for 18 consecutive years  Visit www.nrtllc.com for more information Coldwell Banker Chicago is looking for a Field Services Coordinator to join their team.  This position will be based of the Deerfield Service Center but will travel to offices throughout the Chicago region.  The Field Services Coordinator (FSC) serves as a liaison between the Central Region Service Center (CRSC) and the sales branch administrative staff in the local operating company.  This position provides support to the branch administration staff to ensure effective integration with the applicable CRSC departments and staff.  In addition, the position collaborates with CRSC staff to implement policy and procedure changes at the sales branch level.   Job Duties:   Act as a liaison between the Central Region Service Center (CRSC) and the branch office administrative staff.  The liaison function includes the following items: Communication of CRSC daily operational items to branch staff.  Examples include items such as check printing problems or global transaction processing issues that may impact agent payments. Communicate CRSC policy and procedure changes. Ongoing branch staff training for policy and procedure changes, as well as, training for relevant “hot topics”. Assist in “second level” problem resolution for transaction related matters.  I.e. commission exceptions and disputes. Assist CRSC in other projects and initiatives as needed. Ensure consistency and compliance with accounting and transaction related policies. Main HomeBase system administrator for Chicago Region Training for new office administrators. Branch staff training for accounting and commission related matters. Identify and communicate opportunities for process improvement between the CRSC and branches. Assist in the development and implementation of consistent best practices for CRSC/branch related matters. Other Duties: Providing support to Transaction staff on an as needed basis.  Includes but is not limited to: Daily printing and distribution of commission and earnest money checks. Support daily courier service between the local company headquarters and the sales branch offices. Other accounting related duties such as Quick checks, and vendor check requests. System administration for Trident, COGNOS and check scanning equipment. Other duties as assigned by the local operating company leadership.   Qualifications: High School Diploma required. 2 years customer service experience required; Prior Real Estate strongly preferred. Technologically proficient in all areas including but not limited to: familiarity with various operating systems on PCs and Macs and ability to navigate computer software and hardware Ability to learn new software programs on an as needed basis, skillful in using the following programs including, but not limited to: Microsoft office programs such as Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Publisher (including utilizing templates and mail merge), and Adobe programs such as Adobe Acrobat Creative problem solving skills. Ability to communicate with different audiences to convey message successfully and to change gear quickly to support different customers Ability to multi-task, prioritize and be flexible with changing business needs in a team environment as well as manage deadlines and time constraints. Customer focused, delivery oriented, good team member, values honesty and integrity   Position Type and Expected Hours of Work: Travel to other nearby offices is required on an consistent basis. Scheduled hours are based on business need. Work Environment: This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.   Physical Demands: This is largely a sedentary role; however, the ability, with or without accommodation, to move around the office occasionally for filing or greeting guests is required.  This would require the ability to lift files, open filing cabinets and bend or stand as necessary. The employee must occasionally lift office products and supplies weighing up to 20 pounds.   Must be able to physically, with or without accommodation, operate a computer, phone and/or copy machine.  Must possess the ability, with or without accommodation, to express oneself, communicate with others, listen and exchange information. To be considered an applicant for this position you must show how you meet the basic qualifications of the job in a resume or document you upload. Employment by NRT is contingent upon completing Form I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification, education verification, and satisfactory reference and background checks. NRT LLC, a subsidiary of Realogy Corporation, is committed to providing equal employment opportunity (“EEO”) and will make employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, citizenship, age, sex, gender, sexual orientation, sexual preference, gender identity or gender expression, veteran status, marital status, disability, or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable laws and regulations.Under the Americans with Disabilities Act and other applicable laws Realogy will provide reasonable accommodation to disabled applicants upon request during the application process to ensure equal opportunities to be considered for employment.",Field Services Coordinator (Administrative Assistant) Job in Deerfield,Full Time Employee,"Deerfield, IL 60015",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-services-coordinator-administrative-assistant-job-deerfield-il-us-172748513.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=19,,Administrative/Clerical,d85e71ecdd90fcc7666abee74ddba280
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:04:22:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Administrative AssistantAre you an experienced Administrative Assistant with at least 2 years of related experience? We have a contract to possible hire opportunity available in Mansfield, TX with a well established company.Features and Benefits while On Contract: Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseYour Role: Prepare correspondenceReport general analysisAssist in coorinating meetings and travel itinerariesPrepare presentation materialsRun various reportsPurchase supplies for the branchAnswer phones and direct callsType, file and copy correspondencesSort and distribute mailWork on special projectsPerform general administrative duties and support for management teamRepresent the company in a professional manner at all times ensuring quality customer serviceAbide by all policies, rules, and regulations of the company including all applicable safety rules, regulations and proceduresSupport corporate programs, goals, and initiatives of the companyBackground Profile: Two to three years of related experience. High school diplomaMicrosoft Office experienceStrong communicationsPlease visit us at https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com  Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct, contract, and contract-to-hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Customer Service, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Administrative Assistant Job in Mansfield,"Full Time, Employee","Mansfield, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-mansfield-tx-us-172962665.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=6,12.00 - 13.00 /hour,Administrative/Clerical,eaa0c386c6ab7db8e479ab604fbae497
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:04:54:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary ""Together, we improve people's everyday lives and well-being."" As a Giant Eagle Team Member, you will be part of a team that emphasizes building lifelong relationships with our customers by focusing on understanding and exceeding their needs. As a member of the Grocery team, you will be responsible for replenishing stock for our customers. The majority of your time will be spent on the sales floor, directly interacting with our customers and ensuring they are able to find the products they need. As a member of our team, you will also be fully trained and able to assist customers in other areas in the store including, but not limited to, the Dairy and Frozen Departments, as well as the Front End service area. Job Responsibilities Provide exemplary customer service by ensuring products are replenished on the shelves and helping customers locate product. Become familiar with products in the store to answer questions and make suggestions to customers. Be knowledgeable of weekly ad items. Smiles and greets customers in a friendly manner, whether the encounter takes place in the team member's designated department or elsewhere in the store. Properly handle products and equipment in accordance with food safety and safety guidelines to ensure a safe shopping environment. Replenish product on the shelf, rotating product and ensuring code dating procedures are followed. Maintain cleanliness of department and work area, including the back room. Set up displays on the sales floor. Assist in maintaining back room efficiency by unloading deliveries. Rotate and check code dates on products to ensure customers safety. Assist in other areas as required. Education and Training Required No High School diploma required Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 14 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Numeric Computation/Reporting Presentation & Verbal Communic Written Communication Takes Direction Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 50 pounds Grasping Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 50 pounds Matching Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Twisting Communication (verbal) Unloading Walking Equipment Used Cardboard Baler Compactor Electric/Manual Jacks Safety Cutter Trash compactor U-Boats",Grocery Clerk (part time) Boardman Giant Eagle Job in Boardman,Full Time Employee,"Boardman, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/grocery-clerk-part-time-boardman-giant-eagle-job-boardman-oh-us-173007926.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,a1246781bd995d13907af48c7fddf3ed
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:04:55:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695789W2 Contract positionDuration: Approximately 1 yearPlease send all resumes and inquiries to Abby Cole - acole@apexsystemsinc.com This person will be providing critical administrative critical duties such as: email filings, sending emails to customers. Good grammar and writing skills are necessary. This is a customer facing role. Some degree of knowledge in computer networking is a plus. Some excel skills will be necessary. This position will need someone who is good on the phone has proper demeanor/tact as they will be communicating with the customer a lot who will like be directors and IT managers. Being well organized and have good time management skills will be crucial. They will also be reading through contracts so some experience in contract admin role or related role would be helpful.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Communications Specialist Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/communications-specialist-job-austin-tx-us-172773352.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e2427f606e95533f316459584f7a9542
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:04:55:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"DTI is seeking candidates for the position of Office Associate (Eagle Elite) - Law Firm.Responsibilities and Essential Functions:Ability to step into multiple positions and perform duties as prescribed by the Site ManagerTravel to and become cross-trained within local DTI site locationsShow measured completion of LitWorks classesBe flexible to daily changing roles, responsibilities, and work locationsMonitor and listen to clients to understand inquiries and requests in order to provide accurate information about the facilities and services and prompt assistanceEnsure the delivery of faxes/parcels in a timely matter in accordance to DTI's standardsExhibit ability to take verbal instructions while taking notes to properly produce staff copy projects.Accurately produce copy and print projects in accordance to verbal and written instructionsEnsure copy projects have been properly produced and Quality Checked (QC'd) to DTI's standardHave direct involvement in direct client communicationsAnswering telephone inquiries and delivering any/all DTI service responsibilitiesImmediate attention given to clients entering Copy/Mail Center in accordance with DTI's standardsAdhere to the Standards of ExcellenceComply with DTI policy that any information seen during the copy process is strictly confidential and is never to leave the copy center and never to be talked about to anyoneMay be required to work additional hours beyond regular schedule to meet client needs and/or commitments, which may include weekends, evenings and/or holidaysDue to the cyclical nature of the industry team members may be required to work varying schedules to reflect the business needs of the various DTI clientsRequired Characteristics and Credentials:High School Diploma or equivalentMinimum of 1 year experience in a copy/mail service center environment or other service industryPrevious experience in a client service oriented fieldKnowledge of copy machines and utilization of typical office services equipment and technologyAbility to travel to FM client sitesFlexibility in schedule to accommodate operational needsBe personable, articulate, knowledgeable and professional in presenting oneself in a professional settingAbility to learn skills quicklyFlexibility in dealing with simultaneous projectsAttention to detailAbility to function with a high level of patience, tact and diplomacy in handling any complaints/situationsAbility to lift or move 40 lbs. or greaterFine and/or gross motor skills, including the ability to grasp, lift and/or carry or otherwise move packages on a standard wheeled cart with a load capacity of 100lbsAbility to walk, bend, kneel, stand, and/or sit for an extended period of timeManual dexterity required for operating office machinery (phone, copy machines, binding equipment, etc)Working knowledge of Microsoft products pertaining to the specific position including but not limited to Outlook, Word, and Excel etcReading, writing, and arithmetic skills requiredVisual acuityAble to convey information and ideas through speech in ways that others will understandAble to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentencesAble to speak clearly so listeners understand, identify and understand the speech of another personExcellent organizational skillsStrong initiative required; ability to work independently with minimal direct supervision ""PLEASE CLICK ON THE FOLLOWING LINK TO APPLY TO REQUISITION 2214""  https://dtiglobal.com/careers/?fuseaction=mExternal.showJob&RID=2214&CurrentPage=7&sid=28",Office Associate (Eagle Elite) - Law Firm Job in Louisville,"Full Time, Employee","Louisville, KY 40202",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/office-associate-eagle-elite-law-firm-job-louisville-ky-us-173000699.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=11,,Administrative/Clerical,57a2fb7a047f5365c90b5dafbe3c7333
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:04:56:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Administrative Assistant - $/hr Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Job Description:Immediate need for an experienced Administrative Assistant to work in a hospital setting. 2+ years experience as an Admin Assistant required, however no medical experience is required. Location: Beverly Hills Hours: Mon-Fri regular business hours Primary Duties include: -answering heavy phones-scheduling meetings/calendar for supervisor in Outlook -writing correspondence in Word -creating reports in Excel -coordinating special projects/events Prior Experience:-busy office environment-2+ years of admin experience Requirements:-High School Diploma (some college preferred) -ability to multi-task-strong communication skills We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status.Job Experience:,,, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)Typing 30 WPM+Years of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-15-hr-job-los-angeles-ca-us-172925975.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ad532aed684e24ada77139cdd2564882
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:05:07:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary To exceed customer needs and expectations by providing efficient, accurate and pleasant check-out service and shopping assistance. Job Responsibilities Ring up customer's orders by scanning product or punching price into register according to established Company policies and procedures. Finalize sales and collect payments by totaling order and accepting tender from customer. Alertly watch customers at pumps to help prevent drive-offs, unsafe misuse of gasoline containers or placement and pumping multiple cars within the same transaction (Double Pumping). Provide products and services that are competitively priced, meet the requirements of internal and external customers at all times and abide by the Company's Statement of Values. Maintain cleanliness of equipment, counter area, floor, restrooms, exterior pump area, etc. to ensure safety and sanitation regulations are met. Know and follow all state and local laws regarding cigarette sales. Know and follow all coupon-handling procedures. Understand how to sell Lottery tickets, gift cards and Telephone Calling Cards. Assist in Kitchen area as needed. Assist other store team Members in maintaining security in the store. Block and straighten shelves as needed. Assist with light stocking duties and inform management of any out of stock items. Replace misplaced items to the proper location. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 16 years of age Shift ** Retail Shifts ** Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Work Environment Cooler Extreme Outdoor temperatures Freezer Inclement weather (hot/cold, snowy, rainy) Physical requirements Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Climbing Hearing (auditory) Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Communication (verbal) Walking Writing Equipment Used Adding Machine Dishwasher Dolly Fountain Machines Fuel Pumps Ice Coffee Machine Ice Machine Knives Bag in box machine Lang Oven Make Line Merry Chef (Oven) Microwave Motorola Hand Held Gun (Receiving) Panini Grill Power Washer Proofer Registers Smoothie Machine Stand-up Lotto Machine Teazzer Vacuum Watchguard Detergent Dispenser Car Wash Equipment Coffee Brewer Coffee Grinder Conventional Oven Creamer Machine Calculator Computer Printer Telephone",Convenience Sub Shop Clerk (Part Time) Beechwood & State GetGo Job in Alliance,Full Time Employee,"Alliance, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/convenience-sub-shop-clerk-part-time-beechwood-state-getgo-job-alliance-oh-us-173007183.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=5,,Administrative/Clerical,f6da4921fffeae3d06ed3d6e9f117721
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:05:47:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Customer Service Representative/Community Manager At Regus we are leading a business revolution – building a brand new sector that’s growing at breakneck speed, offering fantastic challenges and opportunities. We are the clear number 1 player in the rapidly expanding flexible workplace market. We operate over 3,000 centres in 120 countries and are growing at 20% per year, opening over 1 centre per day. We are continuing to develop rapidly by helping businesses of all sizes to adapt to the changing needs of mobile working, increasing globalisation and the demand for flexible workspace.  Join us and you’ll have the scope to take your career further, while giving our clients innovative new products and exceptional customer service. And you’ll help us to make business happen. The actions and service provided by the Senior CSR/Community Manager are the catalyst for providing customers with a reason to come to Regus and the reasons to stay with Regus. The Senior CSR/Community Manager maintains the full operational functions of a centre, whilst serving as a backup for the Area Manager by conducting centre tours when needed.  Key areas of responsibility  Lead by example creating a strong ethos of customer service throughout the team. Drive customer retention through great service and focused customer engagement. Maximise customer satisfaction results (NPS) through regular customer engagement and the highest levels of centre standards. Handle customer concerns, coordinating questions through to prompt resolution with the Global Service Centre (GSC) team on behalf of the customers. Ensure your customers are invoiced accurately and payments are collected on time. Hold regular community events in your centre. Serve as the primary backup for the Area or General Manager including (as needed) conducting customer needs analysis meetings, and taking customers on tours. Ensure that all daily service charges are captured and entered into the billing system on a daily basis. Support new company initiatives, including the implementation of new tools and systems to improve efficiency. Ensure that the centre is ‘show ready’ at all times. Experience required  Strong Customer Service skills, including the ability to remain flexible and calm in high pressure or continually changing situations. Ability to communicate effectively and professionally in both local language and English (written and oral). Professional communication skills with a high success rate in building and maintaining relationships. Solid organisational skills, including the ability to prioritise and multi task in a demanding environment. Proven success in self lead generation and business development. Commercial, highly results driven. Previous P&L exposure. Ability to perform work accurately and thoroughly. Ability to find a solution for or to deal proactively with work-related problems. A desire and passion to beat the competition and win. Pragmatic - Ability to be hands-on as well as strategic and be a trouble-shooter when the business need deems it appropriate to do so. What we offer An exciting, fast-paced and challenging career. The chance to work with local, national and global clients and a world-class work environment. As you’d expect from a company leading the workplace revolution, we support a progressive working approach for our employees. Where possible, we offer part-time and job share opportunities, along with the ability to accommodate a later start or earlier finish to the working day.   We’re looking for entrepreneurial people who are full of fantastic ideas and the energy to turn them into reality. Show us you have the enthusiasm, ambition and ability to make business happen for our clients and we’ll support you every step of the way as you build a rewarding career.",Community Manager Job in Bloomfield Hills,Full Time,"Bloomfield Hills, MI 48301",All,http://jobview.monster.com/community-manager-job-bloomfield-hills-mi-us-172726214.aspx?mescoid=1100053001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b40e0ee4476757265159cc7aa5c93f5b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:05:48:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"American Dream Home Improvement is currently seeking an individual who is organized, self-sufficient, and motivated to grow. Candidates must be comfortable with Microsoft Office (Word/Excel), QuickBooks experience is preferred, but not required. Previous Customer Service or Collections experience is PREFERRED. Basic office equipment knowledge, as well as daily multitasking are a necessity.  Candidates must have the ability to handle questions/concerns with speed and efficiency, while maintaining communication with ADHI Teams as well as customers. Daily job duties will include inbound & outbound calls and communication with our customers; collections and general customer service. Front office employees act as a liaison between ADHI sales teams, customers, and other ADHI departments.Required Skills & Qualifications:Previous office experience is REQUIREDPrevious call center experience preferred, but NOT requiredAbility to prioritize and manage multiple responsibilities simultaneouslyExceptional interpersonal and organizational skillsCompensation & Benefits:Opportunity for monthly bonusExcellent Insurance Benefits: Health, Vision, Dental, LifeGenerous 401k, employer matchedFull Time Office Position: Monday-Friday 8:30-5 PMA family owned business since 2000, American Dream Home Improvement, Inc. (ADHI) is a market leader in the exterior home repair and storm restoration industry. ADHI's mission is to provide unparalleled customer service and representation to all of our homeowners and to the insurance industry. ADHI has received several high honors such as being an Owens Corning Certified Platinum Preferred Contractor, as well as the Top Volume Contractor in the country with Owens Corning for the past 3 years in a row. In addition, Roofing Contractors Magazine has placed ADHI as being the #1 residential roofer in Illinois and the second largest residential roofer in the nation. Through our proven system and training, ADHI has become one of the fastest growing construction companies in the nation and for this, ADHI has been recognized by Inc. Magazine. With over 50,000 satisfied homeowners since 2000, ADHI is continuing to change the face of the storm restoration industry. 2015 brings great excitement for the ADHI Family with their biggest expansion yet. The addition of 6 new locations throughout the nation will allow ADHI's Dream Teams to represent homeowners throughout 12  states.One Team. One, American Dream.",Administrative Assistant Job in Davenport,Full Time Employee,"Davenport, IA 52807",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-davenport-ia-us-172998957.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,,Administrative/Clerical,fdbfbc9ec1925c5a7a9312867ce5a81b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:06:12:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"SNI Companies is currently seeking a strong administrative assistant for a temp-to-hire opportunity with a client located in the Beltsville area. This position will support a Vice-President and must be a team player, and be able to work in other departments as requested. This position will provide program support assistance. Qualified candidates should have 2+ years of administrative support experience, has a consistent background of being punctual and reliable and is outgoing having the ability to engage with everyone from the CEO to the UPS Driver. This position will pay between $14-16/hour dependent on experience and will require the individual to go through 2 rounds of interviews and skills testing. For consideration please respond with an updated resume, summary of skills and experience and salary requirements both on a temporary and permanent basis to rck@staffingnow.com. Selected candidates will be contacted personally.",Administrative Assistant Job in Beltsville,Full Time,"Beltsville, MD","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-beltsville-md-us-172906746.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=16,14.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),a8da2752720748931f918e71d1a69dfd
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:06:22:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client is looking for an Administrative Assistant/Office CoordinatorMajor Hospital in PhiladelphiaPhiladelphia, PAContract: 3+ Months Job Description: Will be working in Information Services Department. Position will support multiple leadership positions at AVP and IS Director level.  Position will be part of a larger team called IS Business Operations. Skills: *Attention to Detail*Multitasking*Calendar Support*Intermediate/Expert Knowledge of MS Office Suite*Confidentiality *Fast paced environment*Typing/Meeting Minutes*Excellent oral and written communication skills required*Team Player",Administrative Assistant/Office Coordinator - Major Hospital in Philadelphia Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-office-coordinator-major-hospital-in-philadelphia-job-philadelphia-pa-us-172802766.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=11,,Administrative/Clerical,83df00c319adcaa674e23e991cd74581
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:06:55:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Seeking a candidate who has outstanding clerical and/or administrative skills. You will be handling both receptionist duties along with assisting with word processing and administrative support needs within the office. We would like two years of experience within the administrative and/or clerical field. Some legal background is required (approximately one year of experience). Knowledge within Microsoft programming is required (e.g. Word, Excel). Bilingual in Spanish is recommended, however, not required. Responsibilities: - Checking completed work for spelling and grammar issues. - Type reports, text and other written material. - File and store completed documents. - Keep records of work preformed. - Compute and verify totals on report forms, requisitions, and/or bills. If you can see yourself within a fast paced environment, with high call volumes, and continuous interaction with guests and clientele, this may just be the position for you!What are you waiting for? Apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1074426 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Typist/Word Processor - Job in Rancho Cordova,Full Time Employee,"Rancho Cordova, CA 95670",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/typist-word-processor-job-rancho-cordova-ca-us-172599771.aspx?mescoid=4300752001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ec2891dcb9dae9267009fc877b3177f5
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:06:56:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Office AdministratorWe are currently seeking an Office Administrator to support our growing team. Responsibilities:Prioritize and coordinate daily administrative tasks with focus on productivityAssist internal and external clients with impeccable customer servicePrepare correspondence, route and resolve information requestsSupport bookkeeping and backend business system’s support including: invoicing, payroll, and reportingSchedule travel and prepare itinerariesCoordinate team calendars, appointments and meetingsConduct research, expense and statistical reportingCoordinate space and office organization; maintain paper and electronic files, purchase and manage supplies and equipment.Create presentations and assist with special projects as neededImprove office performance by streamlining processes and proceduresQualifications:Associate’s or Bachelor’s Degree preferred2 years Administrative business experience requiredSuperb written and oral communication skillsProficiency with Microsoft Office required; QuickBooks and Google Business experience preferredResults oriented, motivated, self-starter attitudeBenefits:We value our employees’ time and efforts. Our commitment to your success is enhanced by our competitive compensation and extensive benefits package including paid time off, medical, dental and vision benefits and future growth opportunities within the company. Plus, we work to maintain the best possible environment for our employees where people can learn and grow with the company. We strive to provide a collaborative, creative environment where each person feels encouraged to contribute to our processes, decisions, planning and culture.EOE",Office Administrator Job in Washington,Full Time Employee,"Washington, DC 20001",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/office-administrator-job-washington-dc-us-172659388.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=7,,Office Management,8f21a5f833b27e9357cd4c921f678c81
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:07:48:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"ADMIN COORDINATOR REQUIREMENT #16-01420RECRUITER: JILL SIMONEJOB LOCATION: GAITHERSBURG, MD SEPTEMBER 22, 2016 *** CANDIDATES MUST BE ABLE TO WORK ON OUR PAYROLL AS A W-2 ****** WE WILL SPONSOR H1-B VISA'S *** Project Description: Responsible for performing a variety of secretarial, administrative and project-oriented activities in support of their function. May also serves as Team Lead for all administrative support personnel within the functional area and perform activities such as co-ordinating workflow, allocating resources and supervising others. Candidate will need to have experience working in a high volume. Needs someone who can work independently without supervision or direction. Flexible with hours as needed. Someone who can multi-task and prioritize based on urgency. Required Skills: BS is preferred 3-5 years experience BioMed/AZ experience is definitely needed due ot the fast paced environment. Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite/Skype. This 6+ month position starts ASAP. Please E-MAIL your resume (attachment to email) with rate and availability to Jill: jill@alphaconsulting.com",Admin Coordinator Job in Gaithersburg  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Gaithersburg 20878,Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/admin-coordinator-job-gaithersburg-md-us-172647220.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=12,,Administrative/Clerical,7c3ac8195d4cce506b9d410c799b5b26
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:07:49:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Data Entry AnalystContract OpportunityLocation: Mountain View, CA (Local candidates only)Key Responsibilities:Cyber Insurance data entryInvestigate discrepancies in data and adjust accordinglyKey Qualifications:High School diploma1-2 years of experience with data-entry/validationAttention to Detail, Proficiency with Excel Report","Talbridge Job Application for Data Quality Specialist | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Data Entry AnalystContract OpportunityLocation: Mountain View, CA (Local candidates only)Key Responsibilities:Cyber Insurance data entryInvestigate discrepancies in data and adjust accordinglyKey Qualifications:High School diploma1-2 years of experience with data-entry/validationAttention to Detail, Proficiency with Excel",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/data-quality-specialist-job-mountain-view-ca-us-172733617.aspx?mescoid=1500143001001&jobPosition=20,,,bc0c9665de22d5c0dc9e147fb8b112eb
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:08:03:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a commercial real estate company, is seeking a temp to perm Administrative Assistant to support the day to day operations of the firm.Job Responsibilities:Assist the property team’s financial initiatives, such as AP/AR, budget, contract preparation, gift cards, promotional and media funds and so onSupport the execution of marketing events, sponsorships, proof of performance, etc.Work with supervisor to coordinate short term leasing agreements and track and review lease agreement eventsUpdate lease agreement information as needing in SLIM or One WorldProcess monthly rent, tenant sales, and overage rentPerform general office administrative tasks asPrepare customer complaint responses, documents and reports for management, and updates of Company Policies and ProceduresAssist with HR administration as neededProvide general administrative support and projects as directedJob Requirements:Some college or professional school is preferred2-4 years of administrative experience in an office settingAbility to work in a fast-paced environmentPrevious experience with administrative and clerical procedures, including common customer service practicesWorking knowledge of financial reports and how to read themStrong proficiency in MS Office, JD Edwards, One World, and web-based input softwareHighly organized and focusedStrong attention to detail with equally strong communicationWhile PCG appreciates all applicants, only those qualified will be contacted. Thank you for your application. We look forward to hearing from you!",Administrative Assistant Job in Orange,Full Time Employee,OrangeCA,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-job-orange-ca-us-172188808.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6da9f57d1ca1ad474eb8c74e96de8c1b
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:08:05:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"A. R. Building Co. is seeking an enthusiastic, upbeat, driven individual to fill a full time Leasing Agent position for our 240 unit property, Lancaster Midtown. This position assists the Property Manager in leasing apartment units and day to day operations. Prior experience in apartment leasing is preferred, but we will consider resumes with just solid sales and customer service experience. Must have excellent people skills, but also be detail oriented when dealing with paperwork/computer work. Must be proficient in MS office. Familiarity with Real Page or other rental property software is a plus. Some of the duties include:* Shows properties by setting appointments; providing property statistics and leasing information; highlighting benefits, such as, location, surrounding area, transportation, access, neighbors, building systems and services, amenities, occupancy history, owner performance, tenant satisfaction, and security.* Completes lease by reviewing contract requirements; obtaining signatures, deposits, and payments.* Markets property by advertising vacancies; identifying and approaching prospective tenants; creating and distributing marketing materials; greeting drop-ins; participating in community and regional activities; preparing and submitting proposals; responding to inquiries.This position is Monday through Friday daylight with no weekends! Great benefits the 1st of the month after 60 days. This is a great opportunity to start a new career with a reputable, growing, company...apply with your resume and cover letter today!",Leasing Agent Job in Lancaster,Full Time Employee,"Lancaster, OH 43130",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/leasing-agent-job-lancaster-oh-us-172799464.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=16,,Administrative/Clerical,cd8342ef0428356e4e1cb83e4c3456c6
United States of America,US,10/May/2016:08:59:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job MEDICAL OFFICE BILLING COORDINATORBaby Steps Therapy is a pediatric rehab therapy clinic in Rocklin, CA.  We are dedicated to providing the highest quality therapy for children with special needs.  Our warm, friendly environment makes Baby Steps a great place to work.This is a full-time position, complete with competitive salary, benefits, and a chance to grow along with us.  The Billing Coordinator’sprimary responsibility is to ensure that client and contract invoices are correct, and that the receivables are monitored/collected in a timely manner.The position also requires the individual to be professional, organized, provide attention to detail and understand insurance billing regulations.  This position requires flexibility, adaptability and excellent communication skills.Knowledge, Skills and Abilities: Communication Skills: Must professionally and effectively interact with patients, families, staff, co-workers and management.Must have the ability to communicate, in written and verbal form, information consisting of both routine and technical complexity, as well as conclusions and analyses of data.Knowledge of healthcare billing procedures and EDI claims submission.Obtaining insurance authorizations.Working knowledge of deductibles, co-insurance and in-network and out-of-network procedures. Ability to maintain confidentiality and knowledge of HIPPA regulations.High level skill in medical billing software, also including but not limited to, Microsoft Word, Excel, Outlook, and QuickBooks.Required Experience:Accounting: 1 yearHealthcare billing: Minimum 1 yearInvoicing third partiesMedical office experience: 2 yearsBachelor’s degree or equivalent experience  Mandatory Requirements:Live Scan ClearanceCPR CertifiedCurrent Immunizations & TB ClearanceIf you are looking for a medical assistant position, this is not the job for you.    Report","Baby Steps Therapy Job Application for Medical Office Billing Coordinator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Phone 916-947-1812 Address 6960 DESTINY DR STE 112ROCKLIN, CA 95677",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-office-billing-coordinator-job-rocklin-ca-us-172663717.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=1,,,8dce48253f0518ec5eaf7bd23407f447
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:00:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Eliot Center for Health & Rehabilitation is a 114 bed deficiency free facility with a Respiratory Program, Alzheimer's, short term rehab and long term care units. The team at Eliot has wonderful longevity, experienced nurses willing and able to teach, all in a team environment. Our management team is well balanced and cohesive, this is a family environment; we support, teach and learn from each other. Charge Nurse - RN Full time: 3pm-11pm or 11pm-7amMAJOR PURPOSE: Responsible for the overall operation and optimal quality of care for the residents on the assigned unit. Follows all health, sanitary and infection control policies and maintains established standards of practice set forth by the facility's administration and Nursing Policies and Procedures.QUALIFICATIONS:Ability to read, write and comprehend English; ability to follow oral and written instructions.Interest in the nursing needs of the aged and the chronically ill with the ability to work with both.Ability to work with supervisors, co-workers and facility staff in the performance of duties.Ability to work hours as scheduled based on the requirements of the position/assignment. On call as necessary.Registered Nurse licensed in the state of employment. Minimum of one year of education or experience in geriatric nursing or rehabilitation preferred.Knowledge of nursing theory and practice including the administration of medications.CPR certified.WORKING CONDITIONS: Works in an appropriately lighted and ventilated environment. This position may result in your being exposed to blood/body fluids.PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:Must be able to move intermittently throughout the day, proper body mechanics required -- bending, stooping, turning, stretching, reaching above the shoulders and occasional lifting are involved.Must be able to cope with the mental, emotional and physical stress of the position.Must be able to observe, listen and communicate effectively.Must function independently, have flexibility, personal integrity, and the ability to work effectively with residents, personnel, support agencies, and outside agencies. PRIMARY FUNCTIONS:Holds daily shift report with nursing assistants assigned to the unit prior to the start of the shift. Reviews written daily assignments for each resident on assigned unit. Assures assignments are completed before the end of the shift.Makes rounds on assigned residents at least once every two hours.Administers medication and treatments according to the physician's orders. Assumes responsibility for ordering medications.Collaborates with Unit Manager to develop and maintain nursing care plans and update these plans on a monthly basis or more often if the resident's condition changes.Assists the attending physician with rounds and special procedures as needed.Transcribes, documents and implements physician's orders.Responsible for making nursing assessments during each shift.OTHER DUTIES:Contacts the resident's physician and family to notify them of a change in the resident's condition or accident/incident; also notifies the supervisor covering.Assumes all responsibilities of the RN Supervisor in his/her absence or as directed by the DNS/ADNS.Assumes independent responsibility for yearly written evaluations of nursing assistants and documents accurately their strengths, weaknesses and the steps taken to improve their performance. Such evaluations become part of the nursing assistants permanent records and shall be used as the basis to determine the continued employment of nursing assistants, promotional opportunities and the amount of any wage increases granted.Assumes independent responsibility for documenting disciplinary concerns for nursing assistants on designated shifts, including reprimands, oral and written warnings, and recommending the suspension or discharge of an employee.Assumes independent responsibility for completing required routine documentation and auditing as required.EXPECTATIONS:Attends mandatory in-services held at the facility.Understands responsibilities concerning infection control, safety, accident and fire prevention.Assumes any duties that are assigned by the Unit Manager, DNS, ADNS in order to provide optimal achievable quality resident care.Discusses any problems, needs or concerns which arise with the Unit Manager, DNS, ADNS.Assumes responsibility in supporting the Unit Manager, DNS, ADNS in promoting and maintaining positive employee relations and effective communications among facility staff.Understands and upholds the Residents' Bill of Rights and holds all resident information confidential.Displays a polite and courteous manner to all residents and visitors.Assists the Staff Development Coordinator with orientation and on-the-job training for new nursing personnel as needed.Attends and participates in interdisciplinary resident care conferences as directed.Notifies Care Plan Team of changes in condition and weight loss of a resident. Notifies Care Plan Coordinator of any changes in resident's condition and of loss of a resident.Maintains a professional demure appearance and mannerisms according to established facility standards. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse FT pm-p or p-am Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA 01760",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-ft-3pm-11p-or-11p-7am-job-natick-ma-us-168578817.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cd7e4767f1ac44fecb0817b667ded756
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:00:59:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Solidus is searching for a dynamic Software Engineer/Developer for work located in Bellevue, Nebraska. This individual will be part of a fast paced team in support of our customer supporting sustainment and modernization of the Mission Planning and Analysis Common Services (MPACS) application.Candidates need to be able to work in a fast paced environment sustaining and modernizing the Mission Planning and Analysis Common Services application (MPACS). Excellent coding skills required and ability to test own and other code. Need demonstrated experience in performing a variety of complicated tasks and operating with a wide degree of creativity and latitude. A broad knowledge of Coding Standards, Distributed Computing and Relational Databases in desired.Candidate needs to be experienced in the design, modification,development and implementation of software programming applications,unit testing and participation in code review and system test processes through code and test review, and analysis and remediation of code review and test defects. This is a fantastic opportunity to shape a product, grow in a team environment and shine with excellent performance. Successful candidates will possess the knowledge and experience to perform complex system and specialty engineering tasks. Will also have demonstrated experience in performing a variety of complicated tasks and operating with a wide degree of creativity and latitude. A broad knowledge of Coding standards, Distributed computing and relational databases is desired. Selected candidate needs to be experienced in the design, modification,development and implementation of software programming applications,unit testing and participation in code review and system test processes through code and test review, and analysis and remediation of code review and test defects.Requirements:- HTML5 (Ability to translate code from Flash to HTML5)- JavaScript- CSS- JavaScript Libraries- Ampersand Framework- Semantic-UI- Git Software Configuration Management Tool- Ability to obtain a TS Clearance (Min. Interim Secret will be considered)- B.S. in Math, Science, Engineering, Statistics, Engineering Management or Related- Experience interfacing with the Enterprise Database (Oracle based, also uses VMWare and web logic)- Experience with two of the following operating systems (Windows, Solaris, Linux)- Knowledge of the following: Handlebars, Less (CSS), Stash, Jira, Confluence, and AgileWhy Omaha?A hub for thriving businesses across industry segments, Omaha is listed as one of the Top 10 Cities in America for Millennials, right now, and is consistently recognized and ranked among the country's best.Omaha is home to more Fortune 500 companies, per capita, than any other major metro area in the nation. Ten of the largest 1000 American companies by revenue. Eleven colleges and universities. Three of the top U.S. architecture and engineering firms.#8 Best place to live in America ? Money Magazine#2 Nine best up and coming cities for music ? MTV Iggy#6 Most secure places to live in the US (for large metro area of 500K or more residents) Farmer's Insurance Group#1 Top 10 best cities to raise a family in a America ? MOBOTO blog#4 Top 50 Military friendly cities - G.I. Jobs#1 overall for economic perforamce during the last recession ? The Brookings InstituteApplicants selected must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. U.S. Citizenship may be required. Solidus is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participates in E-Verify.NOTICE OF AFFIRMATIVE ACTION PLAN FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, DISABLED VETERANS AND OTHER PROTECTED VETERANS. It is the policy of this Company to seek and employ qualified individuals at all locations and facilities, and to provide equal employment opportunities for all applicants and employees in recruiting, hiring, placement, training, compensation, insurance, benefits, promotion, transfer, and termination. To achieve this, we are dedicated to taking affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities, disabled veterans, and other protected veterans. The objective in adopting the Affirmative Action Programs is to place qualified individuals with disabilities, disabled veterans and other protected veterans in all job classifications. These Affirmative Action Programs are available for inspection by any applicant or employee by contacting the Company's EEO Coordinator, in the Human Resources office, Monday through Friday, 8am to 5pmBotCJ#2015",Software Developer - HTML/ JavaScript/ CSS Job in Bellevue,Full Time,"Bellevue, NE 68005",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/software-developer-html5-javascript-css-job-bellevue-ne-us-168705377.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f519a62447aca63400935c64f13b0af
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:01:40:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Position: Accessory SpecialistDepartment: Remote - Store OperationsReports to: Visual ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: NoLocation:  Job Purpose: The Accessory Specialist will assist the merchandising team in overseeing the processing and placement of accessories. Through the creation of long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Accessory Specialist will ensure that all merchandise is aesthetically pleasing and set according to brand standards and guidelines.  Deliverables:   Train, coach and direct Associates on accessories handling, shipment processing, accessories presentation, and visual techniques as neededVerify stockroom and stockroom activities meet safety requirements which consists of reporting any employee accidentsPartner with the leadership team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, and merchandising reportsEnsure the sales floor is replenished per company guidelines. This includes following up with team members to ensure accuracyEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsManage damaged or defective jewelry and re-ticket per company guidelineUphold all company policies as outlined in the Policy and Procedure Manual, including the Field Employee Policy Guide and Code of Business ConductReview and respond to all emails and corporate visual communications dailyFollow company practices by maintaining the standard of the stock room by ensuring a neat, clean and organized roomAssist in receiving and processing all new merchandise shipmentsEnsure all merchandise in stock rooms and on store shelves meet company standardsEnsure service, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processesPerforms Leader on Duty tasks as needed  Knowledge, Skills, and Qualifications:   Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent. College degree preferred.Must have at least 1 to 2 years of retail merchandising experience. Prior supervisory experience preferredMust have superior communication, organizational and time management skillsMust be able to develop and train others, including delegating tasks and following-upMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts Job Code : 20182 Division : Field - Region : Northeast Location : 0632 - F21 - Washington Street, Boston MA US 19086 449 Washington Street Job Type : Part Time",Accessory Specialist - Washington Street,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Position: Accessory SpecialistDepartment: Remote - Store OperationsReports to: Visual ManagerFLSA Classification: Non-ExemptDirect Reports: NoLocation:  Job Purpose: The Accessory Specialist will assist the merchandising team in overseeing the processing and placement of accessories. Through the creation of long-term strategies and leading company initiatives, the Accessory Specialist will ensure that all merchandise is aesthetically pleasing and set according to brand standards and guidelines.  Deliverables:   Train, coach and direct Associates on accessories handling, shipment processing, accessories presentation, and visual techniques as neededVerify stockroom and stockroom activities meet safety requirements which consists of reporting any employee accidentsPartner with the leadership team to make product placement adjustments based on selling, inventory ownership, and merchandising reportsEnsure the sales floor is replenished per company guidelines. This includes following up with team members to ensure accuracyEnsure all delivery information is accurately reported to verify all shipment‐related paperwork meet audit requirementsManage damaged or defective jewelry and re-ticket per company guidelineUphold all company policies as outlined in the Policy and Procedure Manual, including the Field Employee Policy Guide and Code of Business ConductReview and respond to all emails and corporate visual communications dailyFollow company practices by maintaining the standard of the stock room by ensuring a neat, clean and organized roomAssist in receiving and processing all new merchandise shipmentsEnsure all merchandise in stock rooms and on store shelves meet company standardsEnsure service, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processesPerforms Leader on Duty tasks as needed  Knowledge, Skills, and Qualifications:   Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent. College degree preferred.Must have at least 1 to 2 years of retail merchandising experience. Prior supervisory experience preferredMust have superior communication, organizational and time management skillsMust be able to develop and train others, including delegating tasks and following-upMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shifts Job Code : 20182 Division : Field - Region : Northeast Location : 0632 - F21 - Washington Street, Boston MA US 19086 449 Washington Street Job Type : Part Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/accessory-specialist-washington-street-ma-0632-job-boston-ma-us-168755783.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3d1a6b8c3694cb76723eb2ad4ebc250a
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:01:40:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"QA ENGINEERThe Select Group is seeking a QA Engineer for our client in the Boston, MA area.This is a fantastic opportunity to work in an awesome environment testing an application being developed in-house. QA ENGINEER RESPONSIBILITIES:Conduct Automated testing of the RESTful API.Utilize C# during automation process.Utilize common automated testing tools, preferably Selenium. QA ENGINEER REQUIREMENTS:Experience with API level automation.Minimum 3 years’ experience with test automation.Experience with C#. The Select Group provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital status, amnesty or status as a covered veteran in accordance with applicable federal, state, and local laws. The Select Group expressly prohibits any form of unlawful employee harassment based on race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, genetic information, disability or veteran status. For more information about The Select Group, watch our CORPORATE VIDEO and take a VIRTUAL TOUR of our Headquarters in Raleigh, NC! The Select Group is committed to attracting and developing a diverse workforce (EEO) Click here to Join the TSG Talent Network!  ",QA ENGINEER Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-engineer-job-boston-ma-us-168700547.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=17,,Quality Assurance/Safety,651cd46f4dd77cf4f88dc77e05adb079
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:01:46:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Koontz Wagner Senior Accountant Essential Function: The project accountant collects, records, analyzes and reports on the progress and results of projects. Main duties include:Review projects setup by order entry. Participate in hand-off meeting from sales to project management.Drive accounting kick-off meeting with project managers for the hand-off from order entry to project management.Actively participate and support forecast reviews of projects.Schedule and conduct formal project reconciliations with project managers.Continuously review current and trend for actual results to estimates and identify for review those items trending unusual based on judgment and experience.Develop, analyze, report and interpret trend reports on material, labor, subcontract and other cost buckets, especially as it compares to estimates.Identify and/or respond to AR and AP issuesManage the milestone billing and accounting process.Continuous improvement focus from inception to delivery of projects.Additional duties as assigned by plant controller will include:Month-End close and ad-hoc reportingInteraction with shared services to resolve project issues (i.e. AR, AP)Balance sheet Reconciliations (WIP, Stock, PPE, CIP)Operational audits. Stock. WIP, PPE, Order Entry, Purchasing, Sales and Shipment cut offs.System / report testing.Gross Margin analysis.Quarterly discussion memo - documentation of compliance with SOX controlsManufacturing Expense Analysis (i.e. trend, versus budget; Absorption)Manufacturing Operational Reports meetings/presentationsWeekly labor metrics trend analysisSupervisory Responsibility: Lead, direct, develop and delegate a Junior Project Accountant in the performance of these duties. Technical Skills:Advanced Proficiency in Excel (i.e. pivots, v-lookups) and Microsoft ApplicationsSolid working knowledge of accounting principles, compliance and communicationsSolid experience working with ERP systems. EPICOR would be a major plus.Education: A bachelor's degree in finance and/or accounting. CPA a plus. Experience: At least 5 years in cost and/or project accounting. Experience working with a shared service group is a plus. Experience in auditing or working with audit a plus. EPICOR experience huge plus. This job description is a general description of essential job functions. It is not intended to describe all duties someone in this position may perform. All employees of Global Power and subsidiaries are expected to perform tasks as assigned by supervisory/management personnel, regardless of job title or routine job duties.",Plant Accountant Job in Chattanooga,Full Time,"Chattanooga, TN 37421",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/plant-accountant-job-chattanooga-tn-us-168490598.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=2,Base + Bonus,Experienced (Non-Manager),b211ad039728d3b67ba13f32cdd57b90
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:01:47:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Type: Legal AssistantLocation:  Daytona Beach Florida Education Level:High School Diploma Bachelor's Degree is a plus Compensation:Hourly Experience:3-5 years of Legal Assistant experience A large personal injury law firm is looking for an articulate professional to work as a Legal Assistant to a Case Manager. This is an exciting career opportunity with a fast paced personal injury law firm. This person will be responsible for talking to clients and health care providers. This person will also be responsible for file organization, filing, sending letters, and setting up new files for the case manager. This is a fast paced environment with ample growth opportunities. We are looking for an individual with the following skills:• Ability to work in a faced paced environment • Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to take direction from a Case Manager• Must have strong multi-tasking skills • The ability to meet new people and quickly establish trust• The ability to understand legal contracts and legal documents• A general knowledge of the legal process• Excellent phone skills • Excellent typing skills • Strong Computer knowledge with Microsoft Word, Outlook, and Client Profiles• Is on time every day • Can start working immediately. • Professionalism is a must for this position. • Excellent verbal and written skills • Legal background is a plusPlease send Resumes to HR@farahandfarah.com     Reference Daytona Beach, Florida.",Monster,,"Job Type: Legal AssistantLocation:  Daytona Beach Florida Education Level:High School Diploma Bachelor's Degree is a plus Compensation:Hourly Experience:3-5 years of Legal Assistant experience A large personal injury law firm is looking for an articulate professional to work as a Legal Assistant to a Case Manager. This is an exciting career opportunity with a fast paced personal injury law firm. This person will be responsible for talking to clients and health care providers. This person will also be responsible for file organization, filing, sending letters, and setting up new files for the case manager. This is a fast paced environment with ample growth opportunities. We are looking for an individual with the following skills:• Ability to work in a faced paced environment • Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to take direction from a Case Manager• Must have strong multi-tasking skills • The ability to meet new people and quickly establish trust• The ability to understand legal contracts and legal documents• A general knowledge of the legal process• Excellent phone skills • Excellent typing skills • Strong Computer knowledge with Microsoft Word, Outlook, and Client Profiles• Is on time every day • Can start working immediately. • Professionalism is a must for this position. • Excellent verbal and written skills • Legal background is a plusPlease send Resumes to HR@farahandfarah.com     Reference Daytona Beach, Florida.",,http://jobview.monster.com/legal-assistant-job-daytona-beach-fl-us-168764102.aspx?mescoid=4300747001001&jobPosition=9,,,27fe30bb96a2c45d5aeefaae90ef0395
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:02:45:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job ID: 258262 Contract Length: 6 months Face to face interview required. W2 only. We are looking for a Pega Developer to work on CRM part of a Pega implementation. Looking for someone with development experience with version 7.x or higher. Client will be upgrading to versions 7.2 soon. Preference would be someone who has working in healthcare or insurance industries.  About Eliassen Group: Eliassen Group has been driving the success of our clients, consultants, and employees within Technology Staffing and Consulting Services since 1989. For over 25 years, we have been at the forefront of innovation by uniting talented people and quality solutions within successful companies to help them attain their business objectives. Our solution oriented approach to understanding your needs ensures that we identify and represent the best possible talent available in the market, personally selected and matched to your requirements by our highly-tenured, extraordinarily capable recruiting team. Our consulting divisions include expertise focused on Agile, Big Data, Biometrics & Data Solutions, Creative Services, Government Services, Life Sciences and Workforce Management. Eliassen Group is privately held and headquartered in Wakefield, MA. Don’t miss out on our referral program! If we hire a candidate that you refer us to then you can be eligible for a $1,000 referral check!",Pega Developer Job in Boston,Full Time,"Boston, MA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/pega-developer-job-boston-ma-us-168629585.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,07b68343b8bbee02361cba864ce2abfb
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:02:45:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"COMPANY INFO: My client is an academic medical center outside of Boston.  They have an excellent reputation and have been recognized as a leader in quality and patient safety. As part of a larger organization, my client strives for excellence and patient safety.  They are looking to add a part time Risk Manager to their staff.JOB DESCRIPTION - RISK MANAGER: •We are looking for a seasoned professional with 5+ years of experience working in a risk management department.•This person will report to the director and be responsible for running the day to day activities of the department. •Preparing educational seminars for physicians and staff to developing policies and procedures and doing core measures will be a big part of this position.QUALIFICATIONS: - RISK MANAGER : •Bachelor's degree in Nursing required, Master's degree preferred. •Five + years of relevant experience in hospital health care, quality improvement, patient safety and/or risk management.  •CPHRM preferredPlease send all resumes to Audrey Brava at abrava@mri-boston.com  Key Words: quality, patient care, core measures, risk manager, risk management, compliance, accreditation",Risk Manager - PT  Hours Job in Boston,Part Time Employee,"Boston, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/risk-manager-pt-24-hours-job-boston-ma-us-168653107.aspx?mescoid=1300119001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,303645d72243f02ed639d9c59c39702f
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:02:48:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Seeking experienced In-house Paralegals for an opportunity in Central Florida!Candidates MUST have the following:- Bachelor's Degree or Paralegal Certificate- 10 years of Paralegal experience- Excellent written and verbal communication skills- Detail oriented and well organized- Experience within Real Estate, Sports, Hospitality, Marketing, OR Finance companies highly desiredQualified candidates will be contacted IMMEDIATELY!! APPLY NOW!! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1044833 Job Experience:paralegal, corporateYears of Experience Required:",In-house Paralegal Job in Orlando,Full Time Employee,"Orlando, FL 32801",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/in-house-paralegal-job-orlando-fl-us-168675424.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),343164e15bab4b10709649f98ea66763
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:02:48:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"A global asset management firm based out of Boston, MA is growing out it's IT project management team and is looking for a Business Data Analyst.This asset management firm is quant driven; therefore, most of the employees have a Mathematical background and have supported hedge fund, and asset management clients.The IT project management team supports strategic initiatives across all areas of the firm including accounting, trading, performance and attribution, security master, and post compliance.As the Business Data Analyst you will be in a highly visible position which requires data sourcing, support, and management for a broad range of the aforementioned applications. With this being said this role requires specific exposure to various vendor systems in an asset management environment including: -Accounting: Geneva, Eagle, SunGuard, Simcorp -Trading: Charles River -Performance and Attribution: BISAM, Eagle, Sylvan -Security Master: Markit, Eagle -Post Compliance: Charles River, Latent ZeroIn addition, the Business Data Analyst requires a high level of interaction and collaboration with internal clients and end users; therefore, it is crucial that the Business Data Analyst has in depth knowledge and experience supporting hedge fund, or asset management clientsResponsibilities: -Interpret and organize a collection of business requirements and communication those requirement to the developers-Comprehend market data and economic data from various vendors of the firm and further understand how that data with be distributed throughout the firm-Design, develop and manage data strategies-Research, track and communicate business issues and software defects related to projects and level two application support-Perform data management duties such as data mining, data mapping, data modeling Qualifications:-5+ years of experience working as an IT Business Analyst, Data Analyst or equivalent in an asset management firm-In depth asset management business function knowledge (i.e. Equity, Fixed Income, FX products, etc.) and be able to clearly outline your exposure to these asset classes and explain them to internal and external clients-Strong background in data integration- knowing how data flows from one application to another and how this affects the firm as a whole-Knowledge of financial software vendor packages for trading, portfolio accounting, performance measurement, etc.-Experience with SQL Server Business Intelligence tools: SQL, Reporting Services, Integration ServicesThis is a great opportunity to work as a Business Data Analyst working collaboratively with IT staff as well the business end users where you can utilize both your strong analytical and business domain knowledge to help support global initiatives across the firm.If you are interested in this role working as a Business Data Analyst in downtown Boston, MA please send over your updated resume and contact Joyce McKenna at (617) 248- 9560 to be considered.",Business Systems/ Data Analyst- Asset Management Job in Boston,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Boston   MA,,http://jobview.monster.com/business-systems-data-analyst-asset-management-job-boston-ma-us-168579002.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=17,,,ff6bcd0d20b7d0eec1e3c0d7f8029b0a
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:02:59:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"AMG National Trust Bank is a privately held, profitable wealth management institution offering comprehensive and objective investment management, financial counseling, trust administration services and commercial banking services. We serve affluent individuals, corporate executives, business owners, non-profit institutions and endowments and have offices located across the country. We have been in business for over 40 years and offer a professional and challenging work environment.   The Trust Officer serves as relationship manager to AMG National Trust Bank clients by providing support and advice in managing their trust and estate administration needs. In this role, you will establish solid working relationships with clients and client agents (i.e. attorneys, co-trustees, etc.) and AMG Financial Counselors and General Counsel.  Build relationships with potential new business sources and resources, including community leaders, accountants, and insurance agents. Build multigenerational relationships with members to retain assets held in a trust. Maintain awareness of emerging products and services and new developments in the industry. Keep current on all laws and regulations related to the administration of trust accounts. Acquire and apply intermediate knowledge of industry products, services and processes in handling moderately complex accounts (e.g. irrevocable, IRA, distributing trusts, trust agency, etc.) Prepare and review legal documents, correspondence and forms and ensure compliance with policies, procedures, governing documents and applicable regulations. Provide recommendations to management regarding changes to transaction processing and account maintenance.  Duties: Review accounts with clients on a periodic basis Prepare needed correspondence and documentation Manage cash in accounts and review list daily Authorize payment and distribution from accounts Sign checks Initiate and carry out effective investment portfolio based on client needs Determine that all tax returns are filed timely, including quarterly estimates for beneficiaries, if appropriate Correspond with grantors, beneficiaries, etc. Set-up new accounts using appropriate forms Be alert for and solicit any new potential new business Participate as an active member of the Trust Review Committee Maintain up-to-date knowledge on matters related to trust, estate and other account administration Act as educator and mentor to AMG employees regarding trusts, estate and related areas Education/Experience Requirements: Bachelor’s Degree, preferably in Finance or Business Administration Intermediate/Advanced knowledge of trust and estate services and applicable laws Five years working experience in trust and estate administration and planning required; 5+ years’ experience as a Trust Officer or Trust Relationship Manager responsible for a book of clients containing various types of trust, agency, and estate settlement accounts desired CTFA or other trust certification desirable JD from an accredited law school desirable  Knowledge and Skill Requirements: Working knowledge of Microsoft Office tools and Windows operating environment Normal working knowledge of trust accounting and related systems Business Development skills Advanced proficiency in verbal and written communication Excellent attention to detail Effectiveness under pressure Advanced ability to prioritize and multi task Ability to professionally interact with all levels of employees and clients Ability to respect and hold confidential information Effectively work as a team member and independently as required Establish priorities and follow through to completion Dependable, cooperative, flexible AMG offers a professional work environment. Benefits include paid time off, multiple medical plan offerings, dental and vision coverage, company-paid short- and long-term disability and Life/AD&D 2x annual salary, Medical Flex and Dependent Care Reimbursement accounts, 401(k) Plan and bank holidays!   EOE/AA/M/F/D/V Division/Department : 210 VA Trust % of Travel Required : 0-10% Skills : Banking/Financial -> Client Service",Trust Officer Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time,"Virginia Beach, VA 23450",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/trust-officer-job-virginia-beach-va-us-168569307.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4e9f2e081ff779008586256d78068136
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:37:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking an Information Security, Risk and Compliance Analyst in Piscataway, NJ.Overview:The Information Security, Risk and Compliance Analyst will be responsible for maintaining a fully mature IT Risk/Compliance program. This role is challenged with maintaining an enhanced enterprise risk and assessment strategy and solution, aligned to government standards of Supply Chain Risk Management and industry specifications for security assessments of applications and vendors/partners. In addition, this role will be responsible for the continued production, support, and implementation of IT Security and Risk policies and standards. The chosen candidate for this role will also be tasked with aiding in the creation of IT Compliance controls, and reviews existing IT compliance controls for regulatory updates and performs the necessary gap analysis; creates and maintains various internal and external audit and compliance schedules for Information Technology. This position will also have operational responsibility across the daily functions of: application risk assessments, third party risk assessments, policy and standard exceptions request reviews/approvals, security contract/schedule negotiations, risk findings management, and IT Risk self-assessment remediation efforts.Duties: Develops, implements, and maintains IT Compliance controls; reviews existing IT Compliance controls for regulatory updates and performs the necessary gap analysis; creates and maintains various internal and external audit and compliance schedules for Information Technology Reviews, documents, evaluates, and tests manual and automated controls throughout the corporate IT environment; develops and implements testing methodologies for application development, IT infrastructure, security, and availability; design and executes compliance tests for IT systems and coordinates required remediationREQUIREMENTS:Candidates for this role must have direct experience with the following: Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience required; security certifications such as CISSP, CISM, CompTIA, ECSA, or CEH are preferred Experience administering an IT Risk framework and an enterprise Risk and Controls Self-Assessment (RCSA) program Experience managing the policy, standards and procedures framework for Information Security and IT Risk/Compliance Knowledge concerning Information Security and Information Technology industry risks, solutions, and mitigating controls Experience working in a global company and familiar with international regulatory and privacy requirementsIn addition, a qualified candidate must have: 5 years of direct experience in IT Security or IT Risk/Compliance Excellent verbal and written communication and public speaking skills Accomplishments maintaining professional and technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing professional publications; establishing personal networks; benchmarking state-of-the-art practices; participating in professional societies Experience with the following industry/regulatory requirements and frameworks: ISO27001, SOC2, PCI/DSS, SOX, NIST 800-53 Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified informationAdditional Skills: Technical management skills and experience; hands on experience",Information Security,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Piscataway, NJ 08854",,http://jobview.monster.com/information-security-risk-compliance-analyst-job-piscataway-nj-us-168712433.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b39084313a5dd4128f7f49f35684075c
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:47:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client has an immediate opening for a Payroll Specialist.  This is an excellent opportunity for someone that has 2-4 years experience processing in-house payroll.  Job Summary: Responsible for processing payroll for hourly and salaried employees.  Responsibilities include: * Review and upload approved time from time and attendance system* Audit and process payroll for hourly and salary employees* Set up and process wage garnishments and other adjustments to pay* Handle and process requests regarding wages, hours, and lost or stale checks from employees; communicate and resolve issues with employees* Verify all payroll entries including deductions, earnings and changes, and review and reconcile payroll data* Organize and verify additional data for final payroll runs and process W-2 corrections as necessaryRequirements:- 2-4 years of payroll experience- Experience utilizing Ceridian payroll software- Strong attention to detail with a high degree of accuracy- Proficient in Excel  Why Choose Addison Group? A leading provider of professional staffing and search services, Addison Group distinguishes itself through exceptional delivery, specialized knowledge and strong relationships. Addison enables ideal connections between talented professionals and dynamic businesses. National practice areas include Administrative & HR; Engineering; Finance & Accounting Contract; Finance & Accounting Executive Search; Financial Services; Healthcare and Information Technology. Addison is an Inavero’s 2012 Best of Staffing winner for both Client and Candidate service.www.addisongroup.com",Payroll Specialist Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-specialist-job-boston-ma-us-168565746.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c50efc13f1a1cd36c518c757f12d3273
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:48:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran Job Schedule:  Monday – Friday with rotating SaturdaysJob Shift: 3:30pm start time (2nd shift).Pay: Based on experienceRelocation: Open/Negotiable for the right candidateSign-On Bonus: $2,000 Waste Management (WM), a Fortune 250 company, is the leading provider of comprehensive waste and environmental services in North America. We are strongly committed to a foundation of operating excellence, professionalism and financial strength. WM serves nearly 25 million customers in residential, commercial, industrial and municipal markets throughout North America through a network of collection operations, transfer stations, landfills, recycling facilities and waste-based energy production projects.Tired of just doing preventative maintenance or working only on engines? Are you ready to take the next step and work on equipment that requires a high level of skill - hydraulics, electrical, diagnostics - using modern maintenance practices and technologies? Are you looking for that right opportunity which will allow you to use and be rewarded for your skills and ability, and provide opportunity for growth? Our Sr. technicians are trained to provide superior maintenance on both diesel equipment and, at some locations, on our growing fleet of CNG trucks. We care about our technician’s safety and show it by demanding solid safety practices of all our technicians and managers. Pride, safety, training, growth, opportunity, great benefits, rewards – read more about this opportunity, we may be the company for you.I. Job SummaryWaste Management of Woburn, MA is looking for a Sr. Diesel Mechanic with solid technical practices in the repair of diesel heavy trucks and engines, overall computer knowledge over various programs and willingness to learn the business and support the District Fleet Manager to be groomed for the next level.  A Sr. Diesel Mechanic performs inspection, diagnosis and repair of electrical, hydraulic, suspension, brake and air systems on vehicles and equipment. Has heavy-duty diesel knowledge and an ability to assist in leading a team and support the Shift Supervisor and District Fleet Manager in the training and coaching of maintenance staff.  Performs preventive maintenance inspection (PMI); troubleshoots, repairs, and rebuilds major components on vehicles and equipment. Ensures accurate diagnosis and effective repair and/or replacement of components.II. Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Other minor duties may be assigned.  Maintains a clean, safe work area in compliance with Corporate/OSHA Standards, and performs all work in accordance with established safety procedures.Performs preventive maintenance inspections and ensures the timely and effective repair of any problems identified during an inspection.Performs proficient inspection, diagnosis and moderately complex repair of assigned vehicles and equipment.Provides assistance, guidance and direction to other maintenance personnel.Utilizes vehicle computer electronics systems to interpret failure modes to initiate or assign repairs.Estimates time and material costs on repairs and requisitions new parts.Advises supervisor immediately if additional work is needed or if repairs cannot be completed within the Standard Repair Times (SRTs).Inspects the quality of outside/supplier repairs and or rebuilds. Assesses structural damage and assigns needed repairs utilizing the most appropriate method(s).Performs service calls for emergency breakdowns.Conducts safety checks on vehicles. Performs maintenance related work as required.In the absence of supervision may provide maintenance supervisory duties.III. Supervisory ResponsibilitiesThis job has no supervisory duties.IV. QualificationsThe requirements listed below are representative of the qualifications necessary to perform the job.A. Education and ExperienceEducation: No education requiredExperience: Four year(s) relevant work experience.Preferred qualifications: 5+ years of diesel repair experience on heavy trucks and diesel engines.B. Certificates, Licenses, Registrations or Other RequirementsMust be at least 18 years of ageIf a CDL is a requirement, an applicant must be 21 years of age.Valid driver’s license and must have a clean driving record.Legally eligible to work in the United States.Ability to perform physical requirements of the position with or without reasonable accommodations.Successfully complete pre-employment drug screen, physical, and background check, which will include previous employment check, criminal history and motor vehicle record review.C. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities RequiredSkill in operating tools equipment, parts and procedures utilized during the repair and servicing of vehicles and equipmentSkill in repair of special purpose equipment, ability to effectively communicate needed repairs or tasksAbility to diagnose defects in and repair a variety of equipment and vehiclesAbility to utilize fleet maintenance software programKnowledge of Total Tire Maintenance Program may be required.V. Work EnvironmentListed below are key points regarding environmental demands and work environment of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the job.Required to use motor coordination with finger dexterity (such as keyboarding, machine operation, etc) most of the work day;Required to exert physical effort in handling objects less than 30 pounds most of the work day;Required to be exposed to physical occupational risks (such as cuts, burns, exposure to toxic chemicals, etc) often;Required to be exposed to physical environment which involves dirt, odors, noise, weather extremes or similar elements often;Normal setting for this job is: repair/maintenance shop.BenefitsAt Waste Management, each eligible employee receives a competitive total compensation package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance and Short Term Disability. As well as a Stock Purchase Plan, Company match on 401K, and more! Our employees also receive Paid Vacation, Holidays, and Personal Days. Please note that benefits may vary by site.If this sounds like the opportunity that you have been looking for, please click ""Apply.” Text “WASTE” to 51893 to Learn More!",Sr. Diesel Mechanic - $,Full Time,"Woburn, MA 01801",Waste Management,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-diesel-mechanic-2-000-sign-on-bonus-job-woburn-ma-us-167849703.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=1,Competitive Pay and Excellent Benefits,,74207de292620d35dcb49a5b085253cb
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:51:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:-Client is seeking a Program Manager III. Summary:-Title: Localization Vendor Program Manager -Location: MTV -The team is the central organization responsible for Translating, Validating and Regionalizing all content to support the client's products in 117 languages, covering 189 countries. -Content ranges from marketing materials, help, UI, to legal and ads. The Localization team supports the client's extreme pace of innovation and feature launches, working across multiple internal departments around the world. -This means that the Localization team members need to be proactive, motivated, organized, responsible, and able to work independently in a fast-paced, multi-cultural and team-oriented environment. -As Localization Vendor Manager, you will manage the overall relationships with our Localization service providers, including translation, review and other language-related services, as well as technology and workflow aspects. -You will manage the day-to-day relationships with the service providers, contribute to the Vendors strategy and build all necessary internal and external relationships to make sure that the client has the best Vendors' portfolio delivering translations that create a truly genuine local experience for our users. -Successful Localization Vendor managers have the ability to build strong relationships with internal teams to understand the needs of the business. -Also, they are capable of building long-lasting relationships with Vendors, assessing their strengths and weaknesses, measuring their performance, and supporting them so they can deliver the best quality the client's users are expecting. Responsibilities: -Supervise Localization Vendors to make sure they are compliant with SLAs and KPIs. This means, leading weekly meetings with Vendors and the client's Localization team members to address issues, project action items, quality concerns, operational tasks etc.-Set up Project Plans and serve as Project manager for all necessary initiatives where Localization Vendors are required to participate and deliver results. -Clearly understand Localization workflows to make sure Vendors follow them. Thoroughly document the operational steps required to roll out initiatives/programs that involve the client's Localization teams and Vendors. -Manage, document and resolve escalations involving Vendors. -Create, publish and manage Vendor communications and Internal communications to make sure all team members are aware of status of projects, initiatives, contract changes etc. -Manage the Localization Vendors website -Collect and analyze internal feedback about each Vendor and create an action plan and recommendations. -Maintain the Vendor Profile and Scorecard for each Localization Vendor -Collect all necessary information from the client's Localization team for an RFI/RFP from existing or potential vendors -Incubate new Vendors for the Localization team, create, implement, measure and report on Vendor pilots -Capture feedback/best practices from Vendors to share with the client's team. -Collaborate in Vendors training curriculums and implementation. -Create strong relationships with Internal Localization teams to capture feedback around Vendor performance and overall initiatives. -Develop a strong relationship with the client's gTech Contracts team to provide all necessary information to create/update/renew/negotiate contracts with existing or potential Vendors. Qualifications: -BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience. -5 years of work experience in an entrepreneurial environment, or working for a Fortune 100 company with international commercial operations serving consumers 5 years' experience working with vendors and managing relationships with clients/suppliers. -5 years of proven experience managing WW Programs with cross-functional scope and clearly defined KPIs. -Experience setting up Program/Project metrics and reporting to senior management -Experience creating/updating contracts and SOW with vendors -Strong written and verbal communications -MBA or other graduate degree. -3+ years managing people (FTE or external) -Localization industry expertise -Fluency in other languages and experience living in other countries",Program Manager III Job in Mountain View,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Job Description:-Client is seeking a Program Manager III. Summary:-Title: Localization Vendor Program Manager -Location: MTV -The team is the central organization responsible for Translating, Validating and Regionalizing all content to support the client's products in 117 languages, covering 189 countries. -Content ranges from marketing materials, help, UI, to legal and ads. The Localization team supports the client's extreme pace of innovation and feature launches, working across multiple internal departments around the world. -This means that the Localization team members need to be proactive, motivated, organized, responsible, and able to work independently in a fast-paced, multi-cultural and team-oriented environment. -As Localization Vendor Manager, you will manage the overall relationships with our Localization service providers, including translation, review and other language-related services, as well as technology and workflow aspects. -You will manage the day-to-day relationships with the service providers, contribute to the Vendors strategy and build all necessary internal and external relationships to make sure that the client has the best Vendors' portfolio delivering translations that create a truly genuine local experience for our users. -Successful Localization Vendor managers have the ability to build strong relationships with internal teams to understand the needs of the business. -Also, they are capable of building long-lasting relationships with Vendors, assessing their strengths and weaknesses, measuring their performance, and supporting them so they can deliver the best quality the client's users are expecting. Responsibilities: -Supervise Localization Vendors to make sure they are compliant with SLAs and KPIs. This means, leading weekly meetings with Vendors and the client's Localization team members to address issues, project action items, quality concerns, operational tasks etc.-Set up Project Plans and serve as Project manager for all necessary initiatives where Localization Vendors are required to participate and deliver results. -Clearly understand Localization workflows to make sure Vendors follow them. Thoroughly document the operational steps required to roll out initiatives/programs that involve the client's Localization teams and Vendors. -Manage, document and resolve escalations involving Vendors. -Create, publish and manage Vendor communications and Internal communications to make sure all team members are aware of status of projects, initiatives, contract changes etc. -Manage the Localization Vendors website -Collect and analyze internal feedback about each Vendor and create an action plan and recommendations. -Maintain the Vendor Profile and Scorecard for each Localization Vendor -Collect all necessary information from the client's Localization team for an RFI/RFP from existing or potential vendors -Incubate new Vendors for the Localization team, create, implement, measure and report on Vendor pilots -Capture feedback/best practices from Vendors to share with the client's team. -Collaborate in Vendors training curriculums and implementation. -Create strong relationships with Internal Localization teams to capture feedback around Vendor performance and overall initiatives. -Develop a strong relationship with the client's gTech Contracts team to provide all necessary information to create/update/renew/negotiate contracts with existing or potential Vendors. Qualifications: -BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience. -5 years of work experience in an entrepreneurial environment, or working for a Fortune 100 company with international commercial operations serving consumers 5 years' experience working with vendors and managing relationships with clients/suppliers. -5 years of proven experience managing WW Programs with cross-functional scope and clearly defined KPIs. -Experience setting up Program/Project metrics and reporting to senior management -Experience creating/updating contracts and SOW with vendors -Strong written and verbal communications -MBA or other graduate degree. -3+ years managing people (FTE or external) -Localization industry expertise -Fluency in other languages and experience living in other countries",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-iii-job-mountain-view-ca-us-168711188.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,5de965abc83485b0308b7511f7cba2fa
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:51:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Talascend is currently seeking an IT HR/Finance Specialist for a direct hire opportunity located in Chattanooga, TennesseeOVERVIEW:Role supports IT Manager in defining, documenting, and validating the key business processes required to execute a given business function and aligning these business processes to appropriate technology solutions.  He / She plays a lead role in business application (systems) project implementation to assure that key business process metrics are addressed as part of the system rollout.  This individual specializes in a subset of the client's core business processes and is responsible for documenting these processes and understanding the technology solutions that are used to support the execution of these business processes.  This individual works directly with business process owners (and technology users) to identify where processes can be improved and how the technology solutions supporting these processes can facilitate that improvement.  He / She is also responsible for working with the PIO to understand the technology roadmap for GoA and how this technology roadmap impacts the business process(es) that they have responsibility over.  This individual works with the Manager and Technology Strategy areas to identify and report on key performance indicators and how a given technology solution has impacted these key performance indicators. This specialist is responsible from gathering business requirements through the implementation of a system solution that fulfill the Business requirements (mainly SAP). He / She displays strong skills in SAP Technology with focus on and ABAP plus SAP functional expertise in the HR area.  The specialist will act as a project manager and functional consultant.  As part of a worldwide group, he/she might work with a globally dispersed cross-functional team to lead resources, prepare appropriate documentation based on the project size, delegate tasks to team members, effectively and clearly communicate project status, manage project risk and monitor the change readiness of the business as well as conduct post implementation audit reviews. He/she oversees all aspects of project information including timelines, budgets, resource allocation, scope and definition. He/she must have the ability to manage small to medium global cross-functional projects.  PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:• Create and maintain Business and System documentation for transparency• Work with the Business Area Leader to make transparent through explicit documentation the, business processes, business applications (system landscape), system information (batch jobs, interfaces) and the interrelationship among all of these attributes of the Business Architecture.• Ensure that the Business Area Leaders are aware of the Business Architecture and the implication of the architecture to enable or constrain changes in business strategy.    • Create Application (System) Lifecycle Plans    • Work with the Business Area Leader to ensure that a multiyear lifecycle plan is created to support level 3 processes that includes milestones for all known system version or functional upgrades and sunset and successor system implementation.    • Assess and Manage Business Process / System Requirements and Business User satisfaction    • Work with the business area leaders to determine, for a given business process, the current level of performance satisfaction and risk with current process and systems. Create with the business area requirements plans for continuous improvement of the process and system.    • Identify Automated Solutions which support business process maturity or improvement   • For a given business process, work with the business to identify, document, and analyze business process risk and opportunity costs associated with current process and system     • Identify from the AG Master Construction Plans (MCP) the current and or future generation of Group Solutions as potential successors for the current processes and systems.     • For a given business process, work with the business to create business case documentation (with standard template) to evaluate scenarios to replace or adapt current processes or systems.      • Facilitate the Acquisition and Maintenance of Application Software    • Work with the business to specify the appropriate system controls within the design of the application and facilitate the process of acquiring and defining maintenance guidelines for the application.    • Work with the business to facilitate the development of end-user training based on the business processes, which the acquired application is geared to support.    • Manage Process and System Implementation Projects• Technical Project Leader for the implementation of the new MCP systems or upgrades through the change control process.• Ensure that the system implementation projects follow the GoA ITPO Project Management standards including insuring that all required documentation is current and accurate.• Responsible of requirements validation with the areas of responsibility• Responsible for the functional requirement definitions and for some projects  responsible of the system configuration or programming• Responsible for the PMO of the assigned project (tracking, status reporting)POSITION REQUIREMENTS:Required• 5-10 years of professional work experience in related field.• Competence in defining documenting business processes and process governance using Microsoft Visio Professional 2003 and / or ARIS.• Proficiency in MS Office 2003 / 2007• Proficiency in Process Management• Proficiency in Project Management • SAP Knowledge (HR)• SAP and Process consultant skillsPreferred• Exposure the SEP Software Development Process• Mixed Functional and ABAP experience in SAP manufacturing environment with • SAP HR focus• SAP SuccessFactors ExperienceEDUCATION REQUIREMENTS:Bachelors in Business Administration, Management, Finance, Information Systems or related discipline. Preferred• Master’s in Business Administration",IT HR/Finance Specialist Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/it-hr-finance-specialist-job-chattanooga-tn-us-168752771.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,226751bd8bae86cd86f7fd1519fa98f2
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:54:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Lakeside Dental Care we can offer you and your family a wide range of dental services through our highly qualified team of dentists and hygienists. Our mission is to promote oral health by becoming the area's leading provider of comprehensive dentistry while providing the absolute best care and service to our patients. Whether you need a cleaning or cosmetic dentistry, our friendly staff will provide you with prompt and personalized care. We also have the interpreters who speak Spanish, Vietnamese and Chinese in our dental offices.We are looking for a Full-Time General Dentist to work Tuesday-Thursday from 8:00am-5:00pm and Friday 8:00am-2:00pm. Our doctors enjoy a professional practice experience and comprehensive compensation and benefit package that includes medical, malpractice, disability and life insurances, and a 401K program with employer matching contribution. Required Skills:Must have an active or be eligible to obtain a Louisiana Dental License and a DDS or DMD.For more information about career opportunities, please contact Dave Sylvestri at: (781) 295-1131 or email C.V.",Full-Time General Dentist (-) Job in Kenner,Full Time Employee,"Kenner, LA 70062",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/full-time-general-dentist-4847-200-job-kenner-la-us-169113390.aspx?mescoid=2900455001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,16d9c26da2a74a4730cf83b5614f1944
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:54:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"In-Store Sales Representatives Wanted!We are an elite marketing firm looking for bright and positive individuals to join our marketing and sales team. Our company represents two major entertainment and retail clientele inside professional in-store locations. We are looking for Sales Representatives to be the voice of our client inside the stores. We are looking for outgoing, dedicated, and motivated individuals to help continue our companies growth as well as excel on the sales floor.We are looking for Sales Reps in these locations:PortlandClackamasBeavertonHillsboroWilsonvilleAll of our interviews for our Sales Representative positions are held in our Downtown Portland office.  There’s always an opportunity to grow and advance to a higher position! For our Sales Reps...WE OFFER: • Weekly pay, hourly wage PLUS COMMISSIONS• Friendly environment • Competitive BONUSES• Career advancement and travel opportunities No experience is necessary for our sales reps position. Persons from customer service, retail, and sales backgrounds thrive in our company! If this sounds interesting to you apply now. Want more information about our sales position?Visit our websiteor call 503-444-3313",In-Store Sales Rep/ ADVANCEMENT OPPORTUNITIES Job in Portland,"Full Time , Employee","Portland, OR 97232",Retail Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/in-store-sales-rep-advancement-opportunities-job-portland-or-us-169951913.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f95cd23be75187a3211ac23c40fb1fa3
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:56:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary HVAC Technician will perform skilled inspection, maintenance, repair, and installation of heating, ventilation, air conditioning and refrigeration systems and related equipment in a Semiconductor Industrial Manufacturing Facility working within the Facilities Team in Austin, TX.   ABM (NYSE:ABM), a Fortune 500 company, which operates through its subsidiaries (collectively ""ABM""), is a leading provider of integrated facility services. ABM provides commercial cleaning and maintenance, facility engineering, energy efficiency, parking and security services for thousands of commercial, industrial, government and retail clients across the United States and various international locations. Proudly serving over 50% of Fortune 500 companies, we are 100,000+ employees strong and have a national and international presence and reputation as leaders in our industries.  We are dedicated to employee development and offer abundant opportunities for professional growth and development throughout your career.  Please go to ABM.com to learn more about us.   Education Certification   Career Level TDLR Licensed with 2 years journeyman experience   Benefits Included   Employment Status   Shift Type Rotating – 12 hour Days   Essential Duties: Perform preventative maintenance and routine servicing of equipment. Inspect, troubleshoot, modify and repair HVAC/R equipment. Calibrate systems, diagnose defects and provide technical support in the field. Operate manual and electrical tools and equipment applicable to the trade. Perform skilled electrical maintenance of equipment, components, timers, motors and wiring of systems and       controls as needed. Charge A/C units with Freon and pulling a vacuum on A/C units. Perform other duties as assigned. Job duties may be modified at any time.   Minimum Requirements: High school diploma or GED. HVAC/R Certificate and/or two years of documentable journeyman level experience in HVAC/R EPA License. Knowledge of Standard practices of the HVAC trade. Knowledge of Applicable building codes, ordinances and regulations. Knowledge of Health and safety regulations. Knowledge of Basic record keeping techniques. Ability to work shifts. Ability to lift heavy objects, work independently, meet schedules and time lines.   ABM is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer (Minority/Female/Veteran/Disability/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation)     Job Requirements:High school diploma or GED. HVAC/R Certificate and/or two years of documentable journeyman level experience in HVAC/R EPA License. Knowledge of Standard practices of the HVAC trade. Knowledge of Applicable building codes, ordinances and regulations. Knowledge of Health and safety regulations. Knowledge of Basic record keeping techniques. Ability to work shifts. Ability to lift heavy objects, work independently, meet schedules and time lines.      ",HVAC Technician Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX 78754",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hvac-technician-job-austin-tx-us-174878481.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=12,,Engineering,6a318d79d1910fbf13d5130bb505cb4e
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:57:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Downstream Research ScientistLocation: East Syracuse NY, 13057Duration: 06 months  Description:·         The role of the Research Scientist in Manufacturing Sciences & Technology, Downstream is to conduct experiments for the purposes of commercial manufacturing support for biopharmaceutical purification and bulk drug substance handling processes consisting of chromatography, viral inactivation, ultrafiltration/diafiltration, filtration and bulk scale cryogenics unit operations. ·         Responsibilities include the operation, cleaning and maintenance of laboratory equipment, the preparation of buffers and reagents, documentation of experimental data and results, data verification and the preparation of study protocols and final reports. ·         Appropriate GLP/GMP procedures must be followed. ·         This position also involves troubleshooting and problem solving of process related problems observed at manufacturing scale through the effective design of scale-down studies and the evaluation of data from manufacturing lots. ·         The successful candidate will work effectively in cross-functional project teams and also work independently to accomplish project goals. ·         The position offers the opportunity to interface with Process Development, Pilot Plant, Manufacturing, Manufacturing Support, Quality Assurance, Analytical, Supply Chain and Global Regulatory Sciences groups. ·         Strong communication and technical writing skills are required. Qualifications:·         B. S or M.S. degree in Biological or Chemical Sciences/Engineering preferred. ·         Knowledge of protein purification, protein stability, protein formulation and demonstrated experimental skills for lab work are required. ·         Applied knowledge of AKTA purification, preparative chromatography systems, and ultrafiltration/diafiltration operations are helpful. ·         Candidates must possess good organizational skills and strong attention to details, excellent experimental/troubleshooting aptitude, and be self motivated. ·         The candidate should also possess good verbal and written communication skills, as well as excellent interpersonal skills with the ability to work in a team environment. Referrals are appreciated and welcomed!",Monster,,"Job Title: Downstream Research ScientistLocation: East Syracuse NY, 13057Duration: 06 months  Description:·         The role of the Research Scientist in Manufacturing Sciences & Technology, Downstream is to conduct experiments for the purposes of commercial manufacturing support for biopharmaceutical purification and bulk drug substance handling processes consisting of chromatography, viral inactivation, ultrafiltration/diafiltration, filtration and bulk scale cryogenics unit operations. ·         Responsibilities include the operation, cleaning and maintenance of laboratory equipment, the preparation of buffers and reagents, documentation of experimental data and results, data verification and the preparation of study protocols and final reports. ·         Appropriate GLP/GMP procedures must be followed. ·         This position also involves troubleshooting and problem solving of process related problems observed at manufacturing scale through the effective design of scale-down studies and the evaluation of data from manufacturing lots. ·         The successful candidate will work effectively in cross-functional project teams and also work independently to accomplish project goals. ·         The position offers the opportunity to interface with Process Development, Pilot Plant, Manufacturing, Manufacturing Support, Quality Assurance, Analytical, Supply Chain and Global Regulatory Sciences groups. ·         Strong communication and technical writing skills are required. Qualifications:·         B. S or M.S. degree in Biological or Chemical Sciences/Engineering preferred. ·         Knowledge of protein purification, protein stability, protein formulation and demonstrated experimental skills for lab work are required. ·         Applied knowledge of AKTA purification, preparative chromatography systems, and ultrafiltration/diafiltration operations are helpful. ·         Candidates must possess good organizational skills and strong attention to details, excellent experimental/troubleshooting aptitude, and be self motivated. ·         The candidate should also possess good verbal and written communication skills, as well as excellent interpersonal skills with the ability to work in a team environment. Referrals are appreciated and welcomed!",,http://jobview.monster.com/downstream-research-scientist-job-east-syracuse-ny-us-169390276.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=16,,,96c6bde807e6d71a87ed1e5a899b7b48
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:03:57:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duration: 06/20/2016 to 12/23/2016Location: Cambridge, MA,02142Associate Scientist I, Research Job Description: We are seeking a highly motivated Associate Scientist to join the blood-brain barrier research group in the Neuroimmunology Department at Biogen. The successful candidate will execute experiments in cell-based models to support the development of therapeutics for the treatment of neurodegenerative diseases. A key responsibility herein is maintenance of cell lines and setting up in vitro BBB devices. Precise documentation of procedures and results is essential. This position is integrated in a cross disciplinary Biogen initiative creating a collaborative team environment which requires excellent communication skills from the candidate. Qualifications: • Basic laboratory experience is mandatory, primarily in in vitro settings. • Hands-on experience with cell culture techniques is essential. • Being comfortable to set up and handle complex in vitro BBB devices, including 3D cell cultures and microfluidic platforms, is necessary. The candidate will be adequately trained to become familiar with these devices. • Experience in immunostaining techniques and confocal microscopy, image acquisition and analysis (including video data) is desirable. • Desire and ability to learn and assist in state-of-the-art microscopy techniques is required. • Previous experience in molecular biology and proteomics techniques is a plus. • The candidate is expected to independently execute and troubleshoot experiments and to analyze results. Over time, the candidate will participate in experimental design. • The candidate must be highly self-motivated and work collaboratively in teams through excellent oral and written communication skills. • This position requires strong interpersonal and organizational skills, as well as patience and a steady commitment towards achievement of goals. Education: This position requires a BS/MS degree in biological science. At least 2 years of relevant experience in academia or industry is desired.Kindly email resume to poonam.mundhra@fortira.com or call at 6097243092.",Monster,,"Duration: 06/20/2016 to 12/23/2016Location: Cambridge, MA,02142Associate Scientist I, Research Job Description: We are seeking a highly motivated Associate Scientist to join the blood-brain barrier research group in the Neuroimmunology Department at Biogen. The successful candidate will execute experiments in cell-based models to support the development of therapeutics for the treatment of neurodegenerative diseases. A key responsibility herein is maintenance of cell lines and setting up in vitro BBB devices. Precise documentation of procedures and results is essential. This position is integrated in a cross disciplinary Biogen initiative creating a collaborative team environment which requires excellent communication skills from the candidate. Qualifications: • Basic laboratory experience is mandatory, primarily in in vitro settings. • Hands-on experience with cell culture techniques is essential. • Being comfortable to set up and handle complex in vitro BBB devices, including 3D cell cultures and microfluidic platforms, is necessary. The candidate will be adequately trained to become familiar with these devices. • Experience in immunostaining techniques and confocal microscopy, image acquisition and analysis (including video data) is desirable. • Desire and ability to learn and assist in state-of-the-art microscopy techniques is required. • Previous experience in molecular biology and proteomics techniques is a plus. • The candidate is expected to independently execute and troubleshoot experiments and to analyze results. Over time, the candidate will participate in experimental design. • The candidate must be highly self-motivated and work collaboratively in teams through excellent oral and written communication skills. • This position requires strong interpersonal and organizational skills, as well as patience and a steady commitment towards achievement of goals. Education: This position requires a BS/MS degree in biological science. At least 2 years of relevant experience in academia or industry is desired.Kindly email resume to poonam.mundhra@fortira.com or call at 6097243092.",,http://jobview.monster.com/associate-scientist-job-cambridge-ma-us-169510567.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=20,,,130425adb29de9b635a8a3f18008f10c
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:04:08:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Introduction: The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL), a national leader in scientific research and development, located midway between Baltimore and Washington, DC is seeking a  Contracts Analyst.Job Summary: Provide oversight as well as hands-on management of the funding and modification process for a major $5B DoD contract from initiation through execution, including all relevant documentation; interact with both Government and JHU/APL representatives to identify and resolve issues, provide advice and training, and ensure smooth execution of task order awards; and assist the Supervisor with risk mitigation and contractual compliance activities. Duties (Listed in order of importance with the estimated amount of time spent at each task): Reconcile government funding reports with internal Laboratory reports; identify and resolve discrepancies; provide guidance to staff responsible for processing the funds through execution (35%) Analyze and make recommendations for funding de-obligations as well as validate modifications for canceling funds. (10%) Monitor and manage sponsor acceptance documentation in coordination with the contracting officer representative's (COR's) office and in accordance with contractual requirements. (5%) Manage revisions to task orders, including draft documentation and business system data entry, integrity and reporting. (20%) Perform analysis and risk assessment of funding requests (5%) Interact with the government program office and contracts office to resolve issues as they are identified. (15%) Other ad hoc contract administration activities to include preparing reports and assisting with the maintenance of information for other contracts. (10%)  Note: This job summary and listing of duties is for the purpose of describing the position and its essential functions at time of hire and may change over time. Required Qualifications: Bachelors Degree in Business Administration or related field with 2 to 3 years experience in a government contracting environment Self-starter, proven individual contributor with ability to work in teams in a dynamic environment. Demonstrated ability to work multiple tasks simultaneously while providing superior attention to detail, accuracy, and customer service. Strong communication, organizational and interpersonal skills Proficient with the Microsoft suite of software, notably Word and Excel  Desired Qualifications: Experience with cost estimating and proposal preparation.  Familiarity with JHU/APL's financial, proposal, and estimating processes as well as laboratory business applications such as EBSS and FPB. Security:  Applicant selected will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and must meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.Benefits: APL offers a comprehensive benefits package including a liberal vacation plan, a matching retirement program, significant educational assistance, a scholarship tuition program for staff with dependents, and competitive salaries commensurate with skills and experience. For more information about our organization, please visit our web site at www.jhuapl.edu Equal Employment Opportunity:Johns Hopkins University/Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer that complies with Title IX of the Education Amendments Acts of 1972, as well as other applicable laws. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",Contracts Analyst Job in Columbia,Full Time,"Columbia, MD 21044",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/contracts-analyst-job-columbia-md-us-169507073.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8501d1e793540e576101914b24a19744
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:04:56:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking Entry Level candidates with a Bachelor's Degree in Biology, Chemistry, Microbiology, Biochemistry, Biomedical Engineering or scientific field, to work as consultants for a pharmaceutical client in Fort Worth, TX 76134.  Recent graduates are fine.1 shift: 7am - 3:30pm2nd shift: 3:30pm - 12pm3rd shift: 11pm - 6amWeekend shift Skills: High degree of mechanical aptitude, ability to function in a team environment, ability to function in a fast paced machine paced environment, ability to operate computerized equipment, excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to learn production procedures.Education:Bachelor in a scientific field required. Will consider a recent college grad. MUST have 2 classes in Chemistry.Under the direction of the Production Supervisor, will be responsible to support the production of quality sterile products to meet the production schedule. This includes the cleaning and preparation of equipment, sanitization of work area, and restocking of inventory necessary to support the production schedule. The production assistants also have responsibilities of completing associated documentation according to GDP standards. They are expected to be multi-skilled and capable of learning all aspects of production from compounding, to support services, to filling and packaging. Responsibilities include line clearance, setup and operation of packaging equipment, integrity testing of filters, preparation and sterilization of processing equipment, and coordinating task and schedules within the group and across functional lines. Production assistants may be required to complete garb certification and perform tasks in an aseptic environment. Due to business needs, it may be necessary to work overtime including nights and/or weekends.",Biology or Chemistry Graduate Job in Fort Worth,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Fort Worth, TX 76134",,http://jobview.monster.com/biology-or-chemistry-graduate-job-fort-worth-tx-us-167250289.aspx?mescoid=1900244001001&jobPosition=7,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Biotech/R&D/Science,5e1420edebb96bce8ca18e80f6abe620
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:04:57:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have an immediate position for a “Microbiologist” with our top pharmaceutical client, if you are interested please send your updated resume to greg @ collabinfo.com or call me at 732-788-3483. Title: Microbiologist/ Molecular Scientist Duration: 6+ MonthsLocation: Raritan, NJ Description:The successful candidate will perform molecular biology and biochemical experiments to evaluate and characterize Client vaccines targeting bacterial pathogens.The primary responsibilities include the genetic manipulation and characterization of bacterial pathogens, as well as the expression and purification of proteins and the conduct of various immunological assays. These responsibilities require skills in basic molecular biology, including nucleic acid purification, PCR, qPCR, protein purification and characterization, ELISAs, Luminex and other immunological assays. Experience in the culture and maintenance of mammalian tissue culture cells would be advantageous. The candidate will be responsible for data analysis and interpretation using various computer applications, such as Excel, GraphPad and statistical programs. Maintaining a clear written record of experimental design and results is a requisite, as is the ability to participate in writing reports, protocols and manuscripts. The candidate will also be responsible for maintaining laboratory equipment and supplies, as well as ensuring a safe laboratory environment. The candidate must demonstrate good oral and written skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to work in a team environment. Qualifications BS, BA or MS in molecular biology, microbiology, immunology or related discipline required, with a minimum of two years relevant experience Experience in basic microbiology and molecular biology is required Experience in basic immunology and tissue culture is a plus Experience with vaccine development, including immunological assays, preferred but not essential Excellent verbal and written communication skills Works well in a team environment Works well in a regulated (GCLP compliant) laboratory environmentThanks &RegardsGreg Miller | Collab InfoTechPrinceton | NJ | 08540Contact : 732-788-3483Email:greg@collabinfo.com | Website www.collabinfo.com  ",Monster,,"We have an immediate position for a “Microbiologist” with our top pharmaceutical client, if you are interested please send your updated resume to greg @ collabinfo.com or call me at 732-788-3483. Title: Microbiologist/ Molecular Scientist Duration: 6+ MonthsLocation: Raritan, NJ Description:The successful candidate will perform molecular biology and biochemical experiments to evaluate and characterize Client vaccines targeting bacterial pathogens.The primary responsibilities include the genetic manipulation and characterization of bacterial pathogens, as well as the expression and purification of proteins and the conduct of various immunological assays. These responsibilities require skills in basic molecular biology, including nucleic acid purification, PCR, qPCR, protein purification and characterization, ELISAs, Luminex and other immunological assays. Experience in the culture and maintenance of mammalian tissue culture cells would be advantageous. The candidate will be responsible for data analysis and interpretation using various computer applications, such as Excel, GraphPad and statistical programs. Maintaining a clear written record of experimental design and results is a requisite, as is the ability to participate in writing reports, protocols and manuscripts. The candidate will also be responsible for maintaining laboratory equipment and supplies, as well as ensuring a safe laboratory environment. The candidate must demonstrate good oral and written skills, strong organizational skills, and the ability to work in a team environment. Qualifications BS, BA or MS in molecular biology, microbiology, immunology or related discipline required, with a minimum of two years relevant experience Experience in basic microbiology and molecular biology is required Experience in basic immunology and tissue culture is a plus Experience with vaccine development, including immunological assays, preferred but not essential Excellent verbal and written communication skills Works well in a team environment Works well in a regulated (GCLP compliant) laboratory environmentThanks &RegardsGreg Miller | Collab InfoTechPrinceton | NJ | 08540Contact : 732-788-3483Email:greg@collabinfo.com | Website www.collabinfo.com  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/microbiologist-molecular-scientist-job-raritan-nj-us-169383833.aspx?mescoid=1900242001001&jobPosition=11,,,058e74f29b3ad8539fd01fe8410ec8d1
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:05:47:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Opportunity to join a well-established, well-funded, and growing company providing hospitals, clinics, and CROs with diagnostic imaging agents and related products. Shall support product development, design verification and validation, and Change Controls through: *** Designing and executing experiments and surveys. *** Processing and analyzing data to help make decisions. *** Recommending changes to product designs or manufacturing processes. *** Educating and training team members on statistical processes and analysis. High-profile position within a growing company. Long-term incentive package includes stock options, matched 401(k) and pension plan. Full medical and health benefits along with competitive six figure compensation and bonuses. Relocation assistance available for exceptional candidates. For more information, contact Branden F. Lynch at: (609) 584-9000 ext 241 Or submit resume online at: http://dmc9.com/bfl/app.asp Or email to: 1000023857_10007337@jobbank302.com Please reference #36662459 when responding.Education Requirements: Master DegreeMinimum Experience Requirements: 2-5 yearsJob City Location: LawrenceJob State Location: MAJob Country Location: USASalary Range: $60,000 to $100,000WE ARE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER and our employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, handicap, disability or marital status. We reasonably accommodate individuals with handicaps, disabilities and bona fide religious beliefs. Jobs Career Position Hiring.  CONSIDERED EXPERIENCE INCLUDES:  Top 10 Job Site Top 10 Careers Site Statistician Statistical Scientist Biotechnology Clinical Statistician Research Scientist Medical Device Kit Imaging Kit Statistician cGMP Drug Development Pharmaceuticals JMP SAS Design Expert DOE Design Of Experiment Quality Engineering Imaging Agents Tracers Biomarkers Contrast Medium Contrast Agent Non Clinical       DISCLAIMER: We will make every effort to consider applications for all available positions and shall use one or more of the contact methods and addresses indicated in resume or online application. Indicated location may be proximate or may be desirable point of embarkation for paid or unpaid relocation to another venue. Job descriptions may fit single or multiple presently available or anticipated positions and are NOT an offer of employment or contract implied or otherwise. Described compensation is not definite nor precise and may be estimated and approximate and is negotiable depending on market conditions and candidate availability and other factors and is solely at the discretion of employers. Linguistics used herein may use First Person Singular and First Person Plural grammatical person construction for and with the meaning of Third Person Singular and Third Person Plural references. We reserves the right to amend and change responsibilities to meet business and organizational needs as necessary. Response to a specific posting or advertisement may result in consideration for other opportunities and not necessarily the incentive or basis of the response. Nothing herein is or may be considered a promise, guarantee, offer, pledge, agreement, contract, or oath. If you submit an application or resume which contains your email address, we will use that email address to communicate with you about this and other positions. We use an email quality control service to maintain security and a remove and dead address filter. To cancel receiving email communications, simply send an email from your address with the word ""remove"" in the subject line to pleaseremove@candseek4.com Or, visit the website at www.jobbankremove.com. If you have further concern regarding email received from us, call (609) 584-5499.",Scientist & Statistician - Diagnostic Imaging Agent Manufacturing Job in Lawrence,Full Time,"Lawrence, MA 01840",,http://jobview.monster.com/scientist-statistician-diagnostic-imaging-agent-manufacturing-job-lawrence-ma-us-169419114.aspx?mescoid=2900538001001&jobPosition=10,"60,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),c296e2edbc1f28a9036d84561520829d
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:05:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"R&D Technician IIPerform pharmaceutical formulation lab routine duties such as preparing lab scale formulation, testing finished drug product and reporting data on electronic lab note book. Manager prefers Bachelor Degree - Chemistry/Chemical EngineeringExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",R&D Technician II Job in Warren,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,R&D Technician II,"Warren, IL 60064",http://jobview.monster.com/r-d-technician-ii-job-warren-il-us-169550354.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=16,,Biotech/R&D/Science,79eea4f43451b86d3ab86399059c94a9
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:06:44:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"TechData is looking for Biostatistician, SAS Programmer/Statistical Programmer (Some can be telecommuting), Outcome research Biostatistician, Sr. Clinical Data Manager, Clinical Project Manager for our pharmaceutical clients in Central NJ and Northern NJ. Please see below requirements and send your resume to: john.zhang@techdataservice.com TechData is a leading provider for temporary and permanent positions in the pharmaceutical industry. TechData offers the most competitive pay rate and benefits in clinical research consulting services. Biostatistician• Work closely with clinicians, programmers, and publication managers to generate and QC outputs for publications; review publication (abstract/manuscripts) to ensure accuracy, quality and soundness of statistical methodologies; coordinate internal resource utilization for publication and generate activities metrics for management review. • Work with the clinical study team on study design, development and/or review of clinical study protocols. • Develop and/or review statistical analysis plans, including Table/listing/figure shells, and final study report for clinical studies; perform post-hoc statistical analyses as needed. • Work with the project statistician and clinical data managers on design/review of case report form, data transfer specification, edit check specification, and participation in user acceptance testing (UAT); generate/review data tables/listings and coordinate data review meetings during the course of the study to ensure data quality. • Oversee CRO programming activities, perform quality assurance checks on internally or externally produced SAS tables, listings, and figures, ensure the quality of CRO deliverables. • May work with the Health Outcome team on the design/analysis/validation of projects. • May work on submission teams as a statistician and/or a programmer. QUALIFICATIONS NEEDED: • Must have a MS in Biostatistics/Statistics with at least 5 years of experience or a PhD in Biostatistics/ Statistics with at least 3 years of experience in the pharmaceutical, CRO or biotech industry. • Strong SAS programming skills. • Oncology experience is highly preferred. • Good technical writing skills. • Good communication skills (verbal and written). • Strong teamwork ability/commitment and individual initiative. • Strong organizational skills with ability to effectively manage multiple projects. we need is an experienced statistician who can do SAS programming at the same time can clearly interprete statistical concept and results to non-statisticians and key medical opinion leaders.  Sr. Statistical/SAS Programmer (Some position can be telecommuting)Main purpose of the job: To support the Biostatistics team by carrying out and overseeing programming activities of statistical programmers and external vendors (as required), and to ensure timely and accurate programming and validation activities for clinical studies. Contributes to the overall efficiency and best practice running of the Biostatistics group, demonstrating the ability to work efficiently and to a high standard within a clinical team environment. Main duties/responsibilities: 1. Providing statistical programming and validation support for clinical study reports, overseeing programming activities by external vendors (e.g., CROs) when necessary and coordinating programming activities among the study programmers to achieve timely progress in the following areas: analysis datasets, statistical tables, figures, listings, Integrated Summaries of Safety (ISS), Integrated Summaries of Efficacy (ISE), electronic submissions and other internal and external requests (e.g., publications). Accessing and converting data to SAS from Database management system and PC file formats (e.g., MS Excel, text files). Working with external vendors in order to develop or monitor the content and structure of SAS data sets. 2. Developing and maintaining SOPs, SWPs and other related technical documents, providing input to the Database and CRF Development, creating edit check programs and providing feedback to the Data Management. Providing input in developing statistical analysis plans, specifications of analysis datasets, validation plans, and other related documents. Determining and researching SAS software upgrades and related systems and addressing maintenance issues. 3. Managing and developing team, maintaining standards for programming activities, and guiding/coaching Statistical programmers. 4. Working independently to accomplish tasks and goals defined by supervisor. Attending required training and meetings and bringing in new ideas to improve the programming process. * Responsibilities weighting may change significantly based on the incumbent and their assigned areas of responsibility. Qualifications and education required: • Minimum of Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related science discipline. Masters preferred. Experience required: • Minimum 5 years experience in SAS programming for phase I-IV clinical trials in a pharmaceutical/CRO environment. 7+ years experience preferred. • Some project experience in a pharmaceutical/CRO programming environment or demonstrated significant leadership of SAS programming activities in a clinical pharmaceutical/CRO environment. Skills and aptitude required: • Experience using SAS-Base, MACRO, STAT, GRAPH, ACCESS, MS Office. • Proven experience with Unix and Windows operating systems. • Understanding of the software development life cycle. • Understanding of FDA guidelines. • Good organization, time management and attention to detail skills needed to work in a stressful environment under tight deadlines while maintaining focus on details and quality. • Applies good judgment and demonstrates initiative to resolve issues. • Strong verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills needed to work effectively in a team environment, managing that team as required.   Biostatistician for Outcome ResearchPosition SummaryThe EBM biostatistician provides statistical expertise for all observational research project sponsored by the US Evidence Based Medicine (EBM) in protocol development, Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) preparation and study report. The role needs to ensure that appropriateness of study design, sample size and statistical methodologies are used and adherence to the established standards and SOPs. The role manages the timely execution of statistical and research methodological components of EBM study protocols in order to meet project objectives and has a thorough understanding of current requirements for statistical standards.Roles/ResponsibilitiesUtilize statistical knowledge of and expertise to provide statistical support for EBM studies, with a main focus of real-world observational studies, database examples:1)US medical and pharmacy claims databases (e.g. MarketScan); 2) US medical record databases (e.g. GE Healthcare); 3) US government public use databases (e.g. NHANES, MEPS)Participate in study concept, protocol and SAP development and ensure appropriateness of study design, sample size and statistical methodologies proposed. Specify the structure of the datasets that will be delivered for statistical analysis to ensure that the structure follows any existing company standard for databases pooling. Mock-up, review, and approve tables, listings and graphs specifications. Actively participate in project/study team meetings Establish/negotiate timelines for completion of study-related statistical activities. Ensure the study timelines are met. Conduct observational data analysis, include data management, statistical programming, interpretation of analyses results, and write-up/review the corresponding sections of EBM study report. Produce analysis datasets, listings, tables, and figures for research projects, according to specifications, while maintaining documentation and complying with pre-defined project / study standards. Provide oversight of the biostatistics-related activities for EBM studies subcontracted to a CRO: Oversee the CROs work on the preparation of analysis plans, development and validation of computer algorithms for inferential analyses, statistical writing of study reports, and other outsourced analyses as appropriate. Perform quality control procedures to ensure that statistical deliverables conform to the requirements outlined in the SAP Skills:Working knowledge and experience with bio statistical analysis and SAS programming. Excellent oral and written communication skills in English are a must. Prior work experience in epidemiology, health economic and outcome research, or clinical research area is a plus. Specific experience and understanding of outcomes research, drug development is an asset Familiarity with observational databases desirable; database examples US medical and pharmacy claims databases (e.g. MarketScan) US medical record databases (e.g. GE Healthcare) US government public use databases (e.g. NHANES, MEPS) MS or Ph.D. in Statistics or related fieldMinimum 5-year experience  in pharmaceutical research or equivalent  Senior Clinical Data Manager-Perform DM activities inhouse: protocol review, CRF development, database set up activities, data validation process (including manual data review of listings), SAE reconciliation, managing local laboratory and external labs and database lock. -Perform Project Management : represent DM on clinical teams, coordinate deliverables by other functions and/or CRO as necessary to achieve DM deliverables. -Coordinate with Programming team to provide support to the data review and safety updates (coordinate generation of data review listings, data retrieval to support data review and analysis, SDTM,) -Coordinate CRO data validation activities (coordinate data transfer specs, data reconciliation, query generation and resolution, -Participate in the development and implementation of department standards and documents, and other data management, departmental activities as needed. Minimum 5 years experience in Data Management with some experience in managing projects, project teams Experience in handling local labs, external data Experience in managing CRO, global team Experience with In-Form or other EDC software is desirable however, should have some experience in supporting Oncology studies Ideal candidate possesses above description, but also the ability to be independent, ability to sort critical issues that should be escalated to superior, and ability to propose sensible solutions. Clinical Project Manager:*Please note that this is the same type of position as previous order #449423 in terms of the job description and group. Position Description: The role of the Clinical Projects Manager (CPM) is to plan, execute, and finalize strategic pipeline projects according to strict deadlines and within budget. This includes acquiring resources and coordinating the efforts of medical team members and third-party contractors or consultants in order to deliver and report all projects according to plan. The CPM will also help define project objectives and oversee quality control throughout their life cycle. Overall Expectations: � Interpolate medical strategies into actionable steps of action and ensure successful execution through collaboration with an integrated medical team that includes physicians, pharmacists, data analysts, scientists, and external experts. � Capture key customer insights and integrate into recommendations for internal stakeholders in order to affect research & development milestones � Understand global health care nuances and behavioral drivers � Effectively represent the team�s medical activities and value to key stakeholders Responsibilities: � Manage project development from beginning to end. � Define project scope, goals and deliverables that support department goals in collaboration with senior management and stakeholders. � Develop project plans and associated communications documents. � Effectively communicate project expectations to team members and stakeholders in a timely and clear fashion. � Liaise with project stakeholders on an ongoing basis. � Estimate the resources and participants needed to achieve project goals. � Draft and submit budget proposals, and recommend subsequent budget changes where necessary. � Determine and assess need for additional staff and/or consultants and make the appropriate recommendations if necessary during project cycle. � Set and continually manage project expectations with team members and other stakeholders. � Delegate tasks and responsibilities to appropriate personnel. � Help identify and resolve issues and conflicts within the project team. � Identify and manage project dependencies and critical path. � Plan and schedule project timelines and milestones using appropriate tools. � Track project milestones and deliverables. � Develop and deliver progress reports, proposals, requirements documentation, and presentations. � Determine the frequency and content of status reports from the project team analyze results, and troubleshoot problem areas. � Proactively manage changes in project scope, identify potential crises, and devise contingency plans. � Define project success criteria and disseminate them to involved parties throughout project life cycle. � Coach, mentor, motivate and supervise project team members and contractors, and influence them to take positive action and accountability for their assigned work. � Build, develop, and grow any business relationships vital to the success of the project(s). � Conduct project post mortems and create a recommendations report in order to identify successful and unsuccessful project elements. � Develop best practices and tools for project execution and management. Work Conditions: � Overtime may be required in order to meet project deadlines. � Dexterity of hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and other devices and objects. � Physically able to participate in training sessions, presentations, and meetings. � Some travel may be required for the purpose of meeting with clients, stakeholders, or off-site personnel/management.Position RequirementsMBA and or MPH Experience in pharmaceutical industry. Certifications and strong familiarity with project management software Solid working knowledge of current Internet technologies Demonstrated experience in personnel management. Technically competent with administrative software programs, such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc. Experience at working both independently and in a team-oriented, collaborative environment is essential. Can conform to shifting priorities, demands and timelines through analytical and problem-solving capabilities. Reacts to project adjustments and alterations promptly and efficiently. Flexible during times of change. Ability to read communication styles of team members and contractors who come from a broad spectrum of disciplines. Persuasive, encouraging, and motivating. Ability to elicit cooperation from a wide variety of sources, including upper management, clients, and other departments. Ability to defuse tension among project team, should it arise. Ability to bring project to successful completion through political sensitivity. Strong written and oral communication skills. Strong interpersonal skills. Adept at conducting research into project-related issues and products. Must be able to learn, understand, and apply new technologies. Customer service skills an asset. Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment is crucial. Work ConditionsOvertime may be required in order to meet project deadlines. Sitting for extended periods of time. Dexterity of hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and other devices and objects. Physically able to participate in training sessions, presentations, and meetings. Some travel may be required for the purpose of meeting with clients, stakeholders, or off-site personnel/management. Requirements:MBA or MPH. Experience in pharmaceutical industry mandatory. ",SAS/Statistician/remote,"Full Time, Employee","Warren, NJ 07059",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/sas-statistician-remote-outcome-research-clinical-data-manager-clinical-project-manager-job-warren-nj-us-169488958.aspx?mescoid=1500154001001&jobPosition=12,"80,000.00 - 220,000.00 $ /year",Biotech/R&D/Science,34b986d41430107a1fa764b434f55f2c
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:06:56:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Work with various departments involved in the daily Cash processes and the Supervisor of Cash Management to ensure that all areas of communication are open between all respective areas. Assist other departments in procedure and system process changes in order to improve process. Adhere to all SSAE16 controls and insure that the controls are met within company policy and procedures. Ability to work cooperatively with others to identify, recommend and implement opportunities for increased efficiency in the Cash Management Processing unit. Process payments as they are received daily to ensure timely processing and balancing procedures. Ensure KPI and Regulatory compliance. Able to work flexible hours including mandatory overtime when required and extended hours for End of Month processing. Provide back-up coverage for leads as needed High school diploma or equivalent. 5 years mortgage banking, cashiering, and bookkeeping. Minimum of 1 to 3 year experience in the mortgage environment. Three to five years of experience as a system liaison. Must be computer literate with strong interpersonal and organizational skills. Experience working with MSP (mortgage servicing platform)",Payment Processor Job in Miami,Full Time,Location:,Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/payment-processor-job-miami-fl-us-169470730.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=5,,Biotech/R&D/Science,90d00b7106540a88bd5c4b8b6ab1736a
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:06:57:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ke`aki Technologies, LLC, headquartered in Honolulu, Hawaii, is a Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO) owned business.  A premier government services company, Ke`aki Technologies, LLC, headquartered in Honolulu, Hawaii, is a Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO) owned business.  A premier government services company, Ke`aki Technologies offers a full spectrum of solutions that improve the performance and operational effectiveness of our government and Department of Defense customers. Our mission synchronized solutions are designed to deliver exactly what our customers need, when they need it. From base and range operations to biomedical defense support to telecommunications and IT services, we deliver the exact talent, tools and technologies needed to meet mission requirements.  Ke`aki Technologies has an opportunity for and Epidemiologist to work in the Health Analysis division of our Navy Marine Corp Public Health Center (NMCPHC) contract in Portsmouth, VA. JOB DESRCIPTION:·         The selected Epidemiologist will perform a broad and complex range of investigative and analytical epidemiologic activities related to the surveillance, detection, and prevention of diseases and injuries among DoD beneficiaries.·         Successful candidates will be responsible for coordinating and facilitating conducting routine and non-routine epidemiologic evaluations between teams of professional and support personnel.·         Epidemiologists are responsible for collecting, analyzing and interpreting public health-related data, policies and reports.·         Apply principles of evidence-based public health, disease surveillance, medical terminology, and biostatistics to datasets.·         Translate data analysis results into actionable information and develop comprehensive, population-based approaches to healthcare delivery and health improvement for DoD beneficiaries.·         Develop and design methods of collecting, analyzing, and disseminating data and apply knowledge of program processes and methods for prevention, intervention, and control of diseases of public health importance.  QUALIFICATIONS:Degree/Education/Certification Requirements:·         Master of Science degree in Epidemiology - with at least 15 credit hours in basic and advanced biostatistics courses. OR·         Master's degree in Public Health  - with at least 30 credit hours in courses in epidemiology and biostatistics may substitute for the epidemiology degree requirement.  Required Skills and Experience:·         5+ years of work experience in the field of epidemiology is required for this position. Post-Masters degree research may be substituted for experience on a one-for-one basis.·         Ability to coordinate and facilitate functions of cross-functional teams of professional and support personnel in conducting routine and non ‐ routine epidemiologic evaluations.·         Demonstrated skills in written and oral communication.·         Computerized database management and statistical software program skills, including SAS required. Desired Experience:·         Experience with DATA Step Processing, SQL Processing, SAS Macro Language, SAS/STAT, SAS/GRAPH, CDISC Standards, Data Management with Large Datasets (ETL).·         SAS Certified Clinical Trials Programmer Using SAS 9, SAS Certified Advanced Programmer for SAS 9, SAS Certified Base Programmer for SAS 9. CLEARANCE REQUIREMENT:·         Must current possess an Active DoD Secret Clearance.Ke`aki Technologies LLC is a fast growing government service provider.  Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid vacation and sick time; and 10 paid holidays. For additional information on Ke`aki Technologies, LLC, please visit  www.keakitech.com . We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer of individuals with disabilities and veterans.  We are proud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin or disability status.  If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click  here  to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees.",Epidemiologist - Health Analysis Job in Portsmouth,"Full Time, Employee","Portsmouth, VA 23708",,http://jobview.monster.com/epidemiologist-health-analysis-job-portsmouth-va-us-169383863.aspx?mescoid=1900253001001&jobPosition=20,"70,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Biotech/R&D/Science,9ef904b30ffbdb1098bdd3935ec5c9cf
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:07:25:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chairman Assistant  St. Paul Plant Salt High-Tech USA Group LLC is looking for a Chairman Assistant to help the Chairman in both day-to-day personal and business related tasks. Responsibilities:·         Draft correspondences and other formal documents·         Plan and schedule appointments and events·         Greet and assist onsite guests·         Answer inbound telephone calls·         Develop and implement organized filing systems·         Communicate with government and corporation. ·         Perform all other office tasksRequirements:·         Strong computer skills & Microsoft programs (Word, Excel, Outlook.) ·         Excellent written and verbal communication skills in both English and Chinese Mandarin·         Flexible work hours & able to travel to China and/or Other States. ·         A minimum of 3 year in office assistant roles in United States.·         Import Logistics experience is a plus.Job Type: Part-timeJob Location:·         Imperial County, California.Required education:·         Bachelor degree or equivalent in United States. ·         4 years Bachelor degree in China.·         3 years plus formal university education in China.  ",Monster,,"Chairman Assistant  St. Paul Plant Salt High-Tech USA Group LLC is looking for a Chairman Assistant to help the Chairman in both day-to-day personal and business related tasks. Responsibilities:·         Draft correspondences and other formal documents·         Plan and schedule appointments and events·         Greet and assist onsite guests·         Answer inbound telephone calls·         Develop and implement organized filing systems·         Communicate with government and corporation. ·         Perform all other office tasksRequirements:·         Strong computer skills & Microsoft programs (Word, Excel, Outlook.) ·         Excellent written and verbal communication skills in both English and Chinese Mandarin·         Flexible work hours & able to travel to China and/or Other States. ·         A minimum of 3 year in office assistant roles in United States.·         Import Logistics experience is a plus.Job Type: Part-timeJob Location:·         Imperial County, California.Required education:·         Bachelor degree or equivalent in United States. ·         4 years Bachelor degree in China.·         3 years plus formal university education in China.  ",,http://jobview.monster.com/chairman-assistant-job-imperial-ca-us-169435534.aspx?mescoid=1101114002005&jobPosition=17,,,413820186e19730ed97d254eef6c8bed
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:07:35:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"TechData is looking for SAS programmer with JReview, Biostatistician (Some positions are remote), Statistical Programmer (Some positions can be telecommuting), CDISC programmer, Sr. Clinical Data Manager, Medical Writer, Sr. Clinical Study Manager, Sr. Clinical Outsourcing Consultant, Senior Medical Data Specialist/Medical Dictionary Coding for our pharmaceutical clients in multiple locations inNorthern NJ. We also have similar positions in MA, MD, NC, PA, and CA.  Please see below requirements and send your resume to: John.zhang@techdataservice.com. TechData is a leading provider for temporary and permanent positions in the pharmaceutical industry. TechData offers very competitive pay rate and benefits. Sr. SAS programmer with JreviewSr. SAS Programmer Analyst (JReview/listings) Perform SAS programming to provide data review complex listings/reports to support Data Management, Medical Coding, and other areas of Clinical functions for Oncology trials. Develop programs & graphs in JReview for easier data review and visualization. Develop programs for patient profiles and ad hoc reports to support the clinical teams for Oncology trials. Design and develop SAS macros, applications, and other utilities to expedite SAS programming activities and usage by the Oncology Data Management and other areas of Clinical for data review. Develop and maintain the programs/tools including testing and organizing the SAS datasets, SAS programs and related documentation. Ensure all programming activities and processes performed are conducted according to standard operating procedures and good programming skills. Qualifications: Strong knowledge of JReview and SAS programming skills required in Windows and UNIX environment, with proficiency in Programming in JReview, Graph, Dashboard, SAS/Base, SAS Macros, SAS Graph, SAS/SQL. 5-7 years of experience in programming with clinical trial data and preparing programming and test documentation. Extensive experience of handling external data, such as lab data, PK, and imaging data. Experience of developing programs using JReview. Good understanding of standards specific to clinical trials such as CDISC, SDTM, MedDRA, WHODRUG. Good understanding of relational databases such as ORACLE, Knowledge of the EDC system, InForm, and underlying data structure is a plus. Knowledge of data management process, good understanding of data cleaning process. Strong problem solving skills Able to work independently and a team player, good organizational and time management skills. Capable of communicating technical concepts Good understanding of system development life cycles, GCP, and related regulatory guidelines. Biostatistician Position (2 on site and 2 remote)• Support clinical trial design and protocol concept sheet development • Develop protocols especially for statistical section • Participate study related activities and provide statistical support such as safety review, interim analyses for Phase II and III oncology studies, etc. • Develop statistical analysis plan (SAP), create TLG template and derived analysis datasets specification, perform QC of TLG. • Contribute to CRF development and review edit check specification • Develop Data Monitoring Committee Charter and create mocked TLG for interim review • Review Independent Radiology Review Committee Charter and data transfer plan • Review CSR QUALIFICATIONS: • At least 4 years clinical trial experience (oncology experience preferred) with Ph.D. in statistics • Familiar with oncology trial design and survival analysis • Good communication skill • Excellent programming skill in SAS • Familiar with statistical software such as East, nQuery, Splus and others. • Team work attitude • Able to handle multiple projects concurrently   Sr. Statistical/SAS Programmer (Some position can be telecommuting):To support the Biostatistics team by carrying out and overseeing programming activities of statistical programmers and external vendors (as required), and to ensure timely and accurate programming and validation activities for clinical studies. Contributes to the overall efficiency and best practice running of the Biostatistics group, demonstrating the ability to work efficiently and to a high standard within a clinical team environment. Main duties/responsibilities: 1. Providing statistical programming and validation support for clinical study reports, overseeing programming activities by external vendors (e.g., CROs) when necessary and coordinating programming activities among the study programmers to achieve timely progress in the following areas: analysis datasets, statistical tables, figures, listings, Integrated Summaries of Safety (ISS), Integrated Summaries of Efficacy (ISE), electronic submissions and other internal and external requests (e.g., publications). Accessing and converting data to SAS from Database management system and PC file formats (e.g., MS Excel, text files). Working with external vendors in order to develop or monitor the content and structure of SAS data sets. 2. Developing and maintaining SOPs, SWPs and other related technical documents, providing input to the Database and CRF Development, creating edit check programs and providing feedback to the Data Management. Providing input in developing statistical analysis plans, specifications of analysis datasets, validation plans, and other related documents. Determining and researching SAS software upgrades and related systems and addressing maintenance issues. 3. Managing and developing team, maintaining standards for programming activities, and guiding/coaching Statistical programmers. 4. Working independently to accomplish tasks and goals defined by supervisor. Attending required training and meetings and bringing in new ideas to improve the programming process. * Responsibilities weighting may change significantly based on the incumbent and their assigned areas of responsibility. Qualifications and education required: • Minimum of Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related science discipline. Masters preferred. Experience required: • Minimum 5 years experience in SAS programming for phase I-IV clinical trials in a pharmaceutical/CRO environment. 7+ years experience preferred. • Some project experience in a pharmaceutical/CRO programming environment or demonstrated significant leadership of SAS programming activities in a clinical pharmaceutical/CRO environment. Skills and aptitude required: • Experience using SAS-Base, MACRO, STAT, GRAPH, ACCESS, MS Office. • Proven experience with Unix and Windows operating systems. • Understanding of the software development life cycle. • Understanding of FDA guidelines. • Good organization, time management and attention to detail skills needed to work in a stressful environment under tight deadlines while maintaining focus on details and quality. • Applies good judgment and demonstrates initiative to resolve issues. • Strong verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills needed to work effectively in a team environment, managing that team as required.   Sr. Clinical Study ManagerJOB DESCRIPTION: Identify and select high-quality clinical vendors in conjunction with the appropriate team members by interviewing and assessing a vendor’s skill set. Work with the contracting/budgeting team to ensure that vendor responsibilities and payment terms are clearly defined. Manage and effect oversight of assigned clinical vendors and functional service providers to ensure data integrity and adherence with regulatory requirements. Assure that team is receiving high quality, on time deliverables from internal and external vendors. Collaborate with other team members to coordinate the development and finalization of key study documents including protocols, case reports forms, informed consent documents, study management plans and final clinical study reports. Manage multiple projects and lead multiple study teams simultaneously. Monitor studies against defined milestones and timelines to assure that all deliverables are met. Facilitate the development and implementation of remedial activities when necessary. Attend weekly teleconference with CRO (if applicable). Assume monitoring, co-monitoring responsibilities as needed. Communicate with Principle Investigator, Study Co-Coordinator, and/ CRO (if applicable) to proactively recognize problem situations and work with other team members as required to resolve issues Manage the publication process in conjunction with the publications team to assure that submission timelines are met. Monitor and report clinical trial status using standard and adhoc review & reporting procedures and identify issues that affect functions. Ensure that each function is accountable for their deliverables. In collaboration with Project Management and utilizing various tracking mechanisms, manage clinical trial project milestones and budget. Proactively identify issues and escalate to appropriate managers. REQUIREMENTS: At least 7 years of experience in the management of clinical trials, significant knowledge of overall clinical drug development and general clinical research operations. Pharma industry a MUST – Open to some CRO but pharma required ONCOLOGY EXPERIENCE REQUIRED. Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously with strong organizational and planning skills. Well-developed analytical and problem solving skills. Communicates issues to Director with action plans for resolution. Knowledgeable in all required regulatory and compliance standards and guidelines including ICH-GCP. Ability to effectively work with teams and promote collaborations. Exceptional interpersonal skills including the ability to influence negotiate and resolve conflicts. Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact with all levels of management within the organization and to external business contacts. Experience using the Inform database, PowerPoint and Excel software. Independent judgment and decision making skills with respect to functional responsibilities. Innovative and motivated in optimizing clinical operations processes to meet deliverables. Minimum BS or BA in related field; focusing on biological science or nursing preferred or equivalent. Advanced Degree preferred.  Sr. Clinical Outsourcing Consultant (Sr. Manager Level) Support internal customers in the development of outsourcing requirements for Phase I-IV global clinical trials. Lead and support the qualification and evaluation process for new service providers. Lead the process of Request for Proposal (RFP) development from service provider selection through final contract execution. Chair proposal review meetings, and coordinate all follow-up activities with service providers during the evaluation and selection process. Evaluation includes cost analysis, capability assessment, and overall alignment of services with project goals. Manage the contracting process including preparation, finalization, and administration of CDAs, MSAs, Service Agreements, Work Orders, Change Orders, and Amendments. Coordinate development of service requirements, e.g., statement-of-work, negotiate budgets and payment schedules using costing tools as necessary. Foster clear, consistent and open collaboration across extended and service provider teams. Engage in service provider relationship and performance management. Support project teams in the resolution of service provider performance issues. Implement, integrate, and maintain department central repository databases for contract tracking purposes, workload management, and metrics tracking. Participate in continuous improvement initiatives and develop and implement tools and processes to achieve goals. Maintain time and work load tracking. Perform assigned duties and other work related to this position as a Sr. Clinical Outsourcing Consultant. WORK ENVIRONMENT Fast paced environment Collaborative Business appropriate attire flex-hours REQUIREMENTS: -BA/BS in scientific or business discipline - Minimum of 5 years of Clinical Outsourcing experience in the Bio/pharma industry/CRO environment. - Ideal candidate will be adept in outsourcing all clinical functional areas (e.g. site start-up, global monitoring, regulatory, study file management, safety, clinical data management, statistics, and clinical reporting) and across a varied service provider base (e.g. CRO, labs, ECGs, imaging and ePRO). -Excellent business/financial acumen, budget negotiation skills and understanding of the factors affecting the finances and or operations of service providers. -Excellent communication skills, able to foster and leverage professional relationships and support and influence change at all levels of an organization -Ability to identify and solve complex contractual, process and operational business challenges -Demonstrates a customer and team focus -Demonstrated proficiency in MS Office Suite.  Senior Medical Data Specialist/Medical Dictionary CodingResponsible for the selection and review of appropriate codes of reported terms in clinical trials not limited to adverse events, medical history and medications. Ensures that the term is clear, appropriate and complete as per investigator’s entry on the CRF otherwise, he/she is responsible for the coding query. Abstracts all necessary information from other CRF pages for concept coding if necessary. Assigns codes using MedDRA and WHODD terminologies, which most accurately describe each panel according to established coding guidelines and conventions. Performs reconciliation of safety report and clinical patient profile. Post queries for relevant information from safety report to be added in the clinical database. May require narrative writing for clinical data review profile. Quantitative analysis – Performs a comprehensive review for the all the reported and coded terms. To assure the presence of all coding targets not limited to LLT, PT and SOC and Trade name, Preferred Name ATC 2 and ATC 4 and their respective dictionary versions. Completes brief description of clinical cases for clinical data review utilizing the autogenerated narratives. Qualitative analysis – Evaluates the record for coding consistency and adequacy. Ensures that the selected codes accurately reflect the term as provided by the investigator. Reviews the codes for ICH compliance and adherence to coding guidelines and conventions. Ensures all safety reports are reconciled in the clinical database. Performs all duties according to company policy and regulations and guidance. Performs other duties assigned by the Director or Sr. Manager. No travel required. QUALIFICATIONS: - Graduate of adequate health care related course with commensurate experience in use of dictionaries in Clinical trial setting and have performed clinical data review. - Minimum of 5 years coding experience required and minimum 2 years of AE/SAE data review. - Strong knowledge of ICH guideline, or adequate background and have attended seminars for MEdDRA and WHODD use - Knowledge of Central coding, Ds Navigator, INFORM a plus - Proficiency on all related regulations, GCP, and Good Clinical DM Practice - Computer proficiency and knowledge of medical terminology - Expertise on use of Excel - Strong oral and written communication skills Medical  WriterWork directly with clinical study teams, the Oncology medical writing teams, regulatory affairs personnel, and the publishing group in the preparation of scientifically valid regulatory documents. Responsibilities include prepare regulatory documents on behalf of in accordance with the ICH guidelines, international regulations, standards and processes, and the Writing Style Guide as applicable. Documents include but are not limited to: Protocols and protocol amendments, clinical study reports, Investigator brochures, and submission documents. Participate in project team meetings to provide input regarding deliverables, timelines, and processes. Responsible for managing the document review process. Route documents for approval. The medical writer should be familiar with ICH guidelines and the current AMA Style Manual. The writer will be expected to format and manage long documents with multiple review cycles and tight deadlines. Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in life sciences, RN, Master's degree in life sciences, PharmD or PhD preferred. Would prefer full time onsite 5 days a week, however we will accept someone to work remotely but must work 2-3 days minimum onsite. Excellent writing skills, meticulous attention to detail, proficiency using an electronic document management system, and strong analytical ability to interpret clinical data. Experience: 5+ years’ writing experience in the pharmaceutical industry. Please take note this is a FULL time 40 hour work week. We are looking for someone with experience working as a MW at a major Pharma. Prior experience in oncology is a plus. The most important requirement is the ability to independently write regulatory documents in collaboration with the various members of study team.  Sr. Clinical Data Manager Clinical Data Manager, Neuroscience some supervision, perform all data management functions to ensure timely and quality database lock for Neuroscience projects. Perform data management activities for studies conducted in-house, oversee activities of on-shote or off-shore CRO handling outsourced projects (protocol review, CRF development, database set-up activities, data validation process; medical coding, SAE reconciliation, etc...). Participate in the development of DM SOPs, Standard Working Practices, and other data management related documents. Minimal travel required. Bachelor degree or above in scientific or related field; commensurate experience in Data Management may be considered. Minimum of 2 years Data Management experience required. Strong knowledge of EDC-InForm required (others EDC experience may be considered under special circumstances). Knowledge of Clintrial, I-Review a plus. Proficiency on all related regulations, GCP, and Good Clinical DM Practice. Computer proficiency and knowledge of medical terminology. Project management skills required. Strong oral and written communication skills. Oversee and assume responsibility for all Data Management work study start up, conduct and closure tasks. In addition, consultants will develop external transfer specs, data cleaning activities and assist with database closure activities. Assist with start up and UAT activities for new studies for Neuroscience",SAS/Statistician,"Full Time, Employee","Westwood, NJ 07677",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/sas-statistician-jreview-sdtm-data-manager-study-manager-dictionary-coding-medical-writer-job-westwood-nj-us-169445311.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=17,"80,000.00 - 220,000.00 $ /year",Biotech/R&D/Science,f0da4883be639613135202b06b85bf1c
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:07:47:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regulatory Affairs SpecialistPiper Clinical Solutions is seeking an Regulatory Affairs Specialist to work as part of a medical devices company in Raleigh / Durham / Chapel Hill area.Qualifications for the Regulatory Affairs SpecialistThe Regulatory Affairs Specialist will be responsible for assisting regulatory affairs functions through interfacing with various departments to organize documentation, providing support to strategic manufacturing, and assisting in producing global medical device submissions consistent with governing SOPsThe ideal Regulatory Affairs Specialist will have 3-5 years’ experience in a related regulatory industry and have knowledge of electronic document management systems Any experience with domestic and international medical device regulations is a huge plus Requirements for the Regulatory Affairs Specialist include the following: 3+ years’ experience in a regulatory environment Knowledge of electronic document management systems Bachelor’s degree in Life Sciences or related fieldUnderstanding of domestic and international medical device regulations a huge plus Please send resumes to kfarrington@pipercompanies.com  ",Regulatory Affairs Specialist Job in Durham,"Full Time, Employee","Durham, NC 27703",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/regulatory-affairs-specialist-job-durham-nc-us-169437204.aspx?mescoid=1300079001001&jobPosition=5,,Biotech/R&D/Science,e49b11104ae4d97323f3423d4f9b8cf2
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:07:48:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHENEGA HEALTHCARE SERVICES, LLC is currently seeking 3 Biomedical Research Scientists. One requires a Bachelors degree, one a Masters' and one a PHD. Summary: The Biomedical Research Scientist is required to support the Dental and Trauma Research Directorate of the USAISR. This positions are responsible for assisting with Biofilms and Wounding Healing research. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position)· Key Task 1 - Isolate and characterize various sources of stem cells or progenitors which include bone marrow-derived stem cells and other adult mesenchymal stem cells. Determine the effect of these stem cells on wound healing and improvement of scar compliance. Perform molecular and biochemical analysis of differentiated cells and transplanted bioengineered tissue/scaffolds.· Key Task 2 - Formulate antimicrobial peptide KSL-W for use in wounds. Analyze release kinetics of the molecules invitro and in wounds. Determine the antimicrobial activity of formulated products invitro and in wounds.· Key Task 3-Perform sterile surgical procedures on large and small animals establishing models including a porcine biofilm wound infection model and a deep partial thickness animal model.· Key Task 4 - Provide daily assessment on animals and provide analgesics, pre and post operative care as directed in protocol. · Key Task 5 - Characterize biofilms formed by mono- or mixed-species war wound pathogens both invitro and invivo. Determine the effects of different anti-biofilm agents in inhibiting biofilm growth invitro and invivo. Develop molecular constructs to study the physiology of developing mono- and mixed-species biofilms· Key Task 6 - Performs imaging procedures to assess injury and healing of bone. Takes digital photographs and radiographs of animals and tissue samples. Perform computer tomography assessment on tissues. Maintain and organize digital archive of images and photomicrographs. · Key Task 7 - Prepare media buffers and reagents at specified concentrations. Ensures that reagents and supplies are not outdated. Separates serum from whole blood and prepares samples o blood and tissue for clinical history analyses, histology and /or biomechanical testing. Track and maintain inventory of tissue samples.· Key Task 8 - Develop scaffolds suitable for invivo grafting for the delivery of exogeneous growth factors and stem cells or differentiated cells of the tissue type to improved craniofacial soft and hard tissue defects due to traumatic injuries. · Key Task 9-Research and write scientific manuscripts & publish results in peer-reviewed journals. Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.) A minimum of one (1) year experience with research assays and ability to complete various stem cell or progenirots which include bone marrow stem cells is preferred.· Familiarity with IRB and research protocols on Humans is preferred. Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Native preference under PL 93-638. We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Biomedical Research Scientist Job in Fort Sam Houston,Full Time,"Fort Sam Houston, TX",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/biomedical-research-scientist-job-fort-sam-houston-tx-us-169467861.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7bb1212067e96bff0892be6dc691b58c
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:08:59:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seattle GeneticsSeattle Genetics is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.Job ID 1763Location: Bothell, WashingtonJob Code: 1606SN-01 #LI-JW1# of Openings: 1Description: Summary:We are seeking an experienced professional with a broad background in pharmaceutical quality to manage small molecule projects within Quality Control. This position is responsible for overseeing the quality of small molecules manufactured by contract facilities and will report to the Director of Quality Control.Responsibilities:The ideal candidate will be responsible for representing Quality Control at Seattle Genetics and contract facilities to support early phase development to commercial management of novel small molecule materials and products. This position will require experience in several quality areas such as analytical testing and review, developing specifications, authoring stability documents, using quality systems (change request, deviations, CAPA, OOS, document management) and interpreting regulations, and guidance documents. The position will require outstanding collaboration skills in order to work through projects and issues internally and with contract facilities. The candidate must have strong familiarity with small molecule synthetic and analytical chemistry as investigations, study design and report-writing will require this. This position will manage several projects which require excellent time management. Qualifications: BS in science (chemistry or biology focus preferred) Experience reviewing analytical data Knowledge of synthetic chemistry Ability to keep order of multiple projects/tasks Familiarity with regulatory filings like IND and BLA Familiarity with Quality guidance documents (ICH, CFR, USP, general guidance) Excellent verbal communication skills Excellent written communication skills (SOPs, professional reports, emails) Broad experience with Microsoft Office products Desired: Stability study experience (drafting/reviewing/managing) Project management experience Experience testing in a pharmaceutical QC lab (small molecule testing) Notes: Some domestic and international travel is expected. PI94765280Apply Here",QC Scientist Job in Bothell,,"Seattle GeneticsSeattle Genetics is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applications will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability status.Job ID 1763Location: Bothell, WashingtonJob Code: 1606SN-01 #LI-JW1# of Openings: 1Description: Summary:We are seeking an experienced professional with a broad background in pharmaceutical quality to manage small molecule projects within Quality Control. This position is responsible for overseeing the quality of small molecules manufactured by contract facilities and will report to the Director of Quality Control.Responsibilities:The ideal candidate will be responsible for representing Quality Control at Seattle Genetics and contract facilities to support early phase development to commercial management of novel small molecule materials and products. This position will require experience in several quality areas such as analytical testing and review, developing specifications, authoring stability documents, using quality systems (change request, deviations, CAPA, OOS, document management) and interpreting regulations, and guidance documents. The position will require outstanding collaboration skills in order to work through projects and issues internally and with contract facilities. The candidate must have strong familiarity with small molecule synthetic and analytical chemistry as investigations, study design and report-writing will require this. This position will manage several projects which require excellent time management. Qualifications: BS in science (chemistry or biology focus preferred) Experience reviewing analytical data Knowledge of synthetic chemistry Ability to keep order of multiple projects/tasks Familiarity with regulatory filings like IND and BLA Familiarity with Quality guidance documents (ICH, CFR, USP, general guidance) Excellent verbal communication skills Excellent written communication skills (SOPs, professional reports, emails) Broad experience with Microsoft Office products Desired: Stability study experience (drafting/reviewing/managing) Project management experience Experience testing in a pharmaceutical QC lab (small molecule testing) Notes: Some domestic and international travel is expected. PI94765280Apply Here",,http://jobview.monster.com/qc-scientist-job-bothell-wa-us-169443510.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=3,,,bd13d1ecd03967892efeddd5a61e58c6
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:09:01:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is hiring a Scientific Associate to support downstream manufacturing projects including developing purification processes, driving continuous improvements, and providing commercial support for influenza vaccines. The Scientific Associate will also have the opportunity to:Partner with diverse team members from various functions, countries and members at various levels in the organization.Solve complex problems using analytical thinking gained through formal education and previous roles.Collaboratively design and execute small scale experiments to characterize and define bioprocess steps.Independently operate small scale bioprocess equipment including TFF, NFF, centrifugation, and column chromatography systems.Be able to work and thrive under tight deadlines on projects of varying size, demonstrating awareness of broader project objectives.Perform in-process analytics to characterize/quantify vaccine antigens and contaminants.Understand and interpret experimental data and results to support decisions and understanding of purification processes.Understand and apply bioprocess scale-up strategies.Communicate (present, write-up in technical documents, etc.) results to colleagues and project teams.Function effectively as a core team member.Ideal Candidate:BS degree in Life ScienceKnowledge of bioprocess unit operations (e.g. bioreactors, chromatography, filtration) and engineering scaling principlesHands on experience with AKTA chromatography and TFF systems a plusKnowledge of GMPs preferredAbility to work with cross functional teamsStrong communication skills, technical writing ability, and good attention to detailFor consideration, apply today!Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Scientific Associate Job in Raleigh,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Scientific Associate,"Raleigh, NC 27607",http://jobview.monster.com/scientific-associate-job-raleigh-nc-us-169428163.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,Biotech/R&D/Science,26b3a75941cac203e628559118089689
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:09:46:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Laulima Government Solutions, LLC, is a Native Hawaiian Organization (NHO) owned business. A premier government services company, Laulima Government Solutions, LLC offers a full spectrum of solutions that improve the performance and operational effectiveness of our government and Department of Defense customers. Our mission synchronized solutions are designed to deliver exactly what our customers need, when they need it. From base and range operations to biomedical defense support to telecommunications and IT services, we deliver the exact talent, tools and technologies needed to meet mission requirements.  Laulima Government Solutions is looking for an IACUC Coordinator to provide IACUC support and consultative services to perform or support IACUC activities for USDA and PHS regulated animal studies and activities, including audits, inspections, document reviews, and regulatory training for the Regulated Activities Division on our United States Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases (USAMRIID) contract at Fort Detrick, Maryland. The IACUC Coordinator shall serve as the recorder for the IACUC minutes, communicate with investigators, monitor training, coordinate proposal and addenda review, and prepare reports and documentation of IACUC activities.  DUTIES INCLUDE: ·         Preparing quarterly workload reports, performing grant versus animal protocol comparisons, reviewing publications, entering data in the IACUC Protocol Database, filing, assigning and documenting IACUC-specific training in RIID Train and other databases.·         Work with current IACUC functions as well as the federal laws, regulations, policies, and guidelines governing animal care and use in the United States and the DOD in order to complete tasks.·         Become familiar with USAMRIID IACUC animal care and use policies, SOPs, and procedures.·         Perform regulatory tasks based on these animal care and use SOPs, as well as federal and DOD regulations, guidelines, and policies. Apply regulations, policies, and guidelines to IACUC tasks.·         Review animal research proposals and addenda for completeness prior to and after committee review.·         Review all rodent research proposals and addenda to ensure appropriate information, coordination, signature, and proper format prior to IACUC review. ·         Review revised animal use proposals to ensure that appropriate changes were made IAW the revisions requested by the IACUC.  Notify the IACUC Chair of review results within 7 days of receipt of revised rodent proposals.·         Review technical reports, grants, presentations, and manuscripts to ensure they meet all regulations and requirements for publication.  Review submitted reports, grants, publications and presentations for consistency with approved rodent protocols.  Submit to IACUC Chair for review and signature within 5 business days of receipt.·         Communicate with internal and external customers – oral and written.  Prepare written correspondence in accordance with USAMRIID and Army policies.  Send notification of meetings and meeting material to PIs and IACUC members 5 business days before IACUC subcommittee meeting date.·         Serve as an IACUC recorder and prepare IACUC correspondence/reports.  Take minutes during·         IACUC meetings.  Prepare revision memos to PIs.  Prepare Commander approval memos for proposals and PIs.·         Prepare addenda approval memos for PIs. Serve as the IACUC recorder for DMR subcommittee meetings and prepare revision memos for PIs.  Revision memos should be completed within 7 business days of the meeting date.·         Prepare and provide a memorandum (minutes) to the USAMRIID Commander of all IACUC DMR subcommittee meetings to include review of rodent proposals and other IACUC issues.·         Maintain excel spreadsheets of animal use, animal welfare investigations (AWI), and post approval monitoring (PAM).  Verify number of animals used, training completion, etc.  Track completion of AWI and PAM requirements.·         Perform IACUC database entry and prepare necessary reports based on this data.  These reports include workload reports, DOD Annual Datacall on Animal Use, AAALACi Annual Report, PHS Annual Assurance Report.·         Assist research staff through the animal proposal development process.  Answer customer questions regarding IACUC approval process questions and IACUC policies as needed.·         Review pertinent SOPs for formatting and adherence to USAMRIID SOP requirements.·         Maintain hard copy and electronic files of all regulatory documents.·         Conduct annual review of all rodent animal protocols.·         Schedule meetings and work with the IACUC Chair to select appropriate IACUC members to sit on the committees and review addenda.  IAW the Animal Welfare Regulations, PHS Policy, and DOD Regulations, and based upon guidance from the Chair, select an appropriate IACUC member to serve as a designated reviewer for rodent addenda and select appropriate IACUC members to serve on a designated member review subcommittee for review of rodent proposals.·         Prepare official correspondence for the Commander and Deputy Commander when reporting to OLAW and other regulatory bodies.·         Out-process USAMRIID personnel as needed.·         Format proposals for review by the IACUC.  Electronically send out formatted proposals to the IACUC members prior to IACUC meetings as required by the IACUC SOP.·         Contribute data for the quarterly workload assessment within 10 days of quarter’s end.·         Work with Microsoft Office software, FileMaker, and Adobe Acrobat Professional in order to maintain spreadsheets, prepare correspondence, and perform database entry. REQUIREMENTS: ·         Bachelor’s degree and a minimum of 4 years of related experience. CLEARANCE: ·         A favorable National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI) is required.  Laulima Government Solutions. LLC is a fast growing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid vacation and sick time; and 10 paid holidays. Laulima Government Solutions is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. For additional information on Laulima Government Solutions, LLC, please visit www.laulimags.com. We are an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer of individuals with disabilities and veterans.  We are proud to state that we do not discriminate in employment decisions on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin or disability status.  If you are a person with a disability and you need an accommodation during the application process, please click here to request accommodation. We E-Verify all employees.",IACUC Coordinator Job in Frederick,"Full Time, Employee","Frederick, MD 21702",,http://jobview.monster.com/iacuc-coordinator-job-frederick-md-us-169517946.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,Biotech/R&D/Science,0d538f5615c2aed757cc32415dcfe812
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:09:47:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"PURPOSEThis LCMS Biologics Scientist builds on past experience, skills and personal attributes of an accomplished bioanalytical scientist, and requires the ability to act independently with little or no guidance. The position involves applying analytical skills to assist in the development and implementation of profit-generating biomarker and biotherapeutic assays. An advanced understanding of nano-flow chromatography and modern quadrupole or orbitrap mass spectrometry instrumentation, development/validation of methodology, biological sample preparation, interpreting of data, interacting with clients, and working to objectives/timelines are integral to this position. RESPONSIBILITIES Work under the general guidance of a Scientific Director to develop and validate new bioanalytical approaches pertaining specifically to biomarker and biotherapeutic assays for disease mechanism investigations and support of drug development studies Work with key clients to implement this service in accordance with their expectations Develop methods including sample preparation, chromatography and mass spectrometry approaches for the detection and quantitation of identified biomarker compounds Validate associated methodologies to a fit-for-purpose extent Coordinate application of validated methods to sample analysis Manage bioanalytical data in Watson LIMS Communicate with clients regarding progress on scientific and operational objectives Work with management to set work plans, goals and metrics to build this service Prepare and presents project data and supporting information. Contributes to and reviews technical reports Attends scientific meetings and client visits to promote Q2's LCMS Biologics business Train less experienced scientific co-workers, when necessary, to support growth of LCMS Biologics service Validate methods to regulatory (GLP) standards Oversee the application of the validated methods to routine sample analysis Oversee daily management of intra- and inter-organizational relationships to ensure timely completion of projects in accordance with customer specification Provide frequent communication of project status with clients Prepare and make external presentations of Q2's LCMS Biologics capabilities to clients and prospective clients Apply analytical skills to assist in the development and implementation of profit-generating assays REQUIRED KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES Understanding of chromatography and mass spectrometry instrumentation Understanding of all routine laboratory procedures Understanding of development/validation of methodology Understanding of wet-laboratory sample extraction Ability to interact with clients, and work to objectives/timelines Excellent attention to detail and communication skills Ability to maintain clear and efficient method development documentation Ability to provide verbally communicated or draft procedures Advanced understanding of nano-flow chromatography and modern quadrupole or orbitrap mass spectrometry instrumentation, development/validation of methodology, biological sample preparation, interpreting of data Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with coworkers, managers and clientsMINIMUM REQUIRED EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE Bachelor's Degree in Chemistry/Bioanalytical Chemistry or a related field with 7 years' progressively responsible related experience; or equivalent combination of education, training and experience in GLP laboratory environment.  EEO Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Senior Scientist,Full Time Employee,"Ithaca, NY 14850",All,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-scientist-lcms-biologics-job-ithaca-ny-us-169466998.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=11,,Biotech/R&D/Science,591d38113f4c12cb31457de6d232f673
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:09:49:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job BackgroundA leading pharmaceutical company is seeking a 6-month Contract-to-Hire Scientist for their Technology Services Department. The ideal candidate would have a background in pharmaceuticals as well as leading individual and team projects. Having a background in Chemistry as well as Process and/or Packaging is strongly preferred.Job ResponsibilitiesProvides general technical support for production operations and validation testing of production quality systemsCompletes the complex process validation, computer validation, and existing product development projects with minimal supervisionPerforms monitoring, sampling, and testing to validate equipment, systems, and processes per validation protocolsDesigns and prepares experimental laboratory or pilot scale batches and direct the manufacture of production experimental scale batchesServes as Company's representative and/or coordinator for off-site process validation activities including the monitoring/execution of validation batches, technical support for contract manufacturing issues, and audit of contract manufacturers or raw material suppliers Job RequirementsBachelor's degree in Pharmacy, Chemistry, Chemical Engineering, or related life science fieldMinimum of 5 years of experience in product development/manufacturing process/equipment engineering, or process/product formulation in a regulated environmentOr 2 years of experience with a Graduate DegreeFamiliarity with equipment/process government regulations (e.g.cGMPs, NDAs, ANDAs)If interested, please email nelson.cooper@experis.com for consideration.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Scientist - Tech Services Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,Scientist - Tech Services,"Plymouth, MN 55447",http://jobview.monster.com/scientist-tech-services-job-plymouth-mn-us-169393476.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=3,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Biotech/R&D/Science,dee6c23f6c733bb298e9b70e3fa6d005
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:10:12:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate Scientist IMust possess a BS in molecular biology, biochemistry, or related field with at least one to two years of relevant experience. Knowledge of GMP, ISO, and FDA regulations and audits a plus. Familiar with process and test method validations. Excellent communication skills. Shall be able to perform under pressure to meet project deadlines.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Associate Scientist Job in Warren,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Associate Scientist,"Warren, IL 60064",http://jobview.monster.com/associate-scientist-job-warren-il-us-169418869.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=14,20.00 - 23.00 $ /hour,Biotech/R&D/Science,45966ea31921926f0a6b1841fe0e8881
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:10:54:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Control systems engineering company is seeking an Controls Engineer. This is an immediate need in South San Francisco!Responsibilities for the Controls EngineerResponsibilities include industrial control system design, programming, and commissioning. Additional responsibilities include project scheduling and cost control. Troubleshooting skills with extensive hands-on experience programming PLC’s and HMI’s. Strong working knowledge of industrial control system design including instrumentation, data communications, motor controls, and industrial electrical wiring practices required. AutoCAD, Visual Basic, C++, and database programming experience Requirements for the Controls EngineerBS degree in Engineering discipline5 + years of experience as a Control Systems Engineer requiredBenefits for the Controls EngineerStrong benefits!This Job is located in San Francisco, CA -> United States",Controls Engineer - Controls Engineer/HMI/PLC Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94108",,http://jobview.monster.com/controls-engineer-controls-engineer-hmi-plc-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168914087.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=4,"70,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",,b1b1b56aca80370a832f5edded6d81ec
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:10:55:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:CLINICAL RESEARCH COORDINATOR ? Multi-location Medical Facility? Opportunity To Team With Other Researchers? Successful Leadership Team? Great Pay to $42KThere is an immediate need for a CLINICAL RESEARCH COORDINATOR for a multi-location medical facility, with the opportunity to team with other researchers and a successful leadership team. Applicant must be self-directed, able to function independently and have an in-depth understanding of the study protocol. Candidate will be responsible for the daily management of clinical trial activities, coordinating and conducting all aspects of the study and communicating the results to the principal investigators. APPLY TODAY! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1053080 Job Experience:,, Previous research experience requiredExcellent oral and written communication skillsHonest self-starter requiring little direction to achieve desired resultsYears of Experience Required:",CLINICAL RESEARCH COORDINATOR - Multi-location Medical Facility Job in Shreveport,Full Time Employee,"Shreveport, LA 71101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/clinical-research-coordinator-multi-location-medical-facility-job-shreveport-la-us-169485664.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7b1644b6c0bd82e0843a0a692b345e57
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:11:10:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client in the South San Francisco area is looking for a Research Technician to join their team! Research Technician Duties:Responsibilities include supporting computer upgrades (hardware and software) for laboratory equipment, collaborating with IT and equipment users to manage the process.The Assistant Laboratory Manager will act as a single point of contact for resolving computer related issues in a fast-paced environment with tight timelines.The successful candidate will also work closely with the Lab Manager on an as-needed basis to support activities in the purification laboratories following company safety guidelines.These activities include the ordering of lab reagents, support of lab equipment (e.g. inventorying of equipment, working with vendors to perform upgrades etc.) and support of 5S projects in the purification laboratories.Requirements:Associate degree in Biotech or laboratory manager experience.Lean and/or Six Sigma experience/certification is a plus.Familiarity with basic laboratory practices and equipment are highly desirable.Proficiency in working with computers is required.Candidate should be able to work independently, possess strong interpersonal, communication, conflict resolution and organizational skills, and have a strong focus on detail.",Research Technician Job in South San Francisco,Full Time,"South San Francisco, CA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/research-technician-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-169431913.aspx?mescoid=1900305001001&jobPosition=6,,Entry Level,afe2d9a8e8eda47fefc70c350af5e8f3
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:11:49:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"TechData is looking for Biostatistician, SAS Programmer/Statistical Programmer (Some can be telecommuting), Outcome research Biostatistician, Sr. Clinical Data Manager, Clinical Project Manager for our pharmaceutical clients in Central NJ and Northern NJ. Please see below requirements and send your resume to: john.zhang@techdataservice.com TechData is a leading provider for temporary and permanent positions in the pharmaceutical industry. TechData offers the most competitive pay rate and benefits in clinical research consulting services. Biostatistician• Work closely with clinicians, programmers, and publication managers to generate and QC outputs for publications; review publication (abstract/manuscripts) to ensure accuracy, quality and soundness of statistical methodologies; coordinate internal resource utilization for publication and generate activities metrics for management review. • Work with the clinical study team on study design, development and/or review of clinical study protocols. • Develop and/or review statistical analysis plans, including Table/listing/figure shells, and final study report for clinical studies; perform post-hoc statistical analyses as needed. • Work with the project statistician and clinical data managers on design/review of case report form, data transfer specification, edit check specification, and participation in user acceptance testing (UAT); generate/review data tables/listings and coordinate data review meetings during the course of the study to ensure data quality. • Oversee CRO programming activities, perform quality assurance checks on internally or externally produced SAS tables, listings, and figures, ensure the quality of CRO deliverables. • May work with the Health Outcome team on the design/analysis/validation of projects. • May work on submission teams as a statistician and/or a programmer. QUALIFICATIONS NEEDED: • Must have a MS in Biostatistics/Statistics with at least 5 years of experience or a PhD in Biostatistics/ Statistics with at least 3 years of experience in the pharmaceutical, CRO or biotech industry. • Strong SAS programming skills. • Oncology experience is highly preferred. • Good technical writing skills. • Good communication skills (verbal and written). • Strong teamwork ability/commitment and individual initiative. • Strong organizational skills with ability to effectively manage multiple projects. we need is an experienced statistician who can do SAS programming at the same time can clearly interprete statistical concept and results to non-statisticians and key medical opinion leaders.  Sr. Statistical/SAS Programmer (Some position can be telecommuting)Main purpose of the job: To support the Biostatistics team by carrying out and overseeing programming activities of statistical programmers and external vendors (as required), and to ensure timely and accurate programming and validation activities for clinical studies. Contributes to the overall efficiency and best practice running of the Biostatistics group, demonstrating the ability to work efficiently and to a high standard within a clinical team environment. Main duties/responsibilities: 1. Providing statistical programming and validation support for clinical study reports, overseeing programming activities by external vendors (e.g., CROs) when necessary and coordinating programming activities among the study programmers to achieve timely progress in the following areas: analysis datasets, statistical tables, figures, listings, Integrated Summaries of Safety (ISS), Integrated Summaries of Efficacy (ISE), electronic submissions and other internal and external requests (e.g., publications). Accessing and converting data to SAS from Database management system and PC file formats (e.g., MS Excel, text files). Working with external vendors in order to develop or monitor the content and structure of SAS data sets. 2. Developing and maintaining SOPs, SWPs and other related technical documents, providing input to the Database and CRF Development, creating edit check programs and providing feedback to the Data Management. Providing input in developing statistical analysis plans, specifications of analysis datasets, validation plans, and other related documents. Determining and researching SAS software upgrades and related systems and addressing maintenance issues. 3. Managing and developing team, maintaining standards for programming activities, and guiding/coaching Statistical programmers. 4. Working independently to accomplish tasks and goals defined by supervisor. Attending required training and meetings and bringing in new ideas to improve the programming process. * Responsibilities weighting may change significantly based on the incumbent and their assigned areas of responsibility. Qualifications and education required: • Minimum of Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or a related science discipline. Masters preferred. Experience required: • Minimum 5 years experience in SAS programming for phase I-IV clinical trials in a pharmaceutical/CRO environment. 7+ years experience preferred. • Some project experience in a pharmaceutical/CRO programming environment or demonstrated significant leadership of SAS programming activities in a clinical pharmaceutical/CRO environment. Skills and aptitude required: • Experience using SAS-Base, MACRO, STAT, GRAPH, ACCESS, MS Office. • Proven experience with Unix and Windows operating systems. • Understanding of the software development life cycle. • Understanding of FDA guidelines. • Good organization, time management and attention to detail skills needed to work in a stressful environment under tight deadlines while maintaining focus on details and quality. • Applies good judgment and demonstrates initiative to resolve issues. • Strong verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills needed to work effectively in a team environment, managing that team as required.   Biostatistician for Outcome ResearchPosition SummaryThe EBM biostatistician provides statistical expertise for all observational research project sponsored by the US Evidence Based Medicine (EBM) in protocol development, Statistical Analysis Plan (SAP) preparation and study report. The role needs to ensure that appropriateness of study design, sample size and statistical methodologies are used and adherence to the established standards and SOPs. The role manages the timely execution of statistical and research methodological components of EBM study protocols in order to meet project objectives and has a thorough understanding of current requirements for statistical standards.Roles/ResponsibilitiesUtilize statistical knowledge of and expertise to provide statistical support for EBM studies, with a main focus of real-world observational studies, database examples:1)US medical and pharmacy claims databases (e.g. MarketScan); 2) US medical record databases (e.g. GE Healthcare); 3) US government public use databases (e.g. NHANES, MEPS)Participate in study concept, protocol and SAP development and ensure appropriateness of study design, sample size and statistical methodologies proposed. Specify the structure of the datasets that will be delivered for statistical analysis to ensure that the structure follows any existing company standard for databases pooling. Mock-up, review, and approve tables, listings and graphs specifications. Actively participate in project/study team meetings Establish/negotiate timelines for completion of study-related statistical activities. Ensure the study timelines are met. Conduct observational data analysis, include data management, statistical programming, interpretation of analyses results, and write-up/review the corresponding sections of EBM study report. Produce analysis datasets, listings, tables, and figures for research projects, according to specifications, while maintaining documentation and complying with pre-defined project / study standards. Provide oversight of the biostatistics-related activities for EBM studies subcontracted to a CRO: Oversee the CROs work on the preparation of analysis plans, development and validation of computer algorithms for inferential analyses, statistical writing of study reports, and other outsourced analyses as appropriate. Perform quality control procedures to ensure that statistical deliverables conform to the requirements outlined in the SAP Skills:Working knowledge and experience with bio statistical analysis and SAS programming. Excellent oral and written communication skills in English are a must. Prior work experience in epidemiology, health economic and outcome research, or clinical research area is a plus. Specific experience and understanding of outcomes research, drug development is an asset Familiarity with observational databases desirable; database examples US medical and pharmacy claims databases (e.g. MarketScan) US medical record databases (e.g. GE Healthcare) US government public use databases (e.g. NHANES, MEPS) MS or Ph.D. in Statistics or related fieldMinimum 5-year experience  in pharmaceutical research or equivalent  Senior Clinical Data Manager-Perform DM activities inhouse: protocol review, CRF development, database set up activities, data validation process (including manual data review of listings), SAE reconciliation, managing local laboratory and external labs and database lock. -Perform Project Management : represent DM on clinical teams, coordinate deliverables by other functions and/or CRO as necessary to achieve DM deliverables. -Coordinate with Programming team to provide support to the data review and safety updates (coordinate generation of data review listings, data retrieval to support data review and analysis, SDTM,) -Coordinate CRO data validation activities (coordinate data transfer specs, data reconciliation, query generation and resolution, -Participate in the development and implementation of department standards and documents, and other data management, departmental activities as needed. Minimum 5 years experience in Data Management with some experience in managing projects, project teams Experience in handling local labs, external data Experience in managing CRO, global team Experience with In-Form or other EDC software is desirable however, should have some experience in supporting Oncology studies Ideal candidate possesses above description, but also the ability to be independent, ability to sort critical issues that should be escalated to superior, and ability to propose sensible solutions. Clinical Project Manager:*Please note that this is the same type of position as previous order #449423 in terms of the job description and group. Position Description: The role of the Clinical Projects Manager (CPM) is to plan, execute, and finalize strategic pipeline projects according to strict deadlines and within budget. This includes acquiring resources and coordinating the efforts of medical team members and third-party contractors or consultants in order to deliver and report all projects according to plan. The CPM will also help define project objectives and oversee quality control throughout their life cycle. Overall Expectations: � Interpolate medical strategies into actionable steps of action and ensure successful execution through collaboration with an integrated medical team that includes physicians, pharmacists, data analysts, scientists, and external experts. � Capture key customer insights and integrate into recommendations for internal stakeholders in order to affect research & development milestones � Understand global health care nuances and behavioral drivers � Effectively represent the team�s medical activities and value to key stakeholders Responsibilities: � Manage project development from beginning to end. � Define project scope, goals and deliverables that support department goals in collaboration with senior management and stakeholders. � Develop project plans and associated communications documents. � Effectively communicate project expectations to team members and stakeholders in a timely and clear fashion. � Liaise with project stakeholders on an ongoing basis. � Estimate the resources and participants needed to achieve project goals. � Draft and submit budget proposals, and recommend subsequent budget changes where necessary. � Determine and assess need for additional staff and/or consultants and make the appropriate recommendations if necessary during project cycle. � Set and continually manage project expectations with team members and other stakeholders. � Delegate tasks and responsibilities to appropriate personnel. � Help identify and resolve issues and conflicts within the project team. � Identify and manage project dependencies and critical path. � Plan and schedule project timelines and milestones using appropriate tools. � Track project milestones and deliverables. � Develop and deliver progress reports, proposals, requirements documentation, and presentations. � Determine the frequency and content of status reports from the project team analyze results, and troubleshoot problem areas. � Proactively manage changes in project scope, identify potential crises, and devise contingency plans. � Define project success criteria and disseminate them to involved parties throughout project life cycle. � Coach, mentor, motivate and supervise project team members and contractors, and influence them to take positive action and accountability for their assigned work. � Build, develop, and grow any business relationships vital to the success of the project(s). � Conduct project post mortems and create a recommendations report in order to identify successful and unsuccessful project elements. � Develop best practices and tools for project execution and management. Work Conditions: � Overtime may be required in order to meet project deadlines. � Dexterity of hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and other devices and objects. � Physically able to participate in training sessions, presentations, and meetings. � Some travel may be required for the purpose of meeting with clients, stakeholders, or off-site personnel/management.Position RequirementsMBA and or MPH Experience in pharmaceutical industry. Certifications and strong familiarity with project management software Solid working knowledge of current Internet technologies Demonstrated experience in personnel management. Technically competent with administrative software programs, such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc. Experience at working both independently and in a team-oriented, collaborative environment is essential. Can conform to shifting priorities, demands and timelines through analytical and problem-solving capabilities. Reacts to project adjustments and alterations promptly and efficiently. Flexible during times of change. Ability to read communication styles of team members and contractors who come from a broad spectrum of disciplines. Persuasive, encouraging, and motivating. Ability to elicit cooperation from a wide variety of sources, including upper management, clients, and other departments. Ability to defuse tension among project team, should it arise. Ability to bring project to successful completion through political sensitivity. Strong written and oral communication skills. Strong interpersonal skills. Adept at conducting research into project-related issues and products. Must be able to learn, understand, and apply new technologies. Customer service skills an asset. Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment is crucial. Work ConditionsOvertime may be required in order to meet project deadlines. Sitting for extended periods of time. Dexterity of hands and fingers to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and other devices and objects. Physically able to participate in training sessions, presentations, and meetings. Some travel may be required for the purpose of meeting with clients, stakeholders, or off-site personnel/management. Requirements:MBA or MPH. Experience in pharmaceutical industry mandatory. ",SAS/Statistician/remote,"Full Time, Employee","Warren, NJ 07059",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/sas-statistician-remote-outcome-research-clinical-data-manager-clinical-project-manager-job-warren-nj-us-169445300.aspx?mescoid=1500154001001&jobPosition=19,"80,000.00 - 220,000.00 $ /year",Biotech/R&D/Science,e0ae96f28a8741fe06b92ed485762da4
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:11:50:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chemist IIIJob Summary:Responsible for formulating liquid and lyophilized dosage forms for protein therapeutics to support preclinical and clinical needs.Perform developmental studies for protein therapeutics, prepares data summaries and writes technical reports documenting various aspects of protein formulation development.Qualifications:MS or BS in biochemistry, biophysical chemistry, pharmaceutical science, physical chemistry, chemical engineering or a related field with 3-6 years of analytical development and/or protein formulation experience in biotech or pharmaceutical industry is required. ?Prior experience in development of protein formulations and stability assessment is preferred.Hands-on experience in analytical techniques used for protein characterization and stability testing (HPLC, capillary electrophoresis, IcIEF, DSC, DLS, HIAC, MFI).Strong communication, documentation and report writing skillsExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Chemist III Job in Redwood City,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Chemist III,"Redwood City, CA 94063",http://jobview.monster.com/chemist-iii-job-redwood-city-ca-us-169511450.aspx?mescoid=1900259001001&jobPosition=18,30.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,Biotech/R&D/Science,18c248503e102bfa72d23ac693ad2488
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:12:32:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Overview:This position is responsible for administering Workers' Compensation claims pursuant to department guidelines, individual client expectations and the statutory provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act. The incumbent must investigate claims using tools such as the Employer Interview, Claimant Interview, Claimant Questionnaire, ISO Claim Indexing, pursuit of prior medical records and disability case management to assist in the decision making process. The incumbent must determine compensability of claims, i.e. whether to accept or deny liability, based on the outcome of the investigation. The incumbent must develop action plans to address strategy for claim resolution. The incumbent must manage claim outcomes for early return to modified and regular duty work, conclusion of medical treatment and ultimate closure. The incumbent is responsible for establishing and adjusting reserves to accurately reflect financial exposure. The incumbent interfaces with clients and maintains relationships. Prefer for candidate to work in downtown Pittsburgh, PA office however, willing to consider work from home arrangement.Essential Job Functions:1. Communicate effectively with internal and external customers during the investigation, adjudication, and resolution of claims.External customers include insured employers (policyholders), injured workers, medical providers, treating physicians, medical case managers, brokers, attorneys and reinsurers.Internal customers include Claims Analysts, Bill Processors, Account Managers, Loss Control Consultants, Underwriters, Sales Reps and Claim Intake personnel.2. Investigate alleged work related claims to determine compensability pursuant to department guidelines, customer expectations and the statutory provisions of the Pennsylvania Workers' Compensation Act.Investigate claims by interviewing employer contacts, claimants and, in more complex cases, witnesses; research prior claims through ISO Claim Indexing; and pursue prior medical records if warranted based on the particulars of the claim.Monitor medical case management in an effort to obtain medical opinions on prior medical records and to assist in evaluating the alleged mechanism of injury and its relatedness to the report physical complaints.Determine compensability, i.e., whether to accept or deny liability, by compiling, assessing and making critical decisions regarding all information obtained during the investigation of the claim.Obtain confidential payroll information, calculate benefits and issue indemnity payments to claimants.Develop detailed action plans to address strategy and manage claim outcomes for early return work, conclusion of medical treatment and claim resolution resulting in controlled losses.Initiate fraud referrals and surveillance investigations and monitor feedback for impact on claim resolution.3. Manage lost time claims to conclusion according to department protocols, customer expectations and the requirements of the Pennsylvania Bureau of Workers' Compensation.Closely monitor claim developments and revise established action plan to adjust strategies in response to critical medical, legal and return-to-work developments.Carefully follow medical case management assignments and provide direction to Case Managers to ensure aggressive pursuit of medical updates and return to work strategies. Utilize feedback to determine and initiate proactive steps to expedite return to pre-injury status and conclusion of medical treatment.Manage claim outcomes for early return to modified and regular duty, conclusion of medical treatment and closure.Evaluate and adjust reserves to accurately reflect financial liability.Refer claims for legal intervention and other outside service vendors as needed to manage outcomes.Coordinate and manage defense counsel efforts to ensure that litigated claims are appropriately resolved and financial liability mitigated. Conduct legal claim reviews throughout the year with preferred counsel.Report claims to reinsurance broker in accordance with reinsurance treaties and issue follow-up reports every 6 months.Negotiate settlement of claims up to designated authority level.Conduct quarterly claim review meetings with employers and brokers4. Issue miscellaneous payments to claimants, providers, and attorneys. Evaluate medical invoices along with accompanying medical reports (office notes, diagnostic test results, therapy notes, narrative reports, etc.) to determine if the treatment provided is reasonable, necessary and related to the established work injury.Approve or deny provider bills accordingly with 100% compliance to regulatory requirements.Recognize adverse utilization trends and file Utilization Reviews with the PA Bureau of Workers' Compensation to question the reasonableness and necessity of medical treatment.5. Complete and issue the appropriate Bureau forms as mandated by the Pennsylvania Workers' Compensation Act to formally record the status and disposition of the claim, including:Employer's First Report of Occupational Injury or DiseaseNotice of Compensation Payable, Notice of Temporary Compensation Payable or Agreement for CompensationNotice of Workers' Compensation DenialNotice of Ability to Return to WorkNotice of SuspensionSupplemental AgreementFinal ReceiptStatement of Account6. Provide a high level of customer service at all times.The incumbent is responsible for resolving inquiries for customers, both internal and external. The incumbent must reply to written or telephonic inquiries in a prompt, courteous, professional and informative manner.Inquiries encompass numerous contacts and originate from various sources such as injured workers, employers, brokers, providers, attorneys and physicians.Incumbent is responsible for initiating and maintaining ongoing communication with employer representatives who may range from HR representatives to senior management.Minimum Requirements:High School diploma or GEDA minimum of 2 years of prior workers compensation lost time claims experiencePreferred Qualifications:Bachelor's degreeKnowledge of medical terminology, ICD9 and/or CPT codesProficiency in utilizing standard desktop software (MS Office, e-mails, Adobe, etc.)Excellent verbal and written communications skillsDemonstrated ability to handle multiple prioritiesExcellent time management and organizational skillsCritical thinking skills and decisive judgmentAbility to work independently and as a team member.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled.Highmark Health and its affiliates prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their status as protected veterans or individuals with disabilities, and prohibit discrimination against all individuals based on their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation or any other category protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Highmark Health and its affiliates take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status or disability.",Claims Analyst Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time,"Pittsburgh, PA 15222",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-analyst-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-169483028.aspx?mescoid=1300071001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e49f5207f5fbe610005130815a489c1a
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:12:45:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Pays employees by calculating pay and deductions; issuing checks.Duties:* Maintains payroll information by collecting, calculating, and entering data.* Updates payroll records by entering changes in exemptions, insurance coverage, savings deductions, and job title and department/division transfers.* Prepares reports by compiling summaries of earnings, taxes, deductions, leave, disability, and nontaxable wages.* Determines payroll liabilities by calculating employee federal and state income and social security taxes and employer's social security, unemployment, and workers compensation payments.* Resolves payroll discrepancies by collecting and analyzing information.* Provides payroll information by answering questions and requests.* Maintains payroll operations by following policies and procedures; reporting needed changes.* Maintains employee confidence and protects payroll operations by keeping information confidential.* Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Analyzing Information, Data Entry Skills, Attention to Detail, Confidentiality, Thoroughness, General Math Skills, Financial Software, Reporting Skills, Verbal Communication, Organization",Payroll & A/P Clerk Job in Pflugerville,Full Time,"Pflugerville, TX 78660",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-A-P-Clerk-Job-Pflugerville-TX-US-167260497.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b1f059b73b330453211edd4e53b36e3d
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:12:46:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Retail Sales AssociateJoin the Club! Today, we are 625 clubs strong and growing. Whether our members are small business owners shopping for products for their business, or the head of a household shopping for a family, we aim to provide them with solutions that save them money and time—while taking steps toward helping the environment too. In sum, we work to help our members live better every day. If being part of this unique retail experience interests you, read more about the career opportunities waiting for you at Sam’s Club. Your Local Austin, TX Sam’s Club is having a JOB FAIR!4/14, 4/21, 4/28, 5/5 from 7:30 a.m. - 11:30 a.m FULL TIME AND PART TIME POSITIONS AVAILABLE Opportunities include:  SPECIALTYMeat Wrapper, Cake Decorators  FRONT ENDCashiers, Cart Attendants, Supervisor TIRE & BATTERYSales Associate OPERATIONSStocking Associates, Inventory Associates, Maintenance For more information on how you can become a part of the great Sam’s Club team, please visit our hiring center. Sam’s Club #618810901 Lakeline Mall Dr.Austin, TX 78717 Or apply online at  http://click.appcast.io/track/1qts2t?cs=kj  and specify interest in Club #6188. Sam’s Club is an Equal Opportunity Employer ",Retail Sales Associate Job in Austin,Full Time,"Austin, TX 78717",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Retail-Sales-Associate-Job-Austin-TX-US-166324334.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=12,,,a54f0a9349830ba09ea5ce6c0e8ccc68
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:13:30:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is a human resources leadership role for a well established mid sized organization with employees in multiple states.  Duties include management over the strategy side of benefits to ensure retention of talent, management of a benefits administrator, creating communication strategy for benefits, work with our benefit vendors to stay current with compliance and changes in regulations.  You will also work with a business unit to coach and mentor managers to ensure employee development and satisfaction, guide leadership in our performance management system, help us ensure our culture of employee value, integrity and collaboration stays constant.  Assist the VP of HR with growth strategy and projects.  In return we offer a wonderful supportive HR team, excellent room for career growth and work life balance.  Requirements include current experience leading benefits along with employee relations experience.",Human Resources Benefits Manager and Emplyee Relations Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time,"Eden Prairie, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Benefits-Manager-Emplyee-Relations-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-167145622.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=11,"75,000.00 - 84,000.00 $ /yearannual bonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),769a8593f918b902f38ee8ccc5b17e9c
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:13:45:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Would you like to manage your own department with the ability to escalate your career OR stay in a low opportunity environment with limited growth potential?We are a privately held National Vehicle Up fitter with multiple locations throughout the United States and we are growing exponentially! As a leader in our industry we seek motivated recent college graduates who are striving for a significant role and looking for a Management Training program to learn a business from the ground floor.WHAT DOES THIS JOB ENTAIL?You will receive classroom and hands on training that will afford you the ability to run your own department and move up within the company. In your development to become a successful manager you will learn how to manage, coach and motivate your staff. We will empower you with knowledge of inventory, purchasing, estimating, installations, warrantees, customer satisfaction and profitability.WHY ARE YOU INTERESTED?This opportunity is for those who desire to succeed and have the ability to solve problems, make decisions and meet goals. You will be able to develop and hone your personal, business and management skills in a positive work environment. Our team oriented culture and people are motivated, energetic and strive to make a positive impact both personally and professionally.IS IT RIGHT FOR YOU?Requirements of the position include:Associates or Bachelors degree in any curriculum2 years experience in the automotive service industryWillingness to relocateWillingness to travelNo felonies and no misdemeanors within 5 yearsNo DUI/DWI within last 5 yearsValid Drivers’ License with no more than 4 pointsAuthorized to work in the U.S. without sponsorshipPlease Submit Resumes To:Email: hotjobs@ppswork.com Fax: 330-374-9144or Call 330-374-9133",Service Management Trainee Job in Villa Park,Full Time Employee,"Villa Park, IL",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Management-Trainee-Job-Villa-Park-IL-US-167139147.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,,Human Resources,b79c789f4333ec64a6c15f2107abef49
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:13:46:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Furniture Sales Consultant ARE YOU:Hard working? Success driven? Honest?College Grad? Former Military? Bartender? Server?Experienced in Cell phone / Auto / Appliance Sales? Experienced working for BestBuy / Conn's / Fry's or similar?Many people outside the furniture industry are very successful in our business.No furniture experience required; we will train you for success.  We are looking for highly motivated men and women to sell the #1 Furniture Brand in the World.  We're looking for ENERGETIC, POSITIVE, MATURE men and women to join our team. *Our top sales professionals make $100k+ yearly.*WE OFFER:Base Pay + Generous Commission StructurePaid Vacation/Paid HolidaysPaid Training5 day work weekBonuses Up to 30%!FULL Benefits (Medical, Dental, Vision, 401K)Great Employee DiscountsSALES CONSULTANT REQUIREMENTS:Motivated and ready to start making money!Excellent People SkillsPersonable and ProfessionalOpen Availability/Willing to work Weekends/HolidaysApply Online at hillcountryholdings.com/careers, by Email or VISIT Ashley Furniture HomeStore Pflugerville Store 15424 FM 1825 (You can see us from I-35) to speak with the Manager on DutyIf you are the perfect candidate we will hire you on the spot!",Sales Consultant Job in Pflugerville,Full Time,"Pflugerville, TX 78660",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Consultant-Job-Pflugerville-TX-US-167051625.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=9,"45,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /yearcommissions, monthly bonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),577cc0f8b6c910d260d5f9edb38391f6
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:14:57:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Time HR ManagerBrookdale Westlake Village - 28550 Westlake Village Dr Westlake, OH 44145Job #: HRDNEwlOH057194Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Assists in the development and implementation of human resources policies to meet organizational needs and comply with state and federal laws.* Facilitates and oversees human resources functions such as recruitment, new hire orientation, performance reviews, benefit administration, safety and workers' compensation administration, employee relations, and training/education initiatives.* Responds to inquiries regarding company policies, procedures, and programs.* Conducts necessary investigations on employee relations issues and advises management on appropriate resolution.* Advises management regarding hiring decisions, equal employment opportunity, compensation, benefits, and health/safety issues.* Develops, implements, and monitors the human resources department budget.* Identifies possible pay issues and works with Corporate HR to review local market rates for community positions. Discusses market information with Executive Director to determine if and where pay adjustments should be considered.* Interviews and coordinates recruitment efforts and processes for specific positions as needed.* Represents community(s) in legal proceedings, unemployment hearings and workers' compensation settlements.* Analyzes trends in turnover, hiring, promotions, separations, and grievances to determine support or action needed to adjust unfavorable trends.* Trains management on leadership and HR skills. Identifies community training opportunities and works with Area/Regional/Divisional HRD to implement.Required skills and qualifications:* Bachelor's Degree in Human Resources, Business Administration or related field* Minimum of two years experience in a professional level associate relations/training role, or equivalent combination of education and experience* Certified Professional in Human Resources (PHR/SPHR) is preferred or desire/willingness to acquire* Strong communication skills and ability to be flexible regarding responsibilities* Ability to handle pressure of work deadlines* Knowledge of HR related Federal and State regulations* Strong knowledge of company benefits, payroll, and workers compensation procedures* Good presentation skills and ability to work with associates at all levels of the company.If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Human Resoures Director Job in Westlake,Full Time Employee,"Westlake, OH 44145",Management Consulting Services Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resoures-Director-Job-Westlake-OH-US-166320598.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=2,,Human Resources,f5296cf627a3e1a0e7e856e8155b5dff
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:14:59:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Supports human resources processes by administering tests; scheduling appointments; conducting orientation; maintaining records and information.Responsibilities:Process new hires and changes using ADP WFN and maintain employee files;Monitor FMLA compliance by reviewing paperwork and tracking leave time;Compile data from personnel records and prepare reports;New hire orientation and onboarding representative;Respond to unemployment claims;Work closely with hiring managers to develop, execute and refine specific recruiting plans;Post open positions on various job sites as needed and on corporate website;Work closely with search firms as needed;Conduct reference and background checks;Filing and performance of additional HR, recruiting and clerical duties as assigned.Knowledge and Skills:Capable of strategic thinking and innovation;Has driven personality, ""can do"" attitude, and results-oriented personal style;Experience supporting multiple projects;Excellent communication skills, being able to effectively interact with staff across the organization, departments and customers;Proven capabilities in building relationships;Basic knowledge of employment law issues;Understanding of ADP WFN platform.Requirements:Associate’s degree or equivalent combination of education and experience required; PHR preferred;1+ years of prior recruiting experience required;Previous payroll and/or accounting experience a plus;Excellent computer skills (Word, PowerPoint and Excel) necessary;  2+ years of experience working with ADP platforms preferred;Must possess superior interpersonal, organizational and communication skills;Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions and procedure/policy manuals;Ability to work with minimal supervision in a fast-paced environment;Previous Human Resources experience is required;Payspan, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Employment at Payspan, Inc. is based upon your individual merit and qualifications. We don’t discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, protected veteran status or disability, genetic characteristic, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law. We will also make all reasonable accommodations to meet our obligations under the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) and state disability laws. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status, or disability.",Human Resources Assistant Job in Jacksonville,"Full Time, Employee","Jacksonville, FL 32256",Computer SoftwareHealthcare ServicesFinancial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Assistant-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-166334080.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=18,15.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,Human Resources,116bdbb6627bb83220d5a8f25fbb856b
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:15:47:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter Job DescriptionSourcing and SelectionBuild and develop effective referral sources with FRs/staff, develop productive centers of influence (COIs),and develop qualified lead strategies from a variety of sources (i.e., referrals, COIs, advertising, career fairs,social media, etc.)Actively participate in community clubs and organizations to promote and brand Northwestern MutualCoordinate advertising and marketing strategies to include ads, direct mail, community events, etc.Develop relationships with other Northwestern Mutual recruiters to share leads and best practicesSpecific selection process accountability to include but not limited to screening candidates, conductinginitial interviews, administering selection tools and guiding candidates through the selection processReview resumes and schedule initial interviewsEffectively communicate with candidatesAccountability, Tracking and AnalysisReport weekly recruiting activity to leadership teamDevelop proficiency and use of home office-supported software to maintain candidate databases andaccurate records of prospects to ensure efficiency of the selection processAssist in the coordination of leadership team meetings and the preparation of activity/results reportsAnalyze recruiting ratios to identify inefficiencies in selection process; establish and implement improvementsMay include the oversight of contract and licensing responsibilitiesMiscellaneous:Provide ongoing support for recruiting & selection efforts of other leadership team members (MDs,FDs, CUDs, Director of Recruiting, Campus Recruiter, Recruiting Coordinator)Provide miscellaneous administrative support as needed in the district officeParticipate in on-campus events i.e. job fairs, class talks, club talks, seminars, etc.Provide leadership support throughout the internship program on a district levelQualificationsBachelor’s degree preferredOne to three years professional work experience, preferably in sales, recruiting or the financial services industryDemonstrated ability to work professionally as a team member and with all levels of peopleExperience with prospecting; generating leads via phone or face-to-face interactions preferredStrong personal network and/or community involvement to leverage from a recruiting perspectiveCompetenciesAction Oriented: Enjoys working hard; is action oriented and full of energy for the things he/she sees is challenging; not fearful of acting with a minimum of planning; seizes more opportunities than othersDrive for Results: Can be counted on to exceed goals successfully; is constantly and consistently one of the top performers; very bottom-line oriented; steadfastly pushes self and others for resultsInterpersonal Savvy: Relates well to all kinds of people and able to build rapport quicklyListening: Practices attentive and active listening and has the patience to hear people outPriority Setting: Spends his/her time on what is important; quickly zeros in on the critical few and puts the trivial many aside; can quickly sense what will help or hinder accomplishing a goal; eliminates roadblocks; creates focus",Recruiter Job in Monroeville,Full Time,"Monroeville, PA 15146",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Recruiter-Job-Monroeville-PA-US-150645357.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9f88a0345e0085e2d91c3cc58127e6e6
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:15:48:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:  The ASM 1 - Sales Supervisor is responsible for the daily sales floor activities, the selling process and customer service and for assisting in the execution of warehouse/stockroom and sales support duties as required. The ASM 1 - Sales Supervisor is responsible for helping the store achieve or exceed sales and profit goals on a daily, monthly and annual basis while adhering to all company policies, procedures, governmental regulations and customer service expectations. The ASM 1 - Sales Supervisor is also responsible for the overall management, supervision and operation of the store in the absence of the Store Manager. This is considered a “key carrier” position and is responsible for opening and closing the store and routine handling of bank deposits.   Job Title:                                             ASM 1 – Assistant Store Manager 1 (Sales Supervisor) Department:                                         Store Operations                        Reports To:                                          Store Manager               Job Status:                                           Non-Exempt (Hourly)                              Budget Managed ($):                           None   Position Requirements High school diploma, GED equivalency, or work experience sufficient to demonstrate high school level retail math and English skills Two to five years of related sales/retail/customer service experience; hardwood flooring knowledge a plus Previous supervisory experience (team leadership) preferred Must possess a valid driver’s license and acceptable driving record Basic Microsoft Office skills (Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook) Experience with Point of Sale (POS) systems, preferred Outstanding telephone skills Ability to drive/operate a forklift required (forklift certification required prior to operating equipment) Constant (more than 50% of the time) standing, walking, and hand/finger dexterity; lifting & carrying up to 80 lbs; pushing, & pulling up to 40 lbs Frequent (between 33% -50% of the time) reaching, squatting, kneeling, bending, and twisting; pushing & pulling – up to 80 lbs; Occasional (up to 33% of the time) sitting, using ladder to climb; lifting & carrying over 80 lbs Vision (Near, Distance, Color, Peripheral, Depth Perception) General Work Schedule:         This position will generally work a standard fulltime workweek including evenings, frequent weekends (Saturday and Sunday), holidays and overtime as scheduled based on business and customer needs. Regular and predictable attendance is an essential function of this position. Work Environment: ASM 1 - Sales Supervisors generally work in a retail sales and warehouse environment that involves the use of office equipment, such as computers, copy machines, point of sale equipment, telephones, machinery/mechanical equipment, ladders and heavy equipment (forklift). Routine heavy lifting of and movement of product. Some exposure to moderate noise, outdoor elements (heat and cold) and airborne particles. Limited travel required. 1 – 15 associates supervised indirectly. see job descriptionAdditional Information:",Assistant Store Manager  - Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX 78753",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureRetailConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Store-Manager-1-Austin-Texas-TX-Job-Austin-TX-US-167591787.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b03a61c8c4fb5f64a92539ed9a1eb995
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:16:57:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you ready to jump into the hot healthcare market in Nashville? Parker + Lynch is working with one of Nashville's top company's to source for their next payroll manager. This position is open due to an internal promotion, so there's lots of potential for internal growth. If you have experience managing a team and are ready for a fun but highly professional environment, this might be the perfect fit for you. As Payroll Manager, you will report to the VP, Payroll Services and be responsible for managing weekly and bi-weekly payroll for 10,000+ employees in multiple locations across 30+ states. You will also be in charge of 401(k) plan administration and researching tax laws as the company continues its growth and moves into new states. The position will pay $65,000-75,000 per year plus discretionary bonus, which is between 10-15% annually. The Payroll Manager job responsibilities:  Manage team of 10 payroll processors and analystsEnsure adequate coverage/staffingAdminister company 401(k) planResearches and understands tax laws for new states the company enters with expansion  The Payroll Manager job requirements:  Bachelor's degree in Business Administration or Human Resources5-10 years of payroll processing experience in a multi-location, multi-state environmentSupervisory experience preferredExperience administering 401(k) plan preferred  If you meet the qualifications above and are interested in pursuing this outstanding opportunity with a rapidly growing healthcare company in Nashville, please click 'apply' below. You may also peruse other career opportunities available on our website at www.parkerlynch.com ",Payroll Manager - Healthcare Job in Nashville,Full Time Employee,"Nashville, TN 37205",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Manager-Healthcare-Job-Nashville-TN-US-167446839.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=1,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,104886632a295a87c859a4fd2d314fd6
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:23:51:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"MENTAL HEALTH MANAGER (BAND 2) QUALITY MANAGEMENT OFFICER Southeast Region of the Division of Behavioral Health The Missouri Division of Behavioral Health seeks a Quality Management Officer for Southeast Region of the Division of Behavioral Health in Farmington, Missouri. The QA Officer will manage the performance improvement programs for Southeast Missouri Mental Health Center. Southeast Missouri Mental Health is a 323 bed Joint Commission accredited long term care psychiatric hospital that complies with the requirements of The Joint Commission (TJC) and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). There are two primary services: Adult Psychiatric and Sex Offender Rehabilitation and Treatment. The successful candidate must have knowledge of Joint Commission and CMS Standards, Performance Improvement processes, excellent written and verbal communication skills, supervisory experience, and some statistical knowledge. Minimum qualifications include a Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university with a minimum of 15 earned credit hours in one or a combination of the following: Psychology, Sociology, Social Work, Counseling, Pharmacology, Nursing, Education, Business, Public or Health Care Administration, or a closely related field; and, Four or more years of professional experience in mental health, education, social services, public administration, or a closely related area. (Additional qualifying experience may substitute on a year-for-year basis for deficiencies in the required education.) (Earned graduate credit hours from an accredited college or university in the specified areas may substitute on a year-for-year basis for a maximum of two years of the required experience at a rate of 24 earned graduate credit hours for one year of experience.) Interested applicants should submit a resume and cover letter by April 1, 2016. Send resume to: Mark Remspecher, Human Resources Director 1010 West Columbia Street, Farmington MO 63640 Fax: (573) 218-6807 E-mail: mark.remspecher@dmh.mo.gov EEO/ADA/AA",MENTAL HEALTH MANAGER (BAND ) Job in Farmington,Full Time,"Farmington, MO 63640",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/MENTAL-HEALTH-MANAGER-BAND-2-Job-FARMINGTON-MO-US-165245513.aspx?ch=dailyjournal&mescoid=2100312001001&jobPosition=16,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5186c8ff69900ba365c89703dc298982
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:23:50:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Beautiful Environments, Caring Associates Are you ready for a dynamic work environment that champions senior living care, one where your excellent leadership in nursing is utilized to manage the company's vision to achieve industry-leading resident care goals? If so, our Health Care Coordinator position is the perfect job for you! Our focus is to maximize the potential of every life we touch by living our mission of creating an elegant community where our residents are surrounded by the highest standards of quality of service, environment and care. If you are a person who has a deep compassion for and a desire to serve seniors, who thrives in a senior living environment, then we would like to hear from you. NOW HIRING REGISTERED NURSE & HEALTH CARE COORDINATOR Apply today! Our RNs support all health care services throughout the residence. They provide input to service planning for residents as well as renewal and maintenance of these plans. RNs work with the Health Care Coordinator to supervise, oversee and coordinate the work of other caregivers to meet Resident needs. The RN we select must possess a passion for exemplary healthcare services. They should work well under pressure, be organized, flexible and self --motivated. Our Health Care Coordinator serves our communities by monitoring medication management, performing resident assessments, providing leadership and guidance on health issues, providing onsite medical care and communicating changing medical needs to the team and family members. This positing also includes assuring infection control, verifies physician orders, move-in/move-out information and supervises the ordering, delivery, transcription and documentation of medication, treatments and orders under their authority.",Legend Senior Living Hiring Registered Nurse & Health Care Coordinator Job in Tulsa,Full Time,"Tulsa, OK 74132",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Legend-Senior-Living-Hiring-Registered-Nurse-Health-Care-Coordinator-Job-Tulsa-OK-US-165177845.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=14,Top Pay & Benefits Package,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),9792bf181932e135ce9b1ed8a3db23a2
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:22:55:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeOverland Park, KS Job # RNHHovpKS054910A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division. Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living. Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Home Health RN to provide services in the Overland Park area. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients Your responsibilities: * Evaluates the patient and home health environment to determine required services and involves the patient and patient's family in developing the plan of care * Develops the POC based on findings from evaluation visit * Serves as the patient's advocate and maintains ongoing communication with physician, referral sources, caregivers, and facility management to facilitate coordination of care * Responsible for timely completion and synchronization of all documentation within the patient's home via device (EMR) * Provides direct supervision of nursing clinical care team members (LPN/LVNs & HHAs) Required Skills and Qualifications: * Graduate of an accredited school of professional nursing* One year of experience in Medicare HH; proficient in OASIS-C and Home Health experience required* Licensed as an RN in the state of practice* Travel is required; must have a reliable car w/current insurance coverage and a current driver's license* Experience with Electronic Medical Records (EMR) devices preferred, but not requiredIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Registered Nurse RN Job in Overland Park,Full Time Employee,"Overland Park, KS 66211",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-165183247.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,5540e509cbd8d7165d7b33dcc35943b1
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:22:54:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Immediate Need for Certified Medical Assistants in the Columbia Market! Searching for candidates that have at least 1 year of hands on experience working as a CMA. These positions are available immediately and looking to hire ASAP. Please apply today. Great Pay for the right candidate! We are in need of contract employees and direct hire employees immediately. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1022723 Job Experience:,,, CMA, Triage, 1+ years of experience",Certified Medical Assistant - GREAT Opportunity! Job in Columbia,Full Time Employee,"Columbia, SC 29201",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Medical-Assistant-GREAT-Opportunity!-Job-Columbia-SC-US-165307814.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),58a94807f2db2daebe65afd7977f9b41
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:22:35:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: About Agfa HealthCare Agfa HealthCare, a member of the Agfa-Gevaert Group, is a leading global provider of diagnostic imaging and  healthcare IT solutions. The company has nearly a century of healthcare experience and has been a pioneer on the healthcare IT market since the early 1990's. Today, Agfa HealthCare designs, develops and delivers state-of-the-art systems for capturing, managing and processing diagnostic images and clinical/administrative information for hospitals and healthcare facilities, as well as contrast media solutions to enable effective medical imaging results. The company has sales offices and agents in over 100 markets worldwide. Agfa HealthCare Corporation has an exciting opportunity for an ECM  Business Development Manager. This is a field-based postion and may be based anywhere in the US with access to a major airport. Responsibilities: This important leadership position will focus on Understanding all aspects of the healthcare ECM market and the competitive landscape Creating marketing demand/programs and sales tools that result in ultimately achieving sales objectives   Consultative selling using basic workflow analysis to prepare sales presentation focusing on workflow improvements and ROI Sales presentations on the proposed solution to clients Coordination of competitive information for the sales and marketing groups The Ideal candidate will be a high achiever, results driven, bring high energy, team player   Major Accountabilities:  Create Solution Packages and Sell ECM solutions Develop, plan and execute new products and go-to-market strategies Craft messaging and value propositions Highlight Agfa advantages in marketplace with value propositions Prepare with account mangers effective Sales presentations Presentation of sales proposals to clients Create Marketing, Marcom and Launch Plans for ECM Define market segments, requirements for each segment Improve existing and develop new marketing plans Define requirements for roll out ensuring capabilities of Sales, Service Organizations to effectively launch solutions Insure launch plans are coordinated with Enterprise Imaging and Sales/Service initiatives (Upgrades, etc…). Insure strategy and launch plans are well understood and communicated to Sales/Service teams Competitive Advantage Provide differentiation statements Develop plans to capitalize upon Works With Marketing Communications to… Prepare key messages, value propositions and sales collateral Manage telemarketing campaigns and trade shows Strategy and Roadmap Needs Provide value-added feedback to the Product Marketing, Product Management and Product Development groups for product enhancement Maintain North American enhancement list Provide critical intelligence by translating industry trends into compelling business strategy for new offerings and strategies Own customer satisfaction Monitor and consistently improve customer satisfaction ratings for KLAS Develop and monitor internal metrics on customer satisfaction Manage key customer relationships as required   Strong collaboration with NA sales and marketing teams and European HQ ECM Center of Competences Qualifications: Education Minimum: Bachelor degree in healthcare science, marketing, business development/management, or computer science/engineering (ideally IT healthcare) Specialisation in clinical processes / workflows and/or hospital business processes / workflows would be ideal Experience 5 years in ECM healthcare as: Sales, pre-sales, business development, business management in ECM, EPR solutions Consultant: deployment of ECM projects in hospitals, deployment of hospital processes and workflows (business and clinical) Experience with marketing tools and techniques, including market analysis and strategy development, communications, and financial analysis Experience in a HealthCare/Medical environment, including a comprehensive understanding of Enterprise Content Management and hospital workflows (business and clinical) Strong interpersonal skills, including verbal and written communication and proven experience in communicating project and customer requirements Strong project management and time management skills Excellent written and verbal communication skills Specialized knowledge in Health information technology, hospital workflows and healthcare delivery Specific skills (core competencies, key specialities, technical, human relations or managerial skills, and knowledge areas necessary) Skills:AnalysisPresentationCommunicationNegotiation Knowledge on:ECM/DMSPAS, EPR, EMRClinical processes and workflowsHospital Business processes and workflowsClinical documentationRegional health Generic knowledge onHL7, IHE, XDSscanning processesIT infrastructure We offer a rewarding career in a field that impacts lives, the opportunity to work with a talented, committed team of individuals, training and career development programs, and a competitive compensation and benefits package. If you want to be part of this experience, we'll take you there. Learn more about Agfa HealthCare and follow us on Twitter. Agfa HealthCare Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities/Women/Individuals with Disabilities/Protected Veterans. #LIPOST",HealthCare ECM Business Development Manager Job in ..,Full Time Employee,".., NJ",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/HealthCare-ECM-Business-Development-Manager-Job-..-NJ-US-165311667.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,ddf49f4bdd36a9f448ca18aed905f3b7
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:22:02:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionUnder the direction of the Physicians. Performs radiological procedures in the Vascular Access Center. Performs duties and responsibilities in a manner consistent with our mission and values. Follows established protocols and procedures at the standard maintained by this organization. Documents and communicates results per the Vascular Access Center policies.Principle Accountabilities: % Of Time Spent1.Performs technical radiological procedures of the Vascular Access Center. (35%)2.Prepares the angiography suite for procedures including retrieval of the basic supplies needed. (5%)3.Responsible for the quality control of technical standards. (5%)4. Enters and properly completes all information including charges and supplies into the Radiology Information System and PACS. (25%)5. Is responsible for onsite regulations in radiation safety. (5%)6.Assists with room turnover, stocking and general maintenance of procedure rooms and holding areas. (20%)7. Correlates with physicians to make sure correct charges are entered. 8.Performs other duties as required. (5%)SLHEducationTechnologist must be a graduate of an AMA approved school of Radiological Technology and certified with the American Registry of Radiological Technologists.ExperienceExperience in Interventional Radiology, Seimens and GE C-arm, coding and scrubbing interventional procedures.Registration experience desired.The assessment, care and treatment provided by the Interventional Technologist will be consistent with the specific age related needs of the patient. The Interventional Technologist is competent to care for adult and geriatric patients. Must maintain BLS certification.Working ConditionsEmployee is required to sit occasionally and stand frequently.Employee may be required to lift with assistance.May be required to reach forward and reach overhead. Is required to use both hands for simple grasping and pushing/pulling.Occasionally exposed to electrical hazards and CRT terminal work.Employee is required to lift and carry supplies.(Occasionally: 1-33%, Frequently: 34-66%, Continuously: 67-100%)The most significant of duties are included but this does not exclude occasional work assignments not mentioned or developmental duties.Job Relationships: Member of a comprehensive healthcare team, including other healthcare providers, the patient, the patients family and significant others.Takes direction from: Radiology Director, RadiologistProvides direction to: Patient, patients' family members, and technologistsSupervised by: Radiology Director, RadiologistMission/ValuesFaithful to our Episcopal-Presbyterian heritage and its ministry of healing, St. Luke's Hospital is dedicated to improving the health of the community. Using talents and resources responsibly, our medical staff, employees and volunteers provide care for the whole person with compassion, professional excellence, and respect for each other and those we serve.Core Values: Human Dignity, Compassion, Justice, Excellence, and Stewardship.Human Dignity: We accept and treat all persons as being created in the image of God.Compassion: We respond with caring to the needs of others as if they were members of our family.Justice: We honor each person's rights and responsibilities in light of the common good.Excellence: We set and strive to attain high standards of performance and continuous improvement.Stewardship: We use our talents and resources wisely, with honesty and integrity.FACES - Friendly - Available - Caring - Efficient - SafeCommunication Standards: Promotes and provides courteous and effective communication with internal and external customers.",INTERVENTIONAL RAD TECH Job in Frontenac,Full Time Employee,"Frontenac, MO",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/INTERVENTIONAL-RAD-TECH-Job-FRONTENAC-MO-US-165255291.aspx?mescoid=2900538001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,37d2763837836aa9d51213c9ac07194d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:46:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBaylor RN position to provide Medicare Home Health servicesBrookdale, 7900 Triad Center Dr #250, Greensboro, NC 27409Job #:RNgreNC054872A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Home Health RN to provide services in the Greensboro location. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities:* Evaluate patient and home health environment to determine required services and involve the patient and patient's family in developing the plan of care* Develop the POC based on findings from evaluation visit* Serve as the patient's advocate and maintain ongoing communication with physician, referral sources, caregivers and facility management to facilitate coordination of care* Responsible for timely completion and synchronization of OASIS visits within the patient home via device (EMR)* Provide direct supervision of nursing clinical care team members (LPN's/LVN's & HHA's)Required skills and qualifications:* Graduate of an accredited school of professional nursing* Licensed as an registered nurse in the state of practice* Home Health experience is a MUST* Travel is required; must have a reliable car w/current insurance coverage and a current driver's license* Experience with Electronic Medical Records (EMR) devices preferred but not requiredIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Registered Nurse RN - Home Health Job in Greensboro,Full Time Employee,"Greensboro, NC 27409",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Home-Health-Job-Greensboro-NC-US-165178014.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,784ff3b569b5205b5c314e34bdfc2a12
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:46:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will: Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse,  Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA Job LocationChristiansburg, Virginia, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Registered Nurse Job in Christiansburg,,"Christiansburg, VA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-Job-Christiansburg-VA-US-165304115.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=4,,,ef0341cbb509c5522812630861b29968
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full time LPN or Medical Assistant needed for a busy and fast paced pediatric office in Denville, New Jersey. Medical Assistant must be certified to administer vaccines. Applicant must be available for one evening a week and one Saturday a month. Pediatric experience is a plus but not required. Competitive salary, paid time off, health benefits, life insurance and 401K available for qualifying employees.Job description includes but not limited to:Obtain vital signsPerform medical treatments as requested by MDVaccine administrationEnter patient information into electronic health recordTriage patient phone calls and give medical advice",LPN/ Medical Assistant Job in Denville,Full Time,"Denville, NJ 07834",All,http://jobview.monster.com/LPN-Medical-Assistant-Job-Denville-NJ-US-165312368.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),14eb529aff37390b91291ec1abb49bff
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description:The Clinical Prior Authorization Pharmacist will be responsible for: performing Prior Authorizations; perform duties related to Drug Utilization Review including concurrent, retrospective, and prospective components; and support Customer Care with clinical calls requiring pharmacist intervention. The Clinical Prior Authorization Pharmacist is also responsible for interfacing with physicians, pharmacists, and specialty pharmacy providers with respect to beneficiaries’ benefits and therapeutic interventions, and reviewing/evaluating the health surveys and utilization data for program management and development. The Clinical Prior Authorization Pharmacist will coordinate with Clinical Account Executives and Program Managers to enhance their support and understanding of related Pharmacy Benefit Management (PBM) programs. Additionally, the Clinical Prior Authorization Pharmacist will develop and maintain appropriate clinical, evidence-based documentation that supports PBM programs. The primary functions involve ensuring that Navitus is able to provide clinically sound programs and medications in the most cost-effective manner and utilize technology to implement on-line PBM programs. The Clinical Prior Authorization Pharmacist is responsible for providing information as it relates to Navitus clinical goals and is a primary resource regarding all clinical pharmacy questions.       Responsibilities:·         Responsible for support and input to clinical programs such as: Health Management, Drug Utilization Review, Formulary development, and Prior Authorization programs to encourage appropriate, high quality, cost effective drug therapy; and to identify opportunities for improvement in efficiency, accuracy, and appropriateness of the programs in place.·         Participate in the Coverage Determination (Certification, Prior Authorization, Medical Exception, Exception to Coverage, etc.) process be reviewing all requests which are not clearly approvable based on specified criteria (algorithms), making all coverage denial determinations, and identifying themselves by first name, title, and responsibility at Navitus in relation to drug utilization management program administration·         Continually monitor the quality and efficiency of the Coverage Determination process including coverage criteria, denial language, and communication with prescribers.·         Provide input to clinical content of new programs and for maintenance of existing programs. ·         Complete all annual URAC training requirements·         Responsible for participating in core teams working on new program/ product development.·         Facilitation of communication and education to clients, members, and internal staff regarding clinical daily issues and objectives.·         Provide support to operational departments on the implementation of various PBM programs and daily functioning in support of member/patient quality of care.·         Responsible for supporting / providing clinical expertise related to formulary decisions made by the Pharmacy and Therapeutics committee.·         May review health care survey data for Medicare Part D qualified participants and/or perform phone consultations with Med-D enrollees; aid in documentation of calls; designate enrollees for repeat interaction.·         Assists Customer Care, Client Services and other internal customers in responding to and resolving pharmacy-related inquires from members, clients, providers, or pharmacies.·         Maintain open lines of communication with other functional areas/departments·         Provide effective communication of Navitus’ vision, mission, values, goals, and policies·         Participate in multi-departmental meetings and committees to accomplish projects·         Responsible for staying current with clinical literature and guidelines, and relaying those to the program development core teams Qualifications:Education:    A minimum of a Bachelors Degree in Pharmacy or Pharm D.  Current unrestricted licensure as an RPh in the State of Wisconsin or the ability to gain reciprocity within 4 months of employment is required.   Experience:  Minimum two years clinical experience, or clinical or managed care pharmacy practice residency and 1 year clinical experience. Knowledge of PBM industry, formulary management, pharmacy claims and managed care principles and practices desired. Exceptional clinical skills and ability to apply sound clinical judgment to a variety of situations is necessary.  Proficiency in drug literature and clinical trial evaluation, including proficiency with electronic databases (e.g., Micromedex, Medline, Internet) preferred. Ability to reason and translate clinical information into a manner appropriate for clinical systems and clinical/non-clinical audiences. Emphasis on problem-solving skills, including identifying and accepting a challenging situation and creating and implementing a solution. Requires attention to details in order to assure projects are clinically, editorially, and systems accurate and can be operationalized.  Proficiency in MS Word, Excel, Power Point including tables, charts and figures preferred.  ",Clinical Prior Authorization Pharmacist /  Job in Appleton,Part Time,"Appleton, WI 54914",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Prior-Authorization-Pharmacist-529-Job-Appleton-WI-US-165317702.aspx?mescoid=2900462001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),79ea77bfacbbbf58c597e7128a62ed3b
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. As a Hospice RN Manager of Clinical Practice, you will:Abide by and demonstrates the company Mission – Vision – Values through both behavior and job performance on a day-to-day basis.Coordinate and oversees all direct and indirect patient/family/caregiver services provided by staff.Define and communicate expectations regarding quality provision of services and productivity to interdisciplinary team to assist them in continually improving all aspects of the Company’s services.Ensure Interdisciplinary Group (IDG) staffing meets requirements of the Company’s ratios per census.Interview and hire IDG members. Oversee and approve IDG schedules.Complete and conduct annual performance evaluations in a timely manner and completes any corrective action plans through the HR Department.Assure requirements and standards are maintained by all IDG members including productivity standards.Oversee maintenance of patient clinical records, statistics, reports and records for purposes of evaluation and reporting of agency activities ensuring all patient medical record documentation is present per the Company’s Policy and Procedures and in compliance with local, state and federal law.Responsible for management of pharmacy, DME, labor, mileage and supply costs within budget.Implement and ensure orientation for new personnel.Maintain the Company’s Quality Improvement Program in conjunction with Quality Manager.Ensure program is in 90% compliance to both comprehensive chart audit and annual program regulatory review.Ensure ADR’s are completed with 90% or greater payment rate.Attend A/R meetings and daily stand-up meeting.Participate as indicated in monthly Patient Care Department Report.Plan and implement in-service and continuing education programs to meet education and training needs of personnel as required.Participate in staff meetings, department meetings, team meetings, in-services, committees and other related activities as needed.Participate in evening/weekend call as required, conducting on-call services in a clinically competent and responsive manner.Serve as “Administrator On-Call” as required.Provide professional development for staff and positively motivates the team to achieve service and performance excellence in all areas of the program.Act as liaison to the corporate office and attend meetings as requested.Complete performance evaluations on a timely basisAdhere to and participate in Company’s mandatory HIPAA privacy program/practices and Business Ethics and Compliance programs/practices.Review and adhere to all Company policies and procedures and the Employee Handbook.Participate in special projects and perform other duties as assigned.  Required SkillsQualificationsBachelor’s degree and C.H.P.N. certification preferred.Registered nurse licensed in the state.Minimum of two years clinical management experience, including the supervision of nursing staff preferred.Minimum of three years hospice, home health or related organization experience preferred. Required Experiencekeywords: RN, Registered Nurse, Nurse, nursing, homecare, home care, healthcare, health care, home health, home healthcare, med surge, OASIS, ER, Emergency Room, ICU, intensive care unit, hospice, RN case manager, Medicare, visit nurse, admission nurse, skilled visit, case management, r.n., rn, acute care, Executive Director, homecare manager, home care manager, clinical director, clinical administrator, clinical supervisor, patient care manager, director of nursing, DON, DOCS, Field Case Manager, director of clinical services, RN manager, registered nurse manager, RN supervisor, Registered Nurse Supervisor, nurse management, nurse manager, RN director, Registered Nurse Director, hospice manager, hospice RN manager, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin.  Job LocationPleasanton, California, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Hospice RN Manager of Clinical Practice Job in Pleasanton,,"Pleasanton, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Hospice-RN-Manager-of-Clinical-Practice-Job-Pleasanton-CA-US-165225104.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,,2ba825a4d4b3e13cbeced90b832e8b89
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Outstanding Registered Nurse, RN - Pediatric Clinic - Opportunity at Minot AFB, ND!Come Join Our Team of health care providers at Minot AFB and experience the immense pride others have discovered in caring for Military Members, their Families and Retired Military Veterans!* Excellent Compensation & Comprehensive Benefits!* Full Time Position Days, Monday - Friday!* NO Weekends! NO Call! NO Holidays!* PTO! 10 Paid Federal Holidays! 5 Paid Family Days!* CME Stipend!* Malpractice Insurance Provided!DUTIES: The duties include but are not limited to the following:* Performs comprehensive health assessments of children from birth through eighteen years of age. Comprehensive health assessment includes obtaining a complete and accurate health history from the patient and/or parent/legal guardian; performing a complete and accurate physical examination; and administering selected measures of physical, cognitive, and psychosocial development in accordance with the standardized guidelines for specific measurement tool (e.g. DDST II).* Orders/performs selected diagnostic tests and procedures (laboratory and radiological) as indicated by the patient's condition.* Using the database obtained in the health assessment and diagnostic studies, interprets clinical findings and develops a complete, accurate differential diagnoses/health care problems list.* Identifies and appropriately uses available resources in meeting the health care and health education needs of patients and families, including but not limited to consultation with the pediatrician, other physicians, and allied health professionals.* Within the scope of practice, develops and implements health promotion, illness/injury prevention and therapeutic plans congruent with the client's diagnosis, health care problem or need. Provides developmentally appropriate anticipatory guidance education, and counseling to patients and their families.* Provide outpatient services for pediatric patients as scheduled by the Government.* Performs procedures for patients as scheduled to include, but not restricted to, venopuncture and bladder catherization.* Conducts immediate evaluation and management of emergency problems as they occur.* Coordinates patient care through a continuum and facilitates the achievement of optimal outcomes in relation to care, quality and cost effectiveness.* Ensures compliance with standards of care and practice in accordance with all established policies, procedures, and guidelines used in the medical treatment facility. Provides care within ethical and legal boundaries.* Assesses patients.* Effectively communicates and collaborates with a diverse group of people for the purpose of informing the healthcare team of plans/actions, for teaching/education to benefit the patient/family and organization. Effectively uses appropriate communication format in addressing professional issues.* Excellent oral communication skills for patient/family education and telephone triage of patients. Telephone and in-person assessment/evaluation includes the determination of optimal time and location for patient management (ER, Clinic, home care) and follow-up care as required. Prescribes and communicates treatment plans and patient teaching in accordance with established pediatric protocols.* Excellent written communication skills to perform accurate documentation, both written and electronic, of all activity in accordance with requirements.* Recognizes adverse signs and symptoms and react quickly in emergency situations.* Skilled in setting up, operating and monitoring specialized medical equipment such as IV infusion pumps, cardiac monitoring devices, EKG units, oxygen analyzers, nebulizers, and other unit specific equipment.* Completes orientation and competency verification programs in accordance with (IAW) unit guidelines.* Participates in the orientation and training of newly assigned personnel, as appropriate.* Encourages team building and enhances work knowledge by cross-training/augmenting other units as appropriate.* Serves and participates in committees, functions and other meetings as directed. Provides relevant and timely information to these groups, and assists with decision-making and process improvement. Participates in customer service initiatives, and medical readiness activities, designed to enhance health services.* Ensures a safe work environment, employee safe work habits and patient safety IAW regulatory agencies, infection control policies, and process improvement initiatives.QUALIFICATIONS:* Education : Have a BSN or ADN Degree in Nursing from an accredited institution.* Licensure: Maintain a current and unrestricted RN license to practice nursing in any state.* Experience: 1) Have minimum of 24 months of experience within the last 48 months in a primary care clinic setting. 2) Must have a minimum of 12 months experience in a pediatric setting.* Certification: Maintain a current BLS and PALs certification (American Heart Association – Healthcare Provider).* Must be a U.S citizen and have the ability to pass a background check/security clearance.* Other Required Knowledge: 1) Professional care theories, principles, practices, disease process and procedures. 2) A variety of pharmacological agents used in patient treatment, the desired effects, side effects, and complications of their use as well as the accurate administration of the pharmacologic agent, including dosage calculations as required. Knowledge of the administrative requirements for proper documentation of patient conditions including disease progress, acknowledgement of teaching, and follow up care. 3) Computer operations and proficiency in the use of basic word processing, data entry and automated medical records.SCHEDULING & STAFFING:* Usual duty schedule is an 8-hour shift between the hours of 0730 – 1630 Monday - Friday,to include an uncompensated one-hour lunch.* Nurses for the position must be comfortable with all ages commonly seen in the family practice and pediatric setting (3 days to 99 years of age).* This position requires the flexibility of rotation/cross-coverage to work in either a family practice clinic or pediatric clinic, depending on the needs of the MTF.",#NAME?,Full Time,"Minot Afb, ND 58705",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Pediatric-Clinic-Minot-AFB-ND-Job-Minot-AFB-ND-US-165185960.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2d43bec899abb18c9f492385f7b91471
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the only global provider of commercial solutions, Quintiles understands what it takes to deliver nationally and internationally. Our teams help biopharma get their medicines to the people who need them. We help customers gain insight and access to their markets and ultimately demonstrate their product's value to payers, physicians and patients. A significant part of our business is acting as the biopharma's sales force to physicians or providing nurses to educate patients or prescribers. With the right experience, you can help deliver medical breakthroughs in the real world.   We are excited to announce that at this time we are looking for a Nurse Educator to join our team of over 10,000 global field personnel supporting our pharmaceutical and biotech clients.  Nurse Educator  Patients are at the center of our business strategies. The Nurse Educator Program is an educational based program designed as a resource for patients living with auto-immune diseases that have been prescribed specific medications. Nurse Educators provide education about specific disease treatments, and resources to help patients better begin and manage their disease state and resources associated with their prescribed medication. Nurse Educators are responsible for participating in one-on-one communications with patients as well as appropriate medical professionals within the associated treatment process. Since the program is strictly educational based, Nurse Educators do not provide medical advice or work clinically within this role.   The Nurse Educator will:     Coordinate and facilitate the connection between patients and program approved, patient based resources. Provide direct educational training to patients on specific disease states, and assigned medication. Develop local Patient Advocacy opportunities by creating and/or supporting existing community networks and educational forums Support patient and provider educational speaker programs Provide patient-focused education to promote behavioral change for the empowerment of patients to improve specific treatment compliance Foster appropriate dialogue between patient and health care provider   Quintiles offers a friendly, progressive work atmosphere and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, life insurance and vision coverage, tuition assistance, bonus plan and 401(k). We look forward to the prospect of working with you! Please apply on-line at: http://www.quintiles.com/    EEO Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled     Job Qualifications:     Bachelor's degree Preferred BSN and/or RN licensure Current nursing license in good standing 5 + yrs clinical experience in healthcare to include hospital, home health, pharmaceutical or biotech Nurse educator experience preferred Bilingual in English/Spanish preferred Valid drivers license required Direct interaction with patient and support for persistence and compliance Knowledge of clinical data and pharmacology Demonstrated time management skills; planning and prioritization skills; ability to multi-task and maintain prioritization of key projects and deadlines Demonstrated effective presentation skills; ability to motivate others; excellent interpersonal (written and verbal) skills with demonstrated effectiveness to work cross-functional and independently Demonstrated ability to develop, follow and execute developed plans in an independent environment Demonstrated ability to effectively build positive relationships both internally & externally Demonstrated ability to be adaptable to changing work environments and responsibilities Fully competent in MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) and iPad technology Flexibility to work weekends and evenings Travel up to 20%   Additional Information:",Nurse Educator - Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, KS 66101",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Educator-Kansas-City-KS-4714-Job-Kansas-City-KS-US-164753029.aspx?mescoid=2500357001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,39bc4f73449bc0afe0956b67882eec8f
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Nurse Practitioners needed!We are a health service company looking for nurse practitioners to work in office. This position requires day-to-day duties that assist with all aspects of patient care, including diagnosis, treatments and consultations as part of a treatment team. Must have the ability to perform the important task of educating patients about preventative care. Must be able to perform telemedicine consultations for 50% to 60% of the day. Must be articulate, strong communication skills and possess tremendous organizational skills. Must be able to provide necessary certifications and credentials.Looking for qualified applicants to start asap!",Nurse Practitioners Needed ASAP!!!! Job in Fort Lauderdale,Full Time,"Fort Lauderdale, FL 33301",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioners-Needed-ASAP!!!!-Job-Fort-Lauderdale-FL-US-165179556.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),37cac4086bc02bfda2e529d9fb2bbcd6
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBrookdale St. Augustine 150 Mariner Health Way St. Augustine, FL 32086 Job #:055060Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Key responsibilities:* Provide direct care to residents following an individual service plan, treats each person with respect and dignity, recognizes individual needs, and encourages independence* Assist residents with activities of daily living to include: bathing, dressing, grooming, and toileting* Transfer residents to and from activities and meals according to their individual needs* Serve meals to residents in the dining room or their apartments* Observe and record changes in residents' eating habits, and reporting updates to supervisor* Foster a home-like environment throughout the community by encouraging independence and participation in activities, and providing emotional supportRequired Skills and Qualifications: * High school diploma or GED* Two years previous experience preferred* Must be able to pass a drug screen and background check* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Resident Care Associate Job in St. Augustine,Full Time Employee,"St. Augustine, FL 32086",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Resident-Care-Associate-Job-St.-Augustine-FL-US-165230312.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,80ec20712ae8185e77a822cbc1eb2bd2
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certified Nursing AssistantsDietary AideDietary CookDietitianLicensed Practical NurseRegistered NurseCall or apply in person:Fairmont Health & Rehab130 Kaufman DriveFairmont, WV 26554Phone: 304-363-5633Fax: 304-363-8247We are an equal opportunity employer that encourages workplacediversity This job listing brought to you by The Times-West Virginian",Nurses Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,26554,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Nurses-Job-US-165325295.aspx?ch=newsfair&mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e468fd8bff3e48f4a6d65b7c9d94a2b0
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"WellStar Named on the 2015 FORTUNE 100 Best Companies to Work For® List At WellStar we deliver world-class healthcare. Over 11,000 individuals work together to meet health demands and needs. To deliver world-class healthcare, we equip our facilities and team members with the best technology, resources, and education. We seek to improve the way we deliver care knowing each day holds more miracles, more life, more chances, more compassion, and more opportunities. Join the team named one of the Top 100 Companies by Working Mother Magazine    Nurse Manager OverviewOur Labor, Delivery, Recovery, Postpartum Nurse Manager is a registered professional nurse who provides leadership and management to our critical care unit(s). Responsible for providing service through the effective use of knowledge and skills to promote the creation of a center of excellence for staff recruitment and retention and clinical and business outcomes. Acts as the standard bearer on the unit and holds all participants accountable for the delivery of care and services through effective communication, observation, and the management and measurement of specific interventions/practices and their associated outcomes. Responsibilities include clinical, financial, human and material resources deployment and associated outcomes or goals. Our Nurse Manager serves as a chief retention and safety officer and ensures that safety and quality standards are upheld or met by effective use of data and technology to make decisions and proactively mitigates unnecessary risks for his/her area of responsibility. Responsible for creating and ensuring a desirable, safe work environment that enables the organization to meet or exceed its mission and goals. Models the way to foster communication and collaboration with physicians, staff, patients and other departments.  Role specific competencies, responsibilities, roles and functions are based on the Professional Practice Model, 5-Star Nursing. It is expected that all of our clinical nurses are licensed, knowledgeable and uphold the practice of nursing as outlined by the Georgia Professional Nurse Practice Act and implements the Scope of Practice and Code of Ethics Standards put forth by the American Nurses Association. As a member of the patient services team, it is expected the individual upholds the voice of the patient, system policies and procedures while supporting service excellence goals. Education:Baccalaureate degree in nursing (BSN) from accredited nursing school requiredMaster’s degree in nursing (MSN) preferred. If bachelor degree is not in nursing, MSN must be from accredited nursing school Licensure/Certification:Current/active license as a registered nurse in the State of Georgia requiredCurrent BLS card from the American Heart Association required on the first day of employmentNational certification in area of specialty preferred Experience:Two years of progressive experience in nursing management required  Skills:Excellent verbal and written communication skills and relationship building requiredKnowledge of the health care environmentLeadership that includes such skills as successfully implementing and managing a change processAbility to use systems and inspire/coach others to be successfulModel the way for professional practice; professionalism and teamwork/collaboration for self/department/medical staff; and possess necessary business skills to manage human and material resourcesMust be a continuous learner who understands health care financing, strategy, and operations for running a business unit(s)Effectively employ data and technology to support work processes and make decisionsSupports shared governance or shared decision makingManage the design and delivery of care that in based on evidence and focused on quality and safetyKnowledge of risk management and various accreditation/regulations/licensing requirements assuring that these are upheld while advancing industry standards through the achievement of goals by effective management and measurement of outcomes WellStar is a shining example of what happens when talented and passionate people dedicate themselves to making a difference in the communities we serve. Every time we treat, heal, and encourage a patient toward wellness, we achieve our mission and realize our vision.We are an equal opportunity employer.                                                                                                           Thank you for your interest in WellStar! ",Nurse Manager of Labor and Delivery Job in Douglasville,,"Douglasville, GA 30133",,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Manager-of-Labor-Delivery-Job-Douglasville-GA-US-165234159.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,,974eedb02f504e8c1e38f08567571284
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"MENTAL HEALTH ASSOCIATION OF SOUTHEASTERN PENNSYLVANIAJob DescriptionRecovery CoachREPORTS TO: Program Manager – Mobile Peer ServicesTheRecovery Coach provides flexible, community based services that are designed to promote the empowerment, recovery, and community integration of individuals who have severe mental health challenges by facilitating opportunities for individuals receiving service to direct their own recovery and advocacy process, by teaching and supporting the acquisition and utilization of skills needed to facilitate the individual’s recovery, promoting the knowledge of available service options and choices and the utilization of natural resources in the community, and helping facilitate the development of a sense of wellness and self-worth.DIRECT REPORTS: NoneFLSA STATUS: ExemptNon-exemptENTRY LEVEL REQUIRMENTS [Education/Certificate/License/Skills and/or Experience]Minimum of a High School or GED Diploma; Associates Degree in a Human Services related field is preferredCredentialed as a Certified Peer Specialist.Minimum of three years of experience in a behavioral health work environmentMust possess a valid driver’s license.Must have access to a car to use for work on a daily basis.Must have automobile insurance coverage at the state requirement levels and current state registration. Demonstrated knowledge of the local Mental Health SystemDemonstrated ability to create, read and send e-mail through Google.Proficient in Microsoft Word Must possess basic computer skills to perform job duties including desktop computing, email, time sheet management, electronic health records, using Microsoft Office Applications, ADP and other relevant softwareMust have basic electronic communication and internet skills to gather information required for the program or program participants.Must be able to use new computer systems and/or software functions as they become available.PHYSICAL DEMANDSWhile performing the duties of this job, the employee is required to:Sit at a desk with ergonomically appropriate equipment Lift up to 25 lbs.Climb stairs (up to 3 flights stairs, multiple times per shift, to complete participant check-ins. – If applicable)Walk around multiple MHASP locations and in the community in areas that may not be handicap assessable May be required to have the ability to enter, exit and drive personal or agency vehicles and/or public transportation depending on the needs of your program.Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform his/her essential job duties.WORK ENVIRONMENTThe noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Reasonable accommodations will be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform his/her essential job duties.Must be willing to work overtime as needed.Must be able to work holidays as needed.",Recovery Coach - Trailguides Job in Norristown,Full Time Employee,"Norristown, PA 19401",,http://jobview.monster.com/Recovery-Coach-Trailguides-Job-Norristown-PA-US-164155736.aspx?mescoid=2700423001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,d3ff1dd3c0dc0d743c872ffdf976e61b
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"OPEN INTERVIEW DAYAre you interested in making a difference in the lives of individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities?Jewish Family Service Association of Cleveland (JFSA) is actively recruiting employees for our residential department for the following positions:Direct SupportProfessionals (DSPs)$9-10/hr.No experience necessary!DSPs provide skill development, daily personal care, cooking, cleaning, transportation and community recreation to individuals with intellectual and/or developmental disabilities in a group home in the Stow and Geauga areas. Seeking applicants for full and part-time positions able to work weekdays (2nd and 3rd shift) and weekends (all shifts available).Previous caregiving experience preferred.Also hiring Job CoachesThursday April 7, 20169:00am - 2:00 pm.Stow Public Library3512 Darrow Road, Stow, OH 44224Minimum Requirements: Applicants must be at least 20 years old Valid driver's license, transportation, auto insurance(liability), clean driving record Clear criminal record High School diploma / GED Able to pass drug test Ability to lift 50 poundsEqual Opportunity Employer and Drug Test EmployerJewish Family Service Association of ClevelandWE ARE JFSA. YOU ARE NEVER ALONE.www.jfsa-cleveland.org Source: Akron Beacon Journal",Direct Support - Open Interviews Job in Stow,Full Time,"Stow, OH 44224",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Direct-Support-Open-Interviews-Job-Stow-OH-US-165187921.aspx?ch=newsohio&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Entry Level,ab33545f127ff9f390f3da27360d3b80
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Surgical Care Affiliates (S.C.A) was launched in 1982 and we operate 185 surgical facilities, including surgery centers, surgical hospitals, and hospital surgery departments, in 34 states. We employ approximately 5,000 teammates and more than 7,500 physicians perform procedures in SCA facilities each year. More than 2,000 of these physicians, along with 45+ leading health systems are partnered with us. S.C.A is invested in the success in changing the healthcare market place and improving service models by generating new approaches. The company’s mission is to care for patients, serve physicians, and improve healthcare in America. It achieves this mission by focusing on its core values of clinical quality, integrity, service excellence, teamwork, accountability and continuous improvement. Position Description: The Gastroenterology (GI) Registered Nurse is responsible for assessing, planning, implementing and coordinating patient care from admission to discharge.  The GI Registered Nurse is responsible for the achievement of patient outcomes through implementation of critical pathways and in accordance with the mission, vision, and values of the facility.Accountabilities / Responsibilities:Ensuring a high standard of nursing care to patients attending the Endoscopy Unit, working within company policies and procedures.Providing technical assistance during diagnostic and therapeutic Endoscopic procedures, ensuring safe working practice.Maintaining personal contact with patients and relatives, being sensitive to their needs for courtesy, dignity and privacy and ensuring a friendly environment at all times.Maintaining timely and accurate nursing records and ensuring that confidentiality is respected.Storing, checking and administering drugs in accordance with established standards and guidelinesWorking with minimal supervision during endoscopic procedures, admission and recovery of patients and other related proceduresEnsuring the safe discharge of all patients from the Endoscopy unit.Maintaining a safe and clean environment within the clinical area in accordance with established standards and regulationsQualifications:GI experience preferred.Associates Degree ",Registered Nurse ( Hoag Endoscopy Center) Job in Newport Beach,Full Time Employee,"Newport Beach, CA 92663",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Hoag-Endoscopy-Center-Job-Newport-Beach-CA-US-165277556.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=7,,Medical/Health,a0050efca364e8987d81f7c8c8b13d51
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"ER Nurse ManagerAdvance your career! Our client, a well-respected and growing healthcare system, has engaged Parallon Workforce Solutions to secure a permanent ER Manager. This is an opportunity to join a top facility in the industry and reach your goals personally and professionally. The Parallon Perm Team partners with hundreds of healthcare facilities across the United States, so we can deliver results to you. Title/Unit: ER Nurse ManagerShift/Schedule: Days""Quality Health Care since 1927""Facility Description:We offer a comprehensive array of services including Cardiac Surgery, diagnostic and interventional cardiac catheterizations; endovascular surgery da Vinci® Si™ Surgical System; neurosurgery; family-centered birth services and neonatal care; cancer care; orthopedic and rehabilitation services; advanced digital imaging; inpatient and outpatient medical and surgical care; intensive, intermediate and coronary care; and a 24-hour emergency department with 85,000 visits a year. ER Nurse Managers allocate resources to promote efficient, safe and companssionate nursing care based on current standards of practice. Specific Qualifications: Manager - MUST have a BSN or MSN and MUST have 5 years experience in the ED with ACLS, PALS, BLS,and CEN.Interested candidates please send resume in Word format to Please reference job code 12351 when responding to this ad.",ER Nurse Manager Job in Dover,Full Time Employee,"Dover, DE",,http://jobview.monster.com/ER-Nurse-Manager-Job-Dover-DE-US-165222570.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,c3a501e7201e9bea4a4cb3d014cba213
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Berkshire Homecare is 18 years young and provides services and hires STNAs and HHAs in Lorain and Western Cuyahoga County. Berkshire provides personal care, light home making, assistance with ADLs for seniors and others. Quality is important to our to the clients we serve and to Berkshire Homecare. Berkshire is currently hiring a Home Health Scheduling coordinator or recruiter assistant for the personal care side of our business. The home health scheduling coordinator/ recruiter assistant applicant will have at least one-year current scheduling or recruiter experience or strong/ savvy experience in one of these areas: home health care recruiting, nursing home facility staffing or recruiting, large private duty company or a busy medical environment.Primary abilities will be:Building positive relationships with clients and STNAs and HHAsAbility to solve puzzles provide creative fact based solutionsProfessional communications internally and with external sourcesPossess excellent phone, communication and documentation skillsUnderstand that customer service is a high priorityWorks well in an office environment.Excellent computer skills are important for this positionAt least your year experience in scheduling or recruitingProficient with filing, scanning, entering documentation, follow up with employees and clients.Primary responsibilities will be:Responsible for scheduling and assisting with recruiting STNAs and HHAs in a courteous manner.Verifies and inputs appointment / caregiver information in a timely and accurate fashion.Handles a wide variety of inquiries regarding appointments and services and requirements.Ensures department productivity standards are met/exceeded.Maintains up-to-date knowledge of computer systems and policies and proceduresPerforms other duties as assigned.This role encounters Protected Health Information (PHI) as part of regular responsibilities. Employees must abide by all requirements to safely and securely maintain PHI for our patients.Office hours are Monday through Friday 8am to 4pm.The right candidate will receive a competitive salary and work in a family centered office.RequirementsAt least one year experience in home health scheduling / HR administrationClear background checkAble to pass a drug screenReliable car necessaryBilingual in Spanish a plusBerkshire is an EOE employer",Home Health office / Scheduler or Recruiter Assistant-  yr exp Job in Rocky River,Full Time,"Rocky River, OH 44116",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Home-Health-office-Scheduler-or-Recruiter-Assistant-1-yr-exp-Job-Rocky-River-OH-US-165263860.aspx?mescoid=3900660001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),da9aaa266176bb66add86a572621008e
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Home Instead Senior Care in Skokie is seeking a registered nurse with managerial skills to join our office team.  The right person will be someone with a passion to care for the elderly, make a difference in the lives of seniors, and provide peace of mind to their families. Come work for a company that’s making a difference!  We help seniors age in place by providing private caregivers, all of which are company employees.  In this role, you’ll manage a team that provides seniors with personalized, quality care.  At Home Instead Senior Care, we’re enhancing the lives of aging adults and their families every day. Our care is provided by non-medical caregivers and CNAs, on both an hourly and live-in basis. Because we are primarily a private pay service, we do not deal with Medicare or health insurance, and our paperwork is minimal. Job RequirementsOur Registered Nurse Manager is the quality control element of our team.  Working closely with our client services, staffing, and human resources team members, the Registered Nurse Manager will:Develop, review and revise care plans in collaboration with CAREGivers, Family and Physicians as neededVisit clients to evaluate their initial needs and monitor changes in their care needsManage Field Supervisors who conduct Quality Assurance visitsReview and approve all client care plansProvide training to our caregivers in areas like personal care, transferring and dementia The right person will be a great communicator, have a caring attitude, and be a team player.  If this describes you, we'd love to meet you! This Registered Nurse Manager position offers the following competitive salary and benefits:·         $70,000 - $85,000 salary range depending on experience·         Quarterly Incentive Bonus·         401k ·         Health, dental, vision, life and disability insurance·         Paid Time Off ·         Use of a company car, company cell phone and iPadWork a regular schedule of 40 hours per week, no 12 hour or overnight shifts!",Registered Nurse (RN) Manager Job in Skokie,Full Time,"Skokie, IL 60077",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Manager-Job-Skokie-IL-US-164948292.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=13,"70,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /yearQuarterly Incentive Bonus",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),6c0eaa3cf7bab49e06567d19f26dcc25
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you ready to become a part of some amazing nursing teams?  If yes, then come join our fun, lively team of nurses at The Gardens on University AND YOU WILL BE ELIGIBLE FOR OUR $10,000 LPN SIGN ON BONUS.  Our center offers a family atmosphere as well as a full continuum of services and care focused around each individual in today’s ever-changing health care environment. APPLY TODAY and you can be working at on our 5 star, award winning center soon! http://www.gardensonuniversityskillednursing.com In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:·         -Career Advancement opportunities·       -  Employee Recognition and Center Based Incentives·         -Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr·         -Competitive Wages·         -Comprehensive Benefit Package, including:o   FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for any FT Nurse hiredo   Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/montho   401(k) Retirement Programo   Paid Time Off Program At our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.·         With an environment focused on quality care, your input is important. Helping to achieve excellence, individuals with high standards and accountability for individual and team performance are embraced.At our center, you will be able to grow your career·         We regularly promote from within. Our employees are made aware of opportunities within our health centers to help further their development and experience.At our center, we provide support and resources ·         We have many resources available to those working throughout our center, offering you the right tools to do your job well.At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills·         We invest in you! Training and continuing education are encouraged to promote skill development.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans·         We offer a competitive compensation and industry leading benefits package.  POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the RN Unit Manager / DON, a Licensed Practical Nurse/Licensed Vocational Nurse performs as a licensed care giver and assumes responsibility and accountability for assigned residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through coordination, implementation, and evaluation of the resident’s/patient’s plan of care.  The LPN/LVN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants.  Follows all Center policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff.   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.       Supervisory Responsibilities·   Makes daily work assignments.·   *Directs the work of employees.·   Schedules lunch and rest breaks.·   Authorizes early departure from work.·   Authorizes overtime.·   Reassigns employees from one area to another area as facility needs dictate.·   Prepares written evaluations of assigned employees.·   Enforces facility policies with authority to issue Disciplinary Action Reports as needed.·   Authority to suspend employees for rules violation.·   Initials time records to authorize variances.·   Interviews applicants that will be assigned to his/her area of responsibility.·   Receives and handles employee complaints.·   *Participates in training programs and assists in orientation of new staff.2.       Provides the following nursing functions:·   *Makes frequent rounds to monitor resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.·   *Provides direct resident/patient care, including medication administration.  Makes observations, records and reports to the appropriate person any symptoms, reactions and changes in resident/patient condition.·   Reviews care plans daily to ensure that appropriate care is being given.·   Keeps physician informed of resident/patient conditions.·   Receives and transcribes physician’s order to resident/patient charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·   Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner reflecting the care provided and the resident’s/patient’s response to that care.·   Gives/receives nursing report at shift change.·   Completes all reports and forms as required.·   Participates in Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) meetings as requested.·   Follows all controlled drug policies and procedures as required.·   Follows locked medication room and medication cart policies and procedures as required.·   Ensures assigned work areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.·   Assures charges are accounted for on all chargeable items.·   Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.3.       *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center Health Services, Inc.’s Corporate Compliance Program.4.       Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.5.       *Attends and participates in in-service training, performance improvement (“PI”) committees and other meetings as scheduled and directed.6.       Follows facility dress and hygiene policies.7.       Safety·   Knows and follows facility rules.·   *Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·   Follows facility smoking policies.·   Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents/patients, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·   Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·   *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents/patients, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·   Uses required protective equipment.·   Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.8.       Resident Rights·   Knows Resident Rights.  Helps the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·   Reports resident complaints to management.·   Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.9.       HIPAA·   Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·   Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee.·9.            HIPAA•             Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.•             Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).•             Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee. Other Duties: •             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Licensed in the state as a LPN. Experience: Experience in giving medications to a large group of residents. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Able to use necessary supplies and equipment (feeding pumps, oxygen, treatment trays, medication cart, etc.). Able to calculate drug dosage. Meets all health requirements imposed by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff. Able to read, write, speak and understand English.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word,E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, twisting, pushing and pulling. Tasks marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities. All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents/patients. Lifting and/or transferring some residents/patients will require use of a lifting device and/or assistance of other staff.",LPN $,Full Time,"Spokane, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/LPN-10-000-SIGN-ON-The-Gardens-Job-Spokane-WA-US-165300371.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=9,,,cabdec4785c0c9d8551181db5dc2d7f9
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Arkansas Department of Human Services (DHS) is the state's largest agency with 8,200 employees working in 86 county offices serving more than one million people. Employees work in 10 major divisions and five support offices to provide services to Arkansas citizens. DHS is seeking to fill thirteen (13) Licensed Practical Nurse positions in Benton, AR (Saline County). The Licensed Practical Nurse is responsible for providing direct nursing care to patients in private homes, hospitals, clinics, and residential institutions. This position: Monitors patient's condition by checking vital signs, measuring food and liquid intake and output, responding to call lights or patients' requests for assistance, and making rounds to observe patients. Provides direct care to patients, including caring for colostomies and tracheotomies, mixing medications and food, inserting feeding tubes, catheterizing patients, and performing other nursing procedures as directed. Documents and administers medications and treatments, changes in patient's condition or behavior, responses to care, and daily activities. Administers injections and oral medications as directed by physician. Obtains specimens for laboratory analysis by swabbing or other means. Instructs patients and their families how to care for patients medical needs, including catheter and colostomy care, bowel program techniques, insulin injection, personal hygiene, and skin care. Assists doctor in clinic by gathering information on patient's needs and informing doctor, dressing and undressing patients, assisting with medical procedures, and transcribing doctor's orders. Notifies next shift of each day's events, including patient progress, behavioral problems, and new orders. Performs other duties as assigned. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSLicensure by the Arkansas State Nursing Board as a Licensed Practical Nurse in accordance with ACA 17-87-304. MASS HIRE EVENTThese 13 positions are advertised for a mass hire event, which will take place on Friday, April 1, 2016. When applying, select Saline County as the county you are interested in working. Position number: CONTINUOUS APPLY ONLINE AT HTTP://WWW.ARSTATEJOBS.COM (Search & Apply for the CONTINUOUS Licensed Practical Nurse with Saline) Like us on Facebook follow us on Twitter for more great DHS career opportunities!",Licensed Practical Nurse- Benton,"Full Time, Employee","Benton, AR 72018",,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-Benton-AR-Job-Benton-AR-US-165221111.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,69add17170e97201a6de74a3b9ceb5e2
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:23:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Registered Nurse, you will: Provide admission, case management, and follow-up skilled nursing visits for home health patients.Administer on-going care and case management for each patient, provide necessary follow-up as directed by the Clinical Manager.Confer with physician in developing the initial plan of treatment based on physician's orders and initial patient assessment.  Provide hands-on care, management and evaluation of the care plan and teaching of the patient in accordance with physician orders, under Clinical Manager's supervision.  Revise plan in consultation with physician based on ongoing assessments and as required by policy/regulation.Coordinate appropriate care, encompassing various healthcare personnel (such as Physical Therapists, Occupational Therapists, Home Health Aides and external providers).Report patient care/condition/progress to patient's physician and Clinical Manager on a continuous basis. Implement patient care plan in conjunction with patient and family to assist them in achieving optimal resolution of needs/problems. Coordinate/oversee/supervise the work of Home Health Aides, Certified Home Health Aides and Personal Care Workers and provides written personal care instructions/care plan that reflect current plan of care.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Discharge patients after consultation with the physician and Clinical Manager, preparing and completing needed clinical documentation.Prepare appropriate medical documentation on all patients, including any case conferences, patient contacts, medication order changes, re-certifications, progress updates, and care plan changes.  Prepare visit/shift reports, updates/summarizes patient records, and confers with other health care disciplines in providing optimum patient care.Required SkillsQualificationsDiploma, Associate or Bachelor Degree in NursingMinimum of one year nursing experience preferredStrong med surg, ICU, ER, acute experienceHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse,  Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVA Job LocationHickory, North Carolina, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Registered Nurse Job in Hickory,,"Hickory, NC",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Registered-Nurse-Job-Hickory-NC-US-165225282.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,,33fa95c1eb522ff227605db0c52512a5
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Established Staffing Company contracted with multiple home health agency for medicare and non-medicare visits seeks PT/PTA choose your area of coverage for on going evaluations and supervisor visit and treatment for Home Care visits in Palm Beach,Martin and St. Lucie Counties, Part time/Full time rates are competitive, New Grads welcome! Growing and more work than we can handle. Please Contact Tori (Office Manager) by Email, Cell or Fax resume Fax: 561-370-3090 Cell:561-601-6705",Physical Therapist Job in Wellington,Per Diem,"Wellington, FL 33414",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-Job-Wellington-FL-US-164382523.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=2,Compeitive,Entry Level,6d772dbf081a2e274364dc209e859a19
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY: Under the direction of Vice President of Clinical Services, the Clinical Pharmacist provides internal and external support to customers with a focus on quality, cost savings, and safety. The Clinical Pharmacist supports assigned clients by monitoring client pharmacy benefits and trends specific to client need.  ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Clinical Program Management and Support ·         Prior authorization oversight·         Drug Utilization Reviews·         Support programs to Identify, measure initiatives designed to achieve outcomes of improved health, reduced cost trend, and improved member experience.·         Clinical program support aimed at increasing early detection of disease and active disease models through clinical data including medical and pharmacy claims data, member surveys, other physician and self reported data.·         Clinical program analysis, informatics, and value/impact quantification·         Provide clinical support to internal and external customers as needed including literature and study evaluation·         On-sight clinical support for clients and members providing counseling and support·         Providing assistance to other department members with various projects·         On-call coverage as needed·         Additional duties and projects as assigned by the Vice President of Clinical Services   QUALIFICATIONS: ·         Doctor of Pharmacy/Pharm. D.·         Analytical and account management skills·         Working knowledge of health/disease management ·         Good writing and communication skills·         Experience with patient consultations·         Proficient in PC based software including Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint).·         Travel required·         Maintain valid driver’s license",Clinical Pharmacist Job in Bonita Springs,Full Time,"Bonita Springs, FL",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Pharmacist-Job-Bonita-Springs-FL-US-163137543.aspx?mescoid=2900462001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9bb6298d46037f5af23cd77300a8327f
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bayfront Health Port Charlotte - Port Charlotte, FL Medical Technologist - FT Qualifications:Bachelor's Degree plus completion of accredited Medical Technology programMinimum two (2) years experience as a Medical Technologist in a hospital laboratory preferredNationally recognized certification as a Medical Technologist (ASCP or equivalent)Licensed in the State of Florida as a Medical Technologist in all 5 areas (Hematology, Chemistry, Serology, Microbiology, and Immunohematology) or eligible.Experience with SCC SoftLab Laboratory Information System a plusMonitor Point of Care PerformanceTeach new staff Point of Care MethodsRecord / Document educational sessionsReview results & documentation of Point of Care testsPrepare Lab for Point of Care inspectionsDevelop & implement policiesMaintain detailed recordsFounded in 1962, growth and community involvement continue to be prominent themes at Bayfront Health Port Charlotte with over 40 years of service in Charlotte County. Founded by a group of local physicians who were passionate about serving the city's expanding population, Bayfront Health Port Charlotte's original 50-bed hospital opened on June 4, 1962. Since then, this small, one-story community hospital has grown into a 254-bed Joint Commission Accredited full service hospital that is appropriately known as: Your Hospital for Life. Bayfront Health Port Charlotte is committed to caring for people throughout their cycle of life, including welcoming newborns, preventing illness, providing acute care, managing declining health, and ensuring compassionate care for the dying. Recognized locally as a leading health care provider, Bayfront Health Port Charlotte is large enough to offer the full-continuum of care that you and your family need, but small enough to provide the personal attention that you and your family deserve",Medical Technologist - FT Job in Port Charlotte,Full Time,"Port Charlotte, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Technologist-FT-Job-Port-Charlotte-FL-US-165216090.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0abaf69a4204083ec3318844957e6126
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYEarly Symptom Intervention/Conditioning Specialist coordinates ESI, Work Conditioning and assessment programs for manufacturing employees to increase their ability to perform their job duties and decrease risk of injury.  This position requires employee who will take initiative and be detail oriented.  Excellent presentation, interpersonal, and computer skills are required.    ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESDuties and responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. Implement wellness initiatives, including incentive-based programming, lunch and learns, health education, and health promotions. Assist Safety Department, Medical Staff, and Production team to assess risks and determine ergonomic solutions.   Provide class instruction for team members for general conditioning, work conditioning, return to work program, and pre-shift stretching. Implement and evaluate programs designed to limit risks to workers, including assessment of at-risk body postures, implementation of self-care techniques, and individual coaching. Partner with Safety, HR, Health Services, and Shops regarding countermeasures, process/element changes, body postures, TM development. Collect data on work environments and injury data for analysis by Safety and Health Services. Supervise exercise floor to ensure safety of participants and proper use of exercise equipment. Coordinate work conditioning calendar and work conditioning follow up appointments with other department managers. Ensure that work environment allows employees to maximize their comfort, safety, and productivity. Initiate and implement the Ramp Up return to work program. Assist with investigating unsafe working conditions, study possible causes, and recommend remedial action. Work with Safety and Health Department to implement and enforce standards. Apply injury prevention techniques including group lecture, individual coaching, and follow up. Comply with established operational policies and procedures.  Fulfill all other duties as assigned by supervisor.  SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIESThis position has no supervisory responsibilities  QUALIFICATIONSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEThis position requires a minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in Kinesiology, Exercise/Sports Science, Health Promotions or related field.  Must have effective organizational and communication skills, and be proficient with computers and programs. PHYSICAL DEMANDSThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk, and reach with hands and arms.  The employee is regularly required to communicate audibly to a large group.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.   WORK ENVIRONMENT  The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.",Early Symptom Intervention Specialist - San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78264",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Early-Symptom-Intervention-Specialist-San-Antonio-TX-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-164644995.aspx?ch=courierpress&mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,83ed1d61a7ea2baf2f415d8ad140c5a8
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:16:58:21,No,jobs.monster.com," If you are interested in applying for this job opportunity, please email your resume in Word format to sarah.ayala@parkerlynch.com and put “Payroll Specialist” in the subject line. Emailed resumes will have priority consideration over online applications.  Our client, a rapidly growing company is seeking an experienced Payroll Specialist! The Payroll Specialist is primarily responsible for managing payroll processing for a large company. The ideal candidate will have experience processing payroll for 1,500+ employees along with at least two plus years of experience.  Casual work environmentWork with a team of great peopleFlexible work timesCompetitive Base Salary  Responsibilities: Payroll processing for 1,500+ employees in multiple states for both union and non-union employees.Performs duties associated with the overall administration of the company’s payroll function Prepare and maintain accurate payroll records and reportsTime and attendance auditing and collection of time for payroll processingProcess verifications of employment when needed  Qualifications: 5+ years of full-cycle payroll processing experience (required)Payroll processing for minimum of 1,500+ employees in multiple states Associates or Bachelor’s degree preferred  For immediate consideration, please email your resume in Word format to Sarah.Ayala@ParkerLynch.com with “Payroll Specialist” in the subject heading Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",Payroll Specialist (Union experience) - Oak Brook,Full Time Employee,"Villa Park, IL 60181",,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Union-experience-Oak-Brook-IL-Job-Villa-Park-IL-US-167499189.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=3,,Human Resources,f326563b58e647512202de0ceaa6aaf8
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:17:48:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Job duties:- Proactive nature with ability to effectively handle multiple tasks efficiently. - Strong MS Office skills including: Word, Excel, Outlook etc. - Good verbal and communication skills. - Professional appearance. - Strong organizational skills. - Must be able to establish priorities & follow through on them. - Follow & manage each office transaction from start to closing. - General department office duties like answering phones, scanning,typing, mailing, binding, filing, faxing, office and emailing. - Provide another set of eyes for proofreading documents. - Maintain and prepare listing and selling packages Requirements:Education: High School DiplomaExperience and skills: experience maintaining a high level of confidentiality- experience with Microsoft word, Excel, Powerpoint,Outlook We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1037356",Receptionist - North Austin Job in Austin,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Austin, TX 78759",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Receptionist-North-Austin-Job-Austin-TX-US-167394677.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=6,Up to $12.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),ba5f4cfd645647a8a1798f0c98ec2f08
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:17:49:44,No,jobs.monster.com,".SUMMARYResponsible for the preparation, disbursement, and accurate processing of the payroll in a multi-state environment using electronic payroll and time and attendance systems. Supports the Senior Accountant in processing payroll. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESResponsible for all new hire/employee changes/terminations in systemReviews all employee deductions and direct deposit informationWorks with the benefits administrator to ensure accurate benefit deductions and record keepingReview system set up to ensure accurate payroll processingChecks all personnel time sheets utilizing an electronic time and attendance software product for compliance with policy, contract, state and regulatory requirementsReviews computed wages and corrects any errors to ensure the accuracy of earningsReviews all changes including benefit deductions to payroll prepared by Payroll ClerkMaintains accurate payroll records and employee files, including manual check logReviews and audits master file and pay data entries, and YTD totalsPrepares various labor distribution postings for review by Senior AccountantPrepares reports on monthly leave balances and accrualsHandles all garnishments, deductions, and Paid Time Off (PTO) accrualsWorks closely with Human Resources and Finance on all payroll related issuesReviews the accuracy of payroll deductions to payroll output documentsResponds to employee inquiries and requests regarding payroll mattersMaintains client confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidentialPerforms other duties and special projects as requested by managementSKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONSExperience with payroll outsourcing, Dayforce preferred, and Time and Expense systemsWorking knowledge of payroll best practices.Demonstrated proficiency processing and reviewing multistate payroll.Strong knowledge of federal, state, and local tax regulations.Ability to read and comprehend moderate to complex written and oral communicationAbility to analyze information and evaluate options to choose the best solution and solve problemsAbility to effectively present information one on one and in small group situations to customers, clients and other employees of the organizationAbility to work independently and as a groupAdvanced computer skills and proficient with MS OfficeMaintains a valid driver’s license and be insurable under company insurance provider/programRegularly lift and/or move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCEAssociate’s or Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Accounting or equivalent work experienceFive to eight (5 to 8) years of experience in multi-state payroll processing and tax filingsFundamental Payroll Certification or Certified Payroll Professional certification a plus EOE/M/F/Vet/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Drug Free EmployerSBA 8(a), SDB Certified, HubZone, Buy Indian Certified, Native American Tribally-owned Apply Online $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Payroll Specialist Job in Winnebago,Employee,"Winnebago, NE 68071",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Specialist-Job-Winnebago-NE-US-166321771.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4489c3fc7f2519fe7b73280d389ba48d
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:18:00:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Amazon, we're working to be the most customer-centric company on earth. To get there, we need exceptionally talented, bright, innovative and driven leaders. If you'd like to help us build the place to find and buy anything on-line, this is your chance to make history and be intimately involved in growing our business by leading and supporting new building growth.We are looking for a dynamic and innovative leader who will enable this growth through implementation and support of our high volume-hiring platform. Key to this mission is strategic, large-scale project management initiatives that will allow us to scale our organization for the future in a dramatic way. This role is both a strategic and hands-on leadership role, currently on our NAFC Workforce Staffing Team, supporting network wide growth of our Amazon Fulfillment Centers by initially functioning as a critical Staffing Specialist focused on high volume recruitment for existing and new Amazon Fulfillment Centers• Are you passionate about developing and preserving a positive relationship with candidates?• Does the development and delivery of exceptional training programs, which create staffing expertise in operations, excite you?• Do you believe that automation trumps manual processes every time.• Can you “think big” in the creation of processes and tools that are designed for global, long-term use?Successful candidates will demonstrate and be responsible for some of the following:• Create and drive innovative and scalable system, process and selection mechanisms to support our high volume hiring growth.• This role needs a leader that is exceptional at developing and driving critical people initiatives, large projects and providing great internal stakeholder and candidate customer support.• Driving network HR and Recruiting functional process excellence.• Design scalable new site launch processes to address both selection and recruitment challenges.• Support large scale recruitment events such as job fairs, direct hire events and other community events at new site locations.• Assist in developing and teaching internal manager interview skills network wide by conducting interview training to ensure consistency and a high hiring bar.• Report and follow up on metrics for all recruiting activities (non-exempt) for each member of the team.• Provide metrics inputs to various reporting decks; communicate key performance indicators to Amazon Fulfillment Centers in support of staffing objectives.• Lead and participate in our team efforts of driving and developing standard work through creating scalable, repeatable processes and platforms to successfully launch our buildings in a consistent fashion.• Serve as a critical mentor and influencer of a cross functional group of Sr operations and HR leadership, also serving as a liaison between corporate and NAFC recruiting teams and the NAFC Staffing Engine team.Amazon Operations and Distribution is a 24/7 environment and shifts may change due to business needs.Basic Qualifications:• 5+ years of large scale project management experience, with a focus on continuous improvement, lean principles and process standardization• Completed Bachelor’s Degree from an Accredited University• Authorized to Work in the U.S. Without Sponsorship• Ability to multi task and manage your workload in a rapidly changing environment.• MS Office Suite and strong analytical skill sets are required for the successful candidate• Travel up to 50% to NAFC locations is required.• Ability to work with all levels of associates and managersPreferred Qualifications:• Previous HR, Recruiting or 24/7 operations experience• Innovative, flexible and creative in recruiting efforts• Strong internal customer service focusAmazon is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer- Female/Minority/Disability/Veteran",Staffing Specialist - High Volume Hiring Job in Rialto,,"Rialto, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Staffing-Specialist-High-Volume-Hiring-Job-Rialto-CA-US-166335974.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=16,,Human Resources,0d3c8c326c0b84d2ccdf3daed54c428f
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:18:58:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Productivity Engineer Job #:  660424Apex Systems is looking for a Lead Productivity Engineer for one of our major financial clients. They are looking to interview and hire ASAP.Description: FS Productivity Engineer:FS Productivity Engineering is a newly created function for the Financial Services Division of our client. We are on the search for a Lead Productivity Engineer to join a dynamic, quirky, disruptive team dedicated to delivering innovative, customer friendly, and enabling solutions to increase productivity to over 7000 end points. The right person selected will partner with the Enterprise Engineering team for the strategy and direction of the Windows, Print, Desktop, Mobility and collaboration tool platforms for the client.  Your days will be full of researching, designing, developing, testing, delivering and setting the direction for Capital One’s FS Division platform; as well as, coming up with INNOVATIVE solutions to deliver our products within days of their release by our vendors and to resolve nagging issues that only the brightest can solve.  There will be ample opportunity to learn new approaches, methods, and technologies; and to work as part of a team that is made up of passionate, energetic, quirky, and team first individuals that want to make our products better.Responsibilities:• Architect, design, and develop capabilities, frameworks, tools, and roadmaps for the Microsoft Windows, Linux, Virtual Desktop, Mobility, Collaboration tools and Print products• Find ways to automate and expedite the delivery of our products in what will become a complex cloud service infrastructure.• Active participation in initiatives to support strategic business objectives• Remove Tech Goo from our environment no matter where it is found.• Adopt, embrace, and promote agile and rapid innovation practices with your peers.• Ensure all products conform to the highest architectural and engineering standards.• Champion ways to improve reusability, refine existing work-products for modularity, risk mitigation, and delivery.• Mentor, advise, and guide others, for the appropriate use of technologies, tools, and processes.Qualifications:• Innovator who loves technology and wants to apply it for the collective good of others.• Ability to deliver high quality solutions in a dynamic environment.• Understanding of DevOps practices and methods.• Ability to mentor a team of Platform and Software Engineers to help them adopt new practices and methods.• Understanding of agile/scrum/rapid innovation methods.• Possess strong analytical and problem solving skills; understanding how to mitigate an issue and then resolve it at a later point.• Excellent written and verbal communications with outstanding attention to details.RequirementsCommunication skills!!! Innovation ideas!!! SCCM Desktop Images AD Group Policy Windows 7 10 Desktop as a service/Amazon Workspace Microsoft Office 365/One Drive/Sites Mobility - iOS/Andriod/Apps Software Telephony PrintPositions: 1Location: Dallas\Plano, TXLength: 6 months, contract-to-hireEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Productivity Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Productivity Engineer Job #:  660424Apex Systems is looking for a Lead Productivity Engineer for one of our major financial clients. They are looking to interview and hire ASAP.Description: FS Productivity Engineer:FS Productivity Engineering is a newly created function for the Financial Services Division of our client. We are on the search for a Lead Productivity Engineer to join a dynamic, quirky, disruptive team dedicated to delivering innovative, customer friendly, and enabling solutions to increase productivity to over 7000 end points. The right person selected will partner with the Enterprise Engineering team for the strategy and direction of the Windows, Print, Desktop, Mobility and collaboration tool platforms for the client.  Your days will be full of researching, designing, developing, testing, delivering and setting the direction for Capital One’s FS Division platform; as well as, coming up with INNOVATIVE solutions to deliver our products within days of their release by our vendors and to resolve nagging issues that only the brightest can solve.  There will be ample opportunity to learn new approaches, methods, and technologies; and to work as part of a team that is made up of passionate, energetic, quirky, and team first individuals that want to make our products better.Responsibilities:• Architect, design, and develop capabilities, frameworks, tools, and roadmaps for the Microsoft Windows, Linux, Virtual Desktop, Mobility, Collaboration tools and Print products• Find ways to automate and expedite the delivery of our products in what will become a complex cloud service infrastructure.• Active participation in initiatives to support strategic business objectives• Remove Tech Goo from our environment no matter where it is found.• Adopt, embrace, and promote agile and rapid innovation practices with your peers.• Ensure all products conform to the highest architectural and engineering standards.• Champion ways to improve reusability, refine existing work-products for modularity, risk mitigation, and delivery.• Mentor, advise, and guide others, for the appropriate use of technologies, tools, and processes.Qualifications:• Innovator who loves technology and wants to apply it for the collective good of others.• Ability to deliver high quality solutions in a dynamic environment.• Understanding of DevOps practices and methods.• Ability to mentor a team of Platform and Software Engineers to help them adopt new practices and methods.• Understanding of agile/scrum/rapid innovation methods.• Possess strong analytical and problem solving skills; understanding how to mitigate an issue and then resolve it at a later point.• Excellent written and verbal communications with outstanding attention to details.RequirementsCommunication skills!!! Innovation ideas!!! SCCM Desktop Images AD Group Policy Windows 7 10 Desktop as a service/Amazon Workspace Microsoft Office 365/One Drive/Sites Mobility - iOS/Andriod/Apps Software Telephony PrintPositions: 1Location: Dallas\Plano, TXLength: 6 months, contract-to-hireEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Productivity-Engineer-Job-Dallas-TX-US-167072366.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2bf308de7aa9798514f8aa715e2ce8df
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:18:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Java Developer Location: Southlake, TX Duration: 6 Months (W2 - Contract-to-Hire) Qualifications:•        Strong experience in Java/J2EE.•        Strong experience with Spring in a backend environment•        Strong experience working with XML schemas and documents•        Experience in SOAP based Web Service development and Junit.•        Experience with application reverse engineering and refactoring•        Working knowledge of Maven•        Working knowledge of Object Oriented principles, techniques, Design Patterns etc.•        Experience with Agile - Scrum framework, VersionOne, TDD, Mocking frameworks, and GIT are pluses•        Excellent understanding of code quality, unit testing, and continuous integration•        Excellent interpersonal and communication skills (written as well as verbal)•         Must have a positive attitude, attention to detail, be a team player, possess good problem solving skills, and have a strong work ethic",Java Developer Job in Southlake,Full Time,"Southlake, TX 76092",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Java-Developer-Job-Southlake-TX-US-167048611.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,,af8dbd8411e1f7601399253de87e2cd2
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:19:45:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Please send resume in Word format if you are interested in this Messaging Project Manager / Migration Project Manager / Messaging Manager / Migration Manager opening in Cleveland, OH 44114. Client is looking for someone for 12-18 months to start immediately. Rate for this role is open and if out of state will have budget for travel reimbursement or all inclusive rate. Rate for this role will be anywhere in the $75-$125/hr range, all inclusive Client is looking for someone that has Managed or Project Managed Migration efforts. They need someone who has overseen Lotus Notes, Exchange, Office 365 migrations. Any Binary Tree exp will be a plus for this role. PM/Management/Lead experience and understanding the processes is required and will be more important that being hands on technical. They have hands on staff but need a PM If you are not interested please pass this job onto others. ",Migration Project Manager Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH 44114",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Migration-Project-Manager-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-167055529.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,75.00 - 125.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),9d29c3bf42104af5e2e20de75160160a
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:19:46:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Job Responsibilities:Developing professional that partners in a team environment or is able to independently evaluate, configure, implement, test and debug new IT applications/tools or significant enhancements/upgrades to existing IT applications/tools of moderate complexity.  Develop solutions across multiple disciplines and be responsible for explaining solutions and procedures.  Apply principles, theories and concepts and use methodologies, tools, documented processes and test procedures to complete projects related to moderately complex IT applications/tools. Provides day-to-day administration of IT applications/tools including user management, data entry, documentation, reporting and Tier 1 support. Engages infrastructure teams to address hardware issues/requirements. May engage in 3rd party vendor management.  Provides training, coaching and mentoring to end users. Minimum Requirements:Experience supporting Enterprise applications/tools such as Asset Mgmt, Ticketing, Monitoring & Surveillance, Privileged Access Management, Service Catalog, and Work flow automation.Experience supporting out of the box and in house developed applications/tools Experience in supporting applications/tools in UNIX and Windows environments on physical and virtual serversProgramming skills in languages such as Java, C#, Perl, or PHP. Experience with Web Services.Experience working with SQL and Oracle.Experience managing software vendors Bachelor’s degree or equivalent education and experience. 2+ years related experience.Job ID 44738Alternate Location: US-Louisiana-MonroeRequisition #: 44738 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",IT Systems Analyst  Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Systems-Analyst-1-Job-Monroe-LA-US-166960622.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=10,,,bfedee27be25b23ea665d1f40bec2214
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:20:57:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title:  Business Systems AnalystLocation:  Moorestown, NJ The Goshen Group is seeking a Business Systems Analyst for a billion-dollar healthcare company in Moorestown, NJ. The Business Systems Analyst is responsible for engaging with business owners and providing IT support for a specified set of business systems and support team. The Business Systems Analyst will utilize a solid understanding of assigned managed applications to oversee the implementation, maintenance, and support for such applications. Responsibilities:·         Perform related duties, as required or requested by Supervisor.·         Strong analytical and product management skills required.·         A good understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements.·         Develop and maintain business specific knowledge and associated business systems knowledge commensurate with applications working with.·         Provide second level application support by participating in the identification, troubleshooting, and resolution of application issues.·         Develop and maintain the technical skills necessary for application configuration and administration activities.·         Analyze requests for new applications and enhancements to existing applications for impact, cost, benefit, risk, and deployment requirements.·         Analyze application usage and make recommendations to improve performance and usability.·         Assists training and coaching of colleagues as appropriate.·         Support activities and staff involved with the delivery of support, maintenance, and implementation of new and/or existing applications.·         Maintain the coordination of projects, schedule and resources.·         Ensure the adequacy and appropriateness of processes surrounding current applications.·         Ensure prompt, high-quality resolution of end-user’s problems, questions, concerns, and issues.·         Complete user requests for basic data extractions and reports from responsible applications·         Coordinate with IT staff for more complex problems (2nd and 3rd level support issues).·         Review Incident Reports to identify ongoing problems or trends and to propose approaches to improving service.Qualifications:·         Four (4) year bachelor's degree in related area.·         Two (2) or more years of relevant experience with growing responsibilities.·         Competence in software required to perform job functions.·         Understanding of financial, accounting, or payroll business processes a plus.·         Ability to learn new technologies, software, and technical methodologies.·         Existing basic competencies in SQL a plus.·         Strong knowledge of subject-specific technologies.·         Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to discuss technical issues with non-technical audiences.·         Good analytical skills.·         Superior problem solving ability.·         Demonstrated record of strong interpersonal skills.·         Self-starter and team player who excels at building trusting relationships.·         Ability to use knowledge of applications and business process to fully support customer needs.    ",Business Systems Analyst Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19106",,http://jobview.monster.com/Business-Systems-Analyst-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-166281968.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=2,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),13ffd7c74636e173e451105d45cfb632
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:20:59:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Exodus Integrity Services, Inc, is a rapidly expanding technology company headquartered in Northeast Ohio. EIS provides quality services to our clients by instilling honesty, commitment, and hard work to find the most qualified candidates to fill each opportunity. We are currently looking for Help Desk professionals for our client in the Colorado Springs, CO market. If you are interested in joining a vibrant organization where you are valued and rewarded for your contributions, and you possess the qualifications listed below, please forward your resume and salary requirements.Requirements:- 2 or 4 year degree with a focus on technology with at least a 3.0 GPA. In lieu of a 3.0 GPA at least 1 year of prior Help Desk experience.- Strong communication skills- Passion for technology- No experience necessaryWe offer a competitive wage and benefits package (including a 401(k) plan, medical, dental, and vision insurances), in a terrific work environment.Exodus Integrity Services, Inc. is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer.About EIS:Since 1993, Exodus Integrity Services, Inc. (EIS) has brought hundreds of companies and thousands of talented IT professionals together. With over 120 years of combined industry and functional experience, the EIS team takes a consultative approach to identify client objectives and create practical initiatives that solve problems quickly and efficiently. We specialize in Consulting Solutions, Contingent and Direct Workforce Staffing, and Healthcare IT Solutions.",IT Help Desk Job in Colorado Springs,Full Time,"Colorado Springs, CO 80901",,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Help-Desk-Job-Colorado-Springs-CO-US-160743763.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=16,,,81d2109bbc5c1edc732e6c4bfe2ab423
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:21:47:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:RecruiterJob DescriptionThe Recruiter ensures that staffing requirements are met to identify, attract and onboard top talent to efficiently and effectively meet dynamic business needs. This position is responsible for working with various clients to assess hiring needs and interview candidates for positions.Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities  • Responsible for assisting with implementation and administration of recruitment programs    • Receive, screen, and file incoming resumes, background, and reference checks    • Conduct initial screening interviews, telephone interviews, and/or face-to-face interviews with prospective applicants    • Assist with recommendations to hiring manager on candidate hire, and partner with appropriate stakeholders to offer competitive compensation packages and facilitate negotiation with candidates    • Leverage various resources - internet, community organizations, print media, formal/informal networks, colleges, trade associations - to directly and indirectly source qualified candidates    • Ensure the maintenance of accurate and concise records and reports concerning all phases of the recruitment process, working within the Applicant Tracking System (ATS) and HRIS tools    • Maintain consistent standards for all applicants and ensure compliance with all local rules and regulations related to hiring and recruiting    • Promote the Company image to candidates and external service providers    Candidate Profile  • Bachelor's degree in related field and less than two years of relevant experience preferred   • Strong communication skills, both written and verbal    • Ability to multi-task, prioritize, and meet timelines on deliverables    • Proficient in Microsoft Office    • Self-starter, sense of urgency, works well under pressure, ability to work in high-velocity environment    • Sense of professionalism and ability to develop relationships    • Strong attention to detail    • Ability to handle and maintain confidential information    Careel Level Description  ● Performs routine assignments in the entry level of the Professional Career Band● Uses existing procedures to solve routine or standard problems● Typically requires a college or university degree or the equivalent work experience that provides knowledge and exposure to fundamental theories, principles and concepts● Develops competence by performing structured work assignments● Receives instruction, guidance and direction from others    Disclaimer   The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel working within this job title. Location:USA, Eagan, MNLanguage Requirements:Education:Work Experience:Time Type:Full time Additional Information:",Recruiter Job in Eagan,Full Time Employee,"Job Title:RecruiterJob DescriptionThe Recruiter ensures that staffing requirements are met to identify, attract and onboard top talent to efficiently and effectively meet dynamic business needs. This position is responsible for working with various clients to assess hiring needs and interview candidates for positions.Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities  • Responsible for assisting with implementation and administration of recruitment programs    • Receive, screen, and file incoming resumes, background, and reference checks    • Conduct initial screening interviews, telephone interviews, and/or face-to-face interviews with prospective applicants    • Assist with recommendations to hiring manager on candidate hire, and partner with appropriate stakeholders to offer competitive compensation packages and facilitate negotiation with candidates    • Leverage various resources - internet, community organizations, print media, formal/informal networks, colleges, trade associations - to directly and indirectly source qualified candidates    • Ensure the maintenance of accurate and concise records and reports concerning all phases of the recruitment process, working within the Applicant Tracking System (ATS) and HRIS tools    • Maintain consistent standards for all applicants and ensure compliance with all local rules and regulations related to hiring and recruiting    • Promote the Company image to candidates and external service providers    Candidate Profile  • Bachelor's degree in related field and less than two years of relevant experience preferred   • Strong communication skills, both written and verbal    • Ability to multi-task, prioritize, and meet timelines on deliverables    • Proficient in Microsoft Office    • Self-starter, sense of urgency, works well under pressure, ability to work in high-velocity environment    • Sense of professionalism and ability to develop relationships    • Strong attention to detail    • Ability to handle and maintain confidential information    Careel Level Description  ● Performs routine assignments in the entry level of the Professional Career Band● Uses existing procedures to solve routine or standard problems● Typically requires a college or university degree or the equivalent work experience that provides knowledge and exposure to fundamental theories, principles and concepts● Develops competence by performing structured work assignments● Receives instruction, guidance and direction from others    Disclaimer   The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel working within this job title. Location:USA, Eagan, MNLanguage Requirements:Education:Work Experience:Time Type:Full time Additional Information:",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Recruiter-Job-Eagan-MN-US-166359196.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=15,,Human Resources,967863a959821045ddae3292ca60fef3
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:21:48:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Graphic Designer in Chicago, Illinois 60603A Fortune 50 company is looking to fill a Graphic Designer Associate Position in Chicago, IL. Our client is looking for someone who is creative with excellent communication skills.  Job Description:The Commercial Banking graphic designer will be responsible for development and design of sales collateral material (forms, advertising, brochures, marketing sheets, direct mail campaigns, presentations, etc.) for all Commercial Banking businesses. Graphic designer will work closely with the market coverage team and business units to develop creative solutions for all marketing and promotional activities. Duties and Responsibilities: Work with internal stakeholders to understand business objectives and create effective marketing collateral. Produce a variety of marketing collateral using approved brand templates as well as original concepts following CB brand guidelines. Proofreading of materialsCoordinate print production with print purchasing resourceMaintain relationships with external design consultants  Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree in design or fine arts preferredMinimum 5 years graphic design experienceExcellent creative skillsExperience creating graphics for digital applicationsStrategic creative thinkerStrong project management experienceStrong interpersonal skillsOrganized with ability to multi-task in a fast paced environmentSelf starter Adobe CC (proficient)Microsoft Office (Word, Office, PowerPoint, Excel) (proficient)Mac OS (proficient)  If you are looking to further your career at a Fortune 50 company, then apply for this Graphic Designer Associate Position in Chicago, IL today!",Graphic Designer in Chicago,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Chicago, IL 60603",,http://jobview.monster.com/Graphic-Designer-in-Chicago-Illinois-60603-Job-Chicago-IL-US-166987328.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,5be0610bafb4f3d37ec37c71e0e3aff9
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:22:14:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Firm InformationReed Smith is a global relationship law firm with more than 1,800 lawyers in 26 offices throughout the United States, Europe, Asia and the Middle East.Founded in 1877, the firm represents leading international businesses, from Fortune 100 corporations to mid-market and emerging enterprises. Its lawyers provide litigation and other dispute resolution services in multi-jurisdictional and high-stake matters, deliver regulatory counsel, and execute the full range of strategic domestic and cross-border transactions. Reed Smith is a preeminent advisor to industries including financial services, life sciences, health care, advertising, technology and media, shipping, energy trade and commodities, real estate, manufacturing and education. For more information, visit reedsmith.com Position SummaryUnder general supervision and according to established policies and procedures, provides legal/general support to the firm's attorneys and their clients. Must be familiar with and observe the firm's established and closely monitored work procedures, policies and guidelines. Must maintain positive contact with attorneys (both the firm's and outside counsel), support staff, clients and vendors. Observes confidentiality of client and firm matters. This position is not limited to the functions and skills listed on this description and responsibilities may be revised as needed. Essential Functions Experience in drafting basic litigation pleadings, such as, Pro Hac motions, discovery requests, deposition notices and subpoenas; Assist with the filing of Motions and other court documents; Maintain various charts tracking the status of cases, matters and court and client milestone deadlines; Familiarity with and the ability to search court rules and service requirements; Highly motivated to complete assignments as given and ask questions as appropriate; Exercise excellent judgment including the ability to recognize and report on case discrepancies; Ability to interact well with attorneys, staff and clients; Demonstrated organizational, writing, and proofreading skills including the ability to effectively manage and report on short and long-term projects including document productions; Ability to efficiently track and meet team-established, day-to-day deadlines during core business hours. RequirementsEducation: Undergraduate degree and paralegal certificate, a plus; will consider candidate with comparable relevant experience in lieu of a paralegal certificate.Experience: Paralegal with at a minimum of 2-3 years of legal experience needed.Skills: Excellent verbal and written communication skills as well as the ability to work with individuals at all organizational levels. Ability to organize and prioritize issues and workload. The ability to work on projects independently or with little supervision. Flexibility and ability to adapt to constantly changing priorities. Exercising independent judgment and initiative. OtherEquipment To Be Used: Personal computer and other office equipment such as telephone, calculator, fax, machine, copier, scanner, etc.Typical Physical Demands: Manual dexterity sufficient to operate standard office equipment.Typical Mental Demands: Able to deal with stress associated with fast-paced work environment. Multiple priorities/tasks. Make judgment decisions and adapt to changing work situations. Grasp and apply new ideas. Communicate with various personalities at all levels.Working Conditions: Works in typical office setting. Occasionally called upon to work hours in excess of your normal daily schedule.No resumes accepted from agencies or JDs.Reed Smith offers a challenging work environment, business casual dress code and a total compensation package that includes a competitivesalary, flexible benefits program, tuition assistance, and generous 401 (k) plan.Qualified candidates only, No search firms. Reed Smith is an Equal Opportunity Employer",Paralegal - Financial Services Litigation Job in Princeton,"Full Time, Employee","Princeton, NJ",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Paralegal-Financial-Services-Litigation-Job-Princeton-NJ-US-167023617.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=15,,Legal,4accff82223b3fa3b306cbbf0b472dd7
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:22:54:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking: IBM Mainframe Application Support AdvisorDuration: 3+ month contract (possible CTH)Location: Plano, TXRole Responsibilities: CH PositionAbility to code new programs, unit test and do effective analysis and debugging on codes.Possess effective communication skill to communicate with customers and other team members.Prepares flow charts and systems diagrams to assist in problem analysis.Helps build up knowledge baseApplies knowledge and understanding of customer needs and other internal/external contactsDesigns, specifies, implements, and maintains systems.Designs, codes, tests and Documents software programs for systems of moderate to high complexity as per the requirements specifications.Understands customer requirements, develops and evaluates alternative systems solutions.Involved with resolution of complex software development issues that may arise in a production environment.Participates in the investigation of system requirements and assists in preparation of systems specifications including revising manuals, design of forms and computer output, and documenting user procedures.Analyzes problems, conducts root cause analysis and help in resolution of problems using defined problem management procedure and help in application support and maintenance of customer applicationsMUST HAVES: Must have good working knowledge and hands on experience with IDMS & ADSOMust have mainframe experience & Application Trouble shooting expertise.ITIL V3 certified.Technology: IBM Mainframe Network Database IDMS and Online region ADSO and CICS. COBOL, JCL, CA7, CA11, Endevor, VSAMMaterial management, Inventory management, Order supply chain Financial and Account Payable experience is a plus.6+ years of relevant experience or equivalent combination of education and work experience.About Experis: Experis is the global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We accelerate organizations' growth by intensely attracting, assessing, and placing specialized expertise in IT, Finance, Engineering, and Healthcare to precisely deliver in-demand talent for mission critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. | Visit www.experis.com to learn more.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",IBM Mainframe App Support Advisor Job in Plano,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Seeking: IBM Mainframe Application Support AdvisorDuration: 3+ month contract (possible CTH)Location: Plano, TXRole Responsibilities: CH PositionAbility to code new programs, unit test and do effective analysis and debugging on codes.Possess effective communication skill to communicate with customers and other team members.Prepares flow charts and systems diagrams to assist in problem analysis.Helps build up knowledge baseApplies knowledge and understanding of customer needs and other internal/external contactsDesigns, specifies, implements, and maintains systems.Designs, codes, tests and Documents software programs for systems of moderate to high complexity as per the requirements specifications.Understands customer requirements, develops and evaluates alternative systems solutions.Involved with resolution of complex software development issues that may arise in a production environment.Participates in the investigation of system requirements and assists in preparation of systems specifications including revising manuals, design of forms and computer output, and documenting user procedures.Analyzes problems, conducts root cause analysis and help in resolution of problems using defined problem management procedure and help in application support and maintenance of customer applicationsMUST HAVES: Must have good working knowledge and hands on experience with IDMS & ADSOMust have mainframe experience & Application Trouble shooting expertise.ITIL V3 certified.Technology: IBM Mainframe Network Database IDMS and Online region ADSO and CICS. COBOL, JCL, CA7, CA11, Endevor, VSAMMaterial management, Inventory management, Order supply chain Financial and Account Payable experience is a plus.6+ years of relevant experience or equivalent combination of education and work experience.About Experis: Experis is the global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We accelerate organizations' growth by intensely attracting, assessing, and placing specialized expertise in IT, Finance, Engineering, and Healthcare to precisely deliver in-demand talent for mission critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. | Visit www.experis.com to learn more.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Plano, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/IBM-Mainframe-App-Support-Advisor-Job-Plano-TX-US-167046545.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,5f540d1f733515ab44b0d97d888d9cab
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:22:55:56,No,jobs.monster.com," Human Resources Assistant– RosemontIf you are looking for a friendly work environment with a company that values its employees and offers career advancement potential, that this is the role for you!Duties include:•Professionally administer all incoming calls•Ensure phone calls are redirected accordingly•Greet guests in a professional, friendly, hospitable manner •Open and close visitor area •Manage Global Rosetta Stone language learning program •Coordinate visa related paperwork with immigration attorneys•Update ATS with recruiting costs•Prepare for periodic compliance mailings•Audit monthly vendor eligibility •Data entry for initial COBRA notices for new hires •Assist with open enrollment process•Create announcements for email communications •Assist with corporate wellness program administration •Coordinate food for meetings and manage coffee station•Process expense reports for HR leadership team•Process department invoices•Point of contact for ordering and maintaining supplies  Qualifications Bachelors of Art degree, preferably with a major in Human Resources Administration.Some experience in Human Resources preferred.Experience in HR administration, policies, Worker’s comp, and benefits preferred.Must be able to maintain confidentiality.  Must be effective in written and oral communication.Strong ability with systems including HRIS databases, Excel, Word, etc.Dependable to report to work at the scheduled time.Excellent attention to detail.Strong organizational skills and the ability to multi -task and work in a fast- paced, deadline oriented environment.Interested candidates should forward resumes to Lida Kiehl at lkiehl@flexexecs.com  ",Human Resources Assistant Job in Rosemont,Full Time,"Rosemont, IL 60018",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Assistant-Job-Rosemont-IL-US-165086808.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=15,,,40bc9b6e759b89685e1eaf8d23ac3765
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:22:59:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Human Resources ManagerAt SunEdison, we are looking for talented self-starters with imagination, creativity and vision. In addition, we are seeking individuals who are original thinkers, possess the drive to achieve quick results, and have the capacity to assume increasing responsibility in a highly successful global organization. Ideal candidates will have a passion for the renewable energy industry and desire to be part of a team that is transforming the way energy is generated, distributed, and owned around the globe.Responsibilities:Directs the planning, development, implementation, administration of human resource programs including employee relations.Advises company management in personnel policy and program matters, making or recommending appropriate decisions as consistent with strategic direction.Selects, develops and evaluates personnel to ensure the efficient operation of the function.Works on issues of diverse scope where analysis of situation or data requires evaluation of a variety of factors, including an understanding of current business trends.Follows processes and operational policies in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions.Acts as advisor to subordinate(s) to meet schedules and/or resolve technical problems.Develops and administers schedules, performance requirements; may have budget responsibilities.Required Qualifications:Bachelor's degree or an equivalent combination of education and experience.Five years of related work experience.Mid-level management experience.Preferred Qualifications:Master's degree.Five to eight years of relevant work experience.Experience as a second-tier manager.Energy sector or solar energy experience in utility, commercial or residential/small commercial environment.SunEdison is the world's largest renewable energy development company with a strong ""one company, one culture"" environment that allows you to innovate, expand your potential, and own your future. This environment encourages positive thinking, integrity, and a ""together as a team we win"" attitude. In addition to providing a climate for professional growth, SunEdison offers competitive salary, a comprehensive benefits program and a company matched 401(k) savings plan.SunEdison is an equal employment/affirmative action employer. If you need accommodation for any part of the employment process because of a medical condition or disability, please send an e-mail to RTI_SunEdison@adp.com *LI-ABCSunEdison is an equal employment/affirmative action employer. If you need accommodation for any part of the employment process because of a medical condition or disability, please send an e-mail to RTI_SunEdison@adp.com",Human Resources Business Partner Job in Belmont,Full Time,"Belmont, CA 94002",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Human-Resources-Business-Partner-Job-Belmont-CA-US-167022373.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),01286e60212ea3e9e9e8b4a8294e1b40
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:23:51:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Benefits Analyst Job – Downers Grove Do you have 2-5 years of experience in a Human Resources support role with a strong focus in Benefit Analytics? Are you the “go to” for benefits in your current role and are looking for that next step opportunity?  Please read on for an elevated benefits opportunity with a company in the western suburbs of Chicago.  You will be responsible for the administration and maintenance of company benefit programs and will support all benefit initiatives to include participation in third party surveys and analyzing benchmark data.  In return, you will receive a competitive salary, excellent benefits package with 401k match, and a schedule that emphasizes work/life balance.   As the Benefits Analyst your job duties will include:  Manage the day-to-day administration and maintenance of benefit programs in accordance with established policies and proceduresOversee the maintenance of department technologies and websites and assist in the design and implementation of new benefit programsEstablish and maintain effective relationships with benefit plan carriers to ensure superior performanceCoordinate communication of benefit information to human resources, managers and employeesAssist in completing benefit data analyses, program usage and effectiveness reviews  You are the perfect person if you meet the following preferences/requirements:  BA degree in Human Resources or Business Management + 2 years of relevant HR experience2-5 years of benefit analytics experienceExperience with HRIS technology platforms (ADP preferred)Proficiency in Microsoft Office Excellent customer service and interpersonal skills   If you are interested in joining a great company to achieve that next step in your career as a Benefits Analyst, please apply below!  ",Benefits Analyst Job in Downers Grove,Full Time Employee,"Downers Grove, IL 60515",,http://jobview.monster.com/Benefits-Analyst-Job-Downers-Grove-IL-US-167068403.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=4,,Human Resources,8f36fdd161956ed6d1f541a38d24ca3b
United States of America,US,06/May/2016:23:52:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking for a  SDS - System Admin   position with our direct client, which is a Fortune 50 company based in Cupertino. This is a 12 months contract assignment, the location would be Elk Grove, CA. Feel free to call me to (916) 760 7904 and email me at asma@introlligent.comDescription: The System Administrator (SA) is responsible for effective provisioning, installation/configuration, operation, and maintenance of systems hardware and software and related infrastructure. This individual participates in technical research and development to enable continuing innovation within the infrastructure. This individual ensures that system hardware, operating systems, software systems, and related procedures adhere to organizational values, enable resources to perform tasks, and meet various service level agreements. This individual will assist project teams with technical issues in the Initiation and Planning phases of our standard Project Management Methodology. These activities include the definition of needs, benefits, and technical strategy; research & development within the project life-cycle; technical analysis and design; and support of operations staff in executing, testing and rolling-out the solutions. Participation on projects is focused on smoothing the transition of projects from development staff to production staff by performing operations activities within the project life-cycle. This individual is accountable for the following systems: Linux, SAN Storages, Security, and Inventory systems that support SDS infrastructure; Responsibilities on these systems include SA engineering and provisioning, operations and support, maintenance and research and development to ensure continual innovation. Engineering and Provisioning Engineering of related solutions for various project and operational needs. Install new / rebuild existing servers and configure hardware, peripherals, services, settings, directories, storage, cabling, etc. in accordance with standards and project/operational requirements. Install and configure systems such as supports SDS infrastructure and applications. Develop and maintain installation and configuration procedures. Contribute to and maintain system standards. Research and recommend innovative, and where possible, automated approaches for system administration tasks. Identify approaches that leverage our resources and provide economies of scale. Operations and Support Perform daily system monitoring, verifying the integrity and availability of all hardware, server resources, systems and key processes, reviewing system and application logs, and verifying completion of scheduled jobs such as backups. Perform regular security monitoring to identify any possible intrusions. Perform daily backup operations, ensuring all required file systems and system data are successfully backed up to the appropriate media, recovery tapes or disks are created, and media is recycled and sent off site as necessary. Perform regular file archival and purge as necessary. Create, change, and delete user accounts per request. Provide upper tier support per request from various constituencies. Investigate and troubleshoot issues. Repair and recover from hardware or software failures. Coordinate and communicate with impacted constituencies. Perform hardware, software, and basic network troubleshooting as necessary. Maintenance Apply OS patches and upgrades on a regular basis, and upgrade administrative tools and utilities. Configure / add new services as necessary. Upgrade and configure system software that supports SDS infrastructure applications per project or operational needs. Maintain operational, configuration, or other procedures. Perform period",SDS - Linux Administrator Job in Elk Grove,Full Time,"Elk Grove, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/SDS-Linux-Administrator-Job-Elk-Grove-CA-US-167082120.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=6,,,175dab98d8df89189d8e4b7d7be9cad2
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Opportunity for Technical Consultant for  medical device company. This is a direct hire position in Northeast covering Philadelphia up to Albany New York so candidates are preferred to be located somewhere in the vicinity. There is a base salary and bonus potential. SummaryUnder general supervision, the scope of this field position is to assist the customer with on-site validations and provide technical training and support, including troubleshooting, for company products.  This position is also responsible for preparing and reviewing written laboratory validation study reports.  Assist Account Executives with evaluations, demonstrations and the activation of new accounts, retaining at-risk customers, maintenance of established accounts, and contributing to the growth of existing accounts.  Provide education of the clinical utility of company products in the laboratory and/or Point-of-Care setting as needed.  When not travelling, other responsibilities include developing and improving technical training materials, serving as company experts on the most current laboratory and Point-of-Care CLIA, CAP, COLA, and TJC testing requirements, and for maintaining a current understanding of the technical issues relevant to company products. Maintain a familiarity with the clinical issues relevant to company products.  Performance may be assessed using a combination of the On-TRACC Program, including open communication with management, customer satisfaction, account retention, account growth, AE satisfaction and other relevant criteria.  Requires at least 50% travel, and may average as much as 70% travel, occasionally with less than a week’s notice. Some weekend travel may be required.    Primary Responsibilities:GENERAL Proactively identify at-risk accounts to Technical Services and to the appropriate Account Executive/Regional Sales Director and recommend strategies and suggestions to retain such accounts.Follow standard Technical Services procedures for company documents.May functionally direct and mentor junior/new hire staff.Assist Scientific Affairs when necessary to present professional educational programs to medical and laboratory staff.Attend and participate in company and professional meetings, including conference and webinar calls.Communicate to peers new advances or changing trends identified in the healthcare marketplace.§  Obtain certification within the Vendor Credentialing requirements by being in compliance with current immunizations, required training, background checks and competency assessments.Understand administrative reporting responsibilities and maintain and submit accurate and timely reports.Submit accurate and timely expense reports in accordance with company guidelines, policies and procedures.Maintain and manage time, travel, and expenses within set corporate guidelines and policies using best practices as directed by the Regional Manager.Competent in computer operation including Microsoft WORD, PowerPoint, and Outlook.Maintain all customer information and calendar activities on salesforce.com.Perform other duties and projects as assignedResponsible for exhibiting professional behavior with both internal/external business associates that reflects positively on the company and is consistent with the company’s policies and practices.Display initiative in performing assigned tasks and accomplishing goals. SPECIFICProvide on-site customer assistance in the performance of validation studies in compliance with local, state, and federal regulations, including CLIA, CAP, COLA, and TJC, on all Alere products. Write and review with the customer, validation reports that include accuracy, precision and method comparison studies.Provide on-site technical and clinical training on all company products.Work with Technical Support to provide troubleshooting support as needed which may include additional customer training.Independently perform pro-active account follow up as assigned or as prescribed in departmental SOPs. Assist Sales and Clinical Consultants with in-servicing and continuing education in key accounts to ensure correct technique is maintained and that the medical/lab staff understands the clinical utility of the product(s).   Assist with product training of sales, marketing and technical service staff.Perform tasks as trained in an independent fashion, requiring minimal ongoing direction. Assist in the establishment of procedures.   Key Attributes and Success Competencies:·          Customer Focus – Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; establishes and maintains relationships with customersand gains their trust and respect acts with customers in mind. ·          Listening – Practices attentive and active listening; the patience to hear people out; can accurately re-state the opinions of others even when he/she disagrees. ·          Patience – Is tolerant with people and processes; listens and checks before acting; tries to understand people and the data before making judgments and acting. ·          Conflict Management – Steps up to conflicts, seeing them as opportunities; reads situations quickly; good at focused listening. ·          Problem Solving – uses rigorous logic and methods to solve difficult problems with effective solutions; probes all fruitful sources for answers; can see hidden problems; is excellent at honest analysis. ·          Functional/Technical Skills – Has the functional and technical knowledge and skills to do the job at a high level of accomplishment. ·          Organizational Skills – Must be highly organized in work setting, including multi-tasking.  Must be flexible in scheduling appointments.    Educational/Experiential background:§  A 4 or 5 year Bachelor of Science degree in Medical Technology or Respiratory Therapy from an  accredited college or university is required. (Respiratory Associate degree with accompanying RT certification from an accredited program may be acceptable with non-respiratory therapy bachelor degree).§  Registered Medical Technologist or Respiratory Therapist in state of residence.§  Minimum of 5 years continuous experience as a Medical Technologist in a clinical lab environment or as a Respiratory Therapist in a critical-care environment.§  Management, supervisory, or POCC experience preferred.§  Previous Healthcare Industry experience preferred.§  Advanced degrees welcome.§  Sales Experience preferred.  Preferred experience background:      5 years of medical technologist or respiratory therapist experience plus at least one year of related implementation or Point-of-Care-Testing experience required. Strong knowledge of the diagnostic industry.  Proven excellence in customer service, training and troubleshooting skills. Familiarity with cardiac care, point-of-care testing, infectious diseases and an understanding of sales is highly desirable.  Demonstrated ability to carry out assignments with minimal guidance in an accurate, dependable manner. Ability to work with a variety of people on multiple tasks is critical. Outstanding written and verbal communication skills are required, including a demonstrated ability to clearly and effectively teach complex subjects to a diverse audience.   If interested in being considered, please send resume and salary requirements to Ace Recruiters at resumes@ace-recruiters.com",Technical Consultant-Medical Technologist -Pennsylvania Job in Philadelphia,Employee,"Philadelphia, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Consultant-Medical-Technologist-Pennsylvania-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165176903.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,"70,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year25K bonus annually",Experienced (Non-Manager),fa47202af273e21b798fce4302f28ac5
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress.Education: Minimum of an Associate's Degree and Registered Nurse license required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse,"Full Time, Employee","Port Arthur, TX 77642",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Day-Surgery-Job-Port-Arthur-TX-US-164665651.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,4f2a542e61dfb91f05e877eaf1d539b5
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"What makes us different? Our People, Our Pride, Our Passion.  If you are wanting to make a difference in the lives of residents and grow your nursing career, LaCrosse Health & Rehabilitation center in Coeur d'Alene is for YOU!  Look no further and apply today at our 99 bed center.  Our nurse leadership team instills a fun, welcoming environment which has allowed for longevity and success amongst our nursing team. Visit our website to learn more about these great opportunities and have the potential to be working at our Award winning center soon http://lacrosseskillednursing.com/ In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:·         -Career Advancement opportunities·       -  Employee Recognition and Center Based Incentives·         -Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr·         -Competitive Wages·         -Comprehensive Benefit Package, including:o   FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for any FT Nurse hiredo   Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/montho   401(k) Retirement Programo   Paid Time Off Program At our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.·         With an environment focused on quality care, your input is important. Helping to achieve excellence, individuals with high standards and accountability for individual and team performance are embraced.At our center, you will be able to grow your career·         We regularly promote from within. Our employees are made aware of opportunities within our health centers to help further their development and experience.At our center, we provide support and resources ·         We have many resources available to those working throughout our center, offering you the right tools to do your job well.At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills·         We invest in you! Training and continuing education are encouraged to promote skill development.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans·         We offer a competitive compensation and industry leading benefits package.  POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the RN Unit Manager / DON, a Licensed Practical Nurse/Licensed Vocational Nurse performs as a licensed care giver and assumes responsibility and accountability for assigned residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through coordination, implementation, and evaluation of the resident’s/patient’s plan of care.  The LPN/LVN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants.  Follows all Center policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff.   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.       Supervisory Responsibilities·   Makes daily work assignments.·   *Directs the work of employees.·   Schedules lunch and rest breaks.·   Authorizes early departure from work.·   Authorizes overtime.·   Reassigns employees from one area to another area as facility needs dictate.·   Prepares written evaluations of assigned employees.·   Enforces facility policies with authority to issue Disciplinary Action Reports as needed.·   Authority to suspend employees for rules violation.·   Initials time records to authorize variances.·   Interviews applicants that will be assigned to his/her area of responsibility.·   Receives and handles employee complaints.·   *Participates in training programs and assists in orientation of new staff.2.       Provides the following nursing functions:·   *Makes frequent rounds to monitor resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.·   *Provides direct resident/patient care, including medication administration.  Makes observations, records and reports to the appropriate person any symptoms, reactions and changes in resident/patient condition.·   Reviews care plans daily to ensure that appropriate care is being given.·   Keeps physician informed of resident/patient conditions.·   Receives and transcribes physician’s order to resident/patient charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·   Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner reflecting the care provided and the resident’s/patient’s response to that care.·   Gives/receives nursing report at shift change.·   Completes all reports and forms as required.·   Participates in Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) meetings as requested.·   Follows all controlled drug policies and procedures as required.·   Follows locked medication room and medication cart policies and procedures as required.·   Ensures assigned work areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.·   Assures charges are accounted for on all chargeable items.·   Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.3.       *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center Health Services, Inc.’s Corporate Compliance Program.4.       Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.5.       *Attends and participates in in-service training, performance improvement (“PI”) committees and other meetings as scheduled and directed.6.       Follows facility dress and hygiene policies.7.       Safety·   Knows and follows facility rules.·   *Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·   Follows facility smoking policies.·   Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents/patients, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·   Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·   *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents/patients, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·   Uses required protective equipment.·   Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.8.       Resident Rights·   Knows Resident Rights.  Helps the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·   Reports resident complaints to management.·   Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.9.       HIPAA·   Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·   Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee.·9.            HIPAA•             Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.•             Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).•             Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee. Other Duties: •             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Licensed in the state as a LPN. Experience: Experience in giving medications to a large group of residents. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Able to use necessary supplies and equipment (feeding pumps, oxygen, treatment trays, medication cart, etc.). Able to calculate drug dosage. Meets all health requirements imposed by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff. Able to read, write, speak and understand English.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word,E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, twisting, pushing and pulling. Tasks marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities. All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents/patients. Lifting and/or transferring some residents/patients will require use of a lifting device and/or assistance of other staff.",LPN $,Full Time,"Coeur D'alene, ID",,http://jobview.monster.com/LPN-5-000-SIGN-ON-LaCrosse-Health-Rehab-Job-Coeur-d'Alene-ID-US-165295521.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=9,,,1c7a4733aff93d775a68389e7f9e52ad
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager, ChemistrySt. Peter's Health Partners has an excellent opportunity for a Manager in Chemistry. *Apply today www.sphp.com/employment* This is a system level responsibility and the individual would have managerial and operational functions within the Chemistry section for all system sites. These responsibilities include organizing, coordinating, and evaluating value oriented laboratory services in expeditious manner for quality patient care. The manager is accountable for personnel staffing, training, scheduling, accuracy and timeliness of procedure performance, budgeting, materials management, regulatory compliance and evaluation of results within the assigned section. Duties are to be done in such a manner as to apply and contribute to the St. Peter's Health Partners mission and values.Position Requirements: - Bachelor's degree from school of medical technology or any other culmination meeting supervisory qualifications of NYS DOH.- NYS License from the Dept. of Education as a Clinical Laboratory Technologist (CLT).- Prefer certification by a nationally recognized clinical laboratory certifying agency- Specialist certification in Chemistry is preferred - Minimum 6 years laboratory experience required; preferably with focus in Chemistry",Clinical Laboratory Manager,"Full Time , Employee","Albany, NY 12208",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Laboratory-Manager-Chemistry-Job-Albany-NY-US-160719667.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=7,,Laboratory/Pathology,1bbd83bd72632213c5c5ced148862bdc
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Quintiles is a leading commercial solutions provider that offers service solutions designed to accelerate the success of pharmaceutical, biotechnology and medical device products.  Since 1997, Quintiles has built more than 40 Health Management Services teams, and hired more than 800 clinicians.  Quintiles Health Management Services is redefining how pharmaceutical and biotech companies can provide caregivers with programs that benefit patients.  Our Clinical Educators interact with health care professionals to improve treatment adoption in a variety of disease states that are frequently under-diagnosed, misdiagnosed, or under-treated.  Sales Specialist Job Description:   The Sales Specialist will be responsible to identify potential customers, establish and develop business relationships to facilitate the sales of customer products and services and achieve assigned sales goals as established by sales management. Sales Specialist will be directly responsible for the promotion of Animas products and services within an assigned territory.  Provide accurate and approved product/service and promotional information in a professional manner health care professionals and patients to demonstrate and discuss the benefits of Animas products/services in the insulin delivery market.  Qualifications/Experience Bachelor?s degree from accredited school required 5+ years of direct selling experience to healthcare professionals in the pharmaceutical, biotech, device or healthcare industry is required Education and/or experience in any of the following areas is preferred: diabetes, endocrinology, insulin infusion pumps, and managed care Solid business acumen including excellent and persuasive business communication Demonstrated ability to work independently and exercise good business judgment and discretion and to analyze and address territory opportunities and build key customer relationships Excellent written and oral communication skills required Ability to travel as necessary is required Valid Driver?s License that meets with Quintiles MVR requirements Residence within the current geography is required Quintiles offers a friendly, progressive work atmosphere and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, life insurance and vision coverage, tuition assistance, bonus plan and 401(k).We look forward to the prospect of working with you!   EEO Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled Additional Information:",Sales Specialist Diabetes Device,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA 02108",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Specialist-Diabetes-Device-Boston-MA-60113-Job-Boston-MA-US-164688016.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,97b02d09db3c02896ad38d657f0a2b3c
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:08,No,jobs.monster.com,Bedford MH/ID is recruiting for anCLINICAL DIRECTORTo supervise a licensed outpatient clinic offering counseling/psychiatric services provided by MS therapists & psychiatrists. Minimum experience 3 years in public or private social work including 1 year supervisory experience plus a Masters/BS degree in social service related field. Competitive salary/excellent benefits.Call Jen Georg for more information or to schedule an appointment. (flexible appointment time available) with the Program Manager at 814-443-4891 ext. 4124By 4/08/16EOEprovided by The Altoona Mirror,OUTPATIENT DIRECTOR Job in Bedford,Full Time,"Bedford, PA 15522",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/OUTPATIENT-DIRECTOR-Job-Bedford-PA-US-165317936.aspx?ch=centralpa&mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b24d5781699cd781df14bbd4f66f3682
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"* Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: * Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. * Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. * Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multi-disciplinary plan of care based on identified problems and/or patient needs. * Collaborate with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care. * Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately. * Administers and documents medications/treatments safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure. * Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. * Provide patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. * Provide leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs.Education/Skills: Graduate from an Accredited School of Nursing. Experience: As required by Staff RN Level and assigned area. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications: Current registration with the Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners. BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse - Inpatient Rehab Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA 71105",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Inpatient-Rehab-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-165278058.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,c3b1bbbd453374c0cd0abd188ba8bbbb
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time (All Shifts)Brookdale Middleburg Heights 15435 Bagley Road Middleburg Heights, OH 44130 Job #: 054988Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Middleburg Heights,Part Time Employee,"Middleburg Heights, OH 44130",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Middleburg-Heights-OH-US-165218208.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,a6abec5250ae4d68615bc0bffac4dc51
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part time Home Care Aides needed.Pay $10.91 per hour.Apply at:Commission on Aging103 S. DouglasThree Rivers, MI 49093or at www.stjosephcountymi.org No phone calls please.EOE",CNA Job in Three Rivers,Part Time,"Three Rivers, MI 49093",All,http://jobview.monster.com/CNA-Job-Three-Rivers-MI-US-165270225.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=1,,,b659edf598d01cdcf5ba6d375ad903dd
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION:Home Health Case Manager - Registered Nurse (RN)As a Home Health Case Manager - Registered Nurse (RN) you will be responsible for providing nursing care to clients and direction and leadership to designated staff.Additional responsibilities of the Home Health Case Manager - Registered Nurse (RN) include:� Assessing and formulating a plan of care for clients in their homes that includes social, emotional, physical, and spiritual needs.� Providing nursing care to clients according to physician orders and regulations.� Providing teaching and training to clients, families, and caregivers as appropriate.QUALIFICATIONS:Home Health Case Manager - Registered Nurse (RN)To qualify for the Home Health Case Manager - Registered Nurse (RN), you must have effective communication skills and be able to work with individuals of all ages.Additional requirements of the Home Health Case Manager - Registered Nurse (RN) include:� Graduate of an accredited school of nursing.� Licensure for state of practice is required.� CPR Certification or ability to achieve upon employment.� Must be at least 18 years of age.� Must have a favorable motor vehicle record (MVR) and must present a valid drivers license and proof of insurance before operating a vehicle.ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:Come and Join our team. Will train if no experience. We want someone with lots of energy to help grow our fast paced moving home health care agency.FT/PTCONTACT INFORMATION:Michelle Copsey RN Director402-399-1700*gss**If you need assistance to complete this application or during the interview process such as sign language interpreters, readers or other accommodations, please contact the person listed.",Home Health Case Manager - RN Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Home-Health-Case-Manager-RN-Job-Omaha-NE-US-164754074.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,6a0cba09caa719370ce206263d46f313
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maximum Home Health Care, Inc. seeks Health Services Managers for Clearwater, FL location.  Bachelor’s in Business+ 4 years of experience or Bachelor’s in Any Field+ 5 years of experience required.  Experience must include: managing health care operations, managing employees, scheduling & billing, knowledge of Federal & State laws pertaining to Medicaid/Medicare, insurance & payors, OASIS.    ",Health Services Manager Job in Clearwater,Full Time,"Clearwater, FL 33763",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Services-Manager-Job-Clearwater-FL-US-165300417.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=8,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),55cdaac3180414fdfff6b8fd61f84f64
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:17:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONAre you looking for a new opportunity to build your resume, grow in your career, use your management or dental experience to gain a better paying job? You can be a part of a successful and growing dental organization. Familia Dental has a great opportunity for a dynamic Dental Assistant/ Medical Assistant. This highly sought after Assistant position is a well-respected role.  Dental Assistant   These are 20-40 hour per week positions. Our office will be open Monday - Saturday.  Responsibilities for Dental Assistant  include:Sterilizes and disinfects instruments and equipment.Prepares treatment rooms, instruments and tray setups for dental procedures.Exposes and mounts dental diagnostic x-rays.Assists the dentist during examinations and treatment procedures.Records medical and dental histories and vital signs of patient.Records treatment information in patient records. Requirements for the Dental Assistant include:Assists with other duties as neededA positive attitude is a mustBilingual is preferred, but not requiredAt least one year of experience is requiredEaglesoft experience also a plus, but not requiredBusiness writing/editing skillsAble to multi-task without losing quality workCertified Dental Assistant is a PLUS, not requiredHere are some of the benefits of being an employee at Familia Dental:A teamwork oriented working environment.Personal and professional growth development.A trustful and open communication policy.Company OverviewFamilia Development & Management is a leader in the healthcare industry.  Our successful practice includes 30 locations in 5 states.  Our dental clinics have a modern design, brand new and quality equipment including digital x-ray and paperless systems. Our success enables us to continually expand our dental offices each year. This means you will be working for a flourishing and financially strong dental organization.Familia Dental is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.",Dental Assistant Job in New Braunfels,Part Time,"New Braunfels, TX 78130",,http://jobview.monster.com/Dental-Assistant-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-164740229.aspx?mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=3,,,0502996b426153053f444687e6e3f277
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION:As a Charge Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) you will be responsible for providing nursing care to residents and direction and leadership to designated staff.Additional responsibilities of the Charge Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) include:� Assisting with formulating a plan of care for residents in pertinent area.� Updating plan of care when needed.� Assuring physicians are notified and orders are processed.� Directing and assisting with resident and family education.� Responding appropriately to emergency needs in the center.QUALIFICATIONS:To qualify for the Charge Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN), you must have effective communication skills and be able to work with individuals of all ages.Additional requirements of the Charge Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) include:� Licensure for state of practice is required. Graduate of an accredited nursing school.� CPR Certification or ability to achieve upon employment.� Knowledge and familiarity with the therapeutic effects and side effects of all medication administered.ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:Day shift hours are 6:00AM - 2:30PM.Evening shift hours are 2:00PM - 10:30PM.Night shift hours are 10:00PM - 6:30AM.This position will include every other weekend and holiday rotation. Evening shift includes $1.00 shift differential per hour.Night shift includes $2.00 shift differential per hour.Tuition assistance/reimbursement available.*gss*CONTACT INFORMATION:Amanda Haugen, Human Resources Coordinator(701) 662-6580*If you need assistance to complete this application or during the interview process such as sign language interpreters, readers or other accommodations, please contact the person listed.",Charge Licensed Practical Nurse Healthcare Charge LPN LVN Nurse Job in Devils Lake,Full Time Employee,"Devils Lake, ND",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Charge-Licensed-Practical-Nurse-Healthcare-Charge-LPN-LVN-Nurse-Job-Devils-Lake-ND-US-164706193.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,fddb2be28893e8523cc12d2e9f65e4b6
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time; 11:00pm-7:00am shiftBrookdale Sakonnet Bay 1215 Main Road Tiverton, RI 02878 Job #:055022Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Assist residents with activities of daily living to include: bathing, dressing, grooming and toileting* Transfer residents to and from activities and meals according to their individual service plans* Serve meals to residents in the dining room or their apartments* Record and report changes in residents' eating habits to supervisor* Promote quality services within company, state and federal regulationsRequired skills and qualifications:* Current nursing assistant certification (CNA) in the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus* One year nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Certified Nursing Assistant CNA Job in Tiverton,Full Time Employee,"Tiverton, RI 02878",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Nursing-Assistant-CNA-Job-Tiverton-RI-US-165221570.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,6c832aa7b2ca55687d5286ec26dce0b7
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position available for professional medical billing specialist.Must possess thorough, HANDS-ON EXPERIENCE of third-party payers with windows-based billing software.Position may include claims, follow-up, appeals, customer service.We offer a competitive salary, benefits package, & good working environment.Please send resumes to: Healthcare Solutions WNYE-mail: HRDept@hcswny.com FAX: 716-651-9855",Medical Billing Specialist Job in Cheektowaga,Full Time,"Cheektowaga, NY 14227",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Billing-Specialist-Job-Cheektowaga-NY-US-164682713.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=12,,,9d06978e7208a680b277415b5e11ee07
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you an experienced Project Manager looking for a new opportunity with a prestigious healthcare company? Do you want the chance to advance your career in Project Management by joining a rapidly growing company? If you answered “yes"" to any of these questions – this Project Manager is the position for you!Daily Responsibilities:Manages and coordinates the completion of enterprise. functional and/or departmental projects and key initiatives from start to finish. Drives enterprise. functional and/or departmental initiatives and ensures project timelines and expectations are met.Ensures projects deliver on established goals for business value creation. Presents findings and makes recommendations to all levels of management.Coordinates and manages project planning and execution for multiple projectsManages key project initiatives including the development of detail work plans. setting deadlines. assigning responsibilities. and monitoring/summarizing project progressProvides supervision and leadership for project team membersMonitors developed work plans and enforces accountability by key stakeholdersPlans for and drives change through holistic project plans including process. system. organization and facilities changes pending on projectPrepares strategic analysis of potential business and/or operational opportunitiesCommunicates purpose and vision of the project and prepares summary reports and recommendations for managementRepresents the department in cross-functional teams and to external customersQualifications:A Bachelor's Degree in a related field RequiredMinimum of three-five years of experience managing matrix and cross-departmental projects with a high level of client interactions. Proven track record in successfully handling multiple projects at one time. Ability to multi-task and reprioritize activities with little supervision.Strong knowledge of project development life cycles, web technologies and web development processes.Demonstrated strategic/enterprise view while maintaining attention to detailStrong written and verbal communication skills.Proven ability to understand/respond to complex subjects and provide logical/effective solutions to business needs.Solid interpersonal skills and demonstrated ability to influence internal and external constituents.Ability to analyze information and convert related activities into a comprehensive work plan.Ability to work within tight time frames.Shift: M-F 8-5, 40 hoursAdvantages of this Opportunity:Diversified Healthcare CompanyInnovative approaches, products and servicesStable Company and Proven Track RecordCompetitive CompensationInterested in being considered?• If you are interested in applying to this position, Click Apply!",Digital Project Manager Job in Tampa,Full Time,"Tampa, FL 33602",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Digital-Project-Manager-Job-Tampa-FL-US-165178674.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4b70666f87da171b3054b8d8e10a6e5b
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requirements: Get your career started in the Medical Laboratory Industry. Forensic Screen Technologists work in fast paced, production type environment performing a vital component of medical laboratory science.  Receive on the job training for the pre-analytical processing of medical samples. Required Skills and Qualifications Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university in chemical, physical, biological or clinical laboratory science or medical technology. Able to multi-task in a fast paced environment Able to identify all relevant facts or restrictions and use that information in problem solving Strong attention to detail and accuracy Tuesday - Saturday 12:00pm - 8:30pm 2nd shift position; 10% shift differential pay in addition to hourly base; some overtime required.    Job Description: Responsibilities: Receive specimens for testing; evaluate specimens and test orders; determine priority of work and batches to maintain acceptable turn-around-time; recognize unacceptable and unusual specimens and handle appropriately. Perform confirmatory testing on client samples, quality control samples and proficiency samples making measurements and calculations. Evaluate raw and final data for accuracy; recognize and correct errors and unusual results; interpret results to produce a final report. Maintain, calibrate, and clean instrumentation; perform scheduled and as needed maintenance and critical function checks recognizing significant changes in instrument function; trouble shoot as indicated. Follow quality control rules; monitor controls for error detection and take corrective action; maintain laboratory records, maintenance logs, quality control charts, reagent and standard logs, and worksheets. Participate in the instruction and training of others; demonstrate and/or explain the testing process to others or observe the testing process as performed by others. About our Company MedTox Laboratories, a LabCorp Specialty Testing Group, located in the Roseville / New Brighton area operates a SAMHSA-certified drug testing laboratory and CAP and CLIA-certified clinical laboratory. Our comprehensive laboratory and testing services coupled with our commitment to excellent customer service ensures that our clients' testing programs operate as efficiently and effectively as possible. We are committed to building strong relationships with our clients; being responsive to their questions and adaptable to their",Forensic Screen Technologist Job in Saint Paul,Full Time Employee,"Saint Paul, MN","Saint Paul, MN",http://jobview.monster.com/Forensic-Screen-Technologist-Job-Saint-Paul-MN-US-165193572.aspx?mescoid=1900303001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,cc752fa5708281d86d782ac5f775a1fa
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Nursing - Neurosurgery - Registered Nurse (RN) San Antonio, TX AreaQualifications: Three years Nursing experience; One year Management experience as a charge RN or Clinical Manager/SupervisorCurrent Licensure as an RN in the State of TexasBSN Required; MSN preferred.",Director of Nursing (RN) - Neurosurgery - San Antonio,Full Time,"Kirby, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Nursing-RN-Neurosurgery-San-Antonio-TX-Area-Job-Kirby-TX-US-162060797.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=15,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",508030433ad1e90df63ee1df00e9eb5f
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full TimeBrookdale Riverwalk SNF 350 Calloway Drive Bakersfield, CA 93312 Job #:055089Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Assist the Director of Nursing in planning, organizing, developing and directing the day-to-day operations of the Clinical Services department in accordance with current federal, state and local standards* Assess the comprehensive nursing needs of each resident using acceptable long-term care assessment software tools and according to state and federal time frames * Monitor medication and treatment schedules, work with attending physicians, and provide direct care when required* Assist in determining staffing needs; recruit, select, and orient nursing/direct care personnel * Ensure nursing staff follows all safety precautions when performing tasks with equipment Required skills and qualifications:* Current Registered Nursing Licensure (RN) in the state of practice* At least two years of nursing experience required; long term care experience preferred* Flexibility with schedule including evenings, weekends, and holidays* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Assistant Director of Nursing Job in Bakersfield,Full Time Employee,"Bakersfield, CA 93312",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Director-of-Nursing-Job-Bakersfield-CA-US-165252108.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,ee02fb0492f7c70320c443c69bf7638d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Information Analyst Ii     Judge Healthcare is actively seeking a full time Information Analyst Ii for California's largest hospital system!! This position is located in Long Beach, CA!The following qualifications must be met to be considered for this opportunity:Master’s Degree or PhD in statistics, biostatistics, mathematics, or related field, with emphasis on quantitative analysis required. PharmD, preferred. 3+ years of experience integrating clinical and healthcare industry knowledge to design and develop utilization and cost analyses. Please send your MOST UP TO DATE resumes to Danielle at dbordere@judge.com or call Danielle at 949-383-2538.Thank you so much!Sincerely,Danielle Bordere",Information Analyst II Job in Long Beach,"Full Time, Employee","Long Beach, CA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Information-Analyst-II-Job-Long-Beach-CA-US-165277358.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,c82cfd1b27e190bf4e19560153af8538
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Clinical Program ManagerResponsible for establishing and managing & governing the IS demand pipeline on an ongoing basis. The role will work closely with both IS leadership and Portfolio Committee sponsors to forecast, scope prioritize and score initiatives. The manager will be responsible for overseeing all processes, tools, and guidelines for the function to be successful.The Manager will leverage tools to aggregate and analyze the IS project portfolio to enable an appropriate balance of investments, risks and initiatives. Monitors and reports on the health and viability of the IS portfolio. Communicates the IS strategic vision and agenda to key stakeholders to ensure alignment and support. Conducts comprehensive assessment of current processes and tools; define points of integration and weakness; make recommendations where applicable.Essential Responsibilities:Responsible for the business sponsored portfolios and provide on-going management and governance (prioritization & demand). The manager will participate in a variety of initiatives such as annual planning, phase gate reviews, prioritization, sequencing, analysis and reporting of the portfolios.Ability to handle Cerner specific projectsAct as the focal point with the portfolio committees to assist in ideation, planning, escalation and review of priorities.Drive improved Portfolio management practices that link resources, skills, demand & budget to business/IT strategy objectivesAssists in the development and management of departmental budget in a fiscally responsible manner.Conducts impacts assessments across portfolios.Minimum Experience Required:Cerner Experience4+ years of Healthcare experienceDeep experience in PMO functions - project & portfolio management, requirements analysis & benefits analysisExperience working in a matrixed environmentStrong analytical and project management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret business needsAbility to effectively build and maintain relationships across project and organizational groupsPartner with business portfolios to identify and prioritize opportunities for utilizing IT to achieve the goals of the enterpriseFacilitate vendor analysis sessions and contract negotiations during the RFP processExperience facilitating group meetings of varying size & scopeInfluencing skills (sound business and technical acumen as well as skilled at achieving buy-in for delivery strategies); Stakeholder management (setting and managing expectations)Team player; Quick learner; Strong communicator (ability to communicate at all levels); Strong presentation skills; Strong problem-solving and critical-thinking skills",Clinical Program Manager Job in Los Angeles,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Los Angeles, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Program-Manager-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-165189183.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=13,,,9abcdc5c624fef5660f533f7d299949e
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Community Hospice of Texas has become the largest not for profit hospice in North Texas. Working with a not for profit organization means you can feel good knowing that all profits go back into caring for the patients. Our employees feel that hospice is a true calling for them and they work together as a devoted team of professionals to provide the best end of life experience to everyone they serve. We are currently seeking a Full-time Admissions Nurse (Monday-Friday; 1:00 pm - 9:00 pm) at our Dallas site. This person will meet with patients and families to explain the scope of hospice services and coordinate admission of patient. Primary duties include, but are not limited to:·         Conduct consultation for admission of patients to services, including education of hospice services to patient and family.·         Complete thorough assessment of patient at time of admission; establish/arrange initial frequency of nursing visits, DME/RX needs, and assess need for bereavement, social work, chaplain, volunteer services.·         Attend and report to Interdisciplinary Team regarding patient. ·         Complete paperwork and charting thoroughly and accurately according to Policy. ·         May conduct nursing or “tuck-in” visits.·         May train other admission staff on admission processes.·         May conduct supervisory visit on LVN and CNA staff. Qualifications include:·         Must be a Registered Nurse in the State of Texas·         1 year of nursing experience·         Case Management experience (hospice)·         2+ years of experience as a Case Manager strongly preferred·         Proficient skill using a computer is required·         Ability to think autonomously and make good decisions; have good communication skills, exhibit a confident demeanor that can remain calm in difficult situationsWe offer an excellent culture of compassion with competitive salaries, a top-notch benefits package and excellent training to provide you with the skills and confidence to perform your best. Qualified, interested candidates should complete an application at www.chot.org .",Admissions Nurse - Full-time Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX 75201",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Admissions-Nurse-Full-time-Job-Dallas-TX-US-164155152.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1a0609ee191a5ca4ee1fe597adc5affa
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONAre you looking for a new opportunity to build your resume, grow in your career, use your management or dental experience to gain a better paying job? You can be a part of a successful and growing dental organization. Familia Dental has a great opportunity for a dynamic Dental Assistant/ Medical Assistant. This highly sought after Assistant position is a well-respected role. Certified Dental Assistant   These are 20-40 hour per week positions. Our office will be open Monday - Saturday.  Responsibilities for Dental Assistant  include:Sterilizes and disinfects instruments and equipment.Prepares treatment rooms, instruments and tray setups for dental procedures.Exposes and mounts dental diagnostic x-rays.Assists the dentist during examinations and treatment procedures.Records medical and dental histories and vital signs of patient.Records treatment information in patient records. Requirements for the Dental Assistant include:Assists with other duties as neededA positive attitude is a mustBilingual is preferred, but not requiredAt least one year of experience is requiredEaglesoft experience also a plus, but not requiredBusiness writing/editing skillsAble to multi-task without losing quality workCertified Dental Assistant is a PLUS, not requiredHere are some of the benefits of being an employee at Familia Dental:A teamwork oriented working environment.Personal and professional growth development.A trustful and open communication policy.Company OverviewFamilia Development & Management is a leader in the healthcare industry.  Our successful practice includes 30 locations in 5 states.  Our dental clinics have a modern design, brand new and quality equipment including digital x-ray and paperless systems. Our success enables us to continually expand our dental offices each year. This means you will be working for a flourishing and financially strong dental organization.Familia Dental is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.",Dental Assistant Job in Wheeling,Part Time,"Wheeling, IL 60090",,http://jobview.monster.com/Dental-Assistant-Job-Wheeling-IL-US-164700328.aspx?mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=10,,,206ab562a302c96c69d09d35ae788fc8
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cooley Dickinson Health Care is an integrated health care organization located in Northampton Massachusetts. CDHC is comprised of Cooley Dickinson Hospital, a Massachusetts General Hospital affiliate, complemented by Cooley Dickinson VNA & Hospice, which provides home health and hospice nursing and rehabilitation visits, and Cooley Dickinson Medical Group, an employed multi-specialty group comprised of primary and specialty care physicians and advanced practice providers. Cooley Dickinson VNA & Hospice, a 2014 HomeCare Elite Top Agency, has provided quality care for patients of Hampshire and Franklin Counties since its founding in 1906.  As a non-profit, community health organization, our focus then and now is on wellness, prevention and education. Cooley Dickinson VNA & Hospice offers a comprehensive range of services to meet patient and family health needs by providing appropriate care at home. Cooley Dickinson VNA & Hospice is currently seeking a Registered Nurse Case Manager - VNA is responsible for providing skilled care and case management to patients and families in accordance with the State Nurse Practice Act and accepted professional standards of practice.  The RN Case Manager provides services utilizing nursing theory and processes, communicates and documents observations and assessments, and promotes and maintains health of individuals through direct care, teaching, counseling and appropriate rehabilitative measures.   MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:  Graduate of an approved, accredited school of professional nursing required.  BSN preferred. Current license to practice as a Registered Nurse in the Commonwealth of Massachusetts required Current CPR certification required. Minimum of one (1) year Medical/Surgical nursing experience required; home care/hospice experience preferred. Demonstrated excellent verbal and written communication skills and strong interpersonal skills required. Demonstrated organizational and time management skills required. Current driver's license, good driving record and access to or own reliable transportation required.  Cooley Dickinson Health Care offers competitive salaries, a comprehensive benefits package (including medical/dental/life insurance, paid time off, and a retirement plan with employer match), and a work environment that supports your personal and professional growth.For more information and to apply online, please visit our website, http://www.vnaandhospice.org.",VNA RN Case Manager Job in Northampton,,"Northampton, MA 01060",,http://jobview.monster.com/VNA-RN-Case-Manager-Job-Northampton-MA-US-164160811.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),146f3f70babea4f0d78d19faa1d3720c
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"North Canyon Medical Centeris hiring for the following positions:C.N.AFull Time Position in the Med/Surg department. CNA license required. Varied schedule, but predominantly working nights. ER TechPRN Position in the Emergency Room. CNA with ER Certification. Must have EMT certification or be in the process of obtaining EMT certification.LPN Full Time Position in the Med/Surg department. Licensed as a Licensed Practical Nurse in the State of Idaho. Varied schedule, which will include nights and weekends. Will consider a new grad.MRI TechFull Time Position in the Diagnostic Imaging department. Performs MRI procedures while maintaining and monitoring the patient environment and following appropriate safety procedures. Must have MRI certification.Occupational TherapistFull Time Position in the Rehabilitation department. Licensed as Occupational Therapist in the State of Idaho or can obtain. Occupational Therapist will work with a wide range of clients in an effort to help improve their ability to perform tasks in their daily, living, and working environments.PharmacistPRN Position in the Pharmacy department. RPh or Pharm D. Licensed in state of Idaho. Hospital dispensing and EMR experience preferred.RN - Med/Surg and ER NursesFull Time & PRN Positions in the Emergency Room and Med/Surg departments. Licensed as a Registered Nurse in the State of Idaho with Med/Surg and ER experience preferred. Both experienced and new grads will be considered.RN - Perioperative/PACU NurseMultiple Full Time & PRN Positions in the Surgical Services department. Licensed as a Registered Nurse in the State of Idaho. Prefer two years current OR, PACU, ICU, or CCU experience. Current BLS certification, ACLS Certification, and procedural sedation competency required. System Support Tech Full Time Position in the Information Technology department. Five plus years experience with providing support in a Microsoft ecosystem; Required experience with: Active Directory Administration; Office 365; HyperV Virtualization Technology; System Center Applications; Symantec Anti-Virus; Barracuda Appliances; Juniper Networking. Educational Qualifications: Associate or Bachelors Degree in Computer Technology preferred. Would consider work experience. CISSP, MCSA, JNCIP-ENT desired.All positions require: excellent communication skills to include oral and written comprehension and expression; ability and willingness to exhibit behaviors consistent with standards for performance improvement and organizational values (e.g., efficiency & financial responsibility, safety, partnership & service, teamwork, compassion, integrity, and trust & respect); and ability and willingness to exhibit behaviors consistent with principles for service excellence. Please view complete job descriptions or apply online at: www.ncm-c.com/human-resources NCMC is an equal opportunity employer and promotes diversity in its workforce.",medical positions Job in Gooding,Full Time,"Gooding, ID 83330",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/medical-positions-Job-Gooding-ID-US-165318153.aspx?ch=twinfalls&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,,57afcbb0a5fcd6a20f34c14ad76b7190
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: PharmacistLocation: Oklahoma City, OK 73108Duration: 3+ monthsShift: Rotational Shifts  Responsibilities:·         Responsible for the continuation of pharmacy management’s goals and objectives within the dispensing pharmacy. ·         The Pharmacist provides routine and emergency comprehensive and accurate drug screening, information, processing, and dispensing services for various drug distribution systems to the centers.·         Management skills and accuracy are required to ensure that the appropriate drug product reaches the customer efficiently and safely. ·         Must be fully available during Hours of Operation.·         Preparation and/or supervision of all sterile IV drug products or solutions.·         Assist in the proper ordering, handling, receiving, documentation, and storage of all controlled substances; assist in maintaining a perpetual inventory for schedule II drugs. ·         Provide evening, weekend, and holiday coverage during scheduled on-call rotation and as required by management.  ·         Follow all applicable government regulations including HIPAA. ·         Responsible for providing employees with timely, candid and constructive feedback; developing employees to their full potential and providing challenging opportunities that enhance employee career growth; developing the appropriate talent pool to ensure adequate bench strength and succession planning; recognizing and rewarding employees for accomplishments.Requirements:·         Bachelor of Science Degree in Pharmacy ·         Current license to practice pharmacy in good standing ·         Proficient in the area of clinical interpretation: drug-drug, drug-disease, drug-food interactions and allergies ·         Ability to read, write, speak, and understand the English language ·         Excellent interpersonal skills and well-developed verbal and written communication skills ·         Perform accurately and efficiently when dispensing prescription medications ·         Ability to work flexible hours, which may include evening, weekends, and holidays Preferred: (if above and beyond the minimum required) ·         Knowledgeable about long term care regulations (OBRA, OSHA, state laws and other federal laws) that have an impact upon both pharmacy and Center operations preferred",Pharmacist Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time,"Oklahoma City, OK 73108",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacist-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-165175199.aspx?mescoid=2900462001001&jobPosition=11,,,2fb33abc3060f37fd42b0adacdb8b6e0
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling. As a Home Health Physical Therapist, you will:Plan and administer prescribed skilled physical therapy treatment and training for patients suffering from various injuries, illnesses and functional disabilities to attain highest level of physical function. Test/screen the patient’s physical strengths to assist the physician in evaluating the patient’s level of function and records findings to develop or pursue treatment programs and establish measurable training objectives.Develop/implement a conditioning/rehabilitation program consistent with physician’s Plan of Treatment and the overall goals of the patient/rehab team.  Adjust treatment as needed to achieve maximum results.Confer with physician and clinical team members to obtain adivitional patient information and assist in developing, implementing and revising the therapy treatment program and Plan of Treatment.Provide Physical Therapy Assistants and Home Health Aide staff with written instructions/care plan that reflects current plan of care as related to therapy, supervise/evaluate staffs' performance.  Monitor the appropriate completion of documentation by physical therapy assistants and home health aides/personal care workers as part of the supervisory/leadership responsibility.Accurately, promptly and thoroughly document patients' care observations, interventions and evaluations.  Assure that interim (verbal) orders received from the physician and physical therapist are promptly and accurately documented, submitted for physician signature and implementedReport patient's progress to the patient's physician, Clinical Manager, staff, patient and family.  Submit evaluation, treatment plans, progress reports and discharge summary to the supervisor and care management staff.  Required SkillsQualificationsDegree from an accredited Physical Therapy Program (approved by the APTA)Minimum of one year physical therapy experience preferredHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted Physical Therapy licenseCurrent CPR certificationStrong organizational and communication skills Required ExperienceKeywords:Acute care, ADL, ADLs, ALF, Balance dysfunction, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, clinical rotation, geriatric, geriatrics, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, inpatient, inpatient PT, inpatient P.T., inpatient physical therapist, inpatient therapist, licensed therapist, licensed PT, licensed P.T., licensed physical therapist, modalities, neuro, neurological, ortho, ortho PT, ortho P.T., ortho therapist, ortho physical therapist, orthopedics, orthopedic, orthopedic PT, orthopedic P.T., orthopedic physical therapist, PT, P.T., physical therapist, physical therapy, DPT, doctorate PT, doctorate P.T., doctorate physical therapist, medical, medical care, therapist, therapy Care Manager, therapy case manager, therapy case management, therapy Job, therapy Jobs, PT job, PT jobs, P.T. job, P.T. jobs, physical therapy job, physical therapy jobs, physical therapist job, physical therapist jobs, Oasis, outpatient, outpatient clinic, out patient, outpatient rehab, outpatient PT, outpatient P.T., outpatient therapist, outpatient physical therapy, outpatient physical therapist, PRN, PDM, rehab, rehab PT, rehab P.T., rehab physical therapist, rehab setting, rehabilitative, therapeutic, safe strides, safe strides PT, safe strides P.T., safe strides physical therapist, skilled visit, SNF, sports med, sports medicine, sports med therapist, sports med physical therapist, sports medical physical therapist, subacute, sub acute, post acute, therapy, travel PT, travel P.T., travel therapist, travel physical therapist, traveling PT, traveling P.T., traveling physical therapist, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationKent, Washington, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Physical Therapist (Friday through Tuesday Position) Job in Kent,,"Kent, WA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Physical-Therapist-Friday-through-Tuesday-Position-Job-Kent-WA-US-165304329.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=3,,,6c0f1cb21b5cb5021229589027f41e70
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY:   Under the general supervision of the Reimbursement Supervisor/Manager, is responsible for various reimbursement functions, including but not limited to accurate and timely claim submission, claim status, collection activity, appeals, payment posting, and/or refunds, until accounts receivable issues are properly resolved.  PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:   Collects and reviews all patient insurance information needed to complete the billing, collections, appeal, and/or cash processes. Completes and submits all necessary insurance forms and electronic claims to process the claims in a timely manner as required by all third party payors. Researches and resolves any electronic claim denials. Effectively utilizes various means for collections, including but not limited to phone, fax, mail, and online methods. Provides exceptional customer service to internal and external customers; resolves any customer requests in a timely and accurate manner; escalates complaints accordingly. Maintains frequent phone contact with provider representatives, third party customer service representatives, pharmacy staff, and case managers. Independently analyzes, reports, and communicates any reimbursement trends/delays (e.g. billing denials, claim denials, pricing errors, payments, etc.). Processes any necessary insurance/patient correspondence. Provides all necessary documentation required to expedite payments. This includes demographic, authorization/referrals, National Provider Identification (NPI) number, and referring physicians. Coordinates with inter-departmental associates to obtain appropriate medical records as they relate to the reimbursement process. Provides training and support to inter-departmental associates. Independently and effectively resolves advanced accounts with minimal supervision. May travel to sites to present program services and further build relationship with sites. Maintains confidentiality in regards to patient account status and the financial affairs of clinic/corporation. Communicates effectively to payors and/or claims clearinghouse to ensure accurate and timely electronically filed claims. May have responsibility for particular geographic regions, physician office sites. Works on problems of diverse scope where analysis of data requires evaluation of identifiable factors. Demonstrates good judgment in selecting methods and techniques for obtaining solutions. Networks with internal and external personnel in own area of expertise. Typically determines methods and procedures on new assignments. Performs related duties and special projects as assigned.   EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS:   Requires broad training in fields such as business administration, accounting, computer sciences, medical billing and coding, or similar vocations generally obtained through completion of a two year associate’s degree program, technical vocational training, or equivalent combination of experience and education.  Three (3) to five (5) years directly related and progressively responsible experience preferred.  MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS:   Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing. Strong interpersonal skills. Strong negotiating skills. Strong mathematical skills. Strong analytical skills. Strong organizational skills; attention to detail. Proficient knowledge of accounting principles, pharmacy operations, and medical claims. Proficient knowledge of HCPCS, CPT, ICD-9 and ICD-10 coding. Global understanding of commercial and government payers. Ability to proficiently use Microsoft Excel, Outlook and Word. A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is fully qualified career-oriented position.   Additional Information:",Sr Reimbursement Counselor Job in Rockville,Full Time Employee,"Rockville, MD 20850",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Reimbursement-Counselor-Job-Rockville-MD-US-165314777.aspx?mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,4cf030ad2add64901bd6394c3e824d44
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org)is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  TheCenter provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, earlyintervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services.The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability torelate to individualsand families of varied ethnic and cultural backgrounds, ages, educational levelsand economic circumstances with respect and dignity.  Excellent verbal,written and computer skills are necessary in order to work effectively andcollaboratively with clients, collaborating agencies and communityprofessionals, as well as, maintaining proper documentation.  Clinical staff members must be able totake and pass without major modification a course in Handle with Care, whichrequires hands-on, physical components to ensure the safety of the clients andstaff. Clinical staff members must possess reliable transportation, ability toacquire an F endorsement on driver's license and transport clients.HRMCis an EOE. HRMC conducts Background Checks, Drivers License Record, DegreeVerification, and Drug Screens at hire. Employment is contingent upon cleandrug screen, background check and driving record. Additionally, certainprograms are subject to TB Screening and/or Testing.  Bilingual applicantsare encouraged to apply.HRMC iscurrently seeking a qualified and enthusiastic professional for the following position:  Great Starts Masters Team Leader.Job Summary ProgramManagement ResponsibilitiesOversees, participates in, and supervisesactivities related to clinical programming. Ensures program services adhere toHRMC P&P. Develops and implements clinical policy, procedure, andoperational guidelines of the program. Ensures staff are trained in accordanceto accrediting bodies and other agencies of oversight. Ensures that familiesare receiving the assistance, support, and services that meet their needs in arespectful and empowering way. Assists in ensuring that documentation ofintervention and counseling services are provided according to agency policyand contractual agreement. Provides supervision to therapists. Ensures theprogram meets QA/QI indicators and that QA/QI reporting functions are submittedin a timely manner. Runs and organizes treatment team meetings. Ensurescoordination with Nurse Practitioner occurs. Ensures program is properlyaddressing clients' safety. Ensures coordination of care with key partners,like DCS, occurs well. Oversees coverage of clinical (IOP and therapy)services. Handles clinical crises and ensures solutions are coordinated withstaff team.ClinicalResponsibilitiesProvides individual, group, and familytherapeutic interventions that are evidence-based and culturally competent. Completesassessments for mental health of children and adults, alcohol and drug, andco-occurring disorders, formulate diagnoses, and develop master treatment plansfor families. Completes paperwork timely and in compliance with contractual,legal, applicable licensing, accreditation, and quality assurance standards andoversight requirements. Works with individual clients and their families todevelop and implement treatment goals and a Family Treatment Plan. Participatesin and run as a Recovery Services team member providing programmatic input forTreatment Team decisions related to client needs and progress. Other dutiesassigned. JobRequirements:To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform eachessential duty satisfactorily.  Therequirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/orability required.  Reasonableaccommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to performthe essential functions. This positionrequires utilizing a personal dependable vehicle to conduct Center business.Maintaining a dependable vehicle and certified driver status is a condition ofemployment.Education/Knowledge: Masters degree inSocial Work, Psychology or related field required; Training in trauma informedcare and interventions, co-occurring disorders, child psychopathology, culturaldiversity, and child development preferred. Clinical licensure preferred.Experience: One year experience insupervisory or management role. Experience managing transitional housing,residential, or structured living preferred.Physical: Ability to effectively and ethicallycounsel children and adults; Ability to present professionally and work withina team to format a plan; Ability to effectively utilize nonviolent methods ofcrisis intervention including therapeutic holds; Ability to exercise soundjudgment under pressure, effective decision making, appropriate boundaries,empathic listening skills, flexibility, and accepting practices with diversepopulations; Valid driver's license with ""F"" endorsement; frequent sitting,standing, walking.Please apply online at the link below: https://www.e3applicants.com/hrm/apply.aspx?ap_postid=1228&FrmId=1&UsesNewFormBuilderForm=Y&source=monster&sourceid=monster",Great Starts Masters Team Leader - Residential Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Great-Starts-Masters-Team-Leader-Residential-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-165315034.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,0d4a7d528f8c525a75bb803055dc55c1
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Basic clerical task such as greeting patients with a professional, respectful, and caring attitude while checking in/checking out, answering phones, scheduling, confirming appointments, verifying benefits, and collecting payments in a heavy volume clinic.Essential ResponsibilitiesWelcome and greet all patients and visitors, in person or over the phones.Register new patients and update existing patient demographics by collecting patient detailed information each year.Verify insurance eligibility through electronic resources.Collect patients out of pocket liability (co-pays, co-insurance & deductibles)Work up schedules prior to appointment to ensure prior authorization was obtained.Check patient out and reschedule per doctors instructions.Responsible for keeping the reception area clean and organized.Protects patient confidentiality by making sure documentation is scanned correctly into patients Electronic Medical Record.Works closely with team members to resolve patient problems.QualificationsTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.Education and/or ExperienceHigh school diploma. Associates or Bachelors preferred. At least two years of medical clinic experience (or equivalent) required. Must understand about the differences between self-pay patients and insurance patients. Excellent organizational skills, accurate and attention to detail. Must be able to multitask and be able to handle large patient volume. Cheerful personality and sensitivity to patient needs.",Front Desk Receptionist Job in Pensacola,Full Time,"Pensacola, FL 32503",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Front-Desk-Receptionist-Job-Pensacola-FL-US-165269321.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0723e21fbd51c235edabf5939c8fff48
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"White Glove Placement is seeking Physician Assistant (PA) for clinic position to perform all PA related duties at the clinic  Full Time PositionMonday – Friday 8am-4pmPhysician Assistant (PA) positions available in the Brooklyn and Manhattan Clinic Benefits for Physician Assistant (PA) Position include excellent salaries, health and dental coverage, daily pay at participating facilities, direct deposit for your convenience and cash bonus for hours worked.  PA Physician AssistantRequirements for PA Physician Assistant assignments: PA Physician Assistant NYS license 1 year professional experience as a Physician Assistant[Related Keywords: physician assistant, pa, clinic, healthcare, health care] ",Physician Assistant - PA Job in New York City,Full Time Employee,"New York City, NY 10001",,http://jobview.monster.com/Physician-Assistant-PA-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-164090703.aspx?mescoid=2900483001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,0a9d43b8442a3969b9412a228a5c01c1
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"LIFE Pittsburgh is a community-based alternative to nursing home care.  We assist older adults in maintaining quality, dignity and autonomy in their lives by supporting the family unit within the context of a holistic and faith-based approach to medical and social services.  LIFE Pittsburgh provides guidance for older adults who wish to remain in their own home, but who have health problems that prohibit their ability to safely do so.  Traditional and non-traditional services are combined to support the individual and encourage an independent lifestyle.  Services are provided on an individual basis to tailor a flexible, yet comprehensive, medical and supportive plan of care. Through the LIFE Pittsburgh program, frail and fragile seniors can remain in their own homes and receive a coordinated plan of care that enables them to maintain their independence and enjoy a safe and active life in the community.We are currently seeking a full time Chaplain who will be responsible for providing spiritual support to LIFE Pittsburgh Participants and/or families and assisting individuals to integrate life's events through emotional support and a focus on spirituality. Facilitates Participant attendance of religious services and/or the receiving of sacraments as appropriate. BA required (MA preferred) with appropriate pastoral certification, four or more units of CPE or equivalent certification/experience, and at least 2 years ministry experience (geriatric exp preferred).",Chaplain Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time,"Pittsburgh, PA 15220",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Chaplain-Job-Pittsburgh-PA-US-163482984.aspx?mescoid=2100324001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),710afa57c855f6107d24723b3500a1c9
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. As a Hospice Aide, you will: Perform various services for a patient as necessary to meet the patient’s personal needs, to promote the patient’s comfort, and a safe environment, in accordance with an established physician plan of care and under the supervision of a registered nurse case manager or other professional as dictated by state.Observe patients and report/document these observations and the services provided.Work with family/caregiver/and interdisciplinary team members to meet the emotional needs of the patient/family/caregiver.Required Skills QualificationsCompletion of recognized Nurse Assistant certification program Minimum of one-year direct patient care experience in an institutional, hospice or home care setting Skilled in the proper technique for lifting and transferring patientsAbility to read, write and follow instructions and document care givenUnderstands Hospice philosophy and needs of terminally illCompliance with accepted professional standards and practicesDemonstrates tact, patience and good personal hygieneExcellent observation and communication skillsAbility to work within an interdisciplinary settingSufficient documentation of having passed a skills test and written/oral test demonstrating those competencies identified in OBRA-87, 42 C.F.R. Sections 484.36 and 484.4. In lieu of such documentation, a newly hired HHA must demonstrate skills and written/oral competency prior to working independently with a patientRequired ExperienceGirling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationSeattle, Washington, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Hospice Aide (WA CNA Required) Monday through Friday am to pm  to  patients daily Job in Seattle,,"Seattle, WA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Hospice-Aide-WA-CNA-Required-Monday-through-Friday-8am-to-5pm-4-to-6-patients-daily-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165225121.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=11,,,8d4089980b2e68fbd40452a5e5dab15f
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Strathmore Comprehensive Treatment CenterWe are currently seeking a full-time Substance Abuse Counselor for our Strathmore facility. Hours are 5:30am-1:30pm Mon, Tues, Wed, Thursday 30 hours. Strathmore Treatment Center is a comprehensive outpatient substance abuse treatment facility serving patients diagnosed with the disease of addiction. The qualified candidate will work closely in a team environment with a team of clinicians, medical personnel, and office personnel in accordance with State and Federal Regulations to provide care for our patients. We offer our patients an out-patient environment conducive to recovery from the disease of addiction, specifically to the opioid class of drugs. We offer our staff an educational environment where patient care is our top priority. We offer a competitive benefits package to all full-time employees including Medical, Dental, Vision, 401k, Company paid group term life insurance. Position Summary: Under the supervision of the Clinical Supervisor, our Therapists are ultimately responsible for providing individual and group therapy to patients with a primary diagnosis of chemical dependency. Additional responsibilities include: Position Duties and ResponsibilitiesUtilizing knowledge of a variety of therapeutic models and theories to understand and plan intervention strategies for a variety of patientsMonitoring patient progress and making changes to the therapeutic approach and best practice, evidenced based interventions based on patient response to treatmentWorking collaboratively with the patient and appropriate others to develop a comprehensive treatment plan that addresses priority needs of the patient, desired treatment outcomes, an agreed upon plan of action, and reassessment.Maintaining patient records related to screening, intake, treatment, continuing care, progress toward goals and objectives, discharge summary, and treatment outcomes that are accurate, concise, timely, and useful for coordinating treatment team planning, monitoring, and review.Coordinating and cooperating with local agencies and organizations necessary to expedite treatment for each patient.Amazing Hours!Our hours are earlier than many places, typically 6:00AM to 2:30PM, this gives our counselors more time to pursue part-time schooling and hobbies in the evenings and weekends. Hours my vary by location. Qualifications * Love to smile! Want to make a difference! * Great organizational skills. * CADC credential in good standing. Job Requirements: * Bachelor's Degree in Social/Behavioral Sciences with 3 years of prior Substance Abuse Counseling experience is preferred * Master's Degree preferred * Excellent Verbal, non-verbal and written communication skills * Time management & organizational skill Hours:5:30am-1:30pm Mon, Tues, Wed, Thursday 30 hours.",Counselor Substance Abuse Addiction Counseling Job in South Amboy,Full Time,"South Amboy, NJ 08879",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Counselor-Substance-Abuse-Addiction-Counseling-Job-South-Amboy-NJ-US-164590585.aspx?mescoid=2100309001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8b98e454a68b623f42005887a2e1c9f4
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:21:16:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Phlebotomist Milwaukee, WIUSA Company: WFH-Lab St FrancisLocation: 3237 S. 16th St. Milwaukee WIFTE: .001Shift: VariesShift Start Time: 4aShift End Time: 12aUnder the direct supervision of the Clinical Lab Supervisor/Outreach Services Supervisor/Processing Supervisor. Will perform phlebotomy ancillary duties in support of the clinical/technical laboratory function and simple, routine laboratory procedures as instructed or directed.Skills/Requirements: High School Diploma or Equivalent requiredValid Wisconsin Driver's License AND a minimum of six months phlebotomy experience required. Phlebotomy certification preferred. 1. Knowledge of medical terminology and laboratory department functions preferred.2. Prefer individual familiar with and able to operate various types of equipment including, but not limited to: fax machine, laboratory and/or hospital computer system, telephone reception console, and centrifuges.3. Good communication skills exhibited with all client interactions; both verbal and written.4. Must be able to work as part of a team with good intradepartmental and inter-departmental cooperation and rapport.5. Exhibits good conflict resolution skills with peers, supervisors, and employees in the same or other department/sites.This is a pool position working 1st and 2nd shift. There are no guarantee of hours with this position. We utilize our pool positions to assist us times of peak volumes, coverage for FMLA and vacation. It is not eligible for benefits #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Phlebotomist Job in Milwaukee,"Full Time , Employee","Phlebotomist Milwaukee, WIUSA Company: WFH-Lab St FrancisLocation: 3237 S. 16th St. Milwaukee WIFTE: .001Shift: VariesShift Start Time: 4aShift End Time: 12aUnder the direct supervision of the Clinical Lab Supervisor/Outreach Services Supervisor/Processing Supervisor. Will perform phlebotomy ancillary duties in support of the clinical/technical laboratory function and simple, routine laboratory procedures as instructed or directed.Skills/Requirements: High School Diploma or Equivalent requiredValid Wisconsin Driver's License AND a minimum of six months phlebotomy experience required. Phlebotomy certification preferred. 1. Knowledge of medical terminology and laboratory department functions preferred.2. Prefer individual familiar with and able to operate various types of equipment including, but not limited to: fax machine, laboratory and/or hospital computer system, telephone reception console, and centrifuges.3. Good communication skills exhibited with all client interactions; both verbal and written.4. Must be able to work as part of a team with good intradepartmental and inter-departmental cooperation and rapport.5. Exhibits good conflict resolution skills with peers, supervisors, and employees in the same or other department/sites.This is a pool position working 1st and 2nd shift. There are no guarantee of hours with this position. We utilize our pool positions to assist us times of peak volumes, coverage for FMLA and vacation. It is not eligible for benefits #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Phlebotomist-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-165208340.aspx?mescoid=3100561001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),633a3159e2d0311de43c981c2d27a261
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:20:57:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Monmouth Community Home for Children Program is for adolescents who have varying degrees of behavioral issues that traditionally required more intensive settings.  This program offers greater opportunities along with the same level of treatment intensity in a community based setting.  This is a 24/7 staffed community based residential setting.The Residential Counselor will assist in providing a safe environment and positive residential treatment program within the residence.  Assist in maintaining a positive, strength-based, developmentally appropriate therapeutic environment that is in keeping with the values and clinical treatment philosophy of Legacy Treatment Services. ·         Keep vision of Consumers in home setting or as assigned·         Participate in therapeutically designed home and recreational activities·         Adhere to all Agency policies and procedures, licensing and accreditation standards·         Attend all required house, program and Agency meetings·         Provide all necessary documentation of Consumer behavior and interventions attempted, using approved Legacy format·         Participate as an active member of the Treatment Team·         Actively engages in all pre crisis and crisis interventions seeking to establish a positive outcome·         Participate in quality improvement activities, including incident/accident/grievance review, peer record review, satisfaction surveys, program evaluation and quality improvement projects at the program level·         Participate in the house behavior modification system·         Assist with the transportation of Consumers in Agency vehicles·         May serve as a primary advocate for up to three Consumers·         Additional related duties as assigned by the Adolescent Residential Services Management Team·         May be required to work at alternate locations based on staffing needs Bachelor's Degree in a social science, psychology, education, child development or other closely related fields or, in lieu of a Bachelor’s Degree, High School Diploma or GED and minimum of three (3) years’ experience working as a child care staff in a residential treatment center.  Demonstrated computer skills and ability to work in multiple computer systems/environments.Legacy Treatment Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Residential Counselor - Monmouth Community Home for Children Program Job in Eatontown,Full Time,"Eatontown, NJ 07724",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Residential-Counselor-Monmouth-Community-Home-for-Children-Program-Job-Eatontown-NJ-US-165215627.aspx?mescoid=3900663001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),297917720c8ed025d3f8705d4d560f40
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:20:56:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Founded in 1978, Universal Health Services, Inc. (UHS)* is one of the nation’s largest and most respected healthcare management companies, operating through its subsidiaries’ acute care hospitals, behavioral health facilities and ambulatory centers nationwide. With more than 74,000 people employed by UHS’ subsidiaries, UHS’ business strategy is to continue to grow by building or purchasing healthcare facilities across the country, while continuing to strengthen UHS’ strong franchise based on exceptional service and effective cost control. Our success is driven by a service philosophy based on integrity, competence and compassion and through a responsive management style. The Manager, Corporate Pharmacy will coordinate and provide leadership and guidance to the Acute Care Hospitals within UHS in all areas related to pharmacy operations including but not limited to: performance improvement budget analysis contract purchasing medication safety regulatory compliance distribution, inventory and clinical initiatives informatics operations Liaison with clinical coordinators regarding corporate practice initiatives. Liaison with Corporate Information Technology (IT) regarding clinical pharmacy functionality. Works with facility Directors of Pharmacy and nursing personnel to optimize pharmacy technology systems that support medication distribution and information. Ensures that pharmacists have current drug information resources via collaboration with Corporate Pharmacy Clinical Manager. Job Requirements:Licensed pharmacist with advanced degree (Pharm D or MS, MBA) or equivalent experience with a minimum of 8 years in hospital Pharmacy management and operations in the acute care setting. Preference for 10 + years experience.Must be knowledgeable and up to date with Joint Commission Medication Management. CMS Conditions of Participation and the National Patient Safety Goals. Knowledge of hospital pharmacy computer applications and technology. Proficient in MS applications (Word, Excel, Outlook). Work on and implement patient safety and quality initiatives in the acute care setting. Ability to write corrective action plans. Ability to work independently or in work groups. Ability to write policies and procedures. Work closely with Nursing, Quality, Risk Management and Information Technology departments as well as other departments as designated by the Corporate Director of Pharmacy. Experienced in evaluating financial performance, budgets, and purchasing. Ability to extend corporate initiatives to the hospitals effectively with defined end points Willing to travel 50-75%. If you meet the above requirements and are looking for a rewarding career, please take a moment to share your background with us by applying online. UHS offers competitive compensation commensurate with experience and benefits programs including medical, dental, life insurance and 401k. *UHS is a registered trademark of UHS of Delaware, Inc., the management company for Universal Health Services, Inc. and a wholly-owned subsidiary of Universal Health Services, Inc. Universal Health Services, Inc. is a holding company and operates through its subsidiaries including its management company, UHS of Delaware, Inc. All healthcare and management operations are conducted by subsidiaries of Universal Health Services, Inc. To the extent any reference to ""UHS or UHS facilities"" on this website including any statements, articles or other publications contained herein relates to our healthcare or management operations it is referring to Universal Health Services' subsidiaries including UHS of Delaware. Further, the terms ""we,"" ""us,"" ""our"" or ""the company"" in such context similarly refer to the operations of Universal Health Services' subsidiaries including UHS of Delaware. Any employment referenced in this website is not with Universal Health Services, Inc. but solely with one of its subsidiaries including but not limited to UHS of Delaware, Inc. UHS is not accepting unsolicited assistance from search firms for this employment opportunity. Please, no phone calls or emails. All resumes submitted by search firms to any employee at UHS via-email, the Internet or in any form and/or method without a valid written search agreement in place for this position will be deemed the sole property of UHS. No fee will be paid in the event the candidate is hired by UHS as a result of the referral or through other means. Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=185382&site_id=35",Corporate Manager Pharmacy Operations Job in King Of Prussia,Full Time Employee,Location:,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Corporate-Manager-Pharmacy-Operations-Job-KING-OF-PRUSSIA-PA-US-165305880.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,ec2f60b218802bbcd628a024f62a1340
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:20:38:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"SitrinThe Help. The Hope. The Healing.Openings for Professionals Who Want to Make a Difference in Peoples’ LivesGan Kavod, translated to “Garden of Honor,” is Sitrin’s special needs residences for intellectually disabled individuals with medical needs. Gan Kavod operates intermediate care facilities and individualized residential alternatives in New Hartford, New York Mills, Rome, and Utica, certified by the Office of Persons with Developmental Disabilities (OPWDD).Gan Kavod seeks to fill various full- or part-time positions such as:Registered Nurse(s) Licensed Practical Nurse(s)  Residence CounselorsFor a full list of openings at Sitrin affiliates or to apply online, visit:www.SitrinJobs.com Gan Kavod, Inc.P. O. Box 634 New Hartford, New York 13413www.sitrin.com 315-797-3114Sitrin is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer. Women, minorities, veterans, and persons with disabilities are encouraged to apply.EOE/AA",Multiple Healthcare Positions Job in New Hartford,Full Time,"New Hartford, NY 13413",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Multiple-Healthcare-Positions-Job-New-Hartford-NY-US-165233589.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=20,,,227f2203811485a7eacc2d92218cb473
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:18:46:20,No,jobs.monster.com,PharmPro Network Inc. is in need of Medical Assistant. Mondays to Frifays @ 7am to 3pm for front office scheduling. Please contact me.Orlando Garcia,Certified Medical Assistant Job in Vacaville,Full Time,"Vacaville, CA 95688",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Medical-Assistant-Job-Vacaville-CA-US-165278515.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b98aa486a8494bdbaa01f5ffa93c37f9
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:18:45:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"IVYREHAB is growing and looking for excellent PTs with strong clinical background and interest in sports medicine and orthopedics to join our outpatient clinic team. IVYREHAB is an industry leader in continuing education and professional growth and development. We offer exceptional salaries and benefits including 401(k) match, $1500 continuing education, PTO, etc. If you want to become an integral part of a successful and growing company that currently owns or manages 40 clinics throughout New Jersey, New York & Connecticut and are looking for an exciting career opportunity in a dynamic, growth-oriented environment with an excellent opportunity for advancement and clinical education, IVYREHAB is the right place for you!  JOB DESCRIPTION – STAFF PHYSICAL THERAPIST  IVYREHAB is growing and seeking a Staff Physical Therapist for our outpatient orthopedicclinic in Mercerville, NJ. Minimum Requirements: • Self-motivated with the willingness to exceed patient expectations • Ability to work in a fast paced environment while maintaining a positive attitude • Graduation from an accredited Physical Therapist curriculum • Proof of licensure as a Physical Therapist in the state of desired employment • Proof of USA employment eligibility • Physical Therapy experience, preferably in outpatient care",Staff Physical Therapist Job in Mercerville,Full Time,"Mercerville, NJ 08619",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Staff-Physical-Therapist-Job-Mercerville-NJ-US-164809319.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=11,,,ef817c0f4d6e8004e1e7670ff77fb85d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:18:26:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"PA or NP needed Fulltime or part time in outpatient ALLERGY and ASTHMA practice in Pittsfield and Worcester MA. Experience preferred but will happily provide in-depth training for the qualified applicant. You will provide care to patients of all ages. Salary and benefits are competitive and negotiable. Very mature, well -staffed practice which has been providing continuous specialty care for over 30years! Please Apply and we will reach out promptly!!",Nurse Practitioner/ Physician Assistant Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Multiple locations,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Practitioner-Physician-Assistant-Job-US-164465324.aspx?mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=2,Competitive,,0cec46c3a326ee119e5fe04f01d82c05
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:58:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"                                             St. Peter's Hospital in Albany, NY                                                                  Intensive Care Unit                                                       Full Time  12-hour Shifts Available!!                                                           $5000.00 Sign-On Bonus!!!!!    The ICU is a 19 bed unit which serves patients who are critically ill. The patients can be either medical or surgical in various stages of recuperation from diagnostic, therapeutic or surgical interventions. The highest volume of patients includes those that are recovering from high-risk surgery, pulmonary disease, neurological disorders, renal disease, endocrine disorders, gastrointestinal disorders, or cardiovascular disease.  Multiple medical/surgical units serve as step-down facilities due to the excellent telemetry and ventilator management capabilities of their staff.     We are a cohesive team of Critical Care Nurses, Mid-Level Providers, and Pulmonary Intensivists.  The ICU functions as an interdisciplinary unit, the input from each team member is heard and considered.Rewarding:  We are rewarded by our excellent outcomes, and we believe in recognizing each other for the contributions we make in improving the lives of others.          Nurses working in critical care have the support of regional critical care courses, on-site ACLS classes, and comprehensive orientation developed by clinical nurse specialists in critical care nursing.  Our clinical ladder program provides the opportunity for professional growth through mentoring, opportunities for leadership, and generous educational funding. Requirements:-Critical care experience required-minimum of one year-Current NYS RN license.-BSN preferred    ",Registered Nurse - ICU-EXPERIENCED $ SIGN-ON at St. Peter's Hospital in Albany,"Full Time , Employee","Albany, NY 12208",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-ICU-EXPERIENCED-5000-SIGN-ON-at-St-Peter's-Hospital-in-Albany-NY-Job-Albany-NY-US-155241889.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=4,,Nursing,005966db2e6666698d1a37a7e8c76c6c
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:52:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Springfield Habit OPCO is seeking a Nurse Supervisor. We are part of the Acadia CRC Health Group, the nation's leading provider of treatment and educational programs for adults who are struggling with chemical dependency. CRC provides clinically sound, research-based treatment options at 145 facilities conveniently located throughout the United States. The Nurse Supervisor has responsibility for the delivery of medical services in the facility. In collaboration with facility Administration, allocates department resources in an efficient and economic manner to enable each client to attain or maintain the highest level of drug/alcohol free, physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being. We offer a competitive benefits package to all full-time employees including Medical, Dental, Vision, 401k, Company paid group term life insurance. Primary Responsibilities:Ensuring that the Medication Room is in full compliance with all Clinic Policies, Federal and State Laws and Regulations at all times.Establish Nursing Practice Standards consistent with appropriate regulation, train staff, and monitor staff performance against these standardsScheduling nursing staff to assure they meet client needs and regulatory and budgetary standardsResponsible for ensuring that all Narcotic Treatment Program patient medical records are in compliance with all Clinic Policies, Federal and State Laws and Regulations at all times.Responsible for ensuring that the administration of mediations used in the Narcotic Treatment Program, as ordered by the Medial Directory / Program Physician.Will review medication records for accuracy as mandated by Clinic policy, State and Federal Regulations.The Nursing Supervisor may be required to act as a temporary Clinic Director in his / her absence.The Nursing Supervisor must have a working knowledge of all areas of the clinic in order to assist the Clinic Director in maintaining full compliance with Clinic policy, Federal and State Laws and Regulations and accreditation requirements. QualificationsMust be a licensed Registered Nurse, Licensed Vocational Nurse or Licensed Psychiatric Technician with a current licensure in the state where facility is located.Minimum five (5) years' experience inpatient or residential treatment.",RN LPN Nurse Supervisor Substance Abuse Job in Springfield,Full Time,"Springfield, MA 01107",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-LPN-Nurse-Supervisor-Substance-Abuse-Job-Springfield-MA-US-164153235.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=18,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e6458431b27e7d1d1cb1c2e0ec3baffb
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:50:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Special Investigations Unit (SIU) Medical Coding Quality AnalystThe OptumHealth Behavioral Solutions (OHBS) SIU Medical Coding Quality Analyst is responsible for coding and auditing services specific to administrative fraud, waste and abuse cases. This includes the analysis, documentation, explanation and translation of medical and behavioral diagnosis and procedures. The Medical Coder/Analyst will support the OHBS SIU in research, issues and inquires that relate to their reviews and SIU policies on Medical Coding/Auditing.Primary Responsibilities:Conducts reviews on records that have been identified as suspicious and/or potentially fraudulent, utilizing most current reference materials to include, but not limited to: Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), Internal Classification of Disease (ICD-9/ICD-10) and Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCs) guidelinesDocuments Decisions on reviews through notations and enters notes in appropriate company systemsAbility to discuss and present on decisions made to appropriate internal and external individuals/groupsCoordinate with team members to understand trends and schemes related to billing issues/coding trendsQualifications:Required Qualifications:3+ years of experience in coding and medical billing Associates degree or related field experience Clinical and/or coding expertise in a Physician office, SNF, ALF, Hospital setting, and/or billing/officeStrong oral and written communication skills Strong organizational/time management skills and be able to work independently or as a team Strong knowledge of CMS 1500 and UB04 data elements Strong knowledge of ICD, CPT, HCPC and Revenue CodesAbility to support heavy work load volume and meet unit standards while engaging multiple priorities Current CPC CertificationPrevious Call center experience Experience working in appealsPreferred Qualifications: Problem solving skills Serves as a resource on moderately complex issues related to coding / billing  At OptumHealth, you will perform within an innovative culture that's focused on transformational change in the health care system. You will leverage your skills across a diverse and multi-faceted business. And you will make contributions that will have an impact that's greater than you've ever imagined.Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.Job Keywords: CPC certification, Appeals, claims, Medical coder Analyst, San Francisco, CA /Philadelphia, PA, Multiple Locations",Coding Quality Analyst,"Full Time, Employee","Description:Special Investigations Unit (SIU) Medical Coding Quality AnalystThe OptumHealth Behavioral Solutions (OHBS) SIU Medical Coding Quality Analyst is responsible for coding and auditing services specific to administrative fraud, waste and abuse cases. This includes the analysis, documentation, explanation and translation of medical and behavioral diagnosis and procedures. The Medical Coder/Analyst will support the OHBS SIU in research, issues and inquires that relate to their reviews and SIU policies on Medical Coding/Auditing.Primary Responsibilities:Conducts reviews on records that have been identified as suspicious and/or potentially fraudulent, utilizing most current reference materials to include, but not limited to: Current Procedural Terminology (CPT), Internal Classification of Disease (ICD-9/ICD-10) and Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCs) guidelinesDocuments Decisions on reviews through notations and enters notes in appropriate company systemsAbility to discuss and present on decisions made to appropriate internal and external individuals/groupsCoordinate with team members to understand trends and schemes related to billing issues/coding trendsQualifications:Required Qualifications:3+ years of experience in coding and medical billing Associates degree or related field experience Clinical and/or coding expertise in a Physician office, SNF, ALF, Hospital setting, and/or billing/officeStrong oral and written communication skills Strong organizational/time management skills and be able to work independently or as a team Strong knowledge of CMS 1500 and UB04 data elements Strong knowledge of ICD, CPT, HCPC and Revenue CodesAbility to support heavy work load volume and meet unit standards while engaging multiple priorities Current CPC CertificationPrevious Call center experience Experience working in appealsPreferred Qualifications: Problem solving skills Serves as a resource on moderately complex issues related to coding / billing  At OptumHealth, you will perform within an innovative culture that's focused on transformational change in the health care system. You will leverage your skills across a diverse and multi-faceted business. And you will make contributions that will have an impact that's greater than you've ever imagined.Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.Job Keywords: CPC certification, Appeals, claims, Medical coder Analyst, San Francisco, CA /Philadelphia, PA, Multiple Locations",,http://jobview.monster.com/Coding-Quality-Analyst-Behavioral-Health-San-Francisco-CA-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-164169600.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,672bcc8a03f9c0b4113f693e9c477b7e
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:49:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking for FT and PT Receptionists for our beautiful facility located in Malibu. This person will assist at the front desk and will also rotate at our entry gate office. This person will have the following background:- Receptionist experience- Excellent phone and customer service skills- Experience in ordering supplies, taking notes and assisting staff and clients with their needs- Healthcare or mental health environment experience preferred- Able to multi-task.We offer benefits to all full-time staff which include medical, dental, vision, life and entertainment discount tickets. For more information, you may also visit our website at www.passagesmalibu.com We are an equal opportunity employer.",Receptionist Front Desk Job in Malibu,Full Time,"Malibu, CA 90265",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Receptionist-Front-Desk-Job-Malibu-CA-US-165261183.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9dff1ef4e29ab93942df3ecd1b4aa166
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:47:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part time with a possibility of a full time position in future is available for a medical practice. Candidates must be punctual, hard working, electronic medical records knowledge is a plus but computer skills are must. Competitive salary is offered.",medical assistant/frontdesk receptionist Job in Leesburg,Full Time,"Leesburg, VA 20176",All,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-assistant-frontdesk-receptionist-Job-Leesburg-VA-US-165182735.aspx?mescoid=4301136002005&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e40c97165bbcd50d360effd0ea9fa133
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:42:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for selling medical products and services to hospitals, clinics, doctors' offices, and healthcare professionals. Sells products such as medical devices for the aesthetic medical market including to medical spas, weight loss clinic, plastic surgeons and dermatologists.Primary responsibilitiesTravel to defined geographies to sell medical equipment.Contact potential customers at hospitals, clinics, doctors' offices, rehab facilities, and nursing homes to sell medical products and equipment.Arrange appointments with doctors, medical spas and wellness centersCold-call or go door-to-door.Deliver presentations to doctors, medical spas and wellness centersBuild relationships with medical staff.Provide competitive information such as bid situations, pricing data, or bundling arrangements in order to establish negotiated pricing contracts for assigned products.Perform product demonstrations, installations, and application support.Improve product knowledge and sales techniques.Travel throughout assigned territory to call on regular and prospective customers to solicit orders or talks with customers on sales floor or by phone.Research competitors.Gathers, analyzes and delivers information from the field to allow the company to develop strategies and products appropriated for he market.Coordinate all issues with key clients between sales, service, support, customer services, marketing and finance.Take orders and train clients on medical devicesHelp in the installation and set-up of equipment.Stay informed about the activities of health services in a particular area.Independent Rep/Manager Position - Commission Only Pay Plan - At plan $200K+",Medical Device Area Sales Manager Job in Miami,Full Time,"Miami, FL 33131",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Device-Area-Sales-Manager-Job-Miami-FL-US-165179646.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),27d69ed1537c9f287dc8f1c14703ef3d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:39:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the only global provider of commercial solutions, Quintiles understands what it takes to deliver nationally and internationally. Our teams help biopharma get their medicines to the people who need them. We help customers gain insight and access to their markets and ultimately demonstrate their product's value to payers, physicians and patients. A significant part of our business is acting as the biopharma's sales force to physicians or providing nurses to educate patients or prescribers. With the right experience, you can help deliver medical breakthroughs in the real world.   We are excited to announce that at this time we are looking for a Nurse Educator to join our team of over 10,000 global field personnel supporting our pharmaceutical and biotech clients.  Nurse Educator  Patients are at the center of our business strategies. The Nurse Educator Program is an educational based program designed as a resource for patients living with auto-immune diseases that have been prescribed specific medications. Nurse Educators provide education about specific disease treatments, and resources to help patients better begin and manage their disease state and resources associated with their prescribed medication. Nurse Educators are responsible for participating in one-on-one communications with patients as well as appropriate medical professionals within the associated treatment process. Since the program is strictly educational based, Nurse Educators do not provide medical advice or work clinically within this role.   The Nurse Educator will:     Coordinate and facilitate the connection between patients and program approved, patient based resources. Provide direct educational training to patients on specific disease states, and assigned medication. Develop local Patient Advocacy opportunities by creating and/or supporting existing community networks and educational forums Support patient and provider educational speaker programs Provide patient-focused education to promote behavioral change for the empowerment of patients to improve specific treatment compliance Foster appropriate dialogue between patient and health care provider   Quintiles offers a friendly, progressive work atmosphere and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, life insurance and vision coverage, tuition assistance, bonus plan and 401(k). We look forward to the prospect of working with you! Please apply on-line at: http://www.quintiles.com/    EEO Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled     Job Qualifications:     Bachelor's degree Preferred BSN and/or RN licensure Current nursing license in good standing 5 + yrs clinical experience in healthcare to include hospital, home health, pharmaceutical or biotech Nurse educator experience preferred Bilingual in English/Spanish preferred Valid drivers license required Direct interaction with patient and support for persistence and compliance Knowledge of clinical data and pharmacology Demonstrated time management skills; planning and prioritization skills; ability to multi-task and maintain prioritization of key projects and deadlines Demonstrated effective presentation skills; ability to motivate others; excellent interpersonal (written and verbal) skills with demonstrated effectiveness to work cross-functional and independently Demonstrated ability to develop, follow and execute developed plans in an independent environment Demonstrated ability to effectively build positive relationships both internally & externally Demonstrated ability to be adaptable to changing work environments and responsibilities Fully competent in MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) and iPad technology Flexibility to work weekends and evenings Travel up to 20%   Additional Information:",Nurse Educator - Spokane,Full Time Employee,"Spokane, WA 99201",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Educator-Spokane-WA-4714-Job-Spokane-WA-US-164699758.aspx?mescoid=2500357001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,4cd07b4ac1224b98c5aad6108b7841a3
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:20:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ortho Tech:MMI is Central Maryland’s most comprehensiveorthopaedic practice,located in Frederick.Seeking an experiencedOrtho Tech. Successful candidate will work with physicians and apply,adjust and remove casts, splints, etc. as well asassemble and dispense braces and otherorthopaedic equipment.Basic working knowledgeof theory and practice of splinting and bracingrequired. 1 to 3 years ofexperience, ASOP, NAOT or military training helpful. Flexible hours. Congenial working environment.Excellent salary and benefit plan. For interview, please email resume to resumes@mmidocs.com or fax resume to301-694-7945. EOE",ORTHO TECH Job in Frederick,Full Time,"Frederick, MD 21702",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/ORTHO-TECH-Job-Frederick-MD-US-165262704.aspx?ch=fnp&mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1033cd7f87b41733ab60b4a64acea3b3
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:09:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace.   Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. I believe my work is my calling.As a Hospice LPN, you will:Provide skilled professional nursing care to patient/family/caregiver as directed by the supervising Case Manager or the Patient Care Manager and in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations and with Company’s policies and procedures.Provide timely documentation of patient services based on plan of care.Identify other physical, psychological, social and spiritual needs for assigned patients. Work closely with other members of the interdisciplinary team to ensure all patient and family care needs are being met. Implement nursing plan of care as directed by the interdisciplinary team and Patient Care Manager.Provide professional nursing care by utilizing all elements of nursing process as directed by the plan of care.Responsible for checking and ordering medications.Assess and provide patient/family/caregiver education and information pertinent to diagnosis and self-plan of care.Participate in coordination of Hospice services, appropriately communicating and reporting the need for Hospice interdisciplinary team members (e.g., HCA, OT, PT, MSW, ST, Dietitian) to the Case Manager or Patient Care Manager.Order and use equipment and supplies effectively and efficiently.Provide appropriate pain/symptom management.  Evaluate patient’s response to treatments/medications.Required SkillsQualifications:LPN or LVN licensed in the state where program is located  Graduate of accredited practical nurse or vocational nursing programMinimum of one-year general nursing experienceCommunity health/Hospice or medical/surgical experienceUnderstanding of Hospice philosophy and needs of terminally illSelf-directed with ability to work with little supervisionDemonstrate excellent observation, good nursing judgment and communication skillsAbility to provide good written documentation in a timely mannerRequired ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, cardio nurse, cardio LPN, cardio LVN, cardiac nurse, cardiac LPN, cardiac LVN, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, home health nurse, homecare nurse, home care nurse, home health LPN, home health LVN, homecare LPN, homecare LVN, home care LPN, home care LVN, hospice nurse, hospice LPN, hospice LVN, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, LPN, LVN, L.P.N., L.V.N., license practical nurse, licensed practical nurse, license vocational nurse, licensed vocational nurse, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology LPN, oncology LVN, oncology nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho LPN, ortho LVN, palliative care LPN, palliative care LVN, LPN Job, LVN Job, LPN jobs, LVN jobs, Nursing, nursing job, nursing jobs, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab LPN, rehab LVN, rehab nurse, skilled visit, staff LPN, staff LVN, staff nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit LPN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry LPN, telemetry LVN, travel nurse, travel LPN, travel LVN, visit nurse, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationGreat Bend, Kansas, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Hospice LPN Job in Great Bend,,"Great Bend, KS",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Hospice-LPN-Job-Great-Bend-KS-US-165225061.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=16,,,bdc8ed3de0b158a4f13976768abb22a3
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:17:01:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This patient care facility is looking for a dynamic, detail-driven individual to join their health information management team. This company offers competitive wage, outstanding benefits, and true work-life balance.The Health Information Management Specialist is responsible for chart auditing, supervising admission information, and inputting clinical and patient history information into a health information data base system. Beyond these duties, the Health Information Management Specialist will:? Attend meetings regarding medical insurance updates and implement recommendations.? Assist patients in completing insurance-related documentation.? Utilize ICD-10 coding system.? Maintain record archives and file current records completed.? Exercise outstanding communication skills, both verbal and written.? Generate letters regarding social services.Qualifications:? Proven experience in medical software systems? Displayed abilities in Outlook? 3-5 years of medical records experience ? Knowledge of ICD 10 coding system? RHIA or RHIT certification? High school diploma/GED We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1022926 Job Experience:,, Medical terminologyRHIT, RHIA certificationICD 10 codingCertificate in HIM a plus!",Health Information Management Specialist- Great Benefits! Competitive Pay! Job in Kent,Full Time Employee,"Kent, WA 98032",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Information-Management-Specialist-Great-Benefits!-Competitive-Pay!-Job-Kent-WA-US-165316289.aspx?mescoid=2900531001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2140b732e6b3a71cd18f53a2876666a1
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:16:58:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Nursingneeded for 82 bed skilled nursing facility. Must have R.N. license. Vacation, sick, dental, health, and vision benefits offered. To be a part of our health care team, please call or stop by Windsor Estates 2042 North Business Hwy 5 Camdenton MO 65020 or (573)346-5654.",Director of Nursing Job in Camdenton,Full Time,"Camdenton, MO 65020",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Nursing-Job-Camdenton-MO-US-165235018.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=19,,,3455996e04fd25361aa1d8c747f30e12
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:16:58:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reporting to the Director of Ambulatory Services, responsible for the development and coordination of the Pediatric Outpatient Services in the KidsSTOP at COPs Program. Organizes and coordinates the nursing care in KidsSTOP at COPs to provide quality service to physicians and patients. Provides clinical expertise and supervision of the clinical competencies of the staff nurses, collaborating with the Nurse Manager of COPs on staff development. Assists the Nurse Manager/Director of Ambulatory Services with the daily operations of the KidsSTOP at COPS, including scheduling, patient flow, and coordination with ancillary departments.A. Assists in the overall development of the KidsSTOP at COPs Program, coordinating the delivery of patient care between KidsSTOP, COPS, lab, radiology and other necessary departments. (E) B. Coordinates the schedules of KidsSTOP at COPs staff; makes daily assignments based on expertise of staff, patient needs and physician needs; adjusts staff in accordance to patient volume, acuity and flow. (E)C. Serves as a resource to staff delivering patient care, assisting in coordination of patient flow, just-in-time clinical training, etc. (E)D. Confronts and resolves conflicts involving staff, physicians, patients/families and other departments. (E)E. Contributes to Associate performance appraisals. (E)F. Monitors the quality of nursing care in KidsSTOP at COPs, particularly compliance with nursing practice standards. (E)G. Performs charge nurse role and duties routinely. (E)H. Participates in interviews and hiring process of nursing and support staff for the unit(s). (E)I. Collaborates with the Nurse Educators/Nurse Manager of COPs/Director of Ambulatory Services for staff development programs. (E)J. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by KidsSTOP at COPs.K. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial. Cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served. (E)L. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE Values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa Health Care. (E)M. Performs other duties as assigned. (M)Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",RN Coord Clinical Program- Pedi Acute Care Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78207",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Coord-Clinical-Program-Pedi-Acute-Care-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-165237880.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,8d11598743d304ece37ea8c0ed392696
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:16:57:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Winning Goal.At the Village Network, one of Ohio’s leading private residential, day treatment, and treatment foster care providers, our goal is to make a difference in the lives of children and teens through the highest quality of service possible.  Help us achieve our goal.  Make a positive difference in the lives of our community’s most precious asset, our future, our youth. Contract Clinical Therapist – Uhrichsville OP/FC Brite Futures Program Completes diagnostic assessment within 30 days of placement. Conducts a minimum of 3 assessment interviews to complete socio-demographic information and diagnostic assessment of youth served. Participates in the development of the Individual Service Plan within 30 days. Goals for ongoing counsing are written at this time. Provides ongoing individual or group counseling consistent with ISP goals. Completes progress, notes, diagnostic assessment and participates in initial ISP development and meets quarterly to review and update the youth’s progress in the goals set. Responds to crisis situations, under the supervision of their manager. Maintains ongoing contract regarding progress of the youth with advocates and staff. Submits billing form and corresponding clinical documentation bi-weekly. Performs other duties as required. Requires Master’s degree in Social Work or related field; With approval of the Regional Director, candidates with a Bachelor’s degree and LSW or PC may also be considered.independent licensure; valid OH driver’s license and insurable driving record; and good communication skills. Two years’ previous experience preferred. Starting wage up $35 - $45 per hour.reply to:https://home.eease.adp.com/recruit/?id=15175471",Contract Clinical Therapist Job in Uhrichsville,Full Time,"Uhrichsville, OH 44683",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Contract-Clinical-Therapist-Job-Uhrichsville-OH-US-165213507.aspx?mescoid=2900496001001&jobPosition=2,35.00 - 45.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),98c1fa66182035af44e294d268cc1e06
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:16:14:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYPlan and administer medically prescribed physical therapy treatment for patients suffering from injuries, or muscle, nerve, joint and bone diseases, to restore function, relieve pain, and prevent disability by performing the following duties. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Duties and responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. Maintain superior clinical care quality and patient and physician satisfaction. Achieve patient care time targets, with a general target of 75%+ minimum in the outpatient setting. Exhibit positive attitude and behaviors facilitating team work, efficiency, and care quality and promoting a favorable unit and company image. Maintain excellent individual compliance and reimbursement standards including development and delivery of an appropriate care plan, efficient, relevant, optimal, and complete documentation, meeting chart sign off requirements, capturing of patient time for billing, and performing chart reviews and other quality assurance activities for other clinicians as directed. Deliver care as broadly specified within applicable state practice act. SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIESClinically supervise assigned staff including physical therapy assistants and aides/techs.  Carry out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the organization's policies and applicable laws.  Responsibilities may include training employees; planning, assigning, and directing work; addressing complaints and resolving problems. QUALIFICATIONS & COMPETENCIESTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Please see the attached required competencies for a Physical Therapist. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEGraduate of an accredited curriculum in physical therapy. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONSMust hold a valid and in good standing license to practice in the State where the facility of employment is located; or be eligible to obtain such license.  Must have current CPR certification. PHYSICAL DEMANDSThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk, reach with hands and arms, and talk or hear.  The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel.  The employee is occasionally required to sit and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.  The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 50 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, and peripheral vision. WORK ENVIRONMENTThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.",Physical Therapist - Peds - PRN or Part Time - Jackson,"Part Time, Employee","Jackson, MS 39232",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-Peds-PRN-or-Part-Time-Jackson-MS-Job-Jackson-MS-US-165185939.aspx?ch=courierpress&mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,7d0fb1029594d59d442c68738a1a843a
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:15:49:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Govig Healthcare Group is seeking a Psychiatrist and Psychiatric Nurse Practitioner for a non-profit organization in the diverse and beautiful Utica, NY.  This organization provides direct-care services and programs for child / adolescent and adults who are physically, developmentally, or mentally challenged and their families. Incredible benefits:High % match on retirement that rivals state pensionsVery low cost benefits for individuals and familiesGenerous Vacation packageRelocation compensationFun, flexible work environment!Monday - Friday No weekends or on call. This is a full-time, on-site position.  We are very motivated to bringing you on board.  Call or email us - let's talk!",Child Psych Nurse Practitioner Job in Utica,,"Utica, NY",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Child-Psych-Nurse-Practitioner-Job-Utica-NY-US-165303484.aspx?mescoid=2900500001001&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,51a4b719d443a258913d8e537b544923
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:15:48:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a Certified Medical Assistant or graduating from a Medical Assistant program soon? Then, we would love to speak with you! We are growing and have an immediate need for 15 Certified Medical Assistants to join our Primary Care and Specialty Practices! Come meet our Clinic Services Manager, Practice Managers, and Human Resources team and interview for the position on the spot! For more information about our organization and to formally apply, please visit: www.stamfordhealthmedicalgroup.orgLocations with Available Openings: Darien, Stamford, Wilton, Riverside, and Greenwich.When: Wednesday, April 13, 2016.Additional Details: Once you have applied, you will be contacted by a member of our Human Resources Team that will review the process to join the job fair. Please keep in mind that this is an Invitation Only event.We look forward to meeting you!",Certified Medical Assistant - JOB FAIR! (SHMG) (-) Job in Stamford,"Full Time, Employee","Stamford, CT",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Medical-Assistant-JOB-FAIR!-SHMG-3552-372-Job-Stamford-CT-US-165182345.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,2bacf5ba8fff04d84c890724093b4fa3
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:14:58:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Helen Ross McNabb Center (www.mcnabbcenter.org) is a premier not-for-profit provider of behavioral health services.  The Center provides quality care and serves all ages in a continuum of prevention, early intervention, social, co-occurring, addiction, outpatient and crisis services. The Center is seeking motivated staff members that possess the ability to relate to",Centerpointe Co-Occurring Counselor Residential Job in Knoxville,Full Time,"Knoxville, TN 37917",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Centerpointe-Co-Occurring-Counselor-Residential-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-164773113.aspx?mescoid=3900663001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,fefc8ebc8bec7689688e054d0e966dce
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:14:57:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dental AssistantSusquehanna Community Health and Dental Center is seeking anexperienced Dental Assistant who is Radiology Certified.The selected individual will enjoy a full-time schedule, competitive wage and comprehensive benefit package.The Center is a busy, multiple Dentist practice located at471 Hepburn Street, Williamsport, PA.Interested individuals are encouraged to apply by sending their resume to jackieo@aimhealthy.org or by mail to 471 Hepburn Street, Williamsport, PA 17701. An EqualOpportunity Employerprovided by The Williamsport Sun-Gazette",Dental Assistant Job in Williamsport,Full Time,"Williamsport, PA 17701",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Dental-Assistant-Job-Williamsport-PA-US-165326256.aspx?ch=centralpa&mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),db9a7f1b28d967eb88144163bf714095
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:13:54:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Process Scientist II-POS_75044587-1DescriptionJob Title: Senior Process Scientist IILocation: North Brunswick, NJPurpose:The incumbent provides hands-on technical leadership in designing, conducting and supervising scientific experiments for process development, optimization, scale-up and technology transfer for a variety of veterinary dosage forms, including the development of effective cleaning methods. Provides a lead role as technical liaison with multidisciplinary R&D teams and global manufacturing sites. As a senior staff member, the incumbent supervises other scientists/technicians providing mentoring, technical and administrative guidance and assigns responsibilities while managing multiple projects. Major Responsibilities:- Provides technical leadership in the development of robust industrial manufacturing processes for novel and line extension veterinary dosage forms.- Designs and executes simple to complex experimental studies to identify critical process parameters and define their optimal ranges.- Develops collaborative working relationships with Industrial Operations (IO) counterparts to ensure process development strategies align with industrial expectations and limitations.- Applies broad knowledge of process development and scale up to advance assigned projects and to the development, advancement and/or improvement of new platform technologies or existing processes. - Applies in-depth process knowledge to support IO as needed for OOS/OOT investigations.- In collaboration with IO manufacturing sites, leads the development of site-appropriate cleaning methods.- Coordinates with the GMP Operations group in preparing the master schedule for the pilot plant, tracks development projects and communicates resource constraints.- Represents the department on multi-disciplinary teams with advanced technical knowledge and a solid understanding of current regulatory guidelines.- Documents and prepares comprehensive, accurate and well written reports and project summaries. - Leads, trains and mentors other scientists/technicians and assigns responsibilities in support of multiple projects.- Interacts routinely and effectively within Technical Development teams as well as with Analytical R&D, Manufacturing, QA, and Formulation Development functions.- Conducts work which meets high standards of technical rigor, quality, safety and cGMP compliance.Scope of the Job:- The position has minimal administrative budgeting responsibilities and is primarily technical in nature, managing 1 - 4 other scientists and/or technicians.- Approximately 10-15% domestic and international travel expected.QualificationsKnowledge and Skills:- Ph.D. with minimum 5 years of experience in engineering or related field; or- M.S. with minimum of 7 years of experience in engineering or related field; or- B.S. with minimum of 9 years of experience in engineering or related field.- Demonstrated ability in formulation/process development, scale-up, pilot scale GMP manufacturing and technology transfer activities for dosage forms such as oral chewables, tablets and liquids, and topical liquids.- Experience in design of experiments and the use of statistical tools.- Experience implementing Process Analytical Technology (PAT).- Experience developing cleaning methods.- Working knowledge of cGMP’s in both pilot plant and industrial manufacturing environments.- Excellent written, oral, interpersonal and supervisory skills are necessary. - Ability to establish effective multi-cultural, collaborative, working relationships.About MerialMerial is a world-leading, innovation-driven animal health company, providing a comprehensive range of products to enhance the health and well-being of a wide range of animals. Merial employs 6,600 people and operates in more than 150 countries worldwide with over €2 billion of sales in 2014. Merial has three main business areas: pets, farm animals, and veterinary public health. Our pharmaceuticals and vaccines focus on disease prevention and overall health and wellness in animals, and target more than 200 diseases and conditions across a variety of species. Merial is a Sanofi company. For more information, please see www.merial.com; @Merial Merial Limited and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.#LI-MUSJob:Laboratory/Process/Device DevelopmentPrimary Location:United States-New Jersey-North BrunswickJob Posting:Feb 29, 2016, 2:07:58 PMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regular",Senior Process Scientist II Job in North Brunswick,Full Time Employee,"North Brunswick, NJ",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Process-Scientist-II-Job-North-Brunswick-NJ-US-165237417.aspx?mescoid=1900267001001&jobPosition=14,,General/Other: Medical/Health,ad69581cf82ee86f6ec9d06e0fd0b079
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:13:47:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that the care we give can make every moment count.Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s how our Hospice improves quality of life in the final stages of life. By delivering palliative care by hospice professionals, our patients can spend their remaining days in comfort and peace.   Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. We believe that every moment matters. We believe in compassionate care. Most of all, we believe in dignity and respect for each patient we serve. I believe my work is my calling.As a Hospice Registered Nurse, you will:Provide skilled professional nursing care to patient/family/caregiversOversee and provide primary care, including all clinical care, palliative care, and symptom control and identify other physical, psychological, social and spiritual needs for assigned patients.Regularly assess the patient for nursing needs.Implement the Plan of Care Provisions to meet their needs, initiate appropriate intervention and support for the patient and family upon admission and re-evaluate the patient’s nursing needs to provide appropriate, comprehensive and responsive care plan interventions. Work closely with other members of the interdisciplinary team to ensure all patient and family care needs are being met. Work in collaboration with the Patient Care Manager and the Interdisciplinary Team in the planning, implementation and evaluation of medical and nursing care. Required SkillsQualificationsCurrent and unrestricted Registered Nurse licensureBachelor’s degree and C.H.P.N. (Certified Hospice and Palliative Nurse) certification preferredMinimum of one year general nursing preferred with current Hospice, home health, medical, surgical or critical care experienceExperience with pain and symptom management interventionsAbility to work within an interdisciplinary settingUnderstanding of Hospice philosophy, principles of death/dyingRequired ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, BLS, BSN, cardio nurse, cardio RN, cardio registered nurse, cardiac nurse, cardiac RN, cardiac registered nurse, case management, case manager, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, MSN, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology RN, oncology nurse, oncology registered nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho RN, ortho registered nurse, palliative care RN, palliative care registered nurse, registered nurse, RN Job, RN Jobs, Registered Nurse Job, Registered Nurse Jobs, Nursing, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab RN, rehab registered nurse, rehab nurse, Registered Nurse, Registered Nurse Case Manager, RN, R.N., RN Case Manager, skilled visit, staff RN, staff nurse, staff registered nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit RN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry RN, travel nurse, travel RN, travel registered nurse, visit nurse,  Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.877.44.HOSPICE.   Job LocationOxford, Alabama, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Hospice Registered Nurse Job in Oxford,,"Oxford, AL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Hospice-Registered-Nurse-Job-Oxford-AL-US-165225090.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=13,,,9dfda3c6f8955b1e9293df1330e4d59e
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:13:46:41,No,jobs.monster.com," - Large practice seeking certified LVN to join their fast-paced office.  - EMR experience is required. - E-Clinical works experience preferred.  - Must be able to provide proof of certification.  - Monday-Friday, 8-5pm - Excellent benefits - Practice will pay for renewal of certification and scrubs after 90 probationary period. Job Purpose:Serves patients by providing disease screening; administering immunizations.Duties:* Obtains health history and/or immunication status by interviewing patient and/or relative.* Determines suspicion of presence of disease by performing screening tests.* Records patient statistics by measuring and recording height/length and weight, blood pressure, and pulse.* Immunizes patients by preparing, administering, and recording immunizations.* Documents actions by completing forms, reports, logs, and records.* Keeps supplies ready by inventorying stock; placing orders; verifying receipt.* Keeps equipment operating by following operating instructions; troubleshooting breakdowns; maintaining supplies; performing preventive maintenance; calling for repairs.* Avoids legal challenges by keeping patient information confidential.* Serves and protects the clinic by adhering to professional standards, policies and procedures, federal, state, and local requirements, and jcaho standards.* Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; participating in professional organizations; maintaining licensure.* Enhances department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Infection Control, FDA Health Regulations, Health Promotion and Maintenance, Nursing Skills, Bedside Manner, Medical Teamwork, Thoroughness, Self-Development, Multi-tasking, Dependability, Organization",Licensed Vocational Nurse Job in Corpus Christi,Full Time Employee,"Corpus Christi, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Vocational-Nurse-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-164150568.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=11,14.50 - 16.00 $ /hour,Medical/Health,992a6a2c24552860f51b632d84895a1f
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:13:10:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position SummaryThe Alumni Coordinator position is a unique 0.5 (FTE) role that is responsible for leading, creating and maintaining ongoing relationship with alumni program participants, residential and IOP treatment patients. As the main point of contact for alumni services at your designated center, you will work together with the national alumni manager, executive director and treatment center to engage and enroll participants into the Life-Care Recovery Program.  The Life-Care Recovery Program is a recovery management approach that will focus services in the following areas:  Connect: Creating multiple touchpoints of communication, care, support and outreach for those in recovery. Acquire: Providing information, opportunities and resources beyond the point of treatment.  Refuel: Empowering growth through meetings, events, reunions, referrals and service opportunities. Engage: Building trusting relationships with alumni and families in recovery through Sunspire Health family.  Our Life-CARE Statement says:  “We Connect our patients, alumni and their families to Acquire the on-going care that Refuels sobriety and Engages support for long-term recovery” Primary Responsibilities (include but are not limited to):* Liaison with residential patients “on the floor” for encouragement and may serve as an advocate to the community. * Enroll successfully completed patients into the Life-Care Recovery Program prior to discharge.  * Data management of alumni information, follow-up and progress notes through alumni tracker. * Track and monitor follow-up efforts with enrolled alumni for the duration of I year. Next Day, 1wk, 30, 60, 90, 180, 270, 1 year.  * Facilitate and host weekly sober group meetings for local alumni. * Generate monthly reports of program outcomes, alumni recommendations, program activities and alumni interactions.   * Plan and coordinate monthly/quarterly local alumni events such as: Alumni speakers meetings, Special Occasion Dinners, Family weekend events, Picnics and Holiday Parties.  * Plan and coordinate an annual Sunspire Health alumni reunion weekend retreat for alumni and family members.  * Maintain social media alumni groups.  * Other duties as assigned. This position may be a hybrid role where the employee has an additional job description  * This position may often be held by a staff member with multiple roles and other job descriptions.  * Maintain social media alumni groups Education, Skills and Experience Requirements:* Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in a related field preferred; professional experience may substitute for degree requirement. * At least two (2) years of experience in a behavioral health field. * Must have valid driver’s license and proof of insurance. * Basic knowledge of Word, Excel, Outlook * Strong communications skills. * Strong organizational, decision-making, problem-solving and time management skills.  * Must be detail oriented. * Able to work under pressure and meet deadlines as well as be flexible and dependable.  * Strong interpersonal, organizational and analytical skills. * Structure and content of the English language including the meaning and spelling of words, rules of composition, and grammar. * Exceptional customer/client service with the ability to resolve service issues. * Identifying complex problems and reviewing related information to develop and evaluate options and implement solutions. * Use logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems. * Ability to handle multiple priorities with a sense of urgency. * Excellent interpersonal, communication (verbal and written), and presentation skills. Compensation and Benefits:   Sunspire Health provides an environment where our employees can grow and advance professionally, with a healthy balance between work and personal lives. Our biggest investment is in our employees, so we reward and recognize hard work by promoting from within. We offer a competitive benefits and compensation program that includes generous paid time off (PTO) and on-going professional education.  Sunspire Health is an Equal Opportunity Employer encouraging diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.  Abilities: * Listen to and understand information and ideas presented through verbal and written words and sentences. * Communicate information and ideas verbally and written so others will understand. * Apply general rules to specific problems to produce answers that make sense. * Combine pieces of information to form general rules or conclusions; including finding a relationship among seemingly unrelated events. * Identify/recognize when something is wrong or is likely to go wrong and know who to involve for resolution. * Generate various ideas about a given topic. Physical Demands and Working Environment:The conditions herein are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential job functions. * Environment: Work is performed primarily in a standard clinical environment with extensive patient contact and frequent interruptions. Due to the nature of the work, the associate may be exposed to bodily fluids and odors on an occasional basis. * Physical: Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight (up to 40 pounds); to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a computer keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information. * Vision: Close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. * Hearing: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.",Alumni Coordinator Job in Palm Beach Gardens,Part Time,"Palm Beach Gardens, FL 33410",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Alumni-Coordinator-Job-Palm-Beach-Gardens-FL-US-165303909.aspx?mescoid=1100009001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),212e4832c60153273574d6c468bce6db
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:12:59:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Med / Surg Manager- RN - Registered Nurse - Dialysis, BariatricsMed / Surg Manager- RN - Registered Nurse - Dialysis, Bariatrics  Medical/ Surgical Manager - RNTucson, AZ   ·         2 years of related Medical / Surgical  experience ·         Strong knowledge in diabetes education ·         CDE preferred, BSN preferred·         Manages day-to-day departmental operation, staff ·         Budget and efficiency analysis, compliance, program development  PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1355Shannon LongPlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1355shannon.long@coremedicalgroup.com..Keywords:  Med/Surg Nursing Manager - Nurse Manager Medical Surgical - Nursing Director -  Director of Medical/Surgical - Clinical Manger - RN Director - RN Manager - Manager of M/S - Unit Coordinator - Assistant Director Med/Surg - Bariatrics Manager - Surgical Unit - medical unit Manager, RN Manager, ortho Manager, Patient Care Services Director, Med/Surg RN, Intermediate Care Manager, PCU Nurse Director, Director of Nursing - Progressive Care UnitMed / Surg Manager- RN - Registered Nurse - Dialysis, BariatricsMed / Surg Manager- RN - Registered Nurse - Dialysis, Bariatrics  Medical/ Surgical Manager - RNTucson, AZ   ·         2 years of related Medical / Surgical  experience ·         Strong knowledge in diabetes education ·         CDE preferred, BSN preferred·         Manages day-to-day departmental operation, staff ·         Budget and efficiency analysis, compliance, program development  PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1355Shannon LongPlacement Counselor, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group1-800-995-2673 x1355shannon.long@coremedicalgroup.com..Keywords:  Med/Surg Nursing Manager - Nurse Manager Medical Surgical - Nursing Director -  Director of Medical/Surgical - Clinical Manger - RN Director - RN Manager - Manager of M/S - Unit Coordinator - Assistant Director Med/Surg - Bariatrics Manager - Surgical Unit - medical unit Manager, RN Manager, ortho Manager, Patient Care Services Director, Med/Surg RN, Intermediate Care Manager, PCU Nurse Director, Director of Nursing - Progressive Care Unit",Med / Surg Manager- RN - Registered Nurse - Dialysis,Full Time,"Tucson, AZ",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Med-Surg-Manager-RN-Registered-Nurse-Dialysis-Bariatrics-Job-Tucson-AZ-US-164148466.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,Competitive Base & benefits!,,d08dea8e0f02d6d2f0100e46d05380d4
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:12:58:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health LPN, you will:Provide professional nursing services under the direction of a RN in compliance with the state's Nurse Practice Act, any applicable licensure/certification requirement, applicable healthcare standards, governmental laws and regulations, and Gentiva Health Services policies and procedures.  Provide skilled nursing interventions in the treatment of the patient/clients illness, rehabilitative needs and preventative care.  Utilize a holistic approach in the provision of problem specific therapeutic interventions, teaching and training activities in accordance with the plan of care. Apply knowledge and skills in accordance with accepted standards of clinical practice to facilitate problem resolution and achieve individualized patient goals and outcomes.Confer with the RN Supervisor regarding needed changes in the Plan of Treatment.  Accept verbal orders from physician were permitted by state law/regulations/Nurse Practice Act and communicate these orders to the RN Supervisor. Utilize a systematic, individualized goal/outcome driven approach in implementing the nursing plan of care.Maintain contact with patients, physicians, clinical manager(s), other members of the healthcare team in a timely manner regarding patient/family needs and status changes.  Participate in care coordination activities and discharge planning as appropriate.Maintain the highest standards of professional conduct in relation to information that is confidential in nature.  Share information only when the recipient's right to access is clearly established and the sharing of such information is dearly in the best interests of the patient. Appropriately communicate to ensure adherence to professional standards in the provision of and availability of supplies, materials and equipment needed to safely and effectively implement the plan of care.Prepare, submit and maintain documentation as required by the Company and/or facility.  Visit/shift notes documented on day services are rendered.Required SkillsQualifications:LPN or LVN licensed in the state where program is located  Graduate of accredited practical nurse or vocational nursing programMinimum of one-year general nursing experienceCommunity health/Hospice or medical/surgical experienceUnderstanding of Hospice philosophy and needs of terminally illSelf-directed with ability to work with little supervisionDemonstrate excellent observation, good nursing judgment and communication skillsAbility to provide good written documentation in a timely mannerRequired ExperienceKeywords: ACLS, ANA, Acute care, Admissions Nurse, Admission Nurse, cardio nurse, cardio LPN, cardio LVN, cardiac nurse, cardiac LPN, cardiac LVN, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, critical care, ER, Emergency Room, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, home health nurse, homecare nurse, home care nurse, home health LPN, home health LVN, homecare LPN, homecare LVN, home care LPN, home care LVN, hospice nurse, hospice LPN, hospice LVN, hospital, ICU, intensive care unit, LPN, LVN, L.P.N., L.V.N., license practical nurse, licensed practical nurse, license vocational nurse, licensed vocational nurse, medical, medical care, med surg, med-surg, medicare, Nurse, Nurse Care Manager, Nurse Job, Nurse Jobs, oncology LPN, oncology LVN, oncology nurse, palliative care nurse, ortho nurse, ortho LPN, ortho LVN, palliative care LPN, palliative care LVN, LPN Job, LVN Job, LPN jobs, LVN jobs, Nursing, nursing job, nursing jobs, Oasis, PRN, PDM, progressive care nurse, rehab LPN, rehab LVN, rehab nurse, skilled visit, staff LPN, staff LVN, staff nurse, step down unit, step-down unit, step down unit LPN, tele, telemetry, telemetry nurse, telemetry LPN, telemetry LVN, travel nurse, travel LPN, travel LVN, visit nurse, Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. Job LocationWharton, Texas, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Home Health Licensed Practical Nurse-KAH Job in Wharton,,"Wharton, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Home-Health-Licensed-Practical-Nurse-KAH-Job-Wharton-TX-US-165225073.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,,3564742b7e0f2d087017766d14dfa59b
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:11:57:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:·         -Career Advancement opportunities·       -  Employee Recognition and Center Based Incentives·         -Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr·         -Competitive Wages·         -Comprehensive Benefit Package, including:o   FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for any FT Nurse hiredo   Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/montho   401(k) Retirement Programo   Paid Time Off Program At our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.  ·         With an environment focused on quality care, your input is important. Helping to achieve excellence, individuals with high standards and accountability for individual and team performance are embraced.At our center, you will be able to grow your career·         We regularly promote from within. Our employees are made aware of opportunities within our health centers to help further their development and experience.At our center, we provide support and resources ·         We have many resources available to those working throughout our center, offering you the right tools to do your job well.At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills·         We invest in you! Training and continuing education are encouraged to promote skill development.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans·         We offer a competitive compensation and industry leading benefits package.  POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the Unit Manager / DON, a RN assumes responsibility and accountability for a group of residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through assessment, implementations, and evaluation of the plan of care.  The RN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants and helpers.  Follows all Center’s policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Makes frequent rounds to note resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.2.    Gives/receives the nursing report upon reporting in and ending shift duty hours.3.    *Ensures assigned work area (i.e. nurse station, med. Cart, medication room, etc.), resident/patient care rooms and treatment areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.  Monitors supplies and orders as needed.4.    *Attends regularly conducted staff meetings as scheduled by the Director of Nursing/Unit Manager and participates regularly in continuing education in-service programs.5.    *Handles on-call responsibilities as required.6.    Provides the following nursing functions:·         *Responsible for resident/patient care during his/her respective shift.·         *Provides required patient assessments and interventions.·         Reviews care plans, at least daily, to ensure appropriate care.·         Appraises the DON / Unit Manager of resident /patient status changes in condition.·         *Takes and records blood pressure and vital signs.·         *Administers catheter care as required (may include catheter insertion).·         *Provides respiratory care, e.g. oxygen, nebulizer treatments.·         *Assists the physician in therapeutic measures, as needed.·         Participates in care plan development and attends resident/patient care conferences.·         Helps determine policies for improvement of care.·         Receives and transcribes physician’s orders to resident’s/patient’s charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·         *Prepares and administers medications and performs treatments as ordered by the physician.·         Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s/patient’s response to the care.·         Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.·         Completes the required forms upon admission, transfer, and/or discharge.·         Informs physician of resident/patient change of condition.7.    *Counts all controlled drugs with other nurse at shift change and notifies the DON / Unit Manager of all drug and narcotic discrepancies noted on your shift.8.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart locked according to regulations.  Responsible for security of keys. 9.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart clean and orderly.10.  Conducts weekly shift meetings with nursing assistants.11.  Participates in the Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) process as assigned.12.  *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center’s Corporate Compliance Program.13.  Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.14.  *Attends and participates in in-service classes, performance improvement (“PI”) committees, and other meetings as assigned.15.  Follow facility dress and hygiene policies.16.  Safety·         Knows and follows facility rules.·         Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·         Follows facility smoking policies.·         Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·         Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·         *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·         Uses required protective equipment.·         Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.17.  Resident Rights·         Knows Resident Rights.  Help the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·         Reports resident/patient complaints to management.·         Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.18.  HIPAA·         Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·         Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee. Other Duties: •             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in marketing events.•             Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: One year of experience preferred. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to manage and supervise nursing staff. Ability to make independent decisions. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer.  ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN $,Full Time,"Spokane, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-10-00-SIGN-ON-Franklin-Hills-Health-Rehab-Job-Spokane-WA-US-165294409.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=18,,,95c0fb0a54056f1696ad3279bba005c5
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:11:49:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Certified Medical Assistant - Healthcare - Medical Office AssistantJob ResponsibilitiesWe are looking for experienced Medical Assistants for various full time positions we have available. In this role, you will assist with overall patient care. Responsibilities of the role include, but are not limited to: Handling front office dutiesAdministering InjectionsTaking Vital signsAdministering EKG'sAnswering phonesCertified Medical Assistant - Healthcare - Medical Office Assistant RequirementsQualified candidates must be able to multitask in a fast-paced environment. We are seeking candidates with at least 2 years of experience in either a family practice or internal medicine. As a Medical Assistant, you must be outgoing, personable, and ready to put your talent to work! As a Medical Assistant you must be able to perform the following tasks: Rooming patientsMaintaining a sterile environmentsTaking vitals and patient historyAssisting in office proceduresPerforming duties with excellent customer service skillsCertified Medical Assistant - Healthcare - Medical Office Assistant",Certified Medical Assistant Job in Pomona,Full Time,"Pomona, NY",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Medical-Assistant-Job-Pomona-NY-US-165216241.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=7,14.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,53e238a390178ffa3874110b0c74eef7
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:11:48:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"As the only global provider of commercial solutions, Quintiles understands what it takes to deliver nationally and internationally. Our teams help biopharma get their medicines to the people who need them. We help customers gain insight and access to their markets and ultimately demonstrate their product's value to payers, physicians and patients. A significant part of our business is acting as the biopharma's sales force to physicians or providing nurses to educate patients or prescribers. With the right experience, you can help deliver medical breakthroughs in the real world.   We are excited to announce that at this time we are looking for a Nurse Educator to join our team of over 10,000 global field personnel supporting our pharmaceutical and biotech clients.  Nurse Educator  Patients are at the center of our business strategies. The Nurse Educator Program is an educational based program designed as a resource for patients living with auto-immune diseases that have been prescribed specific medications. Nurse Educators provide education about specific disease treatments, and resources to help patients better begin and manage their disease state and resources associated with their prescribed medication. Nurse Educators are responsible for participating in one-on-one communications with patients as well as appropriate medical professionals within the associated treatment process. Since the program is strictly educational based, Nurse Educators do not provide medical advice or work clinically within this role.   The Nurse Educator will:     Coordinate and facilitate the connection between patients and program approved, patient based resources. Provide direct educational training to patients on specific disease states, and assigned medication. Develop local Patient Advocacy opportunities by creating and/or supporting existing community networks and educational forums Support patient and provider educational speaker programs Provide patient-focused education to promote behavioral change for the empowerment of patients to improve specific treatment compliance Foster appropriate dialogue between patient and health care provider   Quintiles offers a friendly, progressive work atmosphere and a comprehensive benefits package including medical, dental, life insurance and vision coverage, tuition assistance, bonus plan and 401(k). We look forward to the prospect of working with you! Please apply on-line at: http://www.quintiles.com/    EEO Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/Disabled     Job Qualifications:     Bachelor's degree Preferred BSN and/or RN licensure Current nursing license in good standing 5 + yrs clinical experience in healthcare to include hospital, home health, pharmaceutical or biotech Nurse educator experience preferred Bilingual in English/Spanish preferred Valid drivers license required Direct interaction with patient and support for persistence and compliance Knowledge of clinical data and pharmacology Demonstrated time management skills; planning and prioritization skills; ability to multi-task and maintain prioritization of key projects and deadlines Demonstrated effective presentation skills; ability to motivate others; excellent interpersonal (written and verbal) skills with demonstrated effectiveness to work cross-functional and independently Demonstrated ability to develop, follow and execute developed plans in an independent environment Demonstrated ability to effectively build positive relationships both internally & externally Demonstrated ability to be adaptable to changing work environments and responsibilities Fully competent in MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) and iPad technology Flexibility to work weekends and evenings Travel up to 20%   Additional Information:",Nurse Educator - Trenton,Full Time Employee,"Trenton, NJ 08601",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Nurse-Educator-Trenton-NJ-4714-Job-Trenton-NJ-US-164718380.aspx?mescoid=2500357001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,f29bd7351167de9890ea37dc816cbb9d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:10:55:54,No,jobs.monster.com,UBMD Internal Medicine is seeking a full time Medical Assistant for fast-paced Amherst clinic. Minimum 2 years clinical experience required.Must possess excellent clinical and computer skills.Please note that any offer of employment is contingent upon background check and drug screen. Please submit resume with salary requirements to hr@ubmdim.com or fax to 716-961-9910. AA/EOE,Medical Assistant Job in Buffalo,Full Time,"Buffalo, NY 14226",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-165220645.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f4b4819793a596d65be87eac7e1877a7
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:10:54:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time / Second or Third Shift, Every other weekendBrookdale Wooster 1615 Cleveland Road Wooster, OH 44691 Job #:049296bBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications:* Current practical nursing licensure within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Wooster,Part Time Employee,"Wooster, OH 44691",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Wooster-OH-US-165262144.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=4,,Medical/Health,ea72960ddb0782f52b59202a62355001
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:10:33:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Clinical Application SpecialistAbout usVisionix is a brand of Luneau Technology, a global manufacturer and marketer of ophthalmic instrumentation utlizingwavefront technology.  We are in a rapid growth phase and looking for energetic individuals who want to help us build a significant presence in the U.S.The JobAs the Clinical Application Specialist you will travel to customer sites, provide phone and remote access support helping customers learn how to get the best results from our refractive instrument suite; and along the way help make their practice more efficient, create happy patients and enable clinicians to have more consultation time and/or higher patient throughput.  You will become an expert on our products and work with our service, sales and marketing personnel in a team-based approach to solving customer problems.  We expect all employees to deliver the highest levels of customer satisifaction.About youWe are looking for someone with 3+ years of clinical experience in operating and/or teaching the use of ophthalmic instruments.  You should have strong communication skills, enjoy teaching, a strong work ethic, be self-directed and detail-oriented with good organizational skills.  You should be familiar with MS Office products and not be afraid of a spreadsheet or computers.  You are a road warrior, not afraid to be on the road 40-50% of the time including some weekends and possibly holidays.  We like credentials and will help you maintain/increase your certifications: COA, CCOA, COT,  and/or COMT.  A bachelor’s degree or prior experience with an ophthalmic manufacturer is an advantage.We are looking to hire immediately.  Location is flexible.  We are an equal opportunity employer. ",Clinical Application Specialist Job in Columbus,Full Time,"Columbus, OH 43214",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Clinical-Application-Specialist-Job-Columbus-OH-US-165256223.aspx?mescoid=1500126001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0972990f4128c36f707cb3c3df1dab30
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:10:33:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. I believe in working for a company that cares as much as I do.We offer a unique employment package that includes:Unprecedented opportunities for career growth.Clinical ladiver for professional credentialing and advancement.Innovative specialties with cutting-edge training and development.Flexible full-time, part-time and PRN positions. I believe my work is my calling.As a Home Health Physical Therapist Assistant, you will:Provide therapy services planned, delegated and supervised by the qualified Physical Therapist consistent with the patient's approved Plan of Treatment.Observe patients during treatment, compiles data and report patient's progress to Physical Therapist.Act as a liaison and maintains contact with patients, Physical Therapist, Clinical Manager(s), other members of the healthcare team and the community in assuring effective care coordination and appropriate resource referrals.Recommend to Physical Therapist possible modification to existing physical therapy treatment plans and training needs to achieve maximum results.Maintain and submit documents as required by the Company and/or facility.Accurately and thoroughly document patient care observations, interventions and evaluation on the day services are rendered.  Assist qualified Therapist with preparation of patient progress notes.Participate in Performance Improvement activities as assigned.  Communicate information that enable collection and root cause analysis of data to identify opportunities for improvement.Maintain the highest standards of professional conduct in relation to information that is confidential in nature.  Share information only when recipient's right to access is clearly established and sharing of such information is in the best interest of the patient.Maintain/enhance clinical practice skills by attending, participating in/conducting staff development/continuing education program.Required SkillsQualifications Degree from an accredited Physical Therapist Assistant Program (approved by the APTA) A minimum of six months physical therapist assistant experience preferred Home Health experience a plus Current and unrestricted PTA licensure Current CPR certification Good organizational and communication skillsRequired ExperienceKeywords: Acute care, ADL, ADLs, ALF, Balance dysfunction, case management, case manager, clinical, clinic, clinical rotation, geriatric, geriatrics, Healthcare, health care, Homecare, home care, home health, homehealth, hospital, inpatient, inpatient PTA, inpatient P.T.A., inpatient physical therapist assistant, inpatient physical therapy assistant, inpatient therapist, licensed therapist, licensed PTA, licensed P.T.A., licensed physical therapist assistant, licensed physical therapy assistant, modalities, neuro, neurological, ortho, ortho PTA, ortho P.T.A., ortho therapist, ortho physical therapist assistant, ortho physical therapy assistant, orthopedics, orthopedic, orthopedic PTA, orthopedic P.T.A., orthopedic physical therapist assistant, orthopedic physical therapy assistant, outpatient clinic, PTA, P.T.A., physical therapist assistant, physical therapy, physical therapy assistant, medical, medical care, therapist, therapy Care Manager, therapy case manager, therapy case management, therapy Job, therapy Jobs, PTA job, PTA jobs, P.T.A. job, P.T.A. jobs, physical therapy assistant job, physical therapy assistant jobs, physical therapist assistant job, physical therapist assistant jobs, Oasis, outpatient, out patient, outpatient rehab, outpatient PTA, outpatient P.T.A, outpatient physical therapy assistant, outpatient physical therapist assistant, PRN, PDM, rehab, rehab PTA, rehab P.T.A., rehab physical therapist assistant, rehab physical therapy assistant, rehab setting, rehabilitative, therapeutic, safe strides, safe strides PTA, safe strides P.T.A., safe strides physical therapist assistant, skilled visit, SNF, subacute, sub acute, post acute, therapy, travel PTA, travel P.T.A., travel therapist, travel physical therapist, traveling PTA, traveling P.T.A., traveling physical therapist assistant, traveling physical therapy assistant ~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationKent, Washington, United StatesPosition TypeFull-Time/Regular",Full Time Home Health Physical Therapist Assistant Job in Kent,,"Kent, WA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Full-Time-Home-Health-Physical-Therapist-Assistant-Job-Kent-WA-US-165304364.aspx?mescoid=3100552001001&jobPosition=17,,,05ff2f22e32c9beeb6996222602ab4f7
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:09:47:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"TLC Laser Eye Centers is North America's premier eye care services company, providing eye doctors with the tools and technologies needed to deliver high-quality patient care. Through its unmatched management expertise, technology, extensive optometric relationships, direct to consumer advertising and managed care contracting strength, TLC Laser Eye Centers maintains leading positions in refractive, premium IOL and cataract markets. We have the following opportunity in the Madison, WIPosition is  Full Time OPHTHALMIC ASSISTANT / SURGICAL CONSULTANT: Main Purpose Greet patients, having them complete the proper paperwork and informing them of the process flow; Create, update and maintain accurate patient files, both hard copy and in the database system; Confirm and reschedule appointments ensuring all appropriate parties are informed Primary patient liaison from the time the patient enters the center Ophthalmic testing, including auto refraction, visual acuity, topographical mapping, aberometry measurements, lensometry and eye dilation in a manner consistent with TLC's Gold Standard approach Effective communication of pricing and packages consistent with TLC's Gold Standard approach Provide pre-operative care to patients on surgery days and post-operative care to patients during surgery and post-operative appointments Patient closing, including surgery and post-op scheduling, financial and informed consent discussions Effective and timely follow-up to prospective, current and past patients. Follow standard operating procedures that protect our patients, doctors and staff from undue risk and liability Core Responsibilities / Competencies Provides great customer service; delivers high customer satisfaction (always be friendly and helpful); Exhibits a good balance of listening and verbal communications skills; Primary staff member to develop bond with patients ensuring they feel welcomed, understood and appreciated Introductory knowledge of TLC's value to prospective patients: packages and pricing, TLC's experience and quality of care, local surgeon experience and bio details Ophthalmic/optometric experience is preferred; ability to effectively complete testing associates with a consult work-up; customer service orientation; excellent listening and communication skills Proficient with standard office equipment; multi-task comfortably; ability to work with a high degree of professionalism Exemplary organizational skills; willingness to be cross-trained and fill in for other staff members Comfortably handle obstacles to procedure scheduling Background in customer service and medical/health industry preferred. TLC Vision offers training, a competitive salary, comprehensive benefits and excellent career development opportunities.",Surgical Consultant Job in Madison,Full Time,"Madison, WI 53718",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Surgical-Consultant-Job-Madison-WI-US-165266872.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e8f50d360b6a544d1d9e0b3c966b0f90
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:09:46:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-TimeBaylor RN position to provide Medicare Home Health services-Must have Medicare Home Health experienceBrookdale, 7900 Triad Center Dr #250, Greensboro, NC 27409Job #:RNgreNC054872A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division.Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Brookdale Healthcare Services is looking for a Home Health RN to provide services in the Greensboro location. Join a dynamic team of health care providers focused on health, wellness and prevention for all our patients.Your responsibilities:* Evaluate patient and home health environment to determine required services and involve the patient and patient's family in developing the plan of care* Develop the POC based on findings from evaluation visit* Serve as the patient's advocate and maintain ongoing communication with physician, referral sources, caregivers and facility management to facilitate coordination of care* Responsible for timely completion and synchronization of OASIS visits within the patient home via device (EMR)* Provide direct supervision of nursing clinical care team members (LPN's/LVN's & HHA's)Required skills and qualifications:* Graduate of an accredited school of professional nursing* Licensed as an registered nurse in the state of practice* Home Health experience is a MUST* Travel is required; must have a reliable car w/current insurance coverage and a current driver's license* Experience with Electronic Medical Records (EMR) devices preferred but not requiredIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Registered Nurse RN - Home Health-Baylor Job in Greensboro,Full Time Employee,"Greensboro, NC 27409",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Home-Health-Baylor-Job-Greensboro-NC-US-165181892.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,8dcb6af299bb442149ae3600c0fd8fd6
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:09:01:47,No,jobs.monster.com,Alleghenies Unlimited Care ProvidersProviding In-Home Personal Care to the Elderly andPersons with DisabilitiesNow Accepting Applications forIn-Home Personal Care Workers Second Shift Residential Program WorkersPart Tme Van DriversHighly Competitive Benefit Packages:Paid trainingStart Making a difference todayApply on-line at www.alucp.org/apply Or contact us for an immediate interview toll free877-371-1110EOE/M/F/D/VThis job listing brought to you by The Johnstown Tribune Democrat,Healthcare Aides & Van Drivers Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,15904,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Healthcare-Aides-Van-Drivers-Job-US-164755607.aspx?ch=newsjtpa&mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,a1545c94619fe16b66b6177937a9e50c
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:09:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"A busy OB/GYN practice seeks a Medical Assistant or Licensed Practical Nurse. Great hours, amazing benefits and friendly staff.One must be:Well spokenProfessionalWell-roundedFriendlyUpbeatDuties include:Filling prescriptionsEducating the patientsPatient TriageVitalsTaking patients backFiling paperworkEtc.Benefits:· 100% health coverage· Two weeks paid vacation/sick leave· 401k· 2 paid snow days· 2 paid bereavement days for immediate familyGreat hours and great pay, Monday through Friday.Please email resumes to be considered. And, please forward to anyone you know that may be interested.",Medical Assistant LPN Job in Fairfax,Full Time,"Fairfax, VA 22030",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-LPN-Job-Fairfax-VA-US-165192282.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cdfdca1b13fc48795d3ea84960ef8ce3
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:08:59:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you passionate about healthcare, working with the elderly, and ready to start your career with a dedicated healthcare team? Come join our team at Buena Vida Nursing and Rehab! Buena Vida Nursing and Rehab offers quality care combined with a warm caring and family-like atmosphere where our residents and employees feel at home. If you meet our qualifications and are ready to jump start your career in healthcare, we want to talk to you!As a Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA), you will ensure that resident’s personal care needs are being met in accordance with Residents’ wishes and Care Plan Objectives.  ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS OF POSITION: ·         Answers signal lights, bells, or intercom system to determine residents' needs and ensures call lights are within reach of resident.·         Ensures that residents’ who are unable to call for help are checked frequently.·         Gives direct resident care such as bathing, dressing, and grooming of residents.·         Assists residents in preparation for and transporting to appointments, activities and social programs.·         Handles linens according to infection control guidelines.·         Feeds residents requiring help and records meal intake.·         Delivers and documents all snacks and supplements.·         Offers fluids to residents frequently to ensure that residents are hydrated where designated by care plan.·         Reviews and implements daily nursing needs as outlined by resident Care Plan or nurse managers.·         Transports residents or assists residents with mobility needs.·         Turns and repositions bedfast residents, alone or with assistance.·         Takes and records temperatures, blood pressure, pulse rates, respiration rates, height, weight, and food and fluid intake and output, as directed.·         Monitors resident’s activities and reports any irregularities of resident performance to nurse managers.·         Participates in and receives nursing report upon reporting and departing to/from work.·         Reports all changes in residents’ conditions to supervisor.·         Maintains cleanliness of residents units, central bathing area, treatment and supply rooms, workrooms, and linen closets.·         Understands and adheres to the guidelines of “Residents Rights”. EDUCATION / REQUIREMENTS: As a CNA, you will need to communicate with residents and nursing staff.  You must be able to speak, read, and write English. Prior experience as an LTC nursing assistant is preferred; or equivalent combination of education and experience.  The successful completion of State Approved Nursing Assistant Training and Competency Evaluation Program is required as well as good standing in the state registry.  ",Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA) Job in San Antonio,Full Time Employee,"San Antonio, TX 78222",,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Nursing-Assistant-CNA-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-159741034.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,3ee14219bdfc4fff41cfae6be296614d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:07:49:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pharmacy TechsCertified with Part D experience. Prior Authorization and Drug Management experience required.PC skills with MS Office, Word, Excel and Access preferred. Email resume to: mkeilty@spectralsolutions.com Reference Code:264624",Pharmacy Tech Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,33764,Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Pharmacy-Tech-Job-US-164179125.aspx?ch=newsstpt&mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2552c88e0ce3b016cc891142d889c7ff
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:07:48:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pediatric Office Seeks a Certified Medical Assistant with Pediatric Experience  Local applicants only please:   Temple Terrace / Tampa / USF areaWe currently have a position open for immediate employment for a Full-Time Medical Assistant to assist the physician and/or a nurse practitioner in a patient-friendly environment.Our Medical Assistants must have the ability to:·         Multitask·         Work independently ·         Be proactive Skills that are required include: ·         Taking vital signs·         Vaccine administration to children and ·         Taking blood samples  Experience in pediatrics as well as with electronic medical records (especially IMS) are a definite plus.Must have reliable transportation. Good job attendance is mandatory!Please attach your cover letter when applying online, including where you obtained your MA degree and certification as well as your previous work experience in the medical field (along with names and contact numbers).   ",Pediatric Medical Assistant Job in Tampa,Full Time,"Tampa, FL 33617",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pediatric-Medical-Assistant-Job-Tampa-FL-US-164965502.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a38652c24af4a514589bee53ea040f0c
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:06:57:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"RAVENWOOD HEALTHCommunity Health Center in Geauga Cty has the following positions open:• FORENSIC THERAPIST• DUAL THERAPIST• YOUTH CARE WORKERS• HOTLINE WORKER/RESIDENTIAL STAFF• EMERGENCY SERVICES THERAPIST-ON SITE AND/OR ON CALL• EMERGENCY SERVICES CLINICAL COORDINATOR• IN HOME FAMILY THERAPIST• FULL-TIME MEDICAL BILLING & CLAIMS FOLLOW-UP• FRONT DESK RECEPTIONIST• MEDICAL RECORDS SPECIALIST• DRIVERSFor Details, Please see: ravenwoodmhc.org Send resume to:HUMAN RESOURCES12557 Ravenwood DriveChardon, OH  44024FAX:  (440) 285-4552durstd@ravenwoodmhc.orgEEO",RAVENWOOD HEALTH Job in Chardon,Full Time,"Chardon, OH 44024",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/RAVENWOOD-HEALTH-Job-Chardon-OH-US-164178642.aspx?ch=newsherald&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,,,8e57663cd520594354bc899cd874e3e6
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:06:56:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The purpose of this position is to join and contribute to a service conscious Pharmacy team who will consistently build relationships with patients by exceeding their needs and providing safe, accurate and efficient care to achieve optimal patient, Team Member and Company outcomes. This position is required to travel among a geographically close area of stores to provide support. Job Responsibilities Model excellent patient care by respecting, engaging and enthusiastically meeting or exceeding all patient needs including processing orders in person and by phone, directing patients to products and merchandise and referring appropriate questions concerning prescriptions and over the counter medicine to the pharmacist. Process all new and refill prescriptions. Input prescriptions while maintaining productivity and quality standards Adhere to all company, state and federal policies, laws and regulations including HIPAA and Pseudoephedrine sales Accurately and efficiently handle prescription data including:- Retrieving prescription orders - Counting, pouring, measuring and weighing tablets and medications - Mixing medications - Selecting the proper prescription container - Creating prescription labels Assist with maintaining proper inventory levels by ordering, receiving, stocking and rotating drugs and other supplies per company policy and procedures Have knowledge of all appropriate service and business metrics and assist team on action plans to improve outcomes. Resolve customer questions and concerns by communicating effectively with the customer and the management team/support staff in an efficient manner. Certification/Qualification and/or Registration as a Pharmacy Technician as required by the state and/or Giant Eagle. Assist in the execution of all company initiatives and programs. Travel to all locations within geographically assigned area to assist in efficient store operations. Little or no financial or budgetary responsibility Amount of Budgetary Responsibility: $0 None Education and Training Required High school diploma or equivalent Experience Required 0 to 6 months Experience Desired Age Requirement At least 18 years of age Shift Any Hours 1st Shift - 6a - 3p 2nd Shift - 2p - 10p Competencies Required Adaptability Customer Focused Gets Things Done Interpersonal Skills Problem Solving Respect for Self and Others Computer Skills Work Environment Normal store environment with no continuous exposure to extreme temps, dust, etc Physical requirements Grasping Hearing (auditory) Bending Carrying Up to 25 pounds Data Entry Filing Lifting Up to 25 pounds Operating Equipment Pulling Pushing Reading Reaching Repetitive Motion Sight or Peripheral Vision Sorting Standing Telephone Usage Twisting Typing Communication (verbal) Walking Weighing Writing Equipment Used Deposit Safe Drive Thru Fill Station Intercom Ordering Machine Safety Cutter Scale WalkieTalkie",Pharmacy Tech Floater (Full-time) Youngstown Metro Area Job in Youngstown,Full Time Employee,"Youngstown, OH",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Pharmacy-Tech-Floater-Full-time-Youngstown-Metro-Area-Job-Youngstown-OH-US-165266891.aspx?mescoid=2900524001001&jobPosition=1,,Medical/Health,dc0657ef6662d64cce2526342df8e9ac
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:05:49:21,No,jobs.monster.com,A urgent care fcility looking for a full / part time expereinnced medical assistant.,Medical Assistant,Full Time,"Oakland, CA 94612",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-MA-Job-Oakland-CA-US-165167565.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),997fb60a9fa93977408e9e25ffd63ad9
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:05:48:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Advocate will provide Counseling and support to victims, family members and significant othersAccompany victims through procedures at area hospitals, police departments, prosecutor's office and courtProvide victims with case related medical and legal optionsprovide appropriate referrals for victims and significant othersPresent educationals and outreach programs in schools, community centers, church groups etc. and sensitivity training programs to personnel at hospitals, police departments and social agencies in the communityCarry out other tasks as deemed necessary by your supervisor to ensure success of the Serv program",Domestic Violence Court Advocate Job in Gloucester,Full Time / Employee,"Gloucester, NJ 08030",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Domestic-Violence-Court-Advocate-Job-Gloucester-NJ-US-165177605.aspx?mescoid=2100315001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),38df7ab5c5e056bb9e72822fecb7dfa5
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:04:56:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"In order to attract and retain our top notch staff, we offer:·         -Career Advancement opportunities·       -  Employee Recognition and Center Based Incentives·         -Educational Assistance up to $2,500/yr·         -Competitive Wages·         -Comprehensive Benefit Package, including:o   FREE Medical Insurance during introductory period for any FT Nurse hiredo   Medical, Dental, Vision single coverage insurance UNDER $115/montho   401(k) Retirement Programo   Paid Time Off ProgramAt our center, you will be making a difference in the lives of our residents.  ·         With an environment focused on quality care, your input is important. Helping to achieve excellence, individuals with high standards and accountability for individual and team performance are embraced.At our center, you will be able to grow your career·         We regularly promote from within. Our employees are made aware of opportunities within our health centers to help further their development and experience.At our center, we provide support and resources ·         We have many resources available to those working throughout our center, offering you the right tools to do your job well.At our center, we offer ongoing training to learn and develop new skills·         We invest in you! Training and continuing education are encouraged to promote skill development.At our center, we offer attractive benefit plans·         We offer a competitive compensation and industry leading benefits package. POSITION SUMMARY: Under the supervision of the Unit Manager / DON, a RN assumes responsibility and accountability for a group of residents/patients for a shift of duty.  Nursing care is provided through assessment, implementations, and evaluation of the plan of care.  The RN adheres to the standards of care for the area, manages the environment to maintain resident/patient safety, and supervises the resident/patient care activity performance by nursing assistants and helpers.  Follows all Center’s policies and procedures.  Performs duties as defined by the State Nurse Practice Act.  REPORTING RELATIONSHIPS: Oversees assigned nursing staff   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: 1.    Makes frequent rounds to note resident/patient conditions and to ensure nursing personnel are performing their work assignments in accordance with acceptable nursing standards.2.    Gives/receives the nursing report upon reporting in and ending shift duty hours.3.    *Ensures assigned work area (i.e. nurse station, med. Cart, medication room, etc.), resident/patient care rooms and treatment areas are maintained in a clean and sanitary manner.  Monitors supplies and orders as needed.4.    *Attends regularly conducted staff meetings as scheduled by the Director of Nursing/Unit Manager and participates regularly in continuing education in-service programs.5.    *Handles on-call responsibilities as required.6.    Provides the following nursing functions:·         *Responsible for resident/patient care during his/her respective shift.·         *Provides required patient assessments and interventions.·         Reviews care plans, at least daily, to ensure appropriate care.·         Appraises the DON / Unit Manager of resident /patient status changes in condition.·         *Takes and records blood pressure and vital signs.·         *Administers catheter care as required (may include catheter insertion).·         *Provides respiratory care, e.g. oxygen, nebulizer treatments.·         *Assists the physician in therapeutic measures, as needed.·         Participates in care plan development and attends resident/patient care conferences.·         Helps determine policies for improvement of care.·         Receives and transcribes physician’s orders to resident’s/patient’s charts, Kardex/Care Plan A, Medication Administration Record (“MAR”), treatment/care plans, as required.·         *Prepares and administers medications and performs treatments as ordered by the physician.·         Charts nurses notes in an informative and descriptive manner that reflects the care provided as well as the resident’s/patient’s response to the care.·         Documents all pertinent data as required by Medicare, Medicaid, Center standards and policies.·         Completes the required forms upon admission, transfer, and/or discharge.·         Informs physician of resident/patient change of condition.7.    *Counts all controlled drugs with other nurse at shift change and notifies the DON / Unit Manager of all drug and narcotic discrepancies noted on your shift.8.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart locked according to regulations.  Responsible for security of keys. 9.    *Keeps medication room and medication cart clean and orderly.10.  Conducts weekly shift meetings with nursing assistants.11.  Participates in the Interdisciplinary Plan of Care (“IPOC”) process as assigned.12.  *Complies with laws and regulations applicable to position and acts in accordance with Center’s Corporate Compliance Program.13.  Treats all residents, visitors, and staff with courtesy.14.  *Attends and participates in in-service classes, performance improvement (“PI”) committees, and other meetings as assigned.15.  Follow facility dress and hygiene policies.16.  Safety·         Knows and follows facility rules.·         Demonstrates proper use of equipment.  Reports equipment needs or repairs.·         Follows facility smoking policies.·         Reports and documents any incidents or accidents of residents, staff or visitors to the appropriate facility personnel.·         Reports all hazardous conditions/equipment to Supervisor.·         *Performs duties, which may include transportation of residents, as assigned in Facility Disaster Plan.·         Uses required protective equipment.·         Follows infection control standards, policies and procedures.17.  Resident Rights·         Knows Resident Rights.  Help the residents/patients exercise and/or protect their rights.·         Reports resident/patient complaints to management.·         Maintains confidentiality of resident/patient information.18.  HIPAA·         Follows and adheres to Center’s policies and procedures implementing HIPAA requirements for the privacy and security of protected health information.·         Uses and/or discloses only minimum amount of Protected Health Information necessary to complete assigned tasks (applies only if position requires access to PHI under Role Based Access Grid).·         Reports all suspected violation of company’s HIPAA policies or procedures to Facility Privacy Designee.Other Duties: •             Participates in all-hands dining.•             *Performs other duties as directed by facility management.•             Participates in marketing events.•             Works overtime, holiday and weekend hours as scheduled.MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS: Education: Possesses a current license to practice in the State as an RN. Experience: One year of experience preferred. Skills, Knowledge and Abilities: Ability to manage and supervise nursing staff. Ability to make independent decisions. Ability to read, write, speak and understand English. Meets all health requirements, as required by law. Ability to relate positively, effectively, and appropriately with residents, families, community members, volunteers and other facility staff.  Demonstrates basic computer knowledge and ability with an aptitude to learn company applications.  Microsoft Office version 1997, 2000 or XP, MS Word, MS Access, MS Excel, E-mail, Outlook, Internet Explorer. ENVIRONMENTAL AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS: The responsibilities of this position involve significant physical activities including standing, lifting (up to 60 pounds unassisted), bending, stooping, pushing, pulling and twisting.  The tasks on this position description marked with an asterisk (*) are those that regularly require these physical activities.  All employees of nursing homes may be required to provide lifting and transfer assistance to residents.  Lifting and/or transferring some residents will require use of a lifting device and /or assistance of other staff.",RN Crestwood Health & Rehab Job in Port Angeles,Full Time,"Port Angeles, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Crestwood-Health-Rehab-Job-Port-Angeles-WA-US-165298671.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,,7d70fa0e8672e754933979ded0ba51de
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:04:55:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Sonographer Position Features:This is a PRN position that requires a seasoned sonographer. The sonographer will perform OB/GYN ultrasounds at various clinics throughout the week, but usually only one location per day and in the local area. The ideal sonographer is highly experienced in OB, has excellent interpersonal skills and can work autonomously with minimal supervision. Good knowledge of the principles, practices and techniques of routine OB/GYN ultrasounds, complex gynecological ultrasounds and maternal fetal medicine ultrasounds including fetal echocardiography. Familiar with Sonultra. Good critical thinking skills to add/perform necessary procedures in complex gynecological and obstetrical examinations are required. Skill in administering ultrasound exams and recording retrieved data in a timely manner. Good time management skills and team oriented. Must be motivated and can work independent. Capable of working with patients and families, staff, and physicians. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1022951 Job Experience:,",sonographer - OB/GYN Job in Seattle,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Seattle, WA 98161",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sonographer-OB-GYN-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165316285.aspx?mescoid=2900518001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7131fad9c580725ab6acc2fa9d86d3e2
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:04:35:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"NURSE PRACTIONER & PHYSICIANS ASSISTANTOur expanding, Otolaryngology practice is seeking a full-time Nurse Practitioner and Medical Assistant for our Amherst, NY Office. We are an independent medical practice with principles that include the highest level of technology and medical experience available in the most convenient, least invasive manner. We offer a competitive compensation structure, as well as a generous benefit plan. Qualified candidate must be a graduate of an accredited NP program and currently licensed or eligible for immediate licensure in New York. Please email your cover letter and resume to: tkaczmarek@tlkmgmt.com",NURSE PRACTIONER & PHYSICIANS ASSISTANT Job in Amherst,Full Time,"Amherst, NY 14226",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/NURSE-PRACTIONER-PHYSICIANS-ASSISTANT-Job-Amherst-NY-US-165325129.aspx?ch=buffalonews&mescoid=2900505001001&jobPosition=1,,,653e870032ba12dde49a0040b9fe578a
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:03:48:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"PAREXEL International is looking to hire an experienced regulatory publishing professional as a Senior Associate, to take the lead on global publishing services for a key partnership client.As Senior Associate based you work as part of a dedicated client team providing outsourced regulatory services - both pre and post approval - to a high profile pharmaceutical company. This role involves working with Insight Publisher to produce EU and Non-EU submissions - CTA, MAA, variations and renewals - to timeline and quality.In this role you will have the opportunity to work on a variety of products across a range of therapy areas on an international level.This position is offered home based in the US, preferably along the East Coast; however, other home based US locations will be considered for the right candidate.QualificationsTo be considered for this position you will have significant experience in the publishing of EU and Non-EU pre and post approval submissions - CTA, MAA, renewals and variations. At a minimum experience with MRP, DCP and eCTD within the EU is required. Proven experience in the use of publishing tools is essential.To be successful in this role you will be a strong communicator, able to work to tight deadlines within a fast paced environment, and hold a Bachelor's degree.EEO DisclaimerPAREXEL complies with all applicable federal, state, and local laws prohibiting discrimination in employment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local law.",Senior Publishing Associate Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,Home Based,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Publishing-Associate-Job-Boston-MA-US-165227960.aspx?mescoid=2700445001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a241fbb6fe40b9f868b11081eeee6175
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:03:47:46,No,jobs.monster.com," FRONT OFFICE COORDINATOR Front office coordinator needed for busy ENT practice in Naples Florida.  FulL Time and P/Tposition. Qualified candidates will be willing to work both front office as check-in and check-out.  Greenway Prime Suite and ENT experience preferred but not necessary.  This position may includetravel to Estero location. Experience with EMR is a must.  Company offers great benefit package.  Please submit resume to fgcent@aol.com. Check–In and Check-out Principle Duties and Responsibilities: 1.      Obtains accurate demographic information from the patient or patient advocate when registering a patient.  Explains the check-in procedures to new patients.2.     Enters insurance information accurately ensuring clean claims processing.3.     Processes the required consent forms and obtains the necessary signatures upon patient arrival.4.     Scans all consent forms and insurance verifications in to patient’s chart.5.     Processes all patient medical record releases according to HIPAA policy and procedure adhering to patient’s rights and confidentiality.6.     Able to identify deductibles, out-of pocket expenses, co-payments, and percentage payables.7.     Schedules/reschedules/cancels appointments accurately and in a timely manner.8.     Collects insurance information while making the initial appointment.9.     Identifies if the company is in network with the patient’s insurance plan or directs the patient to contact the insurance carrier.10.  Answers telephone and greets patients in a courteous manner.11.  Returns messages left in a courteous timely manner.12.  Scans patient documents in the correct category and under the correct date.13.  Documents all important information in patient’s chart including any important conversation with the patient.14.  Monitors and maintains the flow of the front desk15.  Works through and attempts to resolve patient concerns immediately.16.  Monitors the flow of physician schedule before appointment date.17.  Monitors check in sheet and waiting room to ensure no patient is missed at check in.18.  Collects all advertising tracking or intake data for patients as mandated by practice.19.  Makes confirmation phone calls for up coming appointments.20.  Monitors the flow of physician schedule before appointment date.21.  Collects all patient balances, co-pays, co-insurance and deductibles at the time of service.22.  Records all collections on superbill as well as keep a copy of the physician’s superbill.23.  Closes out the collection drawer and identifies where problems exist.24.  Sends proper documentation when physicians refer patients out.25.  Works outstanding patient balances by providing courtesy calls to patients or guarantors. 26.  Performs other responsibilities within the expertise of the individual’s job scope.",Front Office Coordinator Job in Naples,Full Time,"Naples, FL 34110",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Front-Office-Coordinator-Job-Naples-FL-US-165294468.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=15,,,00ca43ca607aef4bcb710766d39ebc21
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:02:58:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Terrace House, our inpatient and detox treatment facilities located in Buffalo are looking for a full time master level, licensed preferred Counselor! The shift is Sunday- Thursday with some evenings required. Come work for a Best Company to Work for employer in New York State! Voted 8 years in a row! We offer health benefits, 401k and profit sharing! Team players should apply!Duties/ Responsibilities include but are not limited to:Conducts assessmentsCreates treatment plansCarries full caseloadFacilitates didactic and practice groupsProvides leadership to entry level counselorsAssists the team with other duties as needed.Requirements: Master's degree in related field, QHP/ License preferred (CASAC, LMHC, LMSW, LCSW), and experience in chemical dependency detox treatment. ",Detox Counselor- Buffalo Job in Buffalo,Full Time Employee,"Buffalo, NY 14203",Nonprofit Charitable OrganizationsOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Detox-Counselor-Buffalo-Job-Buffalo-NY-US-138360326.aspx?ch=buffalonews&mescoid=2100314001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,4b87aec9c358f1fcd3ca29b872208ede
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:02:57:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Serves patients by providing educational information; helping with daily living; monitoring vital signs and functions; administering medications.Duties:* Educates patients and their families by assisting in preoperative, postoperative, and relevant health teaching.* Administers medications by preparing medications; administering specified medication orally or by subcutaneous or intermuscular injection; recording dosage and time in patient record; maintaining logs.* Provides ancillary medical care by dressing wounds; giving enemas, douches, alcohol rubs, and massages; applying compresses, ice bags, and hot water bottles.* Maintains patient stability by taking and recording vital signs.* Maintains patient nutrition by examining food trays for prescribed diet; feeding patients; recording food and fluid intake and output.* Helps patients with daily living by bathing, dressing, and assisting patients in walking and turning.* Keeps nursing supervisors informed by observing patients and reporting adverse reactions to medication or treatment.* Maintains equipment and supplies by keeping catheters, tracheotomy tubes, and oxygen supplies available.* Performs routine laboratory tests by collecting samples, such as urine, blood, and sputum.* Prepares cadavers for motuary by washing and dressing deceased persons.* Serves and protects the hospital community by adhering to professional standards, hospital policies and procedures, federal, state, and local requirements, and jcaho standards.* Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations.* Enhances nursing and hospital reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Administering Medication, Pain Management, Nutrition, Informing Others, Hospital Environment, Bedside Manner, Nursing Skills, Listening, Multi-tasking, Medical Teamwork, Acute/Critical Care",LPN or RN Job in Indianapolis,Employee,"Indianapolis, IN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/LPN-or-RN-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-164102880.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),43440e5daff85d14d2be857f5b32bbe8
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:01:48:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Business Analyst in Kansas City, KS. Details:Responsible for Implementation and support of applications. Works closely with end users to troubleshoot and correct problems relating to applications, and assists with conversions to and implementations of software products. Uses healthcare business operations expertise to seek out, research and evaluate a variety of solutions to provide end users with high quality, efficient products. Maintains and supports specified installed application software products. Leads work on a specific project.Required Experience:Associate Degree in healthcare business operations like HIM, hospital billing, etc. 5 years experience in healthcare business operations setting. 4 years experience as an analyst. Certification in one Epic application.  Preferred: Bachelor Degree in healthcare business operations, 6 years experience in healthcare business operations setting, 5 years experience as an analyst, national certification in business or IT area. If interested in more details, please contact:Justin SellersJsellers@judge.com",Business Analyst Job in Kansas City,"Full Time, Employee","Kansas City, KS",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Business-Analyst-Job-Kansas-City-KS-US-165304481.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,675573e301d863eaccfd41a9dbe7703d
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:01:46:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Licensed Practical NursesPRN OpportunitiesCorizon Health has exciting opportunities for Licensed Practical Nurses at PendletonCorrectional Facility in Pendleton, IN!Discover a fast growing specialtywith Corizon and enjoy:Manageable workassignmentsIncreased varietyLow acuityThe successful candidate will be a graduate from an accredited school of nursing with a currentLPN license and current CPR certification.Call or apply online now!Andrea Ellis314-919-9558Andrea.Ellis@CorizonHealth.comwww.CorizonHealth.com EOE/AAP/DTRDifferent. And making a difference.This job listing brought to you by The Herald Bulletin",Licensed Practical Nurses Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Per Diem,46064,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurses-Job-US-164709891.aspx?ch=newsher&mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c8f9d086bd5e620149487e9754dda3df
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:01:45:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Medical Assistant - Immediate Opening (Carrollton)$15-$16 HourlyImmediate Opening! Large Carrollton Family Practice has one new opening for a Medical Assistant to join team. $14.00-$15 Mon-Fri 8 to 5 Duties: Verifies patient information by interviewing patient; recording medical history; confirming purpose of visit. Prepares patients for examination by performing preliminary physical tests; taking blood pressure, weight, and temperature; reporting patient history summary. Requirements: Upbeat and positive demeanor Minimum of 2 year of MA experience Please Apply Immediately for consideration. Thanks!!",Medical Assistant Job in Carrollton,Full Time,"Carrollton, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Medical-Assistant-Job-Carrollton-TX-US-163503891.aspx?mescoid=3100556001001&jobPosition=2,15.00 - 16.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),366210bcc9b329ae697b0b893c9598a2
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:01:38:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Making a difference in mind, body and spirit Because helping people is our calling. At River Point Behavioral Health, our focus is on safety and quality and we are looking for people like you to join our team. River Point Behavioral Health provides a calm and safe setting for progressive, individualized treatment for adults. Our services include: inpatient, residential, electroconvulsive therapy (ECT), partial hospitalization and intensive outpatient programs. We are conveniently located in the Southside of Jacksonville near the intersection of Beach Boulevard and University Boulevard.  We have an immediate opening for a PRN Admissions Consultant, our ideal candidate will assess potential patients to assist in determining appropriate level of care. Contacts the physician in order to review assessment findings and obtain doctor's orders for potential admissions. Answers and documents all incoming calls and triages them for appropriate level of care  Conducts needs assessments and completes high risk notification forms.You will also be responsible for logging all calls, referrals and admissions into Hospital's Patient Information System. Obtaining insurance information, where appropriate, and forwards to admissions specialist for benefits check and receives benefit paperwork. Logs information into the appropriate log: registration, call and/or EMTALA. Our candidate should understands how to interpret benefit sheets and communicates benefit information to patients and families. * River Point offers a full comprehensive benefit package,  including company matched 401K and stock option plans.  Additional benefits include supplemental life for employee, spouse and dependents. A perks card is also offered with many discounts for car rentals, attractions, movie tickets, cell phones and many more. Please check out our website at http://www.riverpointbehavioral.com/ to learn more about us. River Point Behavioral Health is part of Universal Health Services, Inc. (UHS) one of the nation's largest and most respected health care management companies. UHS operates through its subsidiaries acute care hospitals, behavioral health facilities and ambulatory centers nationwide. Founded in 1978, UHS subsidiaries now have more than 65,000 employees. The UHS business strategy is to build or purchase health care properties in rapidly growing markets and create a strong franchise based on exceptional service and effective cost control. Our success comes from a responsive management style and a service philosophy based on integrity, competence and compassion Job Requirements:Qualified candidates must possess the following: * Must have a Masters Degree in Mental Health field. * Must have some experience with Intake or Assessment experience with Mental Health  * Must be able to communicate effectively with potential patients, family members, referral agencies and physicians * Must be able to effectively document findings from assessments of potential admissions * Able to learn and operate the hospitals' patients information system * Prefer someone who is able to take vital signs  Verbally demonstrates an understanding of EMTALA rules and regulations. Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=185732&site_id=35",Admissions Consultant Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32216",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Admissions-Consultant-Job-JACKSONVILLE-FL-US-165264755.aspx?mescoid=4300728001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,9a9be28de78f58097f69542b49416fd3
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:00:59:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Location: Hill Air Force BasePosition: Licensed Vocational Nurse - OutpatientGCI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, or national origin. GCI gives preferential treatment to veterans.Global Consulting International seeks candidates for a full time position providing Outpatient Licensed Vocational Nurse services to the men and women of the United States Air Force and their families at Hill AFB in Utah.LICENSED VOCATIONAL NURSE (LVN) – OUTPATIENT SUMMARY: Assists in routine care and treatment of patients, to include flying and special operational duty personnel, when required. Organizes the medical environment, performs and participates in support activities for outpatient care situations, including contingency operations and disasters. 1. QUALIFICATIONS: 1.1. EDUCATION: Must have successfully completed all education and training requirements leading to and graduated from an accredited national, state or military equivalent school for Vocational Nursing. 1.2. LICENSE: Must have and maintain throughout course of contract, a current, active, valid, unrestricted license (with no limitations, stipulations or pending adverse actions) to practice as a Licensed Vocational Nurse (LVN) from a US jurisdiction. License must be recognized and accepted by the State of practice in accordance with governing regulations. 1.3. KNOWLEDGE: Must have understanding of and ability to correctly utilize and/or apply; medical terminology, anatomy and physiology, psychology, pharmacology, medical ethics and legal concepts, clinical procedures, patient care; emergency medical treatment to include cardiopulmonary resuscitation, aseptic technique, specimen collection, diagnostic testing, prepare and administer oral and parenteral (excluding IV) medications, vaccination procedures, mechanisms of anaphylaxis and shock and their treatment; prescription drugs and their 　administration; operating and maintaining therapeutic equipment, risk management, medical contingency operations, computer operations in the use of basic word processing, data entry and automated medical records. 1.4. EXPERIENCE: Experience performing care and treatment of patients; operating and maintaining therapeutic equipment; properly administering oral and parenteral medications; conducting paraprofessional portions of physical examinations; or assisting in medical treatment of patients in accordance with established procedures and protocols, within the LVN scope of practice. 1.4.1. Shall have practiced as an LVN performing hands-on patient care in the outpatient clinical setting for at least 12 months within the past 24 months. 2. Type of work: The duties will be performed in accordance with established procedures and protocols, within the scope of practice. Duties include but are not limited to the following: 2.1. Serves as a Vocational Nurse performing patient care and nursing administrative duties for outpatients in accordance with established policies, procedures, protocols, and guidelines. 2.2. Monitors and records age appropriate physiological measurements. 2.3. Orients new patients to the clinic/hospital environment. 2.4. Assists with patient check-ins, admissions, discharges, and transfers as directed. 2.5. Provides individualized patient teaching on appropriate topics to include preventative healthcare and health maintenance. 2.6. Prepares and positions patients for diagnostic testing, examinations, treatments, and clinical procedures. 2.7. Performs appropriate portions of medical examinations, treatment, diagnostic, and clinical procedures. 2.8. Records treatment, procedure rendered, and observed effects. 2.9. Identifies patient problems and accurately notifies nursing team of observations. 2.10. Prepares and administers medications in accordance with scope of practice and training. 2.11. Recognizes and responds to emergencies and performs basic life support measures. 2.12. Performs appropriate portions of physical examinations including age appropriate physical measurements. 2.13. Adheres to infection control procedures including use of personal protective equipment, disposal of waste, and aseptic technique. 2.14. Performs central sterile supply duties. 2.15. Ensures all equipment is properly assembled, operates, cleaned and stored at the end of each work shift. Ensures preventive maintenance and routine cleaning are performed as directed.　2.16. Performs medical records reviews and applies appropriate protocols and guidelines to determine medical needs. 2.17. Maintains patient medical records in electronic format as well as hard copy as required. 2.18. Prepares and submits administrative reports. 2.19. Participates in training and continuing education programs for new procedures, techniques, and equipment. 2.20. Ensures a safe work environment and employee safe work habits. 2.21. Establishes and maintains appropriate, professional, interpersonal relationships with co-workers, families, peers, and other team members.",Licensed Vocational Nurse (Outpatient) - Hill AFB Job in Hill Afb,Full Time,"Hill Afb, UT 84056",,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Vocational-Nurse-Outpatient-Hill-AFB-Job-Hill-AFB-UT-US-165274692.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=15,,,e023b9c624a2a8a170d937d70d22eabd
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:00:57:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Arkansas Department of Human Services (DHS) is the state's largest agency with 8,200 employees working in 83 county offices serving more than one million people. Employees work in 10 major divisions and five support offices to provide services to Arkansas citizens. DHS is seeking three (3) Licensed Practical Nurse Supervisors in Benton, AR (Saline County). The Licensed Practical Nurse Supervisor is responsible for supervising nursing activities in a nursing facility. This position: Supervises a small to medium-sized nursing staff by interviewing and recommending for hire, assigning and reviewing work, training employees, scheduling leave time, resolving work problems, and evaluating the performance of incumbents.Reviews nurses' report book for medication changes, physician orders, new patients, patient problems, and general instructions.Counts controlled drugs to verify the amount of narcotics on hand and reviews medication cards for changes and dosage amount.Administers medications to patients.Observes and charts patient behavior, condition, and daily activities.Discusses routine activities or personal problems with patients.May instruct and assist patients with personal hygiene and feeding and escort patients to dining and recreational area and appointments.Assists doctors and nursing personnel by taking and recording physician orders, nursing notes, and vital signs.Notifies next shift of each day's events including sick patients, behavioral problems, and new orders.Inventories and orders supplies.Performs other duties as assigned. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONSLicensure by the Arkansas State Nursing Board as a Licensed Practical Nurse in accordance with ACA 17-87-304; three years of experience providing direct nursing care, including one year in a supervisory or leadership capacity. MASS HIRE EVENTThese 3 positions are advertised for a mass hire event, which will take place on Friday, April 1, 2016. When applying, select Saline County as the county you are interested in working. Position number: CONTINUOUS APPLY ONLINE AT HTTP://WWW.ARSTATEJOBS.COM (Search & Apply for the CONTINUOUS Licensed Practical Nurse Supervisor with Saline) Like us on Facebook & follow us on Twitter for more great DHS career opportunities!",Licensed Practical Nurse Supervisor- Benton,"Full Time, Employee","Benton, AR 72018",,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-Supervisor-Benton-AR-Job-Benton-AR-US-165221689.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,0990a8f72eb91786e70231f3052aae16
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:00:11:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"DIRECTOR OF NURSING 5 star SNF seeks exp RN strong in clinical, long term care experience & knowledge of State/Federal regulations. Great opp for ADON. Immediate benefits. Email: ltcjobs4700@gmail.com EOE/DFWP",Director of Nursing Job in West Palm Beach,Full Time,"West Palm Beach, FL 33405",,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Nursing-Job-West-Palm-Beach-FL-US-165184725.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=3,,,05e13cfb571d2141446161c3b8ecb98e
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:00:11:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: Upbring, the new Lutheran Social Services of the South, is a 135 year-old nonprofit organization with a rich legacy of serving vulnerable people across Texas. Its mission is to break the cycle of child abuse by empowering children, families and communities. Upbring serves more than 30,000 people annually and provides innovative programs and services for children including foster care, adoption, education, residential treatment and community services. For more information, visit Upbring.org.Responsibilities: Job Summary:The Case Manager is responsible for managing and monitoring an assigned caseload of clients by providing comprehensive case management services to clients by completing a home study and providing post release supervision, serve as a resource to the client and the placement family, and act as a liaison between the HHCS and the referring shelter provide according to Agency and licensing standards and federal, state, and local regulatory and funding requirements. This position works closely and in partnership with HHCS in terms of program services, compliance, and record keeping. Essential dutiesHome Study Complete home study assessment upon receipt of a home study referral from Heartland Human Care Services (HHCS)Work closely with HHCS and the shelter provider to initiate contact with client and related partiesNotify HHCS when a background check of household members over the age of 18 has not been completed; coordinate background check process with HHCSComplete all required paperwork and forms to initiate the home studyInitiate the Home Study Checklist to track case progress throughout the Home Study processComplete Home Study within 10 days of accepting the referralAccurately complete case notes for each client using designated forms and ensure they are completed in a timely manner and meet program requirementsPost Release ServicesComplete all requirement paperwork needed to initiate post release services for each clientSchedule home visits with clients on a monthly, annual, or as-needed to ensure the safety and well-being of the clientMeet with client to review post placement progress; accurately document case file with progress and/or changesReport any serious or significant incidents to the appropriate staff in a timely mannerPrepare and maintain case files, records, and/or logs on all assigned clients and ensure they are complete and accurateServe as a liaison between residents and their families and service providers, as neededRespond to client concerns in a timely mannerComplete requested or required reports based on client progress, caseload, or compliance per the established deadlineObtain needed information and complete regular reports regarding client progress Qualifications: Minimum qualificationsBachelor’s degree in Social Work, Psychology, Sociology, Social Services, Behavioral Services, or closely related field1 year experience in child welfare, family preservation, foster care/adoption, or closely relatedKnowledge of psychological theory, methods, and ethicsAbility to establish rapport, trust, and boundaries with clientsStrong writing skills with the ability to properly and accurate document client care and progressAbility to follow instructions and work independently with minimum supervisionStrong organizational and time management skills with the ability to meet deadlines and manage a diverse caseloadStrong interpersonal skills with the ability to apply compassion and empathy, while dealing with stressful and difficult situationsProficiency with Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, and Outlook)Background clearance that includes State Child Abuse and Neglect and criminal background checkBilingual in Spanish (due to service population and area) Preferred QualificationsMaster’s degree in Social Work, Psychology, Sociology, Social Services, Behavioral Services, or closely related field LMSW, LCSW",Case Manager Job in Guadalupe,Full Time,"Guadalupe, TX 77901",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Case-Manager-Job-Guadalupe-TX-US-164939083.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=16,,,22c192425cea31f38ee16cf8c06c228a
United States of America,US,09/May/2016:00:11:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"RN – Registered Nurse - Neuro – Nurse – RN Staff Neuro NurseRegistered Nurse, RNSeattle, WA area Here's an incredible opportunity for a highly motivated and experienced Neuro Nurse to work at a highly respected and reputable hospital located in Washington! Neuro Nurse - This is a full time, permanent position available for immediate hire!- Excellent hospital in the area with excellent clinical programs!- Top rates and great benefits!- Must have 2 years of Neuro nursing experience in a complex hospital setting- Current FL RN license- BSN degree required- Relocation assistance available!PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1378Heather HiltonCareer Specialist, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group / CoreInformation Technology2 Keewaydin Drive, Salem, NH 03079p: 800-995-2673 ext. 1378 | f: 866-420-1055heather.hilton@coremedicalgroup.com   OUR SERVICES ARE ALWAYS FREE!IMMEDIATE HIRE! All applicants must be a registered nurse. The ideal candidate will 2 years of Neuro nursing experience and current FL RN license.  PLEASE CONTACT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE! 1-800-995-2673 x 1378Heather HiltonCareer Specialist, Permanent Placement ServicesCoreMedical Group / CoreInformation Technology2 Keewaydin Drive, Salem, NH 03079p: 800-995-2673 ext. 1378 | f: 866-420-1055heather.hilton@coremedicalgroup.comKeywords: Neuro Nurse, Neuro RN, Neuro Registered Nurse, Charge Nurse, Director of Nursing, DON, Neuro Department RN, Neuro Department Registered Nurse, Public Health Nurse, PHN, Registered Nurse, RN, School Nurse, Staff Nurse, Staff RN, Staff Registered Nurse,",RN – Registered Nurse - Neuro – Nurse – RN Staff Job in Seattle,Full Time Employee,"Seattle, WA 98111",,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-%E2%80%93-Registered-Nurse-Neuro-%E2%80%93-Nurse-%E2%80%93-RN-Staff-Job-Seattle-WA-US-165256959.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,7303435686a41793f4f604b9de2e1b50
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:23:51:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Taylor,Full Time Employee,"Taylor, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-taylor-tx-us-167323129.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=12,,Logistics/Transportation,053580b31a20ad48e503abae020ea0e7
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:23:50:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Georgia Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities (DBHDD) is currently seeking qualified candidates for the position of Registered Nurse at Georgia Regional Hospital - Atlanta, located in Decatur, GA.Job Description:Assess client health problems and needs, develop and implement nursing care plans, and maintain medical recordsAdminister nursing care to ill, injured, convalescent, or disabled clientsMay advise clients on health maintenance and disease prevention or provide case management.Job Responsibilities & Performance Standards:Administers prescribed medications and notes times and amounts on clients' chartsConsults and coordinates with health care team members to assess, plan, implement and evaluate client care plansMaintains accurate, detailed reports and client recordsModifies client treatment plans as indicated by clients' responses and conditionsMonitors all aspects of client care, including diet and physical activityMonitors, records and reports symptoms and changes in clients' conditionsObserves nurses and visits clients to ensure that proper nursing care is providedPrepares clients for, and assists with, examinations and treatmentsPrepares rooms, sterile instruments, equipment and supplies, and ensures that stock of supplies is maintainedProvides education to client and familyProvides health care, first aid, immunizations and assistance in convalescence and rehabilitationTechnical Competencies:Ability to assess, plan for, and provide basic nursing skills; knows procedures including developing, implementing and revising plan of careKnowledge of nursing policies, procedures, protocols, treatments, standards of care and nurse practice actKnowledge of the procedures for medication administration and can administer oral, sublingual and IM medications; knowledge of pharmacologyKnowledge of immunization regulations and protocolsAbility to perform CPR and for some sites, AED Various Units and Shifts AvailablePreference will be given to those who, in addition to meeting the above qualifications, also possess the following:Current Georgia RN LicenseCurrent CPR certificationExperience in mental health ",Registered Nurse (RN) Job in Decatur,Full Time,"Decatur, GA 30034",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/registered-nurse-rn-job-decatur-ga-us-148610447.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4884121e05df4c15571b03fb1db57f70
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:23:38:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Interested in becoming a Nurse Aide Evaluator?Opportunities available in the following locations and surrounding areas:ATLANTA, GA NACES Plus Foundation (NACES), an affiliate of Texas Nurses Association, coordinates and conducts the testing of nurse aide candidates.   NACES is seeking Nurse Aide Evaluators (NAEs) to administer the National Nurse Aide Assessment Program (NNAAP®) examination to eligible nurse aide candidates. The examination consists of a written examination and a skills demonstration examination. The NAE will proctor the written exam which is limited to a maximum of two hours. The skills demonstration exam is timed and consists of observing the nurse aide candidate demonstrate five randomly selected skills from a predetermined test pool of skills. Self scheduling is available for NAEs to administer exams at testing sites based on his/her availability and proximity to the site locations. The time commitment is flexible and varies according to the number of candidates to be tested. Job Requirements Registered nurses who meet the OBRA 1987-1989 standards of having at least one year of experience caring for the elderly or chronically ill of any age may apply to become a Nurse Aide Evaluator (NAE). RN Nurse Aide Evaluators must have a current nursing license in good standing or a compact license that applies to the state in which they will be administering the examination. They must carry their own malpractice insurance and have automobile liability insurance.   Prior to administrating the NNAAP® Examination, the nurse will be required to attend a two day orientation workshop and a one day observation/hands on examination with a current NACES Nurse Aide Evaluator. The RN will sign an agreement with NACES to become an independent contractor (1099) as a Nurse Aide Evaluator (NAE).If qualified and interested:Email your resume to nacesrecruiter@texasnurses.org or fax to 512-533-9825.  Thank you for your interest.  ",GA RN EVALUATOR Job in Atlanta,Part Time,"Atlanta, GA 30318",,http://jobview.monster.com/ga-rn-evaluator-job-atlanta-ga-us-168027742.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),652265f63bf13256c65649845a3aa266
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:23:38:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Georgetown,Full Time Employee,"Georgetown, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-georgetown-tx-us-167323689.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=10,,Logistics/Transportation,121828385d93de1b5323dbd5aa95688c
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:23:37:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Receiving/Warehouse Lead will oversee all aspects of receiving for our store including supervising daily operations and work flow and overseeing the staff. QualificationsQualifications include 2-3+ years experience with high volume operations, strong leadership and interpersonal skills. Knowledge of all areas of warehousing including UPS, LTL, Receiving, Restock, Transfer and Inventory departments is a plus.",Receiving Lead Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30307",,http://jobview.monster.com/receiving-lead-job-atlanta-ga-us-166562625.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,Logistics/Transportation,ff130b0d2fcfcce5df0f3318749f315e
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:22:55:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES Create a strategic planning initiative to establish rules and guidance for the UAS program in accordance with the FAA requirements for civilian operators; Participate in program reviews with customers, subcontractors and business partners; Responsible for UAV scheduling, resource allocation, budgeting and day-to-day UAV Program Management; Work efficiently with the Operations and Commercial team Management to evaluate UAS Program success and areas of improvement; Develop UAV safe flight standards requirements and coordinate with the Director of Training on required New Hire and Re-current Training Plans; Create and develop mission procedures in strict compliance with Era Operational standards and all applicable regulations; Places safety and customer service at the forefront in all assigned tasks; Facilitates communications with the customer and ensures Era is always represented in a professional manner; Complies with other duties and assignments that may be assigned by the Director of Operations. Minimum Requirements: At least 3 years plus of UAV field experience; At least 5 years of leadership/management experience; Must possess extensive knowledge of civilian UAV FAA regulations; Ability to obtain an FAA Class II Medical Certificate;  Excellent verbal and written communication skills required; Computer proficiency in MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint required; Must be organized and be able to work with a large and varied workload; and Must possess strong interpersonal skills to work effectively within a team.  Preferred Qualifications: ATP Certificate; or FAA Avionics or Airframe/Power plant licenses; Our compensation structure is designed to make Era an attractive employer and very competitive within the industry.  We also offer a comprehensive benefits package which includes an employer sponsored 401k plan and Employee Stock Purchase Plan. EOE - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities   Click Here To Applyhttps://erahelicopters.mua.hrdepartment.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=1264&site_id=123",UAS Program Manager Job in Lake Charles,Full Time Employee,"Lake Charles, LA 70605","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/uas-program-manager-job-lake-charles-la-us-167342451.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,Logistics/Transportation,bb39057d418563422c28aa539b51c02b
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:22:54:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Anaheim, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-anaheim-ca-us-159709930.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,dce1cea794d92d8a6b4c8a6214ebe8d1
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:22:47:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in Texas Job in Austin,Full Time Employee,"Austin, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-texas-job-austin-tx-us-167323607.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=18,,Logistics/Transportation,41970b343f1a0f8a729b84492c8f6365
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:22:34:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ericsson is a world-leading provider of telecommunications equipment and related services to mobile and fixed network operators globally. Over 1,000 networks in more than 175 countries utilize our network equipment and 40 percent of all mobile calls are made through our systems. We are one of the few companies worldwide that can offer end-to-end solutions for all major mobile communication standards.Telecom Tower Technician AssociateResponsibilities:Complete and pass all tower trainingUnderstand and strictly adhere to safety practices and guidelinesUnderstand and strictly adhere to established Ericsson and customer quality requirements without deviationClimb ladders and towers and safely and efficiently complete various job duties at elevated heights with supervisionObserve and report possible compound/equipment defects or hazardsEnsure that Job Hazard Assessment (JHA) requirements are identified, documented and followedAccurately follow instructions and complete assigned course of action in accordance with scope of work and methods of procedures (MOPs) and track work via checklistsAccurately and timely document job costs, including labor hours and materialOther duties as assigned by managementBasic RequirementsValid driver licenseMust successfully complete DOT certification within 90 days of employmentMust take and pass a drug test and adhere to random drug testing policyMust successfully complete and pass a background check, including criminal history check, employment history check, and education verification, among other thingsMust successfully complete Ericsson’s tower training program at required levelAbility to learn and retain new knowledgeMust be able to travel outside home market up to 25% - 50% of timeMust be willing to serve in an on-call rotationMust be able to work outside of normal business hours (i.e., shift work), to include nights and weekends, if neededSelf-starter with desire and ability to learn and retain knowledgeMust be a team player and have excellent interpersonal communication skillsExcellent organizational and administrative skills Effective written and oral communication skills in English language for safety reasonsAbility to exercise flexibility in challenging and/or perplexing situationsAbility to multi-task and maintain composure in stressful and demanding work environmentMust have high level of computer proficiency, including a working knowledge of all Microsoft Office suite productsPrevious experience conducting safety meetings/briefings a plusKnowledge of networking principals, Ethernet standards, power systems, and cable testing is a plusWorking knowledge of telecommunication construction a plusPrevious experience ensuring Job Hazard Assessment (JHA) requirements are identified, documented and followed a plus  Physical RequirementsMust take and pass a pre-employment fitness-for-duty examination, and periodic fitness-for-duty examinations during employmentMust be in good physical condition with the ability to bend, twist, squat, and lift and carry up to 70 lbs and pull own body weight plus equipment weight up a vertical tower repeatedly for long periods of timeAbility to climb ladders and steep staircasesAbility to climb tall structures (100 feet or more) with 50 lb. load and to work at altitudes of 300+ feetWeight must not exceed 250 lbs.in order to meet weight limits specified by safety equipment manufacturers’ standardsWaist circumference must not exceed 60 inches measured at the navel as specified by the manufacturer of safety equipmentAbility to clearly identify specific color schemesAbility to work in remote and challenging locations including, but not limited to: rooftops, confined spaces, and all types of geographic locationsAbility to work outdoors in all types of weather conditionsAbility to drive long distances on and off roadMechanical RequirementsUnderstanding of basic mechanical terms and toolsAbility to learn and retain physical and mechanical installation specificationsAbility to connect and disconnect various sizes and types of electronic connectorsClick Here to Apply!*This job description is intended to describe the general nature and level of work to be performed by employees assigned to the position; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required of employees assigned to the position.We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Tower Tech I Associate Job in North Atlanta,Full Time,"North Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/tower-tech-i-associate-job-north-atlanta-ga-us-167753649.aspx?mescoid=1700221001001&jobPosition=13,,,9f23a4e78857faeb43220fe063f4f0f6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:00:23:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Title:  Financial Analyst​Location: Tempe, AZDuration: 3+ months (possible C2H)  Overview:Excellent Tempe, AZ Company is seeking a Financial Analyst for a contract-to-hire position at their Mountain View location. An Accounting background is preferred.  Looking for 2-4 years of experience - not senior level. Only candidates with a maximum of 4 years of experience will be considered. Local candidates only, please. Must be US authorized person.Day to Day functions will include:Daily work in aggregating, summarizing, analyzing, and presenting data in a manner that supports decision makingContinuous process improvements: Maintain, Identify, Lead, and Create process and model improvementsLead projects to develop, implement and maintain key reporting metrics, specifically related to a SaaS organization.Support operating groups and Senior Management with in-depth analysis and reporting in an effort to drive growth.End to end forecasting and budgeting accountability, including significant excel modeling and incremental functionality to existing modelingQualified Candidates will have: 2-4 years of experience in financial analysis, business integration, and financial modeling in a corporate (HQ) environmentBachelor’s degree in Business (finance or accounting) from an accredited universityStrong account background is preferredAptitude to present results and models to executiveClear thinking/problem solving: successfully led projects/process improvements within operations/finance functions; able to quickly grasp new ideasEnthusiastic team player, productive working independently or as part of a group; ability to interface effectively with all levels of the organization   Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Job Title:  Financial Analyst​Location: Tempe, AZDuration: 3+ months (possible C2H)  Overview:Excellent Tempe, AZ Company is seeking a Financial Analyst for a contract-to-hire position at their Mountain View location. An Accounting background is preferred.  Looking for 2-4 years of experience - not senior level. Only candidates with a maximum of 4 years of experience will be considered. Local candidates only, please. Must be US authorized person.Day to Day functions will include:Daily work in aggregating, summarizing, analyzing, and presenting data in a manner that supports decision makingContinuous process improvements: Maintain, Identify, Lead, and Create process and model improvementsLead projects to develop, implement and maintain key reporting metrics, specifically related to a SaaS organization.Support operating groups and Senior Management with in-depth analysis and reporting in an effort to drive growth.End to end forecasting and budgeting accountability, including significant excel modeling and incremental functionality to existing modelingQualified Candidates will have: 2-4 years of experience in financial analysis, business integration, and financial modeling in a corporate (HQ) environmentBachelor’s degree in Business (finance or accounting) from an accredited universityStrong account background is preferredAptitude to present results and models to executiveClear thinking/problem solving: successfully led projects/process improvements within operations/finance functions; able to quickly grasp new ideasEnthusiastic team player, productive working independently or as part of a group; ability to interface effectively with all levels of the organization  ",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-job-mountain-view-ca-us-171921821.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=6,,,6f8e211d45efe26cb5d8cd6ee4773744
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:00:26:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client in Downtown Boston, MA that is seeking a Staff Accountant on a temporary to permanent basis.Responsibilities Include: Assist with the month end close Financial statement preparation AP/AR Post to the GL Journal EntriesREQUIREMENTS: Knowledge of Great Plains Strong Excel skills Good Customer Service skillsKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Staff Accountant Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02116",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-boston-ma-us-171602611.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),75aa8c848659904ef8c9a913998bdb92
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:00:58:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our successful and growing company in Fort Worth, TX is looking for an Accountant on a direct hire basis.Company Profile:Founded in 1988One of the world’s leading providers of oil and gas well service equipmentCustom designed equipment to meet the needs of their customersSetting the standard in excellent equipment serviceFeatures and Benefits:Medical, Dental and Vision benefitsVacation PayHoliday Pay401KOpportunity to work for a small family owned company with sales adherent with a much larger firmRewarded for hard work and initiativeAccountant Role:The Accountant will facilitate and review monthly financials as well as day to day accounts payable and receivable functionsThe Accountant will evaluate and make appropriate recommendations to internal accounting processesResponsibilities will include:Journal entriesAccount reconciliations including bank and credit cardsDetailed reporting on Job CostingJob costing and labor hour analysis and reportingMonth end financial preparationExpense reportsAccountant Background Profile:The skilled Accountant will have a Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting4-5 years’ experience in accounting3+ years’ Quick Books experienceIntermediate to advanced Excel skillsThe Accountant will have a high attention to detail and desire for accuracyPlease visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/ft.-worth.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/accounting-finance.html Improve your job search reach with www.sumry.me/?afmc=ftl and let potential employers see you beyond just your resume.  It’s a smart way to invest in your search and the hottest trend in making a successful job transition.Frontline Source Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Accountant Job in Ft Worth,"Full Time, Employee","Ft Worth, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/accountant-job-ft-worth-tx-us-171809587.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,"50,000.00 - 62,000.00 /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1ea429d6d3a47ea695326deaad5f8d5b
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:01:00:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Assistant Controller Full-time Buy Sod, Inc., in Pinehurst, NC, is looking to add an Assistant Controller to their team! This person will assist the Controller in: Reconciliations of all GL accounts and cash accounts, notes payable maintenance, sales tax returns, managing intercompany accounting and reconciliations of transactions, maintaining system data (costing, pricing, GL setups), month end closing, and more! Experience/Education: B.S. in Accounting preferred, understanding of GAAP, 5-10 years public/private accounting experience, SAGE operating system a plus, strong communication and interpersonal skills, proficient in MS Office. Competitive salary and full benefits package offered! Send resume and cover letter to: abruton@buysod.com Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 000-000-0000 Address PO BOX 4089Pinehurst, NC 28374",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-controller-job-pinehurst-nc-us-171831176.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=11,,,6e20217da506a18f5eb664eb656237f6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:01:46:18,No,jobs.monster.com,".CPA, Senior Construction Accountant- Northern VirginiaPOSITION SUMMARY:The Senior Project Accountant will be responsible for all aspects of job cost accounting. Provide Project Management team with an effective and controlled reporting of project profits, subcontractor payments and issues, client billings and issues, pending change orders, past due accounts receivable, timely recognition and resolution of issues. Minimum Qualifications and Requirements:Education/Experience: Any combination of education and experience providing the required skill and knowledge for successful performance would be qualifying. Typical qualifications would be 5 years in accounting (construction environment preferred.)Skills/Abilities: Computer literate, good written and verbal communication skills, excellent interpersonal skills, detail oriented, rule oriented, excellent organizational skills, able to prioritize while working in a fast paced environment, must be self-starter and able to work with minimal supervision.The project accountant will help to ensure project management is in compliance with existing accounting and corporate procedure and policy, while maximizing controllable project management performance. Assist project management team with performance and/or communication problem resolutions at project accounting level. Expose, review and resolve major accounting problems with project management members, involving project management team, property accountants, market sector leader up to and including owner as necessary to reach a resolution. Accountant Job Functions and Responsibilities:Job/budget and subcontract set upClient set up/maintenanceMaintain on file fully executed owner contracts/purchase ordersMeet all owner requirements: billing deadlines, waivers, certified payrollMaintain on file fully executed subcontract agreement (over $50,000), purchase orders and letters of intentOrder Builders Risk Insurance/Performance and Payment Bond when requiredEnforce joint check agreements with subcontractors/suppliersSupplier invoice processing: coding, a/p entry, PM/SPA approval, process for payment, filing, problem resolution, contract compliance, lien releases, insurance compliance, subcontractor relationsMaintain efficient job cost filingObtain and monitor status of all owner and subcontractor pending change ordersBudget monitoringProfit/fee monitoringConstruction Project Invoicing: AIA, Format 1, Owner Specified FormatPosting of cash receipts/Non A/R cash receiptsMonitoring status of customers’ receivables and being proactive to resolve problemsJournal entries related to job costComplete understanding of all job cost accounting reports: underbilling/overbilling, cash flow vs. net cash flowPrepare monthly owner reportsAssist in the preparation of periodic job profit projectionsJob close out reports/routingIf you are interested in learning more about this position, please email me at VINCIA.VANTERPOOL@ADECCONA.COM Provide the following:- Resume in WORD DOC attachment- Salary History & Current RequirementsApply Online",Sr.Development Accountant,Employee,"Falls Church, VA 22042",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-development-accountant-cpa-job-falls-church-va-us-171745930.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1fabc7d0aec444d554e5fed8abe18482
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:01:47:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"A global healthcare company that specializes in technologies for researching medicine is looking for a Senior Tax Analyst in Lake Forest, IL.  The ideal candidate will have five or years’ experience of Corporate Tax, tax compliance, research, corporate taxation, forecasting and accounting for income taxes. The company offers competitive pay with great work life balance, competitive pay.  Senior Tax Analyst Responsibilities include:· Prepare federal and state income tax returns and assist in forecasting federal and state tax rates and ensure compliance with applicable tax laws.· Maintain, create and document tax functions.  Knowledge of SAP desired.  May involve interaction with IT personnel in the development of required reports and processes necessary to facilitate, support and document the tax impact of the business operations.· Prepare monthly, quarterly, and annual tax provision work papers.· Assist with supporting state and federal income tax audits· Prepare 1042s, quarterly excise tax returns and amended state tax returns.· Supervise unclaimed property tax returns compliance process with 3rd party vendors· Provides support to Tax Manager on resolution of various correspondence from federal, state and local government authorities and other reporting agencies.· Prepare calculations and remittances of federal and state estimated tax payments;· Provide supporting schedules for outsourced federal and state income tax return compliance including preparing and maintaining federal (regular tax and AMT) and state tax depreciation books in BNA, including adjustments for bonus depreciation and cost segregation of assets, determination of apportionment factors, UNICAP, and calculation of Domestic Production Activities Deduction.· Maintain and reconcile federal and state income tax accounts· Provide support to Tax Department and outside consultants. Qualifications:     • Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting with 5+ years of corporate tax experience; experience in tax compliance, research, corporate taxation, forecasting and accounting for income taxes. Public Accounting experience preferred, but not required.• CPA required• Must possess strong excel spreadsheet skills• SAP experience desired, but not required• Strong interpersonal skills and desire to work with others• Strong organizational skills• Ability to see tasks through to completion as assignedIf you are interested in pursuing this Senior Tax Analyst Job in Rosemont, IL or perhaps other available opportunities with Parker & Lynch then please email your resume in .doc format to neema.parikh@ParkerLynch.com. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled   ",Senior Tax Analyst Job in Lake Forest,Full Time Employee,"Lake Forest, IL 60045",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-tax-analyst-job-lake-forest-il-us-171430606.aspx?mescoid=1300116001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,39bc9b4dfd8b631e40a27e123de924e5
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:01:56:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Absentee Shawnee Tribe is seeking qualified applicants for the Financial Controller position. This position reports directly to the Tribal Treasurer and is responsible for developing maintaining financial statements, reports and staff of the fiscal operations of The Absentee Shawnee Tribe. Must possess extensive knowledge of accounting and internal control principles. Master's Degree preferred, Bachelor's degree in Accounting or Business required. Competitive compensation and full benefits package provided. For more information or to apply please visit www.astribe.com This job listing brought to you by The Norman Transcript",Financial Controller Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,74801,Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-controller-job-shawnee-ok-us-171821066.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),5f8d102fe64d2651e0f5e03d54d6cce7
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:02:39:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce's client in the heart of South Miami, FL is looking for a Payroll Processor to join their team. This is a great opportunity for someone to join a growing company. The person must be able to process a smooth and flawless payroll as well as maintaining the confidentiality and integrity of the Payroll Department within established policies and procedures.Responsibilities: Input W-4, Direct Deposit and Legal Wage Withholding information (Garnishment, Child Support, Levies, etc) Process a complete PeopleSoft payroll from Pre-calculation to Confirmation; this includes downloading to the pay sheets, Commissions, HourlyTime and PeopleSoft Absences; running queries on all additional information loaded to the pay lines for balancing and auditing purposes Transmit payroll information to outsourced vendors Run GL interface process to PeopleSoft Financial system Submit stop payment request to Treasury department Processes and prints online (same day) checks as required and maintains check log Prepare all check requests and mailing payments to corresponding vendors Respond to employee's inquiries within a reasonable time frame in a courteous and professional manner Calculate retro payments Maintain adequate and timely filing of all payroll records Propose corrective action when information is needed or errors occur Assist with payroll transitions and conversions including audits of test files and input of data as required Assist in the preparation of special projects and management reports as needed Serves as a full back up to the Payroll Department in all payroll related functions Performs other related duties as required Promote a positive image of the Business at all times Maintain loyalty to employerREQUIREMENTS: High School diploma required, Associate's degree in Accounting or equivalent training and education beyond high school preferred Minimum of two years of PeopleSoft version 9.0 or above software experience preferred Minimum of two year's Payroll work experience Knowledge of Bahamas, Virgin Islands and Mexico payroll processing is a plus Able to work quickly and accurately while under deadline pressure Able to work additional hours when planned and unplanned occasions arise Possess good analytical skills Must be computer literate proficient in Windows Excel, and Word Possess excellent verbal and written communication skills Must be detail oriented, accurate, and possess excellent organizational skills Able to work with a ten key calculator Able to handle confidential information Able to deal effectively with employees at all levels Able to work with minimal direction and supervisionKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Payroll Processor Job in South Miami,Full Time Employee,"South Miami, FL 33143",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-processor-job-south-miami-fl-us-171796597.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=9,"46,000.00 - 46,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),a58e83c8d230ce30ec4a4b5d43c20542
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:02:53:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce's client, a growing company in Holland, MI is looking to add an Internal Auditor to their finance team. Responsibilities include coordinating activities, tasks and responsibilities to maintain internal controls.Essential Functions: Monitor audit department performance and make needed adjustments to meet goals in support of organizational compliance Interact with internal management and external auditors Identify and analyze key metrics in support of on-going process improvements Identify deficiencies and potential issues with processes and controls; suggest improvements in processes, policies and control requirements, and work with management to implement improvementsREQUIREMENTS: Candidates must be a CPA with 2+ years of experience in an internal audit department or public accounting Strong communication skills to interface with the executive team and advanced excel skills are also required Travel will be up to 50%",Internal Auditor Job in Holland,Full Time Employee,"Holland, MI 49423",,http://jobview.monster.com/internal-auditor-job-holland-mi-us-171909629.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=2,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),be9cec9cb24ed9345214d10bb33fa96f
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:02:56:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you analytical with strong problem solving skills? Do you have three years of inventory accounting experience?  If you answered yes to all of the above, we want to speak with you! Accounting Principals is seeking an Inventory Accountant for a leading retailer located in the City of Commerce, CA.    Our client is a leader in their industry, and offers a stable, fast paced work environment! This is what your day-to- will look like…• Prepare reconciliations and journal entries and review exception reporting to ensure the accurate and timely closing of the inventory accounts • Accurately analyze and report complex transactions• Assist with coordination of physical inventory counts• Assist retail locations and distribution staff with operational support • Record inventory counts to the inventory sup-ledger• Analyze shrink per department• Prepare and maintain inventory control processes• Assist with providing innovative solutions to streamline the inventory accounting processes• Ad hoc analysis The requirements for the Inventory Accounting job are…• At least three years of accounting experience, with retail inventory exposure• Strong computer skills, intermediate to advanced MS Excel• Strong problem solving and analytical skills   ",Inventory Accountant Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90023",,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-accountant-job-los-angeles-ca-us-171060604.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a3bc6a3bb32bf24c4352d9e0f0946fa6
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:02:58:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"AP Specialist Job in Jacksonville, FL An Accounts Payable specialist contract position is available courtesy of Accounting Principals. You will be matching invoices and must have full cycle experience. This is a 6-8 month contract position. If you enjoy working in a high volume, fast paced environment please apply! Responsibilities Three way match for all Accounts PayableHandling invoices and purchase ordersCondensing accounts and invoices from multiple statesKeeping A/P process organized and efficient  Requirements 3-5 years of Accounts Payable ExperienceThree way match experience requiredExceptional organization skillsTeam mentalitySelf-motivated and able to work independentlyTech savvy and able to learn new technology and software quicklyMicrosoft Dynamics experience preferredPrevious experience with warehouse AP preferred  ",AP Specialist Job in Jacksonville,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Jacksonville, FL 32256",,http://jobview.monster.com/ap-specialist-job-in-jacksonville-fl-job-jacksonville-fl-us-171219751.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=2,13.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,01dc489a9a5ce07d7530cc49a9b91b38
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:02:59:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Contract Accountant   -   ( 456331 )     Description   First Data is a global leader in commerce-enabling technology solutions, serving more than six million business locations and 4,000 financial institutions in 118 countries around the world. Our 23,000 owner-associates are dedicated to helping companies, from start-ups to the world’s largest corporations, conduct commerce every day by securing and processing more than 2,300 transactions per second and $1.9 trillion per year. First Data is committed to staying at the forefront of our industry, and we are innovating a wide range of next-generation commerce technology solutions to help our clients better detect fraud, gain insights into consumer spending patterns and build customer loyalty. There are many exciting opportunities for talented individuals who would like to join our team and play a meaningful role in helping us shape the future of global commerce. First Data’s Operations and Call Center functions are focused on providing the outstanding client service, support and experiences that are critical to our ongoing success. Our Operations owner-associates are responsible for the stability of our global network infrastructure by helping our financial institution clients with various aspects of transaction processing, including statement management, card production and ticket-issue resolution. Our Call Center owner-associates are often the first point of contact for our business clients, and they play an important role in driving client satisfaction. They are responsible for answering questions and resolving problems on a wide range of issues, including account activation inquiries, potential fraudulent activity and our full range of products and services. Position Description Overview Reviews contractual documents for implementation and advises management and various areas of potential risks regarding addressed services or missing services.  Implements contractual price updates and client setups in a timely and effective manner into the billing system.  Responsible for interacting with various teams to resolve outstanding transaction activity and ensuring it drives to the sales journal.  Manage small to mid-size less complex clients.  Prepares adjustments impacting client base and provides management detailed report of said adjustments.  Researches and responds to inquiries in a timely manner to minimize the impact of errors, maintain quality relationships with client base and assist in management decisions.Ensures clients contracts are set-up on CABS to ensure activity is captured, priced, and driven to the appropriate invoice in a timely and accurate manner.  Assist in monthly financial close.  Add value by enabling the collection on invoices to realize revenues for the business.  Capture data utilized by other areas for financial analysis. Job Responsibilities Review and implement contractual documents into CABS (Client Accounting Billing System) to enable invoicing of services. Advise management and other areas of potential risks garding addressed services or missing services. Implement contractual price updates, new services, and client setups in a timely and effective manner into the billing system per department processes and procedures. Resolve outstanding transaction activity to drive to the sales journal. Manage small to mid-size less complex clients for day to day operations. Prepare adjustments impacting client base and provides management detailed report of said adjustments. Research and respond to inquiries in a timely manner to minimize the impact of errors, maintain quality relationships with client base and assist in management decisions.      Scope of Job Complex accounting activities and financial analyses. Broad accounting knowledge providing training and guidance to less experienced accounting staff. Autonomy Limited supervision, exercising considerable discretion and independent judgement. Coordinates more complex accounting matters with other departments and divisions.   Job Requirements Bachelors degree in Accounting/Finance or equivalent work experience. 4-6 years financial accounting experience. Competencies Financial Analysis Financial Recordkeeping Financial Reporting Accounting GAAP General Ledger Cost Accounting Fin & Acctg Systems First Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer (Minorities/Females/Vets/Disabled/LGBT)   Primary Location :   United States-Nebraska-Omaha-Omaha - 6902 Pine Street Job Field :   Accounting Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Aug 4, 2016 Manager Level :   L2 - Supervisor/Professional Employee Status :   Regular",Senior Contract Accountant Job in Omaha,Full Time Employee,"Omaha, NE",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-contract-accountant-job-omaha-ne-us-171854864.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f7999182339363555ef3c361bb43e336
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:03:03:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br /> Job Description Clean Harbors is the leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. The Company serves a diverse customer base, including a majority of the Fortune 500 companies, thousands of smaller private entities and numerous federal, state, provincial and local governmental agencies. Through its Safety-Kleen subsidiary, Clean Harbors also is a premier provider of used oil recycling and re-refining, parts washers and environmental services for the small quantity generator market. Headquartered in Norwell, Massachusetts, Clean Harbors has waste disposal facilities and service locations throughout the United States and Canada, as well as Mexico and Puerto Rico. We offer competitive salaries and progressive benefits including health, dental, life insurance, 401K, generous paid time off, tuition reimbursement and more. We offer a drug free work environment and require a pre-employment drug screen. All Applicants are subject to pre-employment security background checks, and some positions may require pre-employment physical fitness for duty tests. The Billing Representative reports directly to the Billing Supervisor and is responsible for managing and maintaining the accuracy, quality, and timeliness of monthly billing in accordance with customer specifications and company policies and procedures. RESPONSIBILITIES: Ensures Health and Safety is the number one goal by following policies, processes, and acting in a safe manner at all times. Generate reports including, but not limited to Unbilled, Ready and Not Ready reports from the Win system, manifests and worksheets; Review the data and verifies that correct prices populate the order before posting preview. Research customer requests to solve problems/issues and answers questions regarding invoices in a timely, courteous and professional manner. Calculate sales tax and discounts when required. Review instructions, profile, and waste class detail to determine if conversions need to be done to get the correct unit measure for the customer. Crosschecking and reconciling scanned worksheets, manifest, weight tickets, billing items and printing of invoices and the corresponding backup documents. Interface with sales and customer service frequently in a professional and courteous manner. Compute daily billing totals for both invoiced and previewed orders and provides billing statistics upon request for special projects. Cross-train in other areas to ensure coverage in the case of illness, vacation, etc. Interact with other departments to resolve billing issues and assist in getting jobs set up correctly to avoid future problems. Stay current with electronic mailing of invoices to customers; Keep the workbench updated. Complete credit/rebills in timely manner. Complete and submit any special documents and/or reports that customers may require to accompany or replace invoices. Require mandatory overtime during week and weekends during billing close or special projects. Performs other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business.  REQUIREMENTS:Associates degree required.1+ years billing or related work experienceStrong time management and customer service skillsStrong verbal and written communications skillsStrong math skills and basic accounting knowledgeStrong PC skill including Word and ExcelAbility to work under pressure to meet deadlinesPossess and utilize problem-solving skillsDemonstrate ability to assess priorities and operate in a flexible manner in order to meet dynamic needs and high volume productivity standards.Ability to use independent judgment when reviewing orders and work with minimal supervision in a fast paced team environment. Works with audit team to correct errors and resolve problems.  Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen.  Some positions also require a pre-hire medical exam.  Must meet all work eligibility requirements. Environmentally-responsible business.*CHP*SK#LI - TT1Potential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Billing Representative Job in Norwell,Full Time Employee,"Norwell, MA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/billing-representative-job-norwell-ma-us-171748196.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=6,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,093315ab2290675312886c1bea4a68b1
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:03:11:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce's client in Mount Laurel, NJ is searching for Finance/Banking Operations Professionals for various positions.Responsibilities may include: Complete and review processes including daily draw processing, Visa transaction oversight, wire transfer requests, change of address requests, payoff reinstatement requests, tax/insurance monitoring and line management Monitor daily/weekly/monthly control reports to ensure department procedures are followed Work with external 3rd parties and internal team players to gather, input, and evaluate fee dataREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years of banking, finance, or mortgage experience",Finance/Banking Operations Job in Mount Laurel,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Mount Laurel, NJ 08054",,http://jobview.monster.com/finance-banking-operations-job-mount-laurel-nj-us-171850421.aspx?mescoid=4300698001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b2fcc230ff7104b649809402c95746ed
United States of America,US,08/May/2016:03:42:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking a Senior Accountant in Chantilly, Virginia (VA) who will be responsible for supporting month- end and year- end close process, preparing monthly account reconciliations and research/ resolve variances, preparing and posting complex journal entries, assisting with analyzing financial statements and reporting on variances, providing support for internal and external audit requests, aiding in training staff accountants, and assisting in documentation of business processes.REQUIREMENTS: BS degree in Accounting from an accredited university 3-5 years of progressively responsible experience ERP and SAP experience preferred",Senior Accountant Job in Chantilly,Full Time Employee,"Chantilly, VA 20151",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-chantilly-va-us-171699758.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),fa58bc6591bce1c903d827350227a9b6
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:22:34:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"City:MerrillvilleState:IndianaPostal/Zip Code:46410 Allied Building Products, a division of Oldcastle, is a national independent distributor specializing in commercial &amp; residential exterior and interior building materials with over 200 locations from Hawaii to Boston. The company was founded in 1950 as a small family-operated business focusing on the metro NY/NJ region and through acquisitions across much of the United States is now established as a major industry player. We believe that our employees are our best asset. Allied still holds true to the core values of our humble beginnings that havemade us a true success. No gym membership needed If sitting at a desk is not your thing, not to worry - you’ll get plenty of exercise at this job! In addition, you’ll enjoy competitive pay and comprehensive benefits. Energetic, organized, detail oriented individuals do well in this role. Who are we? Allied Building Products is one of the largest, most successful distributors in the building materials industry. We have over 200 locations, maintain a fleet of over 2,700 vehicles and employ over 3,100 people. As part of the Allied Building Products family, you’ll be a member of an organization with a history of success that dates back over 60 years. What will I be doing? As a full time Warehouse Associate, you’ll ensure smooth operation of our warehouse by performing material inspections, filling orders and loading/unloading vehicles. Job Description Fill orders quickly and accurately Notify Purchasing and Sales when orders can’t be filled and/or notify Lead Warehouse Associate when inventory levels appear low Initial Pick Tickets as orders are loaded and then ensure secondary verification Call customers in a professional and timely manner Inspect condition and quantity of received materials before placing them in the warehouse Properly place received materials in correct bin locations Communicate deviations with the Receiving Coordinator (in advance) to facilitate proper changes in the inventory control system Label and store all non-stock items Complete cycle counts and inventory checks in a timely and accurate manner Load and unload vehicles in a safe and professional manner Verify product descriptions, condition, amounts, and nomenclature Reconcile printed tickets to stock Accurately complete paperwork (Pick Tickets, Inventory Count Sheets, etc.) Moving materials in yard and warehouse as needed Maintain cleanliness and neatness of warehouse Adhere to and understand safety policies and regulations Perform other duties as assigned Requirements Previous warehouse and inventory control experience Ability to drive a forklift Experience working directly with the customer Ability to communicate with co-workers, vendors and customers Must be able to work both indoors and outdoors under adverse weather conditions Ability to handle all types of building products Ability to lift 75+ lbs. repeatedly throughout the day Preferences Previous experience working with building materials helpful CDL Class A or B license preferred What Allied Offers You Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Allied is a great place to grow! If you're up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Allied Building Products is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Allied Building Products is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.",Warehouse Associate - Entry Level / Full Time / Inventory Control - Merrillville,Full Time Employee,"Merrillville, IN",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-associate-entry-level-full-time-inventory-control-merrillville-in-job-merrillville-in-us-167862505.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=10,,,11a339f5bea06f5aca20833af9adcfb1
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:47:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"CR England has an IMMEDIATE NEED for experienced Truck Drivers! We offer weekly pay, flexible home time, paid vacation, health benefits, and much more. APPLY NOW - takes less than 10-minutes! Experienced CDL-A drivers with a safe and clean record are offered some of the best driving positions with a well-balanced life on the road, frequent home time and stability. We have never laid off a driver due to lack of freight. AVAILABLE OPPORTUNITIES include: Local Lanes (limited), Dedicated, Intermodal, Regional, National, Solo, Team Driving, Driver trainer, Instructors. GENEROUS BENEFITS PACKAGE includes: Competitive Pay, Bonus Incentives, Paid Vacation, Flexible Home Time, Health Benefits, 401k Company Participation. Better Pay, Home Time and Miles.",Experienced CDL-A Driver Needed in California Job in Oakland,Full Time Employee,"Oakland, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-cdl-a-driver-needed-in-california-job-oakland-ca-us-167323479.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=20,,Logistics/Transportation,bb0169006d0c52b7e1be167d6deda860
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:47:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Emergency Room – RN – ER - Nurse                                                                               Southern Atlanta, GA AreaRelocation AssistanceCompetitive Pay                                                                                                        Emergency Room – RN – Nurse – ED                                                                        ·         Full Benefits·         2+ years of recent Emergency Room experience preferred·         Growth Potential!                                                                     We are looking for an experienced Registered Nurse with Customer service abilities including effective listening skills, critical thinking skills, decisive judgment and the ability to work with minimal supervision in a fast paced environment…. Call to find out more.                                                                                                                                            How we will work for you… ·         Resume preparation services·         Interview preparation and coaching·         Detailed job descriptions·         Interview feedback   FOR IMMEDIATE INTERVIEW CALL RYAN DEMERITT @ 800-995-2673 X1339   Ryan DemerittPermanent Placement SpecialistCoreMedical Group (phone) 800-995-2673   ext. 1339(fax) 866-420-1055ryan.demeritt@coremedicalgroup.com               Connect with me on LinkedIn!!    APPLY TODAY!!!!keywords:  ED, ER, Emergency Room, Emergency Department,  telemetry, step-down, PCU, emergency department, critical care, emergency services, director, manager, magnet, ER, ED, E.R., E.D, intensive care, nurse manager, CNO, Director of ER, Director of emergency services, emergency room, critical care, icu, ccu. Nurse manager, clinical coordinator, assistant nurse manager, head nurse, charge nurse, director, vice presidentemergency department, critical care, intensive care, vice presisent, telemetry, intermediate care, emergency services, director, manager, magnet, ER, ED, E.R., E.D, intensive care, nurse manager, CNO, Director of ER, Director of emergency services, emergency room, critical care, icu, ccu. Emergency Department, Emergency Room, ER, ED, Trauma Center, Level I Trauma, Level II Trauma, Director, VP Patient Care, Associate Director, Nurse Manager, Assistant Director, Vice President, Senior Director, Director of Patient Care Services, ACNO, CNO, Chief Nurse Officer, Chief Nurse Executive, BSN, Bachelor of Science Degree, Master of Science Nursing, MSN, MHA, MBA, JCAHO, Magnet Hospital, Teaching Hospital, ENPC, TNCC, CCRN, CEN Certified, Certified Emergency Nurse, RN, Registered Nurse, R.N., Nurse, Critical Care, CVICU, ICU, women’s services, labor & delivery, ob/gyn, l&d, labor, delivery, OB, obstetrics, postpartum, nursery, newborn, women's services, NICU, neonatal, perinatal, antepartum, child, baby, mother, mother/baby, rn, registered nurse, nurse, acute care, hospital, inpatient, outpatient, manager, clinical leader, coordinator, director. Birthing center, pediatrics, maternity, maternal, nurse manager, head nurse, director, clinical coordinator, clinical leader, cno, senior director, cvor, cardiovascular operating room, telemetry, progressive care unit, PCU, Stepdown, Critical care, Telemetry, Physical therapist, physical therapy, ortho, orthopedics, outpatient, dialysis, renal, kidney,",Emergency Room – RN – ER - Nurse Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/emergency-room-%E2%80%93-rn-%E2%80%93-er-nurse-job-atlanta-ga-us-167747886.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=16,25.00 - 36.00 $ /hour,Medical/Health,c2f40d2da2c7d005e2e41eaaab3d4371
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:37:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hill Manufacturing Company, Inc. is an 85 year-old industrial chemical manufacturer and one of the fastest growing privately held specialty chemical producers in the United States. We manufacture and sell over 1,500 non-technical industrial maintenance products to virtually every industrial sector. Credit Department  Customer Service   Individual selected will be a detailed, hands-on self-starter and possess credit approval experience. Must be able to efficiently and diplomatically resolve customer credit concerns and to utilize good judgment in making credit decision. Industrial account experience preferred as well as the ability to effectively interact with all levels of management and a multi-state sales force.    Duties and Responsibilities: Excellent communication skillsCollectionsSkip LettersInterpreting invoices and understanding creditsCustomer serviceAccounts Receivables Salary is negotiable, depending on experience. Medical / Dental 401k Paid vacation Hours: 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM EOE",Credit and Collection Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30315",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/credit-collection-job-atlanta-ga-us-167443187.aspx?mescoid=4300696001001&jobPosition=9,12.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),7ed06461a63138420955b0285d506c8e
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:37:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Combined Insurance is seeking Territory Managers to join our fast-paced, high energy, growing company. We are proud of our tradition of success in the insurance industry of over 90 years. Come join our team of hard-working, talented professionals! JOB SUMMARY: The Territory Manager (TM) is responsible for leading, developing, building and managing a team of 5 or more Agents, generating sales to new customers, sales and service to current Combined Insurance policyholders, recruiting of new agents and delivering annual new sales objectives RESPONSIBILITIES: Developing New Agents Field train a minimum of 4-5 days each week for the first two weeks with all new Agents. Field train a minimum of 3 days each week for the next 5 weeks with all new Agents. Develop in each Agent expertise with all aspects of the sales process New and Established Agents Receive monthly internal leads from Marketing Director (MD) and distribute to Agents (biweekly) Receive externally generated leads, distribute to Agents immediately and report disposition daily Support Agents in assignment planning/appointment setting as needed Field train Agents by accompanying them during sales visits as needed, typically at least one day every 2 weeks per Agent Collect post-sales documentation and process according to documentation type including disposition of internal lead cards weekly Meetings Conduct daily meetings with the team each morning for the purpose of training and development Attend monthly full day market team meetings and deliver training as required Attend bi-weekly full day meeting with MD and other TMs Conduct and attend training and development meetings Core sales process and personal production Meet production standards and guidelines set by management Be able to effectively demonstrate the company's sales process Engage in personal production during Incentive Weeks only (Incentive Week to typically take place twice a  quarter) Execute core sales process as outlined during that week Contact externally generated leads and report dispositions in requested timeframe Plan assignments Conduct sales presentations consistent with new customer approach Complete all post sales administration and data collection documents Service customer service calls or refer to appropriate channel Recruiting/Field Demos Field recruit prospective new Agent candidates while training and selling Establish local networks and sources within territory to find qualified new agent candidates Conduct informational recruiting seminars to prospective new Agents as needed Represent the Company at local job fairs or other hiring events Assist MD’s with interview process of new agent candidates as needed Take all prospective territory Agents that have passed MD interview on field demos Make final hiring decisions together with MD Other Establish local presence for Company Follow company policies and standards COMPETENCIES: Capacity to manage and lead a sales team Strong communication and organizational skills Good coaching and mentorship skills Ability to conduct small group training meetings Maintain high ethical standards Excellent sales and negotiation skills SKILLS/EXPERIENCE: Successful and stable work history Demonstrated leadership skills Minimum of 1 year Insurance sales Minimum of 1 year Insurance Sales Management experience Basic PC skills required Obtaining your Life, Accident, and Health license is required prior to employment EDUCATION: High School Degree or equivalent required College Degree preferred OUR BENEFITS As a Combined corporate employee, you have access to one of the most comprehensive benefit plans in the business, designed to meet your needs and help you reach your financial goals.  We are committed to supporting its employees with a comprehensive compensation package that is appropriate in the market where they work. Below are several of the many benefits we offer our employees: Health insurance Dental insurance Tuition reimbursement A company-match 401(k) plan Disability insurance Life insurance Employee referral bonuses ABOUT COMBINED INSURANCE Combined Insurance is a leading provider of individual supplemental accident, disability, health and life insurance products. With a field sales force and corporate staff in excess of 5,000 people worldwide, Combined Insurance meets the growing coverage needs of policyholders around the globe. We pride ourselves on being customer-centric, people-driven, accountable, performance-minded, and ethical. We invest in our employees and take the time to focus on their development, needs and career aspirations. Connect with us onTWITTER, FACEBOOK, LINKEDIN, INSTAGRAM and GOOGLE+ Read our blog, SUPPLEMENTALLY SPEAKING, for more info on health and wellness topics  ",Territory Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-167702940.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3f2d586a7caf12fee98473bb7a6cbb7a
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:36:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"City:ConleyState:GeorgiaPostal/Zip Code:30288 Georgia Masonry Supply is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Essential Duties and Responsibilities Load and unload products on dump trucks or flatbed trucks with Moffett Unload multiple stop loads Understand proper placement of materials at jobsite Identify different types and sizes of material Assist customers and outside vendors with any issues (i.e. matching materials and quantities) Keep assigned equipment in proper working condition/clean at all times Daily maintenance check sheet; report any concerns to his/ her supervisor Perform other work-related duties as assigned Other duties may be assigned to meet business needs Qualifications / Requirements CDL Class A License with 2 plus years of commercial driving experience Must have Moffett Experience Ability to drive dump truck and straight truck with Moffett Previous flatbed and dump truck experience required Certificate of driving school training Must have acceptable driving record throughout employment (driving record changes/ updates will be monitored annually) Detailed oriented Able to work in team environment Must be able to complete all required paperwork for job site assignments Meet the DOT federal regulations for certification annually Communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing, with superiors, colleagues, and individuals inside and outside the Company Physical Requirements Must be able to sit, bend, walk, and climb in and out of trucks and Moffett in an outdoor setting for up to 8 plus hours a day Preferences Prior forklift experience highly desirable What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Join ourTalent Communityto receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers onFacebook,Twitter,Instagram,Google+,Pinterest,WordPress (Career Blog)andLinkedIn! Georgia Masonry Supply is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on thislink. Georgia Masonry Supply is part of theOldcastlecareers™network.",Truck Driver / CDL A / Home Nightly - Conley,Full Time Employee,"Conley, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-home-nightly-conley-ga-job-conley-ga-us-167731145.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=6,,,81f3b1b43ac6d7747095bd04b0758323
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:36:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail Sales Merchandiser FULL TIME   Retail Sales Merchandiser candidates are organized, self-motivated and friendly. As a member of our Top Performing Sales Team, you will work in full time Retail Sales with oversight and responsibility for increasing sales of our client’s products for leading brands in chocolate, candy/confections, sports drinks, soda products, and snacks. This Retail Sales position services and sells to retail accounts within an assigned territory, ensuring Client standards are met and sales volumes are increased. The ideal candidate for this Retail Sales position is independent, ambitious and driven to succeed with strong sales skills and the confidence to influence key decision makers at the store level. This is a great opportunity to work with Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.   Responsibilities:   Meet and exceed sales goals, by maintaining proper product inventory Engage with store management using the latest technology to drive sales and enhance client satisfaction  Maintain client objectives  Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers, building rapport with clients and customers Perform merchandising duties QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or higher education or equivalent job-related experience Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Position Summary   The Retail Sales Merchandiser (RSM) is responsible for servicing and selling to retail accounts within an assigned territory to ensure Client standards are met and volume is increased.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities   Sales and Merchandising Maintain Client objectives by ensuring secondary placements of product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics Shelf Standards and Conditions: authorization of items to meet Client shelf schematic standards Meet Client and Company objectives by maintaining full distribution on existing SKUs. Take direction regarding tagging, rotating, and placing POS materials for products on shelf Prepare for and respond to audits Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Complete accurate and timely paperwork and reports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. May provide feedback for Client audit objectives  Customer Relations Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers Build rapport with Clients and Customers Field questions and proactively develop action plans to resolve issues Additional Responsibilities: Demonstrates high degree of professionalism in communication, attitude and teamwork with customers, peers and management Demonstrates high level of quality work, attendance and appearance Adheres to all Company Policies & Procedures and Safety Regulations Adheres to local, state and federal laws Performs the job safely utilizing proper equipment and safety techniques Additional responsibilities as assigned by supervisor related to the position/department Supervisory Responsibilities   Direct Reports   This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports   This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are essential duties and function of this job  Travel up to   20%         Must maintain current and valid driver’s license and valid proof of current insurance Minimum Qualifications Minimum Qualifications   The following are the minimum job-related qualifications which an individual needs in order to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities of the job   Education Level: (Required): High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience   Field of Study/Area of Experience:  Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels. Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills Demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others Works cooperatively with others toward common group objectives, demonstrates respect for the ideas and contributions of other team members, cultivates positive relationships with other associates, and provides assistance and support to others Ability to communicate with email and basic internet skills Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Demonstrate commitment to meet or exceed customers’ expectations Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Administrative Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work may be performed in an office, field, retail store, or warehouse environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.      Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).      ",Retail Sales Merchandiser Full Time Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-merchandiser-full-time-job-atlanta-ga-us-167696208.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=11,,Retail,77c33d21b4b4ac21e3b0bfd3360155e4
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:36:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you.  (NYSE: XPO) Join XPO Logistics for the respect you deserve on day one and career opportunities moving forward.   At XPO Logistics, our rewarding culture is built on teamwork and respect. Safety is our #1 core value, so we maintain a fleet which includes new Freightliner®Cascadia® tractors with state-of-the-art technology. Each is equipped with Drive Safe Systems™ (DSS) which alerts drivers to potential safety risks and helps them respond. XPO Logistics trucks were also recently rated as best-maintained in the industry by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.   As a Driver Sales Representative (DSR) you can help us serve our customers better while you help yourself with many opportunities to advance your career. Great pay and benefits complete the package that makes XPO Logistics a rewarding culture. All this, and you’ll get to go home every day.   XPO Logistics goes the extra mile for you: Our DSRs are recognized among the best in the industry. Every day, you’ll be supported by a friendly team and state-of-the-art technology. Your ideas will be heard. You will have real opportunities to advance your career. You’ll get great pay, great benefits and the pride that comes from a rewarding career. XPO Logistics invests in safety: New Freightliner® Cascadia® tractors with the latest technologies. The first and only major LTL carrier to deploy significant safety technology as an integrated system across the entire fleet. More National Truck Driving Championship Champions than any other LTL carrier. Our drivers have recorded over 2 billion miles of safe driving. Five XPO Logistics DSRs have driven over three million miles without an accident.  Description of Essential Job Functions: Drive (under both the DOT regulations and in the opinion of the company); unload & load freight off/on trailers; lift freight and other objects of various shapes, sizes and weights (up to 50 lbs frequently and greater than 75 lbs occasionally); safely operate heavy equipment; move, position and connect/disconnect a converter dolly with an average weight/pull force of approximately 128 lbs; safely climb in and out of a tractor cab and trailer; sit for extended periods of time in a truck tractor and/or forklift; safely walk and stand for extended periods of time on various surfaces that may be uneven or slippery; operate a tractor/trailer combination up to 11 consecutive hours, in all types of weather, while safely transporting hazardous/non-hazardous materials; and safely walk, reach (including above your head), bend, climb, push, pull, twist, squat & kneel as necessary to perform the job duties.  Safely operate tractor-trailer combination, including doubles (and triples, where applicable). Perform vehicle inspections required under section 396.13 of the Federal Motor Carriers Safety Regulations. Maintain a current Class A CDL with Hazardous Materials, Doubles/Triples  and Tanker Vehicle (Tanker) endorsements. Operate and maintain records in accordance with Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations (FMCSR), Department of Transportation (DOT) and company policies as required. Provide service excellence to customers including generating sales leads to appropriate personnel. Able to work a flexible schedule and as many as 12-14 hours in a day, including any of the shifts (day, evening, night and weekend). Prompt, daily attendance at assigned work location. Perform other duties as assigned. Compensation & Benefits:   Pay starts at $21.85 per hour and may also include the opportunity for overtime and an annual company bonus. Benefit plans are based on length of employment, beginning with 401k eligibility and expanding up to full medical, dental, vision, prescription, life insurance and disability. XPO Logistics is a great opportunity for a challenging career with tremendous growth potential and the flexibility to be home every day.   Skills & Experience: Possess and maintain a valid Class A Commercial driver's license. Hazardous materials endorsement required. Doubles/Triples endorsement required. Tank Vehicle endorsement (Tankers) required. Must be 21 years of age or older. Forklift experience preferred. Safe driving record and history. Pass DOT drug test and have no prior positive tests or refusals. Pass a company paid DOT physical. Pass a company paid Post Offer Pre-Hire screen (physical essential functions) test.    “We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.  Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.”  ",Truck Driver Job in Cinnaminson,"Full Time, Employee","Cinnaminson, NJ 08077",,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-job-cinnaminson-nj-us-167856256.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,,Logistics/Transportation,80fc27c82d615e3e37f701943dd6f84c
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:21:36:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking an IT Sourcing Manager for a consulting position at a pharmaceutical client in Raritan, NJ 08869.Required Skills and Experience: • Bachelor’s degree • 6+ years’ sourcing, negotiation and contracting experience in an IT sourcing environment, on-shore and off-shore service contracting, preferably with experience with Application Development/Support (ADM)• Global/international sourcing and contracting experience preferred • Excellent oral and written communication skills • Strong analytical skills • Strong attention to detail, accuracy and processes • Highly flexible and adaptable to change • Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills • Proficient with Microsoft Office products, including Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint and SharePointResponsibilities:Will manage the Procurement activities related to transitioning application development and application support on-shore and off-shore suppliers and contracts into Application Services. The selected candidate will: • Partner closely with IT business partners to create a timeline for completing Procurement transition activities • Gather and analyze supplier and contract data • Provide suppliers with contracting process training • Partner with the Procurement Contracting Center of Excellence to determine future contracting approaches • Insure needed contracting is completed in the timeframe required • Negotiate fair, market based pricing with transitioning suppliers • Promote collaboration and establish strong partnerships with IT and Procurement stakeholders • Record savings related to transitioning suppliers • Provide status reports on activities and projects to Manager • Meet deadlines and deliver within timeframe assigned. ",IT Sourcing Manager Job in Raritan,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Raritan, NJ 08869",,http://jobview.monster.com/it-sourcing-manager-job-raritan-nj-us-167300280.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,7671de45fdc1dc64585d18f85ec0719e
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:20:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sales Trainer - Starting at the Entry Level - Immediate HireAre you looking to make a long lasting impact on the business you work with? Looking for a clear path for advancement? Want to be developed along the way?3MP Atlanta, Inc. is looking for a passionate Entry Level Sales Trainer who will partner with and ensure the long-term success of our team and customers.  This job involves one on one sales interaction with customers.You will be responsible for developing relationships within your assigned territory, connecting with key decision makers. You will liaise between customers and cross-functional internal teams to ensure the timely and successful delivery of our solutions according to customer needs.  Pay based upon performance.RESPONSIBILITIESExecute day to day sales, marketing, and campaign managementExcel in our management training program working from Entry Level to Senior ManagementManage the implementation and delivery of a key client’s activity, maximizing performance, return on investment, and identifying opportunity to expandOwn all problem solving, troubleshooting, client campaign requests, media planning and key implementationsBuild client relationships through service excellence and balance their campaign needs with your proactive approachGet your hands dirty with team building, growth, and expansion efforts**This is an entry level position with advancement opportunities into senior management**REQUIREMENTS· Work, internship or other leadership experience in a professional comparable environment· Business, Marketing or Sales focused degree and/or coursework· Internship/work experience in the sales field· Excellent oral and written communication skills and an ability to influence others internally and external· An ability to analyze quantitatively and problem-solve· Demonstrated ability to perform well in a highly dynamic, rapidly changing environment· Active listener and effective communicator· Ability to prioritize and demonstrate relentless discipline in achieving goals· Strong ownership, bias for action and willingness to role-up your sleevesIf you're up for the challenge and fit these qualifications send us your resume!www.3mpatlanta.com",Sales Trainer - Starting at the Entry Level - Immediate Hire Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-trainer-starting-at-the-entry-level-immediate-hire-job-atlanta-ga-us-167207584.aspx?mescoid=1300091001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,446d68ef5c7997971f8e30e3ba4673ac
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:20:57:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"MAINTENANCE MECHANIC opportunity at a manufacturing company near Pine Lake, GA in Atlanta metro east. Twelve hour day shift. Local candidates.Responsibilities for the Maintenance TechnicianPerform mechanical and electrical repairs, maintenance and preventive maintenance on site equipment and systems Coordinate maintenance activities with production and maintenance departments to prioritized objectivesTroubleshoot electrical, mechanical and electronic problems and resolve them with a minimum of downtimeInstall, repair, and maintain a variety of complex machinery which are mechanical, hydraulic or pneumatic in nature in accordance with drawings, diagrams, operational manuals, manufacturing specifications, etc. Use a variety of tools including specialized tooling and precision measuring and testing instruments.Repair and maintain any stand-by equipment or back-up parts, such as timers, controllers, circuit boards, DC drives and controls, and electrical pneumatic valves Fabricate simple parts, perform miscellaneous welding and sheet metal work involved in repairing or installation of equipment. Design and fabricate special-use parts, equipment and special fixtures as needed to improve operating efficiencyRequirements for the Maintenance TechnicianMinimum 5 to 7 years experience in mechanical maintenance in a manufacturing environmentNeed 1 to 3 years specialized training in maintenance or assembly of high-speed production equipmentNeed boiler and air compressor maintenance experience A PLUS to have related electrical experienceCertified to operate lift truck per OSHA requirementsGood interpersonal and verbal communication skillsBenefitsSalary in range shown based on qualificationsComprehensive BenefitsGrowth opporuntiySolid stable manufacturing firmThis Job is located in Atlanta, GA -> United States",Maintenance Technician - Mechanical Equipment/Manufacturing/Boiler and Air Compressor Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30306",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-technician-mechanical-equipment-manufacturing-boiler-air-compressor-job-atlanta-ga-us-167268811.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=2,"35,360.00 - 41,600.00 $ /year",,b5a83e487a81dbbb4bf60fdd6b79eeda
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:19:45:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a prestigious national law firm, is seeking a financial services litigation paralegal to join their Atlanta team. This is an exciting opportunity to work with a well-respected attorney whose focus includes the representation of clients in business disputes, commercial litigation and consumer law.To be considered, candidates must have at least 2 years of experience as a litigation paralegal in a law firm environment, ideally with experience in the mortgage servicing industry. Top verbal and written communication skills are required as well as advanced MS Word and Excel abilities. Organization skills are paramount with the ability to multitask and prioritize to meet critical deadlines. Candidates must have an undergraduate degree and a paralegal certificate, preferably from an ABA approved paralegal program. Responsibilities Include:Assisting attorneys with preparing legal documents, including pleadings, briefs, motions, subpoenas, and discovery-related materialsManaging case files and matter documents through electronic docketing systemsEnsuring filings are in compliance with court rules and filing and e-filing documents therein, specifically in Georgia state and federal courtsAssisting attorneys with discovery, including discovery requests, depositions, and issuing subpoenasAssisting with document review and analysis through various platformsThis firm offers a comprehensive benefits package and competitive salary based on experience. $55,000-$65,000 DOE. They have an excellent infrastructure for training and support and offer a collaborative, positive work environment.Qualified candidates who are interested in learning more about this opportunity should submit resume today for immediate and confidential considerationFind Us on Facebook!Follow BeaconHillLegal on Twitter!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com.We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Commercial Litigation Paralegal Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,AtlantaGA,Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-litigation-paralegal-job-atlanta-ga-us-167537727.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=13,"55,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Legal,bb9e0ada3215812e959c5239d14a9b9e
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:19:45:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-atlanta-ga-us-159971923.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,7efe6da93f6350d9ae0ab02758232bbb
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:18:40:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Senior Manager, Technology and Operations is responsible for managing all aspects of technology and operations to enable delivery of Client Accounting Services (CAS). Managing the technology includes strategically managing the technology platform which includes NetSuite, Bill.com, Nexonia, Avalara, Box, DocuSign, and LastPass with additional tools being added or changed as we grow. The Senior Manager will monitor the industry in conjunction with client needs and suggest potential changes in the technology stack. The Senior Manager will perform tool evaluations and negotiate agreements with potential vendors.The Senior Manager will also manage the team providing all technology and operations support to the accounting teams. These responsibilities will include monitoring staffing needs to support the client pipeline and determining what positions or skill sets should be included on the team. The Senior Manager will also provide staff development, performance appraisals, and management coaching for all team members.The Senior Manager will support new client implementations stepping into a project management role when necessary.The Senior Manager will partner with the CAS Controller and Director to create estimates and proposals for prospective clients. The Senior Manager will participate in client assessments when appropriate to determine the scope of services and effort necessary to support the client.The Senior Manager will work with the technology and operations staff to evaluate operational processes for efficiency and optimization opportunities and implement appropriate process changes to achieve these efficiencies. Required Experience:Bachelor's Degree in Management, Accounting, Computer Science or related fieldProven experience in managing and developing highly performing teamsExperience preparing client estimates and proposals preferredExtensive project management experience required, PMP certification preferredExperience managing vendor relationshipsExtensive experience managing client relationships and providing client supportExperience working in a cloud-based environmentNetSuite experience strongly preferredExperience working in a paperless environment strongly preferredStrong interpersonal and relationship building skills",Senior Manager,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30328",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-manager-technology-operations-135-975-job-atlanta-ga-us-165775025.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=13,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",2ad5f85a16088153efa2536a341f49bb
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:17:50:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position is responsible for leading the timely installation and service of connectivity products in the Client offices. This includes: Managing the timely installation, training, upgrade, relocation or removal of the products, Coordination and implementation of: Phone, DSL Cable-modem communications and Cabling, Preparation and performance of ASCII downloads, Ensuring patient historical results are available to client where possible, Working with Dispatchers and others to schedule installation events. Single Point of Contact with Client and Sales for status of installation, Follow up with clients to ensure satisfaction with installation and training.Communication with Client, Sales Representatives, Vendors, Hardware Preparation Team, Installers, Bridge team members and Help Desk, Conduct a phone survey with the client to identify best Care360 product for the Client, Ensuring accurate and complete paperwork for Installers, Performing post-installation survey to ensure quality. Effective verbal and written communications with technical and non-technical individuals. Knowledge of Medical field strongly preferredEducation:**Additional Job Details:Need to be based in Atlanta metro area travel the area for client conversions/hardware install. There  will some will require travel to South Georgia CLEAN DRIVING RECORD",IMPLEMENTATION TECHNICIAN Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/implementation-technician-job-atlanta-ga-us-167861106.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,4aebacd6bf198d13bd63f4805689f8fa
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:17:49:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Southeastern Technology Consultants is working with a client in Atlanta seeking a Junior Security Engineer for an exciting opportunity! Qualified candidates must have either a bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience in the IT industry.Job Responsibilities:-          Identify security issues and risks – develop mitigation plans-          Participate in security compliance efforts, penetration testing, incident handling and security operations support-          Participate in design, implementation and testing of disaster recovery plan for operating systems, databases, networks, servers and software applications-          Ensure the secure operation of computer systems, servers and network connectionsIf you are interested in this position, please send you resume to resume@southeasternit.com  StaffSource/ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, ARG Financial Staffing/Southeastern Technology Consultants complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.",Security Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30303",,http://jobview.monster.com/security-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-164695768.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,bad9a1bb4c219837e10c855bd745c9b5
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:17:25:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: A major public company specializing in data analysis, information gathering and media has a need for a transactional real estate attorney licensed to practice in Georgia.Logistics: This is a REMOTE position approved for 3 months at 20 - 40 hours per week (there is a strong possibility of an extension). You will work from your own office/home. Start date in June.Job Responsibilities of a Real Estate Senior Attorney Editor:- As a Real Estate Senior Attorney Editor, you will be responsible for independently researching, writing, editing and reviewing documents to provide practical guidance on how best to accomplish specific legal tasks related to practicing real estate law in Georgia.Job Requirements:- At least six years' experience working in Georgia as a transactional real estate attorney (both residential and commercial) in a law firm setting or an in-house counsel role.- Strong business acumen, and an understanding of the needs and priorities of attorneys.- Excellent writing and editing skills.",Senior Attorney Editor - Real Estate Law (REMOTE) Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA 30303",Legal Services,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-attorney-editor-real-estate-law-remote-job-atlanta-ga-us-167463538.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=19,,Legal,72cedaa7c58e10897ba39222cf4dba7d
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:17:17:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"BOSTIK is hiring!The Shipping and Receiving Clerk is responsible and authorized to perform all duties associated with Inbound freight. They must be committed to produce a quality product in the most cost-effective and timely manner without risk to the employee or environment. To accomplish this the employee will strive for Quality, Safety, and Productivity utilizing a philosophy of Teamwork and Employee Involvement.We seek people who want to be a part of a growing, world-class organization. We also offer comprehensive benefits effective DAY 1… “Stick” with us!Position responsibilities:Follows all plant policies and practices to ensure safety, quality, service, and cost objectives are metUtilizes the Movex system/documentation from the Movex system to receive in raw materials, purchased finished goods, and packaging supplies as well as to pull finished goods for shipment to customersAssists in maintaining an accurate inventory through activities including, but not limited to: double checking quantities and item codes when receiving in material and when pulling orders, reporting loss of product (raw materials, finished goods, packaging) due to spills/damage and immediately recording/reporting all discrepancies in inventory and any damaged productEnsures compliance with all local, state, and federal transportation and environmental regulationsReports any spills or incidents that adversely impact safety or the environmentOperates a forklift in a safe manner following all departmental and plant safety rulesAssists in maintaining an acceptable level of housekeepingAccurately completes all required paperworkAssists in physical inventoriesAssures compliance with all company policiesComplies with Corporate EHS safety and regulatory requirementsEssential skills and experience:High school diploma or GEDAbility to read and write EnglishDemonstrated computer skills (Microsoft Applications, AS400, Movex and Lotus Notes preferred)1 -3 years experience in a warehousing environmentPhysical demands and work environment: The physical demands and work environment characteristics described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.Physical demands: While performing duties of job, employee is required to stand, walk, sit: use hands to finger, handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands or arms; talk and hear. Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. Must be able to lift 75 pounds.MUST BE ABLE TO WEAR FULL FACE RESPIRATOR; Required to be clean shaven to facilitate respirator use.Work environment: Plant. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.About Bostik - Smart Adhesives:With our eyes on the future, Bostik is driven to develop smart adhesives – enabling us to anticipate needs, create value and shape new capabilities. We are not the right place for everyone. We ARE right for those who work collaboratively to think and act boldly beyond today. Put your potential to work to increase our collective expertise, powered by a spirit of innovation.As one of the largest adhesive and sealant companies in the world, Bostik designs, manufactures, and markets bonding solutions within a variety of Global Business Units: Industrial Adhesives (Converting, Assembly, Packaging, Transportation, Flexible Packaging and Industrial Laminations); Consumer and Construction (Flooring Installation Systems, Construction Sealants and Adhesives); and Nonwovens (Disposable Hygiene). Bostik is well positioned as part of Arkema's High Performance Materials segment. A global chemical company and France’s leading chemicals producer, Arkema is building the future of the chemical industry every day. Make a difference with Bostik. Build a career with purpose. Experience the impact powerful bonds can make - at a place where you can feel at home. Compliance: Bostik is an EEO/AA/Drug Free Workplace. Disclaimer: The above information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees in this role. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications ",Shipping & Receiving/Warehouse Specialist - st Shift - Paulsboro,Full Time,"Paulsboro, NJ 08066",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-warehouse-specialist-1st-shift-paulsboro-nj-job-paulsboro-nj-us-167855832.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3071755d70ef980fd666b37f251d864d
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:17:02:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"PositionFull-Time Dishwasher QualificationsMust be able to reach above and below shoulder height with hands and arms.Must be able to frequently walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, crawl, or lift.Must be able to regularly life and/or move up to 10 pounds and frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Work ScheduleMust be flexible and be able to work weekends and holidays BenefitsLenbrook offers a competitive salary and benefits which includes:MedicalDentalVisionDisabilityLife insuranceFlexible spending accountHealth savings account401(k) with employer matchEmployee assistance programPTO To apply, please visit www.lenbrook-atlanta.org.  Go to the Careers tab and click on Job Postings.   EOE and drug-free workplace",Dishwasher Job in North Atlanta,Full Time,"North Atlanta, GA 30319",,http://jobview.monster.com/dishwasher-job-north-atlanta-ga-us-167763497.aspx?mescoid=3500617001001&jobPosition=16,,,cde03ea4749bf7bd688e9355e79f9e3f
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:16:57:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"WHO WE ARE: Team Beans/Forever Collectibles, LLC is a worldwide leading manufacturer of sports and entertainment merchandise, including products ranging from collectibles and novelty items to promotional memorabilia. With all of the major sports licenses at our fingertips, along with a powerful infrastructure and broad variety of products, our company is reaching new heights every day. The success of Forever Collectibles' expansion is directly related to our ability to bring fresh designs and manufacturing techniques to categories in need of innovation. We are constantly searching for dedicated and driven professionals to join and help grow our team! AT A FIRST GLANCE:The Purchasing & Planning Coordinator is expected to monitor and maintain optimal inventory levels in assigned product categories based on current customer demand, season trends and historical data. WHAT WE ARE LOOKING FOR:·       Bachelor’s degree in economics, statistics, mathematics, supply chain management or other related fields·       Must live within 50 minutes of Forever Collectibles’ HQ office or willing to relocate·       Must be a sports advocate and have an understanding of primary sports·       Active lifestyle preferred·       Able to be part of a community and work in a team environment·       Proficiency in the use of Windows and Microsoft Office Applications; Word, Excel, Outlook·       Open to taking direction·       Strong communication skills ·       Must be adaptable to working in a rapidly changing and evolving environment A DAY IN THE LIFE:·       Responsible for placement of official purchase orders; making any adjustments, updates, cancellations to these documents·       Accurately enter and update all product information into Microsoft GP for assigned categories·       Work with vendors to manage and resolve all purchase order issues including timelines, pricing disputes, quantity requirements and shipping methods·       Generate regularly scheduled inventory reports and analyze in full to make useful recommendations to purchasing manager·       Ability to generate ad hoc reports in assistance to entire department ·       Constantly making an effort to contribute improvement to all processes and procedures so as to achieve better results for overall company objectives",Purchasing Coordinator Job in Somerset,"Full Time, Employee","Somerset, NJ 08873",,http://jobview.monster.com/purchasing-coordinator-job-somerset-nj-us-167854926.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=18,"30,000.00 - 35,000.00 $ /year",Logistics/Transportation,5b8aad28aab77fd0f984736fa1800ae3
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:16:56:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"About ABM Healthcare Support Services ABM Healthcare Support Services joins together three healthcare services leaders — HHA Services, Healthcare Parking Systems of America (HPSA) and ABM Health to provide each of the services needed to support our healthcare clients’ entire ecosystems—from hospitals to ambulatory surgical centers and medical office buildings.  Services provided include clinical engineering & healthcare technologies, environmental services, facility management, food service, hospitality, parking, patient observation & transportation, and security.    Position Summary Responsible for the administrative support functions of the Support Services Departments and management teams. This position provides clerical support and receptionist duties to the department.Essential Duties Responsible for answering all incoming calls, inquiries and greeting visitors to the department. Uses telephone answering scripting when receiving calls. Responds to all requests from customers with a can do attitude. Follows up on requests with a sense of urgency. Distributes messages and requests to appropriate personnel upon receipt. Uses several different computer programs to enter department data, record-keeping, and generate reports. Maintains a clean environment in the desk and office area. Maintains office supplies for use by all management team members and places orders for replacement. Demonstrates Customer Service, Role Proficiency, Teamwork, Resource Management, Flexibility, Quality Initiatives and Leadership, and Personal Accountability as defined by the organization, department and unit. Manages information appropriate to role by providing timely and appropriate input by using and transmitting information in print, verbal, and document forms appropriate to job tasks. Assists with the hiring of department personnel including setting up interviews, pre-hire assessments, drug, and background checks. Processes all benefit and HR paperwork for new hires and establishes employment files. Works closely with the corporate office to coordinate the hiring and start of all new department personnel. Processes department time cards and payroll reports and submits within established deadlines. Provides information, assistance, and introductions to new staff. Maintains all department personnel records including training records, personnel files, required regulatory documents and general information as established by the facility and department. Treats all patient, employee and staff information as confidential. Follows the HIPAA policy as established by the facility and department. Answers calls and requests for patient transport department and dispatches transporters as needed. Attends all required in-services designated by the facility and or department. Understands and exemplifies the philosophies and values of ABM Healthcare Support Services. Ability to type in a word processing environment at 50 words per minute. Ability to communicate effectively in both written and verbal formats. Enjoys working in a team environment interacting with a variety of departments. Must possess excellent customer service skills. Must possess excellent communication and interpersonal skills treating others with respect. Able to work independently, establishes priorities and makes decisions without close supervision. Ability to handle multiple tasks at one time.   Job Requirements:Education/Training High School Diploma or GED is required. Associate degree or advanced business training is preferred.Job Knowledge/Experience: Two years of proven success in an Administrative Assistant role or related business role is required.Language/Writing Communication: Required:  Ability to use a personal computer in a Windows environment. Knowledge of general business software programs.   Click Here To Applyhttps://abm.mua.hrdepartment.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=39317&site_id=123",HSS - Administrative Assistant Job in Decatur,Full Time Employee,"Decatur, GA 30033",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/hss-administrative-assistant-job-decatur-ga-us-167381846.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=2,,Other,2d4ba9d9dc54b5f18740e22321b8be83
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:16:38:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Ensure all assigned Driver Qualification files are accurate and complete. Facilitate orientation for students and drivers at designated terminal location.Process orientation paperwork and ensure Driver Qualification files are in compliance with local, state, and federal regulations as well as with Company hiring criteria and the process for Establishing a Driver File before the driver completes orientation.Conduct brief interviews with driver applicants in order to gather additional information required for the Driver file and forward the file to Safety Audit for reviewDisqualify applicants who do not meet the drug screen and hiring criteria; consult with appropriate leadership personnel on additional disqualification concerns.Ensure all drivers meet DOT/Swift requirements regarding medical exams.Update the status of each orientation attendee and submit a Driver New-Hire Personnel Action Form (PAF).Perform additional duties as assigned by leadership.Maintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company demands and expectations.Periodic travel required as necessary for training proposes.Skills: Must be proficient with Microsoft Word and Excel; be detail oriented and analytical; possess strong written and verbal communication skills; possess a positive attitude and highly motivatedEducation: High School Diploma or GEDExperience Required: Two years transportation experience preferred Position RequirementsMust be proficient with Microsoft Word and Excel; be detail oriented and analytical; possess strong written and verbal communication skills; possess a positive attitude and highly motivated Required EducationHigh School Diploma or GED Required ExperienceTwo years transportation experience preferred",Safety Compliance/orientation Administrator Job in Sumner,"Full Time, Employee","Sumner, WA","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/safety-compliance-orientation-administrator-job-sumner-wa-us-167889782.aspx?mescoid=1100057001001&jobPosition=17,,,91008d2905d5f0c560372c0821f9e368
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:16:37:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"WHO WE AREGourmet Foods International was built on a true passion for fine food which has driven our company to become a leading specialty food supplier in the nation.  Started in 1967 by Russell McCall, Gourmet Foods was no more than a single cheese and wine shop. We now have warehouses nationwide to help achieve our goal of aligning communities through food. Our philosophy is based on the idea that food is a universal connector. We have worked to keep a strong focus on supporting small producers and bringing their hand-crafted, healthy, and environmentally conscious products to consumers across the nation. OUR PRODUCTSA remarkable specialty food program features top quality products, offered with extraordinary freshness and variety. We distribute over 10,000 gourmet products across the US with strong leadership in most specialty cheese categories.  Gourmet Foods prides itself on cultivating strong relationships with vendors which include many small producers and traditional cheesemakers. Our product selection includes a large number of artisan goods from all across the country as well as imported items from around the world. CORE VALUESThrough our values we strive to develop customer and employee loyalty while generating long-term profitable and sustainable growth. • We create a bridge between producers, customers, and consumers by bringing quality products to new and expanding markets  • We promote an energetic climate of purpose and innovation.  • We recognize our social responsibility to give back to our communities through outreach and sustainable business practices.SUMMARYResponsible for pulling orders using RF device and stacking pallets by specification. RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned.Pull and scan correct items and quantities of product for customer ordersVerify shelf life of products is within specificationsTag items with proper labelsStack pallets properlyFollow Power Warehouse procedures for pulling ordersProperly record any product damagesEnsure product is packaged properly for optimal shippingMaintain work environmentMaintain the safety, quality, and legality of food products WORKSKILLS: Excellent communication skills, ability to follow directions and meet deadlines and be able to work under minimal supervision. EXPERIENCE: Previous RF experience a plus QUALIFICATIONS: Pallet jack certification EDUCATION: High School Diploma or GED preferred PHYSICAL DEMANDS: Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs. and able to work in cold environment for an extended period of time WORK ENVIRONMENT: Warehouse environment",Order Puller Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30303",,http://jobview.monster.com/order-puller-job-atlanta-ga-us-150373089.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),214d3ee944bded169445dcffa9339562
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:16:19:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job OverviewPrimary Purpose and Essential Functions: Perform thorough inspections and related repairs on equipment owned or operated by Swift Transportation as directed by supervisor and provide superior customer service to Swift drivers.Complete advanced preventative maintenance inspections to comply with DOT regulations and assist with basic mechanical repairsUtilize basic understanding of trailer maintenance, diagnosis, and repair, root causes of common issues, and corrective steps to keep trailers running at maximum efficiency.Perform quality checks for entry level mechanics; Mentor and assist any shop personnel as needed to create a cohesive and well-rounded shop environment centered around learning.Utilize computer programs to track various information such as Asset Tracking, Work Order Management, Parts Management, etc.Recognize and identify, non-trailer specific related repair or maintenance items; Ensure the issue is fixed by appropriate personnel in a timely mannerAssist in the moving of equipment around the yardMaintains a clean and safe work area compliant with OSHA and company regulation and policyMaintain a positive work atmosphere by acting and communicating in a manner which facilitates the success of business operations in order to meet company demands and expectations.Perform additional duties as requiredSkills: Demonstrated/proven superior customer service skills; valid drivers license; ability to read and understand repair manuals, understanding and ability to complete/fill tags and repair orders; computer keyboarding.Education: High School Diploma GED or graduation from trade/techinical school preferred. Additional technical school education may substitute for required experience. Drivers license required.Experience Required: Three (3) years of heavy equipment/mechanic related experience. Completion of Swift 3MT Packet may substitute for one (1) year of required experience. Position RequirementsDemonstrated/proven superior customer service skills; valid drivers license; ability to read and understand repair manuals, understanding and ability to complete/fill tags and repair orders; computer keyboarding. Required EducationHigh School Diploma GED or graduation from trade/techinical school preferred. Additional technical school education may substitute for required experience. Drivers license required. Required ExperienceThree (3) years of heavy equipment/mechanic related experience. Completion of Swift 3MT Packet may substitute for one (1) year of required experience.",Trailer Mechanic - mt Job in Sumner,"Full Time, Employee","Sumner, WA","Travel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/trailer-mechanic-3mt-job-sumner-wa-us-167889670.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=20,,,98eee1ba09bbfda72c5e9ed4886e0fd9
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:15:48:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY AND DISTINGUISHING FEATURES OF THE WORK: Downtown property development and management company is looking for an Office Manager for their Atlanta headquarters. The Office Manager performs a variety of facilities management functions to ensure fully operable facilities which allow employees to perform their assigned tasks and ensure functionality of the environment by integrating people, place and technology. MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS REQUIRED: High school diploma or equivalent; and,Three to five years of progressively responsible experience; or,Any combination of education, training and experience which provides the required knowledge, skills, and abilities to perform the essential functions of the job.  ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: Responsible for controlling the day-to-day operations of the office; meeting employee ergonomics requirements; overseeing the coordination and operation of building space allocation, staff assignments, and floorplan layouts.Maintains and distributes office supplies, such as paper, to various print areas and supply closets.Routinely spot checks office for cleanliness, facility repairs, or general maintenance. Maintains product levels in break room, pantries and coffee stations.Performs full supervisory duties for receptionist. Acts as a backup receptionist and provides administrative services and support duties to the whole organization as needed. Manages coverage schedule for front desk.Hosts monthly meeting for administrative staff.Manages related vendor relationships, including processing of payment requests in Nexus payables.Supervises the activities of all outside contractors working within company facilities.Coordinates with Information Technology and property management staff to facilitate a team based approach, combining expertise and manpower for the completion of projects.Plans and organizes corporate events to include company-wide meetings and employee social gatherings.Manages building space allocation, design layout, communication and facility expansion and modifications for new office construction or renovation of existing locations. Coordinates with contractors and vendors regarding cost estimates and inspections.Responds to questions, requests, or problems or directs to appropriate person/department.   KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:       Knowledge of:Facilities operation and OSHA regulations.Administrative and managerial principles, concepts, practices, and procedures.Supervision of staff and activities. All computer applications and hardware related to performance of the essential functions of the job.Department organization, standard operating guidelines and policies, rules, and regulations.       Skill in:Negotiating contracts.Reading and interpreting documents such as safety roles, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals to include OSHA regulation, fire and building codes.Planning, organizing, assigning, directing, reviewing and evaluating the work of staff.Preparing clear and concise reports, correspondence and other written materials. Communicating orally and in writing with internal staff, the general public, and other departmental staff in order to give and receive information in a courteous manner.Operating and maintaining all assigned equipment required to perform the essential functions of the job.   ",Office Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30308",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/office-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-168030214.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=8,"50,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),81784544b78fcb2452d154b6a0f033cd
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:15:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under close supervision, provides assistance to Transportation Supervisors in order to coordinate the efficient, safe, and on-time movement of AC Transit fixed-route operations assigned to Trans-bay service operating via the Transbay Transit Center (TTC). This is an excellent opportunity to work at one of the largest bus agencies in California. In addition to working with some of the best in the business, AC Transit also has an outstanding benefits package that includes pension, medical, dental and vision coverage, flexible spending and a 457 savings plan.",Transportation Supervisor Assistant (Part Time) Job in San Francisco,Part Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/transportation-supervisor-assistant-part-time-job-san-francisco-ca-us-167889601.aspx?mescoid=1100024001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e58dbd9b1241c19a373b6aa4b41f3732
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:15:12:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our business sales professionals are elite self-starters with a drive to transform the way our customers do business through technology. Wireless solutions? Nosotros las tenemos. Cloud solutions? Nosotros las proveemos. As a member of our team, you’ll bring the full array of AT&T solutions to businesses - and feel great about the impact you’re having on their bottom line. As part of the BSLDP, you’ll learn directly from a company that’s leading the way for innovation. This 16-week paid program offers instructor-led, web-based and hands-on training - all designed to help you gain new experiences and transform your skills. You’ll kick off your adventure in Atlanta, and after honing your skills, you can anticipate relocation to one of AT&T’s nationwide markets with a demand for your talent. It’s just the opportunity you need to hit the ground running. You’ll also work with our advanced technology, learn how to prospect for new business, solve problems, provide excellent customer service and meet sales goals. With your passion for sales and technology combined with our training, you’ll be on your way to becoming a top sales performer. If you’re a leader with a focus in sales, the world-class training you’ll receive in our BSLDP can give you the tools and connections you need to build an amazing career. From securing new business to managing our existing customers, you’ll take on a variety of challenges. You must be English-Spanish bilingual, able to relocate within the U.S., have a valid driver’s license, and have a Bachelor’s or Advanced Degree. AT&T will not sponsor applicants for work visas of any kind for this position. ¿Eres tú? Nuestros empleados lo explican aún mejor, conócelos ahora>>",AT&T Business Sales Leadership Development Program Bilingual Spanish Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/at-t-business-sales-leadership-development-program-bilingual-spanish-job-atlanta-ga-us-167341108.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=4,,,005c5f2fccacf8c34b5857464d24c087
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:14:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Truck Driver – Entry Level ( CDL Not Required ) Transportation – Full Time,Full Time,"Bakersville, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-entry-level-cdl-not-required-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-bakersville-ca-us-159709926.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=17,,Logistics/Transportation,593f53eab6097e74a1e83c1452ab4003
United States of America,US,07/May/2016:14:58:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kenan Transport Company, a highway subsidiary of the Kenan Advantage Group, is now seeking Mechanicsout of Ft. Lauderdale, FL. Apply Today!Advantages to joining our teamCompetitive pay Excellent benefits including: Medical, Dental, & Vision plans Paid vacations & holidays 401K with company match Paid training Paid uniforms Tool allowance Mechanic/Driver referral incentive pay And so much more!We hope your career continues to be a long and a safe one. As you make decisions about your career, consider a position that fits your life with Kenan Advantage Group.Mechanic High school diploma or GED equivalent 1 year minimum verifiable experience performing general mechanical work including maintenance and repair experience or equivalent qualifications Complete set of hand and air powered tools up to, and including, "" drive Valid driver's license Technical school experience preferredMechanic Apprentice Valid driver's licenseCall 1-800-871-4581 for more information or apply today! Kenan Advantage Group, and its subsidiaries, is North America's largest liquid bulk transportation and logistics provider to the petroleum and specialty products industries. We operate in 125 fixed based, over 175 satellite locations and over 5,900 trucks.Kenan Advantage Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Mechanic - KTC Job in Fort Lauderdale,Full Time Employee,"Fort Lauderdale, FL",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanic-ktc-job-fort-lauderdale-fl-us-167862512.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=8,,Logistics/Transportation,8b424b58f3ab7e7be9f14cecc7d18ca0
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mobile Service-Advanced Diesel TechnicianIndependently performs advanced diagnostics, service repairs and maintenance work on customer and/or dealer-owned agricultural equipment.  Responsibilities:Performs advanced diagnostics and repairs on agricultural equipment and established Ag Management Solutions (AMS) productsParticipates in Service EDUCATE Training programs required for the development of skills and knowledge  Mentors Service Technician TraineesConducts or supports customer clinicsMaintains current knowledge of John Deere and competitive products      Maintains condition of vehicles, inventory, tools and equipmentMaintains a clean work area and performs work in a neat and orderly fashionFollows all safety rules and regulations in performing work assignmentsCompletes all reports and forms required in conjunction with work assignmentsAccounts for all time and all material used in performing assigned duties  Performs diagnosis and repair in the fieldExperience, Education, Skills and Knowledge:5+ years of experience performing service repairsAbility to perform advanced repairs and maintenance using special tools and equipment following Technical Manual procedures on machines of the Technician’s specialtyAdvanced knowledge of mechanical, electrical and hydraulic systems used in the repair of agricultural and turf equipmentExcellent skills in operating vehicles and equipment used for diagnostic purposesAbility to use Service Advisor and basic computer functionsAbility to lift at least 75 lbs. repeatedlyAdvanced Diesel Service Technician education preferredHigh School Diploma or equivalent experience required; Associates degree preferredValid driver’s license requiredPay and Benefits:Depending on experience $23-$29/hrFull time with benefits : medical, dental, vision, 401k, life, short and long term disability, PTO, company provided uniforms, and morePlease apply online at www2.ourcareerplace.com/TrueNorth",Diesel Technician Job in Grand Forks,Full Time,"Grand Forks, ND 58201",,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Technician-Job-Grand-Forks-ND-US-165860449.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=9,,,35800c315d06f797afc46fc068583fa3
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:15,No,jobs.monster.com," KATYINDEPENDENTSCHOOL DISTRICT  Title:                                 HVAC Technician SeniorReports To:                       HVAC Assistant Supervisor  Wage/Hour Status:            Non-ExemptPay Grade:                        C-6Duty Days:                         260 DaysDate Revised:                    9-2015 Qualifications: High School Diploma or GEDPossess a valid Texas Operator’s License     Knowledge and skill required to operate and repair all equipment associated with HVAC and low temperature refrigeration maintenanceMust possess minimum EPA certification I and II (Universal certification preferred)Texas State Contractors License Type B(Preferred) or ability to obtain Texas State Contractors License Type BPhysically able to lift 50 poundsAbility to comprehend written and verbal English Primary Purpose: Maintain district wide HVAC and low temperature refrigeration equipment in order to provide a quality building environment for students, staff, and community. Major Duties and Responsibilities: Assume primary responsibility for the safe and functional condition of HVAC and refrigeration equipment.Perform preventive maintenance for HVAC and refrigeration equipmentPerform repairs and/or new installation as requested on approved work orderRecommend when refrigeration assistance should be obtained from outside sourcePractice all safety regulations related to tradeRecommend supplies and equipment for purchaseReport any safety hazards in a buildingMaintain an inventory of suppliesRespond to emergency repairs immediately and report problems to HVAC Supervisor Equipment Used: Computer, meters, gages, welding equipment, ladders, hoists, hand and power tools, pipe bender, propane torchlight truck or van. Working Conditions: Continual walking, standing, climbing, stooping, bending, kneeling, reaching, and heavy lifting and carrying. Work in tiring and uncomfortable positions, outside and inside. Exposure to extreme temperatures. Frequent district wide travel.May be required to work night shift. ▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪▪The foregoing statements describe the general purpose and responsibilities assigned to this job and are not an exhaustive list of all responsibilities and duties that may be assigned or skills that may be required.",HVAC Technician Senior Job in Katy,Full Time,"Katy, TX 77494",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Technician-Senior-Job-Katy-TX-US-163698838.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=12,15.99 - 23.98 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),d378f5c5919348adefea49a7df6bf79d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Supervisor I needed for a contract opportunity with Yoh's client located in Morristown, TN. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Minimum of 1-2 years of team leadership experience - Experienced leading a team in a manufacturing operation - Six Sigma training or equivalent quality training - OMLP Graduate What You'll Be Doing: - Lead a team to support the business strategy for one or more product lines while maintaining high team morale, employee engagement, safety and teamwork - Provide employee health and safety leadership by driving 5S housekeeping, health and safety framework score improvement, training completion, audit item closure and successful completion of priorities - Support and consistently administer all company workplace policies including attendance, safety and quality objectives - Develop and execute an effective communication plan for the team to ensure high employment engagement Lead lean manufacturing initiatives - Develop, coordinate, lead and execute daily production plans to meet on-time shipments - Drive productivity as measured by labor efficiency improvements & implementation of cost out projects - Work cross-functionally with others to identify root causes and solve external quality issues - Support Bachelor's Degree from an accredited college or university What You Need to Bring to the Table: - Ability to build and lead a team through change - Strong analytical, problem solving and project management skills - Strong organizational skills - Ability to work without direct supervision - Strong understanding of business processes in a manufacturing environment - Strong oral and written communication skills Bonus Points! Otherwise Known As Preferred Qualifications: - Team leadership experience What's In It For You? - This is your chance to shine while supporting our client that cares about your development and help you lead where you want to be. Get Hired, Apply Now! Recruiter: Jestoni Garcia Phone Number: 570-309-6492 Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: PROF; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WBRSTL Ref: 1070818 SFSF: PROF Nearest Major Market: Knoxville Job Segment: Housekeeping, Industrial, Manager, Lean Six Sigma, Hospitality, Manufacturing, Management, Healthcare #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Production Supervisor I Job Job in Morristown,Full Time Employee,"Morristown, TN",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-I-Job-Job-Morristown-TN-US-166046077.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=8,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,859dcebe17841ab3ff65f8db4c7206c5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Located in beautiful downtown Nashville, TN, Hermitage Hall is one of the country’s largest full continuum service providers for youth who struggle with a variety of social, emotional and behavioral difficulties. At Hermitage Hall, we have developed our treatment programming around a core fundamental belief: that treatment success can be maximized through specialized treatment programming designed around the youth’s age, developmental needs, cognitive level, past traumatic experiences and method of learning. If you have a passion for making a difference in a child's life, join our team of dedicated professionals who are committed to helping the youth in our care. The Maintenance Technician will be responsible for: • Repairs and maintains electrical and mechanical equipment. • Repairs plumbing issues. • Performs minor carpentry work. • Installs, finishes, and repairs drywall. • Installs, removes and repairs locks. • Performs routine maintenance on machinery and equipment, including lubrication, cleaning and inspections. • Completes routine building tasks, e.g. replace light bulbs; unstop toilets, replaces material dispensers, repair flush valves and etc. • Maintains grounds (inside and outside). • Organize office when need it. • Demonstrates understanding of the maintenance role in a therapeutic milieu. • Responds calmly and effectively to emergency situations. • Understands responsibilities for emergency codes. • Experience with HVAC units. • Knowledge in PM system and work order system. • Any other duties as assigned by supervisor. • Must be available for on-call or emergency duty. • Demonstrates knowledge of state licensing regulations, contractual requirements, CARF standards, HIPAA policy, ordinances, laws and other regulations required of his/her position and acts consistently and in obedience to same. Job Requirements:• High School diploma or G.E.D. • Minimum of 2 years maintenance experience in a commercial or industrial setting with knowledge of CARF and state licensing regulations. • Valid State Driver's License. • HVAC license or certification preferable. • Electrical experience; certificate or license preferable. • Ability to speak Spanish a plus. Click Here To Applyhttps://uhs.ats.hrsmart.com/cgi-bin/pm/click.cgi?job_id=187427&site_id=35",Maintenance Technician Job in Nashville,"Full Time, Employee","Nashville, TN 37203",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-NASHVILLE-TN-US-165869969.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,1d784e144b8c00ebc151fc2a89dd2d77
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:This is an outstanding opportunity for a Journeyman level Heavy Duty Mechanic with tracked and over the road equipment experience. We are working with an outfit in San Jose that needs a Lead Tech to maintain and repair a wide array of equipment. This role will require a top notch mechanic to order parts, perform field and shop duties and maintain the fleet. We need a leader who can keep an eye on the big picture while ensuring the readiness of the fleet. Previous experience with vendors, maintenance software and leading other mechanics is a must. This is a key role within the company that will grow with time and success. All successful candidates will submit to a background check, MVR, and drug screen.Compensation:$85,000 - $92,000/year, competitive benefits and a 4% matching 401K availableShifts:Days, Monday to Friday, some flexibility required to work extra hours.We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Lead Diesel Mechanic - Truck & Heavy Equipment Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Diesel-Mechanic-Truck-Heavy-Equipment-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165667537.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=6,,,2c97cd9f9037c656fe80a5a1c15cf3c9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"About GENCO…GENCO, A FedEx Company, is a leading supply chain solution provider specializing in Product Lifecycle Logistics® for technology, retail, consumer and industrial goods, and healthcare industries. Operating more than 38 million square feet throughout North America, GENCO provides a comprehensive range of integrated logistics services to enable growth, minimize cost, mitigate supply chain risk, and improve customer service. Services include inbound logistics, warehousing and distribution, fulfillment, contract packaging and product configuration, systems integration, returns processing and disposition, test, repair, refurbishment, product liquidation, and managed transportation. Visit genco.com, gencomarketplace.com, and nobetterdeal.com for more information.We Have…A strong FedEx brand consistently ranked among the world’s most admired and trusted employers.A top notch leadership team with the experience needed to grow and develop your career.An open mind for new ideas and creative methods.A strong compensation and benefits package, including health, vision, dental, 401k with a strong match and much more!General Summary…The Warehouse Worker is responsible for the accurate storing, shipping and receiving of product to meet company standards of safety, security and productivity. The Warehouse Worker is responsible for operating a double pallet jack for the purpose of moving, locating, relocating, stacking, and counting merchandise.  This Position Will Be Responsible For…Accurately selecting product according to the customer’s batch/order specifications. Product is to be organized, minimizing damage to the item, keeping paperwork attached. The picker then sends the order to the packing area to be loaded on the pack lines.  Some teammates are designated to load the pack lines per orderEnsuring outbound shipments are accurate and free of damage. Reporting quality variances to supervisorPulling and preparing product for shipment, ensuring that the exact number and type of product is loaded and shipped. Perform picking duties in an efficient manner that meets customer service standardsMoving and staging product and materials using a double pallet jack or other equipment. Use radio frequency equipment for picking and load functions, as required. Maintain the facility’s equipment and materials in a neat, clean, and orderly fashion. On a daily basis, inspect and perform minor maintenance on the double pallet jack or other equipment. Operate all equipment in a safe and efficient manner following prescribed work methods.Keeping appropriate records and reports to guarantee that tight inventory control and security are maintained. Assist in physical inventories. Ensure proper stock rotation.Become knowledgeable of the responsibilities, procedures and duties of other areas of the warehouse. Act as back-up during times of absence and vacationCharging forklift battery as needed; participate in physical inventories; perform labeling, sorting, wrapping, packing, and repacking as needed; repair pallets when necessaryAdhering to all double pallet jack operation procedures discussed at the double pallet jack/forklift operators qualification/certification and safety meetings. The teammate is responsible for operating warehouse and computer equipment in a safe, efficient manner according to all safety standards.Maintaining a safe working environment.  Maintain a clean, neat, and orderly work area.  Recognize our customers and GENCO’s commitment to pride and quality work.  Assist in maintaining the security of the building and conduct all activities in a manner that promotes a safe environment You might be a great fit if…Experience with and ability to operate material handling equipment, electric pallet jack experience preferredMust be capable of repetitive lifting of up to 50 lbs; must be able to stand and walk for extended periods of time Must be capable of sitting, standing, and walking for extended periods of timeAbility to read, write, and speak EnglishAbility to count accurately, do simple math and write legibly Familiarity with Radio Frequency (RF) equipment is preferred Strong sense of urgency; flexibility in meeting deadlines Strong attention to detail and quality Must be able to pass a pre-employment drug screen and background checkEOE AA Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, Disabled.GENCO participates in E-Verify.Referrals…If this isn’t the job for you perhaps you have a friend who would be a perfect fit! Please send them this link by clicking the ""Share"" icon above or have them apply online by clicking here and searching our openings.Click play to view our GENCO “Introduction Video”Learn About Our Company or Follow Us @  Additional Information:",Warehouse Worker Job in Grove City,Full Time Employee,"Grove City, OH 43123",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Worker-Job-Grove-City-OH-US-166043805.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e7678b3dbdc9b80fe35f44f0a11cee4f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dairyland Power Cooperative - Job Opportunities Dairyland Power Cooperative, an electric utility headquartered in La Crosse, WI has immediate openings for the following positions: ""Administrative Specialist - Finance ""Director Transmission Services ""Electrical Engineer ""Hydraulic Equipment Operator ""Instrument Technician (Journeyman) - Genoa, WI ""Mechanic - Genoa, WI ""Plant Control Systems Administrator ""Plant Operator Trainee - Genoa, WI ""Utility Worker - Alma, WI ""Various Summer positions For more information on the jobs, please visit us at www.dairynet.com/careers We offer a great range of benefits. Apply online at www.dairynet.com/careers or request a position description and application by calling Dairyland Power Cooperative Jobline: 608-787-1293. Applications will be accepted until staffing needs are met. Must submit college/vo-tech transcripts. Dairyland Power Cooperative is an equal opportunity provider and employer.",Electrical Engineer,Full Time,"La Crosse, WI 54601",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Electrical-Engineer-Hydraulic-Equipment-Operator-more-Job-La-Crosse-WI-US-165326548.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=1700169001001&jobPosition=12,,,cf57b6d7d3b0d77794badcfe90e0bc1e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Electronics Technician  Immediate Opening!  Temporary to PermanentFull time – M-F; 1st & 2nd Shift AvailablePlease email resumes to Rose Crane –rcrane@tempforce.net  TempForce is continually recruiting for general labor talent to work temporary and temp-to-hire positions within Gainesville and surrounding areas. JOB DESCRIPTION:This position is responsible for and required to have experience troubleshooting analogue RF electronics and cable assemblies. The ideal candidate will utilize various electronic test equipment, such as multimeters, Network Analyzers, and power supplies.  RESPONSIBILITIES: ·         Design and document minor electronics and cable assemblies.·         Utilize various electronic test equipment.·         Perform minor soldering and electronic repairs.·         Troubleshoot electro-mechanical assemblies to the component level.·         Develop and document test processes for electronic equipment. QUALIFICATIONS:   High school diplomaTechnical degree or equivalent Minimum of 2-5 Years professional experienceExtreme attention to detailsCertifications, if applicable",Electronics Technician Job in Gainesville,Full Time,"Gainesville, FL 32609",,http://jobview.monster.com/Electronics-Technician-Job-Gainesville-FL-US-156050730.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=18,10.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),9954e0f5ce948b858d0aa72ff07cf721
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"84 Lumber is seeking an Engineered Wood Designer for our stores. This is position is responsible for completing design work assigned by the Design Manager, and responsibilities will include: Reading and interpreting blueprints Ensure designs are accurate, optimized, and conforms to standards Request sealed engineering drawings and/or repair details and follow-up to ensure complete when necessary Generate EWP placement layouts for final construction Generate and provide accurate pricing for estimating purposes Aid in training of new employees when required Provide job-site support, with the aid of sales department, when requested.General knowledge of construction industry. Knowledge of floor and roof truss design process Ability to read and interpret architectural and structural blueprints Ability to calculate tributary loads, concentrated loads, and load transfer through a building. Ability to operate a computer and current software used by company Knowledge of current local codes associated with truss design (i.e. TPI, UBC). Good written and oral communication skills are required. Ability to read, understand, and follow oral and written instructions. Ability to deal courteously with customers, co-workers, and construction personnel Good math skills including, but not limited to architectural units, fractions, geometry, and basic trigonometry.",Designer (Lumber) ( G ) Job in Brunswick,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Designer-Lumber-0933-4G-003-Job-Brunswick-MD-US-165673253.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=7,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,7b3cf582eeb8db9803a7c23356a6e164
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Southwark Metal Mfg. Co is a leading provider of prefabricated sheet metal ducts and fittings to the HVAC industry. Southwark stands above our competitors by providing quality products, superior service, and on-time delivery since 1946. We currently have an exciting opportunity for an experienced PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR - 2nd shift,  in our Philadelphia, PA locationThe ideal candidate will possess 5-7 years of manufacturing experience. Must have the ability to manage multiple tasks while supervising a multi-level staff through their daily assignments. Maintains production goals with regard to quantity and quality of product manufactured based on the demands of the customer. Maintain a safe and clean work environment and enforce established safety procedures. Responsible for the development of staff and ensuring the cooperation between all departments. Must have a 'can do' positive attitude while working within a fast paced environment. The right candidate must be organized, detailed and team oriented, while possessing strong communication and leadership skills.We offer a competitive salary commensurate with experience with an outstanding and comprehensive benefits package, including medical, prescription, dental, vision, life, and 401(k).Interested candidates are encouraged to send their resumes with salary history to: l.francione@southwarkmetal.comEOE",PRODUCTION SUPERVISOR,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19114",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/PRODUCTION-SUPERVISOR-2nd-Shift-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165912064.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=8,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),987aaae8d9323ad8f608ade74a30a9d7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Superior Nut Company is a successful and growing Cambridge-Based Snack-Food Company with a strong Social and Environmental commitment to producing one of the finest food products in the world is currently looking for a passionate, motivated Food Manufacturing Maintenance Mechanic to join our Operations Team. The Company has a customer base that includes all types of business serving every food consumer market with distribution extending coast to coast and overseas.The Food Manufacturing Maintenance Mechanic will be responsible plant maintenance and engineering functions, as well as working closely with upper management in the designing, ordering, modifying, repairing, and maintenance of all plant equipment.Responsibilities:• Responsible for the for the repair, troubleshooting & installation of production equipment• Designing, upgrading, and implementing changes to production equipment• Leading and working with teams to perform equipment repair, upgrade, updating processes, etc...• Skilled in electrical repair, troubleshooting, wiring and upgrading technology• Welding, experienced in arc, stick, mig, plasma cutting, oxy-acetylene brazing• Extensive experience with PLC (Allen Bradley) based systems, programming capabilities.• Machining, experience with manual and CNC Lathe & Milling equipment, minor programming experience• Knowledge of switches, solenoids, photo eyes, actuators, motors, pneumatic, hydraulic, servomotors vibration equipment, scales and packaging equipment• Skilled with machine shop tooling including shears, brake and punch pressesRequirements:• At least four years of hands-on experience.• Extensive knowledge of food related practices are required, FDA, GMP• Knowledge of machines and tools, including their designs, uses, repair, and maintenance.• Electrical and Electric experience highly desirable.• Ability to think independently, as well as consistently collaborate and communicate with upper management.• Exceptional attention to detail and follow up with Company safety and performance objectives in mind.• Ability to work in a fast-paced, challenging, and consistently changing environment.• Packaging equipment experience a plus.All HR functions for this client are administered by HRO. HRO is not a recruiting agency.No Phone calls or recruiters. This client is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Food Manufacturing Maintenance Mechanic Job in Cambridge,Full Time,"Cambridge, MA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Food-Manufacturing-Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Cambridge-MA-US-162134838.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=11,,,b4d9110cecd29373646ba2154614eed8
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Works under the direction supervision of the Facilities Manager or designee with a minimum of supervision. Performs various equipment and facility repairs. Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesTroubleshoots and performs complex preventive maintenance and/or repair in a timely manner on all types of equipment, machines, and/or tools - such as lathes, milling machines, routers, drill presses, forming presses and other equipment - to ensure minimum downtime and full availability to production. Maintains effective communication with operators and other department to ensure early diagnoses and resolution of problems.Troubleshoots, repairs and performs various complex repairs to facility, including layout, carpentry, electrical, HVAC, painting, plumbing, and welding. Relocates various company assets, stock, equipment and material. Assists external contractors as assigned. Maintains records, data and other pertinent information as instructed or required. Maintains working knowledge of mechanical and electronic systems, circuit schematics, diagnostic programs and equipment. Expected to work flexible hours and to be on-call/available for both machine and facility-related emergency call-ins. Must possess valid driver's license and safe driving record to drive company vehicles.Knowledge, Skills and AbilitiesHigh School Diploma or GED is required.Completed apprenticeship program preferred.Must be able to read complicated drawings, charts and tables.Efficient with advanced mathematics skills.Minimum 5 years of experience. In the following link you will find information regarding Equal Employment Opportunity: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf",Facility Maintenance and Repair Technician Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32218",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Facility-Maintenance-Repair-Technician-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165854711.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6f3ef7896404147f79bdae587db6b59f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:31,No,jobs.monster.com,SERVICE TECHNICIAN  We have an immediate F.T. opening to service office machines in Central WI area. Benefits Include- Company car- Cell phone- Health Insurance- IRA- Industry Specific Training ProvidedQualifications- General knowledge of computers and electronics ,Field Service Technician Job in Marshfield,Full Time,"Marshfield, WI",,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-marshfield-WI-US-156386881.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,,,4b700095e5fb66ef7966028ebdd920c2
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Maintains diesel equipment operation by completing inspections and preventive maintenance requirements; correcting vehicle deficiencies; making adjustments and alignments; keeping records.Duties: * Determines vehicle condition by conducting inspections and diagnostic tests; identifying worn and damaged parts. * Keeps equipment available for use by completing preventive maintenance schedules; installing component and part upgrades; controlling corrosion; completing winterization procedures. * Corrects vehicle deficiencies by removing, repairing, adjusting, overhauling, assembling, disassembling, and replacing major assemblies, sub-assemblies, components, parts, or systems, such as, power and drive trains, electrical, air conditioning, fuel, emission, brake, steering, hydraulics; completes machine shop operations; making adjustments and alignments including bearing loads, gear tooth contact, valve mechanisms, governors, oil systems, control linkages, clutches, and traction units. * Verifies vehicle performance by conducting test drives; adjusting controls and systems. * Complies with federal and state vehicle requirements. * Maintains vehicle appearance by cleaning, washing, and painting. * Maintains vehicle records by annotating services and repairs. * Keeps shop equipment operating by following operating instructions; troubleshooting breakdowns; maintaining supplies; performing preventive maintenance; calling for repairs. * Contains costs by using warranty; evaluating service and parts options. * Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading technical and regulation publications. * Enhances maintenance department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.* Works well with service manager, parts manager, and other technicians. Skills/Qualifications:Tooling, Supply Management, Mechanical Inspection Tools, Technical Understanding, Attention to Detail, Dependability, Thoroughness, Verbal Communication, Documentation Skills, Inventory Control, Job KnowledgeBenefits include generous pay, plenty of over-time hours, as well as affordable onsite housing with your own kitchen and bathroom facilities.  ",Diesel Mechanic Job in New Town,Full Time,"New Town, ND 58763",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Mechanic-Job-New-Town-ND-US-155264896.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=9,"35,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),59fc9b1c73bc9d686ded71a96841319c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Maintenance Technician   Dominium is one of the leading affordable housing development and property management companies nationwide. We have operations in more than 20 states and over 850 employees.  For over 40 years, we have offered an exceptional working environment that aims to balance the professional and personal lives of all employees. We take pride in maintaining a respectful and fun work atmosphere with superior training programs to encourage growth and development. Dominium is seeking a Full-time Maintenance Technician for a 72 unit apartment community in Des Moines, IA.   Responsibilities: ·         Responsible for apartment turns ·         General appearance and maintenance of the property ·         Assist with data entry for work orders, purchase orders, and inventory   Qualifications: ·         1 year of previous maintenance experience preferred ·         Previous administrative/data entry experience preferred ·         High school diploma preferred ·         Basic painting, electrical, and plumbing experience required ·         Ability to work on-call is a must ·         HVAC experience required ·         Boilers License preferred ·         Valid driver’s license and insurance required Wage: $14.00 - $15.00 an hour  We offer a competitive salary, incentive bonus program, community volunteer and outreach program,  up to 20% rent discount on a Dominium apartment (subject to eligibility and approval requirements), and a comprehensive benefits package including: Medical, Dental, Life & Disability, Paid Time Off, 401(k), Flexible Spending Accounts, Employee Recognition & Wellness Programs.   Please apply online: http://www.dominiumapartments.com/apartment-careers.html   Connect with us on LinkedIn   Equal Opportunity Employer / Drug Free Work Place Ability to work on call,Basic electrical & plumbing,Basic painting,Boilers License,HVACAdditional Information:",Maintenance Technician Job in Des Moines,"Full Time, Employee","Des Moines, IA 50320",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Des-Moines-IA-US-165413899.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,5be6e66690cd10f410db39e2d3082120
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Drexel University was founded in Philadelphia in 1891 to provide educational opportunities for women and men of all backgrounds. Now, as a comprehensive research university with over 26,000 students across its 15 colleges and schools, Drexel’s strength in co-operative education, experiential learning, and translational research provides its students and faculty with excellent opportunities for career success. Known for innovation and dramatic growth, Drexel has earned top rankings from U.S. News & World Report, appearing among its Top 100 National Universities for the past seven years and on its Best Colleges list for the past 11 years. Job Overview: This position for Drexel University Housing oversees the operations for the Housing portfolio on the University City and Center City campuses, comprised of over 4,300 resident students in more than 1.24 million gross square footage of resident living space in traditional, suite-style, apartment, and fraternity and sorority housing. This position is responsible for oversight of $12 million dollars in annual expense. This position has direct supervision of two professional staff positions and works closely with University Facilities, to ensure the halls and Greek houses are maintained at the highest standard providing a safe,secure, clean, and healthy environment. This position is fiscally responsible for hall and Greek house expenditures to align the quality of the housing facilities with the student's academic experience. This position will establish and administer short and long-range plans to maintain the daily operations of the housing facilities, assess student housing operational trends, benchmark information against peer institutions and local market, provide reports, analyze data, and provide actionable advice and recommendations using analytics and professional expertise. The Associate Director will participate in strategic planning, local market and competitive studies, and the quarterly and annual budget processes. Drexel Business Services (DBS) under Campus Services is an integral part of Drexel University, contributing significantly to recruitment, retention and financial stability. The DBS portfolio includes Campus Dining, Conference Services, DragonCard, DragonDollars, Event Services, OneCenter, Parking Services, Printing & Mailing Services, Student Centers, University Bookstores, University Housing and Vending. With 48 full-time employees, 300 contract employees and 254 student employees, Drexel Business Services is responsible for $60 million in revenue and $32 million in operating dollars. A strong campus marketplace is essential to recruiting and retaining today's student. It is the mission of Drexel Business Services to operate and expand a marketplace that delivers high quality services that are customer responsive, built on strong internal and external partnerships, and are integral to the financial strength of Drexel University. Drexel Business Services creates dynamic campus and community destinations through retail, transportation and amenities. Qualifications: Bachelor's Degree required, Master's Degree preferred with a minimum of five years of relevant experience. Essential Functions: Set expectations with University Facilities related to the upkeep and operation of the residence Halls and the Greek properties. Follow up with University Facilities to resolve custodial, maintenance, or HVAC related issues or problems. Develop, manage and supervise all aspects of housing operations management to include facility maintenance requests, space conditions, annual-quarter-semester damage reporting, KeySystems and CCURE access management for all University operated and leased facilities including residence halls and Greek houses. Implement, utilize and maintain systems and processes required to support facility operations to enhance the student living experience within the halls and Greek houses. Work with several key units within the Department of University Facilities, (e.g., Maintenance, Custodial, Engineers, Environmental Health and Safety), to achieve strong relationships. Administer process for work order completion for Drexel Residence Halls by utilizing work order software.   Follow up on work orders which need further investigation by communicating with University Facilities.Work with the Executive Director on prioritizing fiscal spending of departmental operating budget of approximately $12 million. Provide the tactical and logistical support to the Occupancy Management team to allow the group to maximize revenue opportunities in support of the delivery of the $32 million revenue budget.Supervision of two employees that report directly to this position. Serve as the main housing operations deputy to the Executive Director, University Housing, and member of the central staff leadership team for University Housing. May be called upon to assist staff in tasks related to occupancy management of residence halls. Oversee and lead the operational management for University Housing-specific processes and programs related to Move-In and Move-Out in collaboration with external and internal partners.Responsible for training the University Housing staff, and closely monitoring operational systems and maintenance protocols, including documentation of standard operating procedures. Maximize the student experience by triaging escalated maintenance concerns with decision-making responsibilities to ensure strong customer responsiveness.    Develop and oversee internal procurement processes as well as departmental service charge-back activity ensuring expense recovery goals are met. Oversee student payroll and resolution of payroll issues.  Act as an emergency responder, performing operational and communication tasks in the case of emergencies (as deemed necessary by the Executive Director of University Housing or the Vice President Campus Services).Represent the Office of University Housing to constituent groups within and outside of the University, including prospective new students and their families. Outreach and point of contact to external University offices regarding residence facilities and student accommodations. As appointed by the Executive Director for University Housing, represent the group on committees for division-wide initiatives.Drexel University is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer, welcomes individuals from diverse backgrounds and perspectives, and believes that an inclusive and respectful environment enriches the University community and the educational and employment experience of its members. The University prohibits discrimination against individuals on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, sex, sexual orientation, disability, age, status as a veteran or special disabled veteran, gender identity or expression, genetic information, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions and any other prohibited characteristic.  Please visit our website to view all University Policies and Workplace Postings. Background investigations are required for all new hires as a condition of employment, after the job offer is made. Employment may not begin until the University accepts the results of the background investigations. To apply please follow the link www.drexeljobs.com/applicants/Central?quickFind=80774  or visit www.drexeljobs.com and search for Associate Director, Housing Operations  the requisition number is 7353For more information about Drexel University, please visit www.drexel.edu.",Associate Director,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19104",,http://jobview.monster.com/Associate-Director-Housing-Operations-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-163979581.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=10,,,c58a5623cd94a48c92df76f2af5564a7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"In need of a Print Center Associate(3rd SHIFT) to work for one of our clients in Nashville, TN.MUST have the following:1+ years customer service experience1+ years print center experience PREFERREDPrint finishing experience including: document assembly, trimming, folding, packaging, binding, counting and sortingMust pay attention to detailMust have a High School diploma or GEDAble to pass a National Background checkAble to pass a drug screenAuthorized to work in the U.S.  This is a CONTRACT position with an estimated end date of 3/2017. It has the possibility of being extended, if not go permanent, but, it is NOT a guarantee. Position is Monday through Friday, 3rd SHIFT, 8 hours per day, 11:30PM - 8:30AM.  Hourly pay rate is $12.77, non-negotiable. If interested, and you fit the above description, AND ARE WILLING TO WORK 3RD SHIFT, please reply with your resume (make sure your resume reflects your printing experience). Thank you and we look forward to speaking with you. ",Print Production Associate (rd SHIFT) Job in Nashville,Full Time,"Nashville, TN 37203",,http://jobview.monster.com/Print-Production-Associate-3rd-SHIFT-Job-Nashville-TN-US-153394675.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=5,0.00 - 12.77 $ /hour,Entry Level,36c38560c1497df48d164ee959b83468
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: American Commercial Equipment RepairLocation: Brooklyn, NY 11206Positions: Technician (Appliance Repair); Technician (Commercial Cooking Equipment); Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial-------------------American Commercial Equipment Repair is looking for at least 10 commercial refrigeration technicians. Work would be done throughout the 5 boroughs. We also have accounts with numerous school districts in New Jersey and Westchester County.",HVAC Service Technician Job in Brooklyn  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Brooklyn 11206,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Brooklyn-165265208.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a5e4957050741e1fdd7ee65e31646fb9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Methodist Hospital of Chicago—located in Andersonville on the north side of Chicago—is a nonprofit, non-sectarian hospital hosting a full complement of highly qualified physicians and other healthcare professionals. The Hospital offers a very distinctive caring approach to healthcare for today's senior population, as well as others. CALLED TO CARE… Do you share our mission of providing comprehensive, effective healthcare services in an environment where each and every patient is cared for with dignity and a deep sense of compassion? If so, consider joining our team of dedicated professionals.  Position Description: We are seeking qualified candidates for the Facilities Manager position. Ideal candidate will be responsible for the direction of the Building and Grounds Department, including maintaining a comfortable physical environment for patients, personnel, medical staff and the public, in accordance with organizational policy and procedures and regulatory requirements. Candidate will have experience in preventative and corrective maintenance program to ensure efficient and uninterrupted operation of the entire physical plant and all related operating equipment within the facility.   *Ideal candidate will have previous experience in a hospital/healthcare setting as well as HFAP / JCAHO experience* Additional responsibilities include:  ·         Supervision of operation and maintenance buildings and structure, as well as departmental staff.  ·         Provides for department staffing by effectively selecting, evaluating, promoting, disciplining, and separating  maintenance/clinical engineering staff. ·         Provides technical information and assistance as necessary, or, as requested to the professional and administrative staff of the hospital on projects, assigned alterations, and construction work. ·         Regularly prepares reports of work activities for the Administrator of Support services. ·         Ensures that Building & Grounds, Clinical Engineering, and the Safety Program is in compliance with HFAP and local agencies. ·         Establishes and consistently maintains Building & Grounds, Clinical Engineering, and Safety policies. ·         Prepares an annual budget to cover staffing needs, operating expenses, and capital equipment. Effectively monitors and controls expenses. ·         Directs plant operations and life safety issues in accordance with the established policies and procedures of  Hospital. ·         Establishes and implements procedures for the immediate response of appropriate personnel to control emergency situations, reduce downtime, and ensure safe, continuous operations. ·         Periodically reviews department practices to monitor quantity and quality of work performed by the plant operations staff to determine and adjust for maximum productivity. ·         Is the chairman of the Safety/ Environment of Care Committee. ·         Participates and provides indicators for the Hospital Performance Improvement program. Also submits quarterly (Performance Improvement) PI reports ·         Develops and maintains a comprehensive preventative maintenance program for plant operations and clinical engineering. ·         Demonstrates a cost-conscious attitude in regard to appropriate use of additional outside labor and staff overtime. ·         During major construction projects, serves as a professional liaison between the hospital and outside contractors. Monitors construction activity and maintains all permanent files including all correspondence pertaining to construction. ·         Ensures all hospital rental properties are properly maintained and in compliance with City of Chicago regulations. We offer a caring, team-oriented environment with a community focus and excellent employee benefits and ample free parking.   Apply today!  Methodist Hospital of ChicagoAttn: Human Resources  5025 N. Paulina  Chicago, IL 60640 E-Mail:     hr@bethanymethodist.org  Fax:         773-989-1348 EOE",Facilities Manager Job in Chicago,Full Time,"Chicago, IL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Manager-Job-Chicago-IL-US-165377507.aspx?mescoid=1100052001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),a939e1d1073deebcad6d1d21cebc4364
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:         Service Maintenance Technician -  John Deere Agriculture Equipment Location:     Nebraska, Colorado and WyomingGreat Long Term Opportunity With a Great Company    Company Overview:An American corporation that manufactures agricultural, construction, and forestry machinery, diesel engines, drivetrains used in heavy equipment, and lawn care equipment is in need of multiple John Deere maintenance technicians About the position: Performs diagnostics, repairs and maintenance work on customer and/or dealer owned agriculture Equipment. The primary product of the Service Department is billable time, so the individual must possess good time management skills, good interpersonal skills, be able to interact with customers and e capable of providing detailed repair information.Mandatory Requirements For Position - If you do not possess the following 4 requirements, you cannot be considered for this position1. Do you have experience with John Deere Equipment?2. Do you have experience with servicing agricultural combines, tractors, harvestors and planters3. Do you possess any John Deere Certifications?4. Do you have experience maintaining Agricultural equipment?5. Do you have experience with hydraulic and diesel machinery?6. Confirm you are aware that these positions are located in Nebraska, Wyoming and Colorado and that you are willing to relocate?7.Please confirm that you are fluent in English Number of Positions:  15 Key Job Responsibilities:Repair and/or recondition agriculture equipment.Operate special tools and equipment in a safe and orderly manner.Participate in Service Educate Training programs required for the development of skills and knowledge.Follows all safety rules and regulations in performing work assignments.Maintains a clean and safe work area and performs work in the same fashion. Critical Skills/Criteria:1+ years of experience in performing service repairs.Ability to operate vehicles and equipment used for diagnostic purposes.Valid driver’s license is required.Proficient knowledge of mechanical, electrical and hydraulic systems used in the repair of agriculture equipment.Extended periods of standing, climbing bending, must be able to lift 75lbs regularly, extensive hours on a computer. May be exposed to extreme weather conditions from extreme heat to winter blizzard conditions Benefits:Health/Dental/Vision InsuranceLife Insurance401k Retirement with Company matchSupplemental Insurance (AFLAC)PTO (vacation/sick/personal time off)Employee Assistance Program Relocation Assistance:Financial and logistical relocation assistance provided. Citizenship Requirements:Must be authorized to work in the United States.Company will provide assistance in work visa. Reporting Relationship: Reports to Service Manager or Store Manager. Interview Process:Initial Interview via Skype.Position Key Words1) farm equipment2) agriculture equipment3) hydraulics4) diesel equipment5) heavy equipment6) maintenance7) maintenance technician8) service technician   By applying for this position, you agree to have Foreign Staffing, Inc. represent you, and you are allowing us to submit your resume/application to our client on your behalf.http://www.foreignstaffing.com/bilingual-job-seekers/job-postings/service-maintenance-technician-united-states",Maintenance Technician Job in Davenport,Full Time,"Davenport, IA 52801",Agriculture/Forestry/Fishing,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Davenport-IA-US-163901213.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,"55,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),2e9dfc4f0aa48ad1f8dca522d2fae3b2
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Streamline Circuits is a leader in manufacturing Printed Circuit Board offering Rigid, Rigid Flex and Multi-layer Flex. We are committed to providing our customers the most advanced technology, quality and engineering support available. Customers take advantage of these resources to develop a cost effective product in a time sensitive manner. This is critical for today's customers who want and need to get their quality products to market first.We are currently looking for a qualified mature, aggressive, energetic and any candidates who are eager to learn to join our fast paced environment to be successful in thriving to meet the different needs of our demanding high tech customers. If you feel you meet the requirements please send us your resume to be reviewed.Job Description:- Has overall responsibility for all company activities.- Provides direction to all department managers- Responds to problems from department managers.- Ensures that all departments adhere to Quality Policy.- Makes all major financial decisions with assistance and advice as requested.- Provides recourse necessary for company functions.NORMAL JOB REQUIREMENTS:- Thorough knowledge of all facets of PC Board industry including financial, production and marketing departments- Effective management techniques as would be gained by a minimum of 5 years of high-level management experience.- Ability to communicate effectively at all levels.- BS in business administration desired but not required.All Qualified applicant will receive consideration for employment without regard to race. Color, religion, gender, national origin, age disability or veteran status.If you are interested and feel you meet our requirements please send us your resume for review. Walk-ins are welcome.We are located at 1401 Martin Ave, Santa Clara, CA 95050408-727-1418 Main408-727-1413 Fax",VP of Operations Manager Job in Santa Clara,Full Time,"Santa Clara, CA 95050",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/VP-of-Operations-Manager-Job-Santa-Clara-CA-US-166026156.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b62570be75b1b1a514d6262e6678d928
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Landscape Laborer, Denver, CO Metro Area.  Big Sky Renewal, Inc. 7915 East 40th Avenue Denver, CO 80207. Provide basic labor in landscaping maintenance and construction in residential & commercial settings including basic planting, fertilizer application, tree-staking, digging & clearing irrigation trenches, installation of mortar-less segmental concrete masonry blocks or stacked stone walls, loading & unloading of vehicles. Operate vehicles or power equipment such as mowers,  tractors, electric clippers, chain-saws, pruning saws, post pounders, wheel grinders and files, rototillers, line trimmers & push spreaders in a proper/safe manner. Use & maintain basic installation tools (shovel, spade, Maddox, digging bar, hand rake, wheelbarrow, lawn roller & grading rake). Must be able to reach overhead & work   in various positions including stooping, standing, bending over, sitting, kneeling and squatting for extend periods of time.  Must be able to lift min 50 lbs., ascend steps & ladders, lift, pull and push materials and equipment. Criminal background check & drug screen upon hire.  No min edu or exp req. Employer will provide daily transport to & from worksite. The employer will provide workers at no charge all tools, supplies & equipment required to perform the job. 15 temporary, full-time positions avail: Apr 15 – Nov 15, 2016. $13.64/hr. 40 hours per week. Mon – Fri. 6:30am – 3:30pm. Single workweek used for computing wages.  Bi-weekly pay. O/T may be avail/not guart’d at $20.46/hr. Employer will make all deductions from workers’ paycheck required by law. Transportation (including meals & to extent necessary, lodging) to place of employment provided, or costs to workers reimbursed, if worker completes half employment period. Return transportation provided if the worker completes employment period or is dismissed early by employer. Daily subsistence amount at least $12.09 per day during travel to maximum of $51.00 per day with receipts. Reimbursement for all visa, visa processing, crossing & related fees incurred by H2B employee    within 1st workweek. To apply, send resume/statement of interest with phone number, email address, and alternate contact method to workforce.development@denvergov.org, call 720-865-4800, or visit your nearest Colorado Dept. of Labor Workforce Center. Reference Job Order #s: 6477343 or 6395300.",Landscape Laborer Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80207",,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscape-Laborer-Job-Denver-CO-US-165809104.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=18,,,7b84f56cadf78d10f75e0f331568fe90
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:             PT GSE Automotive Fleet SupervisorDepartment:        GSEJob Summary:     The PT Automotive Fleet Supervisor is responsible for maintaining a safe, reliable, and cost-efficient fleet of vehicles to support the business. He/she ensures proper use and care of physical assets, helps to prevent equipment failures, controls costs, manages external vendor relationships, works closely with auto mechanics and internal customers, and performs regular equipment and facility audits. This position also supervises mechanics within the department.A primary responsibility of this position is to monitor fleet vehicle equipment maintenance. To do this, the PT Automotive Fleet Supervisor schedules Preventative Maintenance Inspections and reviews the results, monitors repairs, and performs vehicle audits to ensure mechanics adhere to safety, regulatory and appearance standards. This individual analyzes equipment or vehicle system failures to determine root causes and resolve problems, and plans and coordinates equipment repairs with internal and external groups (e.g., drivers, vendors). Another major area of responsibility is to maintain automotive cost effectiveness. Duties include reviewing equipment failures and component replacements to identify trends, and monitoring key expense indices (e.g., fuel, replacement parts, tires, labor hours, equipment, etc.) to identify and implement cost-saving strategies. The PT Automotive Fleet Supervisor also supports automotive safety and regulatory compliance by conducting facility audits, following up on issues, and coordinating safety and regulatory training. Vendor related duties include verifying external-vendor repairs, preparing repair orders and estimates, and performing on-site vendor inspections.Other DutiesEnsure adequate inventory levels (e.g., parts, tires, etc.) to support business processesWork with other groups to prevent, identify and resolve equipment and service problemsAdhere to purchasing limits, expense approval procedures, and equipment disposal guidelines to remain within cost planReview and approve automotive expensesDetermine employee training needs to produce continuous development plansProvide feedback and supportConduct performance evaluations and resolve individual and group performance issuesPreferred CompetenciesApplies legal, regulatory and safety compliance knowledge to reduce company riskApplies knowledge of mechanical fundamentals, maintenance, diagnosis, and repair to vehicle or aircraft fleet operationApplies an understanding of policies and procedures to situations and operations in a business areaApplies knowledge of company structure and operations to resolve problems, make decisions and achieve business objectivesBuilds labor relations with unionized employees, and addressing and resolving requests and situationsCoaches and develops others using career development processes and toolsManages equipment repair and oversees the correction of problems with tools, machinery and other standard technical equipmentManages inspections of buildings, grounds, equipment, supplies, and/or compliance documents to ensure safety, regulatory      compliance, prolonged service life, and appearanceManages physical assets (e.g., machinery, vehicles, equipment, supplies). Evaluates, obtains and allocates physical asset resources, maximizes their use and projects future asset needsManages and establishes working relationships with vendors (e.g., suppliers, consultants, contractors)",UPS Part-time Automotive Supervisor Job in Chelmsford,,"Chelmsford, MA 01824",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Part-time-Automotive-Supervisor-Job-CHELMSFORD-MA-US-164912511.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=19,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,5187504b268bed511e09d3a9d94722b8
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Workers 1st Shift Westby Hardwood Products, a world-class manufacturer of hardwood flooring, is seeking motivated, dependable production employees for several full-time positions. Qualified candidates will have a strong work ethic, positive attitude and ability to work effectively and efficiently in a team environment. 1st shift: 5 am - 4:00 pm, 4 days per week, starting wage $10.00 per hour. Plus attendance, safety and production bonuses. Benefits include paid holidays, health care, vacation, 401(k) with company match and advancement opportunity. Candidates should apply in person, Monday -Friday from 8:00 am to 4:30 pm at 105 Webster Street in Westby, WI or send a resume to employment@westbyhardwoodproducts.com EOE",Production Workers - st Shift Job in Westby,Full Time,"Westby, WI 54667",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Production-Workers-1st-Shift-Job-Westby-WI-US-165960191.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=17,,,ca6848648f9b6faea953646a1a3867a2
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary: Perform tasks related to maintaining and improving the campus grounds. Mow and trim facility grounds during the growing season. Leaf pickup in the fall. De-ice sidewalks in the winter. Must be able to endure extreme heat in the summer and cold winters.    Essential Functions:  Plant, trim, spray, mow, weed, fertilize, sweep, rake, cultivate, plant, dig, water, shovel snow, remove ice, spread salt and/or sand, and other related functions of a groundskeeper Operate various types of equipment including frontend loaders, power movers, saws, sprayers, weed eaters, hedge trimmers, blowers, hand pruners and pole straws Operate light or medium weight trucks Operate light or medium tractors and attachments used to maintain grounds as needed Prepare campus for special events Assist in snow removal when needed Cooperate with other people within the department and other department personnel in competing assigned tasks Display the necessary initiative and dependability to work alone or in groups Perform all duties in a safe and professional manner and in accordance with department policies and procedures Work special events on weekends as necessary Performs other job duties as assigned   Qualifications   Must be willing to perform a variety of tasks as assigned Must possess a working knowledge of gasoline powered landscape equipment (mowers, edgers, trimmers, chainsaw, etc) Valid Texas drivers license Must be able to lift or move heavy objects up to 80 lbs Must be able to stand and work as long as 12 hours in different positions Must be able to work outdoors and endure temperature and extreme weather   Additional Information:",Groundskeeper - Phoebe Services Job in Allentown,"Full Time, Employee","Allentown, PA 18104",,http://jobview.monster.com/Groundskeeper-Phoebe-Services-Job-Allentown-PA-US-165857470.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,d64cb2fa2c8a50668921cc15833e12b5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position provides supervision for Medivators TX maintenance department, buildings, facility equipment, maintenance/grounds in an efficient, safe and cost effective manner.Main ResponsibilitiesSite Maintenance• Provides leadership and direction for the Conroe maintenance department by developing effective associate training programs, automated PM tracking systems for critical manufacturing/shipping equipment and Key Performance Indicators (KPI) to track overall departmental performance.• Responsible for supporting and maintaining our regulatory compliance programs for all Local, State and Federal agencies and our facility maintenance related FDA requirements. • Provides leadership and support of Conroe’s safety program by participating in our monthly safety team meetings, coordinating facility safety audits and hazard assessments and supporting all safety improvement projects.• Conducts quarterly maintenance inspections of each Medivators facility with the relevant Site Manager and provides a summary of maintenance recommendations to the relevant Site Manager.• Supports the evaluation of the long-term facility infrastructure needs of the organization and the development the project execution plan for all major improvement projects. • Oversees the daily maintenance management for all Medivators buildings, which includes owned and leased properties. The maintenance program will include the interior and exterior upkeep, the mitigation of equipment breakdowns, a progressive preventive maintenance program and all contracted housekeeping activities.• Ensures that all major equipment and furnishings are maintained in a safe operable condition and are maintained in compliance with our ISO and cGMP regulations.• Supports securing major equipment bids and makes recommendations for purchase when replacement or new equipment is required, assists in preparation of cost estimates, scheduling installation activities, reviewing and preparing contracts and purchase requisitions for construction and renovation projects. Site Safety• Ensures that high standards of safety are developed, met, and maintained at Medivators facilities.• Arranges and coordinates annual fire safety inspections with local fire departments. Follows up on any deficiencies or recommendations.• Arranges and coordinates the internal safety inspections of Medivators facilities conducted by the Operations Manager. Follows up on deficiencies and recommendations.• Participates in the process and function of the safety committee as the safety representative. Safety and Maintenance Training• May arrange for or provide training for personnel as it relates to the safety and maintenance needs of Medivators facilities. May attend training programs relevant to the duties and responsibilities of this position.• Provides staff training in a variety of safety and maintenance topics including the effective utilization of the maintenance logs, completion of routine maintenance specific to the facility, equipment operations.• Attends and participates in training opportunities and seminars relevant to this position. Additional Responsibilities• Participates in the development of policies and procedures related to maintenance and safety as an ad hoc member off the Medivators management team.• Participates in annual budget preparation as it relates to safety and maintenance of facilities, ground, and equipment.• Serves as a member of other relevant Medivators committees as assigned.• Completes other assignments as deemed appropriate by the Operations Manager.Qualifications• High School Diploma or GED required; Completion of Technical Program or Technical Certification strongly preferred; BA or BS in related field preferred.• Five years of experience working in a manufacturing environment; Two to Four years leadership experience. Responsibility in an industrial or regulated facility environment is preferred.• Must have advanced knowledge of basic plumbing, electrical, carpentry, mechanical and HVAC principles and be competent in building system operations and be able to train/develop departmental employees.• Must have knowledge in the principles of project management, construction and renovation projects.• Experience in estimation maintenance and repair costs is considered an asset.• Excellent verbal and written communication skills and ability to interface with internal and external customers.• Able to manage Microsoft Office software such as XL, Word, Outlook, Power Point.• Proactive and Dynamic with good communication skills, both written and verbal.• Able to manage ADP software and Mainsaver.",Maintenance Supervisor Job in Conroe,Full Time Employee,"Conroe, TX 77303",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Conroe-TX-US-165554116.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=13,"50,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Installation/Maintenance/Repair,607a5eb06b948b8875052ee9e4afe360
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Description: Installs, repairs, and services propane gas appliances such as gas logs and wall heaters.Installs gas lines by trenching or shoveling.Installs above ground and below ground propane tanks.Exhibits excellent customer service and ensures customer billing information is correct.Will also perform manual labor such as lawn mowing, cleaning, painting, etc. in off seasons. Requirements:CDL Hazmat EndorsementTechnical knowledge of propane tank installation and repair.Ability to work in small spaces such as basements and crawl spaces.Must be able to stoop, squat, bend, crawl, twist, climb, and use range of mobility frequently.Must have a clean driving record and valid NC driver’s license",Propane Service Technician Job in Winston-Salem,Full Time,"Winston-Salem, NC 27127",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Propane-Service-Technician-Job-Winston-Salem-NC-US-163698339.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),26e777676abc727b3c70917349733e83
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Position Summary Maintains Solar Cell and Module production line equipment repair and maintenance in accordance with company and factory policies and procedures. Ensures highest possible uptime and lowest cost of operation achieved from all production line equipment in support of production lines running on 7 day X 24 hour operation to meet or exceed all production safety, output, yield, customer delivery, cost, and product quality/reliability targets. Essential Functions:-       Maintains Solar Cell and Module production line equipment repair and maintenance in accordance with company and factory policies and procedures. -       Performs the maintenance and preventative maintenance care of all production line processing tools.-       Generates preventive and corrective maintenance procedures across all process tools.-       Develops schedule, frequency, resource task lists for all preventative maintenance to minimize production loss time and maximize preventative maintenance effectiveness.-       Responsible to meet or exceed all production line equipment performance targets including; but not limited to, uptime, MTTR, MTBF, equipment Overall Operational Efficiency (OEE), and operating cost.-       Responsible for equipment maintenance related quality control and/or quality improvements.-       Writes production line equipment corrective maintenance troubleshooting guides and procedures.-       Supports maintenance portion of any production line equipment startups, shutdowns, and upgrades. -       Drives overall cost of ownership maintenance improvement methodologies for equipment. -       Manages equipment consumables, spares, and related support services for assigned tools.-       Ensures a clean and safe maintenance work areas using the 5S manufacturing methodology.-       Establishes and reports on equipment performance metrics, spares and consumable usage, and component life times on assigned tools.-       Maintains accurate records and logs on all equipment maintenance activities.-       Ensures good communication between and across all maintenance shifts and/or days of the week.-       Works with tool supplier on maintenance training and certification procedures or specifications. Education and experience: -       High school diploma required. 2 year technical degree preferred. -       Minimum of 5 years of experience in relevant manufacturing equipment maintenance.-       Prefer experience in silicon solar or semiconductor equipment applications, such as chemical handling, chemical cleans, diffusion, vacuum systems, PECVD, printing, plasma etch, plating, string/tab, buss attach, EVA layup, glass clean, junction box attach, taping, frame attach, module test/sorting.-       Experience with developing and producing maintenance specifications and procedures.-       EMT, ERT, Hazmat training or other relevant experience a plus.    Skills and Abilities:-       Excellent reading, writing, arithmetic, and communication skills required. -       Strong leadership traits and sense of ownership. Response rapidly to trouble calls.-       Equipment main system, sub-system, and component level troubleshooting ability.-       Able to read and interpret mechanical and electrical drawings and diagrams.-       Proficient with software applications such as Microsoft Office and Microsoft Project.-       Strong problem-solving skills and ability to creatively develop and implement maintenance solutions to improve equipment performance.-       Ability to multi-task as well as manage daily, weekly, and monthly required maintenance performance targets or deliverables effectively.-       Creates an environment of high productivity and enthusiasm across all shift team members to excel or exceed operation or company specified targets.-       Able to work with minimal supervision or guidance.",Production Equipment Maintenance Technician Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX 78235",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Equipment-Maintenance-Technician-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166078143.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5d5089420c0126d72a86b0d73ab011df
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark  Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary:  The purpose of this job is to help ensure guest satisfaction by maintaining all dishes, pots, pans, silverware, glasses, equipment, and kitchen utensils in a clean and sanitized condition.  In addition, this job requires that the employee keep the dishwashing machine station, three compartment sink, and related areas clean.   Tasks & Responsibilities: Able to follow directions Work in an environment that at times can be hot and humid Maintain a neat and orderly work station Know and comply with all company policies and procedures regarding safety, security, emergencies and energy Report to work on time and in complete uniform Other duties as assigned Qualifications   Minimum of one year experience Understanding of basic kitchen sanitation Must be able to work holidays, weekends, and varied shifts Must be able to perform repetitive tasks and stand for extended periods of time   Additional Information:",General Utility Worker - CISCO Food Foundry SJ- Job in San Jose,"Part Time, Employee","San Jose, CA 95134",,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Utility-Worker-CISCO-Food-Foundry-SJ-17-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-165076824.aspx?mescoid=5100985001001&jobPosition=17,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,98505a7615b391310b23083a8729bcfa
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"AUTOMOTIVE JOURNEYMAN TECHNICIANSKirkwood(63122) and Maplewood(63143) locations.Dean Team is hiring for F/T Experienced Journeyman Technician, VOLKSWAGEN or VOLVO experience is a plus!Candidate must be well rounded in all areas of automotive service including electrical, air conditioning, drivability, suspension, steering, maintenance and engine repair. Must have own tools, a positive attitude and good communication skills. Reliability is a must. Will need to be ASE certified and have Missouri State inspectors license.Medical, dental, 401K, paid vacation.",Automobile Mechanic/Technician Job in St Louis,Full Time,"St Louis, MO",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automobile-Mechanic-Technician-Job-St-Louis-MO-US-163795855.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cae9e3aa2ecb0abd634f76b024f8a50b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Worker, Schererville, IN Look to Spartan If you’re ready for a rewarding job in manufacturing and logistics, you’ll find it at Spartan. We’ll match you with the perfect assignment, with great potential for a long-term position. Contact Spartan today. We’re looking for people just like you. Spartan is currently hiring a Production Worker in Schererville, IN at a reputable nationally known company.  Job DescriptionProduction workers will follow written and verbal instructions to cut, drill, bolt, rivet, caulk, install, assemble and fabricate working with aluminum, steel, wood, rubber, etc. for truck parts.Perform welding, minor repair painting and a variety of van body repair operations such as waterproofing seamsApplying decals on trailer and truck van bodiesInstall undercarriage of van bodies and trailers which my consist of ramps and trolleysPerform conversion operations of truck chassisExamine products at various stages of production to verify quality Provide solutions for work delays and errors in performing all assembly operations Job Requirements •       Ability to use hand and power tools including welding, diagnostic, laminating and masking equipment as well as brazing/cutting tools, blow torch, masking equipment and forklifts and hoists•       Ability to read and comprehend technical manuals•       Excellent verbal communication skills•       Steel Toe Boots•       Ability to lift 15-45lbs•       Willing to submit to a criminal background check and drug screen•       Must have reliable transportation  Ideal Candidates•     Relevant experience preferred •     Committed to safety at all times •     Excellent attendance  Pay Rate: $11 hourHours: 1st Shift Monday – Thursday 6:30am-4:30pm How To ApplyClick APPLY Above then call the office to schedule an appointment at 219-947-9666 We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law. We may conduct a formal criminal background check and drug screen prior to placement. Ask us how YOU can receive text messages for jobs you may be interested in!  TrueBlue Companies·       Centerline - Professional Truck Drivers·       CLP - General and Skilled Construction·       Labor Ready - General Labor·       PlaneTechs - Aviation Manufacturing and Maintenance ·       Spartan - Manufacturing and Logistics·       TransTechs - Skilled Diesel Mechanics  ",Production Worker Job in Schererville,Full Time Employee,"Schererville, IN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Worker-Job-Schererville-IN-US-165912742.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=5,11.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,387f45b1c38a15205842c67f89575c53
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jostens is currently looking for an Electrician at our Denton, TX facility. Join our team today!GENERAL DESCRIPTION OR PURPOSE OF JOB:  Maintain all aspects of physical plant, including manufacturing equipment, HVAC systems, electrical distribution system, compressed air, and other electrical and mechanical systems.  Troubleshoot and repair manufacturing equipment including diagnostics of electrical and mechanical operating systems. Install conduit, wiring and terminations for new electrical services.  Perform comprehensive preventive and predictive maintenance for all plant equipment and operations.  Respond proactively to CMMS work requests and complete repairs or improvements in timely, safe, and professional manner. Required: Job Requirements:·         Two (2) year technical degree or equivalent experience·         Two (2) years or more multi-craft electrical, mechanical experience in an industrial manufacturing environment.·         Must possess ability to read and interpret electrical and mechanical schematics.·         Must possess strong troubleshooting and diagnostic skills.·         Strong computer skills and knowledge of tablets required.·         Knowledge of electrical testing and diagnostic equipment.·         Ability to complete wiring circuits for both low voltage and 480 volt, 3 phase systems.·         Knowledge of electrical / electronic systems and components including controllers, relays, timers, servo motors, circuit boards, etc.·         Service oriented disposition with strong focus on internal customers.·         Understand and comply with OSHA and NFPA 70E regulations.·         Understand and interpret NEC code.·         Knowledge of PLC’s a plus.·         Knowledge of CMMS and EMS a plus.·         Company provided power tools with employee purchased hand tools·         Periodically work in hot and dirty environment inside and outside the plant·         Occasional lifting of weights over 50 lbs is required·         Up to 20 hours overtime per week required during peak season·         Must be able to wear and use necessary protective clothing and/or equipment·         Must maintain equipment and area in a clean, safe condition Typical/expected % of overnight travel:   ABOUT JOSTENS   Celebrating 118 years of business, Jostens has been a part of local communities, working with K-12 schools, colleges and universities, teams and affiliation groups. Representatives from Jostens touch thousands of schools and groups every day, working to make a difference with products and services that recognize accomplishments and help people tell their stories. These products, along with resources for educators, yearbook curriculum and services to help motivate and inspire like Jostens Renaissance® and Commitment to Graduate (C2G) are all designed to contribute to a positive and rewarding school experience. As a household name and leading brand in our market, we are passionate about being the most trusted partner in celebrating moments that matter. We are a mid-size company with a small company feel, allowing us to move fast and explore innovative ideas. At Jostens, we help people capture, celebrate and inspire through their stories and accomplishments with uniquely customized and personalized products for students and families, educators and schools, teams, and world class athletes and their fans.  WHY JOSTENS?  Jostens is comprised of dynamic teams of individuals who support the mission of schools, groups and teams by passionately helping people express themselves, celebrate experiences and traditions, recognize achievements and share their stories.   We value innovation, integrity, diversity and exceptional performance and want to make that apparent in every experience we deliver. Jostens is committed to attracting and retaining the brightest and most talented individuals to our company by offering competitive compensation, a progressive and nurturing culture and growth potential.  In addition to our traditional benefit offerings, Jostens offers charitable gift matching programs for employees, scholarships and charitable contributions to the communities we serve.  Employees also enjoy tuition reimbursement benefits, progressive career planning as well as comprehensive medical benefits and a 401K matching program.  Jostens supports and promotes healthy living through education and incentive programs.  Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and Individuals with Disabilities. Jostens participates in the E-Verify process.",Electrician Job in Denton,Full Time,"Denton, TX 76201",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrician-Job-Denton-TX-US-163686200.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=11,"41,600.00 - 54,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),0eea4205b2be5a9ac40b2577d625f728
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"East Bay Municipal Utility DistrictMachining and Maintenance Worker III$71,988 - $83,340Excellent benefits and retirementMachining and Maintenance Worker III (MMW III) is the skilled sub-journey classification in the Machining and Maintenance Worker series at the East Bay Municipal Utility District (EBMUD). Individuals in the MMW III class perform more specialized mechanical maintenance and repair, and machine tooling operations requiring greater skills, more precision, a higher degree of trade knowledge, and with greater independence of action.In addition to developing journey level skill in maintenance, repair and machine tooling operations, the MMW III will typically perform a variety of mechanical maintenance and repair work on water treatment and distribution plant equipment in the shop and field locations. Every employee adds value to the EBMUD team as they are committed to responsible stewardship of our resources. The employee standard is to act with integrity, treat others with respect, and value a teamwork culture while fulfilling EBMUD's mission to provide reliable, high quality water and wastewater services at fair rates. Competitive candidates will share these values and also have:·        Strong math and mechanical skills·        Strong study habits and discipline to successfully advance to the journey level·        Strong ability to work from drawings, designs and sketches·        Strong ability to maintain records and reports as it pertains to work assignments·        Good work ethics and the ability to communicate effectively; works well with diverse groupsRequires completion of the twelfth grade or its equivalent and 24 months experience of machining and maintenance work.  Completion of an accredited community college or comparable certificate program in machine tool technology or closely related field, acceptable to the District may be substituted for the required 12 months of experience.Apply online at www.ebmud.com by 4:30 p.m., Friday, April 15, 2016.EBMUDRecruitment and Classification Divisionwww.ebmud.comEBMUD is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",Machining and Maintenance Worker III Job in Oakland,Full Time,"Oakland, CA 94607",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Machining-Maintenance-Worker-III-Job-Oakland-CA-US-165365704.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=2,"71,988.00 - 83,340.00 $ /yearExcellent benefits and retirement",Experienced (Non-Manager),93a279191ffce1909bef071447fcaf54
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: We are the maker, marketer and distributor of branded food products that have been American favorites for decades. Our employees located in more than 20 offices and plants across North America rally around our mission, Reinvigorating Iconic Brands. We work to transform our brands to be more profitable for our customers and more enjoyable for our consumers.   At Pinnacle Foods, every employee has the opportunity to make an impact—from marketing and research & development, to manufacturing, finance and sales—each function plays a critical role in our success. By living our values of trust, candor and ownership we create great relationships that help us deliver results and drive meaningful change for our brands and business.   SCOPE OF POSITION : Responsible for inspection of potato chips and ensuring adequate flow of product into packaging area. Monitor and document chip waste data, identify actions to bring waste under target. This position will be the back up to the fry room operator positon.   ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Essential duties and responsibilities include the following; other duties may be assigned. Visually inspects and discards unacceptable product and foreign material. Ensures product flow is adequate for rate of production. Communicates frequently with packaging, fryer room and quality assurance teams. Monitors optical sorter performance by grading quality chips. Weighs and documents waste in the factory, inspection tables and floor waste. Trigger correction action when waste > target, identify improvement action plans validated by quality, maintenance and operations department. Follows all established Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP’s). Keeps work station clean and orderly. Immediately notifies Supervisor or Team Lead of any problems.   SKILLS & EXPERIENCE: Experience working in food processing facility preferred. Ability to work in a fast paced environment under constant pressure of production line environment.   Able to track and monitor data, identify corrective and/or improvement actions. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds.         Pinnacle Foods is an Affirmative Action/EEO Employer – qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to protected veteran or disability status, race/color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or any other legally protected basis.            ",Waste Mgmt Tech/Inspector nd shift (Tim's Cascade Snacks,Full Time Employee,"Algona, WA",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Waste-Mgmt-Tech-Inspector-2nd-shift-Tim's-Cascade-Snacks-Algona-WA-Job-Algona-WA-US-165389015.aspx?mescoid=5100986001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,9146eb52c4508e3b3f7ac9f5024ff9c5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mechanic wanted. A family owned and operated, extremely busy ATV and Marine Dealership In Petaluma is looking for a Mechanic to help with our growing business. In a nut shell, Marine Unlimited Inc. has a huge service department, parts department, large store front and sells new/used ATV's, Side by Sides and boats.Marine Unlimited Inc is looking for a team player who is self-motivated, energetic, responsible, reliable, organized and willing to grow in knowledge.Must work well under pressure.Be able to perform complete engine service on all makes of boats and or ATV's, including ski boats, outboard engines, stern drives, etc.Trailer brakes and lightsTune-upsMisc. Electronics and parts installAbility to multi-taskSelf-motivated enthusiastic presenceHours = Tuesday - SaturdayPlease fax Resume to 707-762-1558Job Type: Full-timewww.marineunlimited.net email = rhonda@marineunlimited.net",MECHANICAL TECHNICIAN Job in Petaluma,Full Time,"Petaluma, CA 94952",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/MECHANICAL-TECHNICIAN-Job-PETALUMA-CA-US-164381455.aspx?mescoid=1700219001001&jobPosition=17,,Entry Level,27ea4c08b5f9097a9b9396f6fa00b841
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsMSS is a Security Integrator offering solutions in Access Control, Digital Surveillance and Intrusion Detection.Responsibilities• Install new equipment• Maintain equipment• Repair equipment• Test equipment and diagnose problems• Train users on safe and effective use of equipment• Cut in StrikesAs a Security Installer, you receive on-the-job training through shadowing senior technicians. We will also sponsor the pursuit of relevant certifications, if applicable. Education• High School Diploma (or equivalent)Qualifications• Burglar Alarm Certification (preferred but not required)Skills• Excellent communication skills• Good manual dexterity• Reliable at all times• Solves problems effectively• Works well with others• Solves problems efficientlyCompensation$15-$25+ per hourPosition TypePart-Time, 35 hours / per weekBenefitsHealth & Dental Options, Simple IRA, Vacation,",Security Installer Job in Lewis Center,Part Time,"Lewis Center, OH 43035",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Security-Installer-Job-Lewis-Center-OH-US-165272587.aspx?mescoid=4900864001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),862a593c7d26151c0870672554ab05a0
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities The Imaging Service Engineer II works independently on a regular basis, performing assigned maintenance, installation, repairs, adjustments, and calibrations of imaging equipment in assigned geography. Performs administrative functions as assigned by the Imaging Services Director. Adheres to instructions and corporate policies, and demonstrates professionalism with integrity in all interactions with customers and staff.   Responsibilities include: Works closely with management and technical staff. Provides technical support (via telephone or on-site) to other engineers. Provides alternate solutions and seeks concurrence from management prior to implementation. Provides technical training to other Imaging Services Engineers as appropriate. Works with sales and service representatives of imaging equipment. Services imaging equipment in assigned geography which may include any of following modalities: conventional x-ray, R&F, tomography, mammography, ultrasound, CT, MRI, IVR labs, nuclear medicine or linear accelerators.   Performs assigned planned maintenance, installation, repairs, adjustments, calibrations and safety testing on a broad range of imaging equipment. Performs incoming inspections, equipment quality control, testing, calibration and image evaluation of equipment according to manufactures specifications and other established guidelines. Services networked equipment and troubleshoots the root cause of problems. Provides strong verbal/written communications consistent with assigned tasks. Performs inspections, quality control and image evaluations. Makes decisions based on clear instructions and operational rules and procedures. Shows initiative, follows established procedures, and works in a safe manner. Assists in decisions related to more complex issues. Monitors and maintains quality control of services provided by outside vendors. Adheres to performance metrics of PM completion, call closure, parts returns, ETTR and others as assigned. Maintains timely, accurate and thorough documentation required by management, as outlined in current policies and procedures. Demonstrates initiative and concern for planning, time utilization and cost containment.   Qualifications   Associate’s degree in electronic technology, or engineering preferred. Minimum of 3 years experience in the repair and maintenance of imaging equipment. An equivalent combination of education and experience may be substituted. Proficient in all skills required for an ISE I.   Strong knowledge of radiology physics, digital technology, and mechanics. Strong knowledge of laws and regulations pertaining to imaging equipment, radiation safety and protection practices. Broad knowledge of imaging performance based on regulations, manufacturing practices and institutional requirements. General knowledge of networked equipment. Well-developed oral and written communication skills. Organizational Skills. Computer Skills (MS Word, Excel, Outlook required). Analytical Skills.   Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-03-21",Imaging Service Engineer II - Brownsville,"Full Time, Employee","Brownsville, TX 78520",,http://jobview.monster.com/Imaging-Service-Engineer-II-Brownsville-TX-Job-Brownsville-TX-US-165718756.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,81a70fc5e9de4efb78333e83e359621e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Apprentice Flexographic Press Operator Salary: Up To $20/HourThis well-established and growing Hoffman Estates area industrial manufacturing company is rapidly expanding and seeking experienced Flexographic Press Operators for 12 hour rotating day (6am-6pm) or night (6pm-6am) shifts. Some flexibility with hours is available.Apprentice Flexographic Press Operator primary responsibilities:mount plates, formulate/ mix inks and set up/ operate Mark Andy multi-color press machines to print labels of the highest quality standards work with ink pumps, cold foil printing and multi-web constructions maintain a clean, well-organized and safe work area accurately document press logs and color formulas operate portable Corona treaters and stacker units collaborate with inventory control efforts perform 1st piece inspectionsApprentice Flexographic Operator qualifications:1-3 years of Flexographic Press Machine Operation experience is required; experience working with Mark Andy presses is a HUGE PLUS ability to work with die cutting, 4-color presses, peel and seal technology, hot stamping, two-sided printing, plow folding, rotary screen printing and laminating materials knowledge of UV inks, WB inks, solvent ink systems interest in learning new processes and technologies reliable work ethics and attendance meticulous attention to details excellent color visionApprentice Flexographic Press OperatorEmail carmi@selectadvantage.com your Word formatted resume and daytime phone number for immediate consideration. Your personal information and resume will remain completely confidential. No Phone Calls Please. Qualified Apprentice Flexographic Press Operator candidates will be contacted.  ",Apprentice Flexographic Press Operators *** To $/Hour ***  Hour Day or Night Shifts Job in Hoffman Estates,Full Time,"Hoffman Estates, IL 60169",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Apprentice-Flexographic-Press-Operators-To-20-Hour-12-Hour-Day-or-Night-Shifts-Job-Hoffman-Estates-IL-US-166035087.aspx?mescoid=5100958001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),76fd40e7e93220b0360a8cda6d33e496
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:02:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"McNichols Company is North America's leading supplier and fabricator of metal, expanded, wire mesh, architectural metals and a variety of gratings products. Founded in 1952 by the late Robert L. McNichols, the company was established on his Christian values, high ethical standards and strong commitment to customer satisfaction. With metals service centers strategically placed from coast-to-coast, McNichols has a dedicated staff and communication network in place that can supply worldwide service. We have an exciting opportunity for an articulate, creative and enthusiastic team player to join our team as a Welding and Fabrication Associate. We have an exciting opportunity for an articulate, creative and enthusiastic team player to join our team as a Welding and Fabrication Associate. We are seeking an experienced Welder/Fabricator with strong skills in both MIG and TIG welding, also with experience with shearing and sawing. Must be able to read blueprints, measure, cut, and square up parts prior to welding. Welding and Fabrication Associate (OSS2) Key Responsibilities: Metal Fabrication which includes Welding, Shearing and SawingReading and interpreting Blueprints, shop and design drawingsProcessing all incoming material orders including, scanning barcodes and locations, storing items in warehouse, downloading scanned information, investigating and resolving all material discrepancies and, closing out the order.Loading and Handling material to and from the racks.Processing material retrieval orders including pulling the items, verifying item, closing services, manifesting all orders, bundling all orders and preparing for shipment to customer.Processing all internal moves including pulling material from one location and storing it in another location, investigating all discrepancies and closing all work orders.Process all required material, verifying it for accuracy, preparing it for shipping, investigating and resolving all discrepancies and closing all work orders.Research and resolve exceptions encountered during above processes and communicate difficult issues or problems to manager.Prepare and process all paperwork necessary to accomplish the above processes.Inspect and maintain all equipment including, scanners, work station equipment, ladders, etc.Responsible for utilizing our Company proprietary software programs to collect requests and complete work orders.Observe safety procedures and report any safety issues.Perform other duties as assigned. Qualifications/ Ideal candidate profile: 4 years past warehouse experience in a service industry and a team focused environment focusing on:Inventory Control - Cycle Counting & Physical InventoryIndustrial forklift OperationIndustrial Crane OperationHand tools knowledge of all typesWelding, shearing, sawingMeasuring devicesNaamm MBG 533.09 Welding qualification for fabrication of steel, stainless steel and aluminum bar grating.Industry relevant fabrication experience (welding, sawing and shearing)Able to work in a physically demanding environment which includes climbing stairs, lifting material weighing between 40-60 pounds.Experience in working in shipping and receiving.Strong attention to detail and accuracy.Ability to adhere to and enforce all security procedures.Ability to work in a production oriented environment and perform against established performance standards.Basic computer skillsAbility to read, write and understand EnglishAbility to read and interpret Blueprints, shop and design drawingsWorking knowledge of basic mathExcellent communication skills, both verbal and written.Ability to prioritize, organize and multi task.Experience in dealing with ISO 9001:2008High School diploma or equivalent.Must be able to work overtime as required. The candidate will be a self-motivated team player with a determined and mature approach. McNichols offers an extensive benefits package",Welding and Fabrication Associate (OSS) Job in New Brunswick,"Full Time, Employee","New Brunswick, NJ",Metals and MineralsManufacturing - OtherArchitectural and Design Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Welding-Fabrication-Associate-OSS2-Job-New-Brunswick-NJ-US-166022095.aspx?mescoid=5100920001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,239b86ee38e6c7e8ce91dd2c2acff790
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Managerfor a mid size fan company wanted. Must be knowledgeable in metal working, welding, powder coating, machining, with heavy emphasis on scheduling jobs through Mapics ERP software. Must be able to work with sales, engineering, and inventory control to  build a world class product and ship it on time. American Coolair is an 88 year old family corporation in Jacksonville, Florida. We design and build fans for the agricultural, commercial, and industrial markets. We ship these products around the world. We are a profit sharing company, providing a 401K plan, cash bonus, and a long term profit sharing plan. We provide several health plans and make a generous contribution to each. Please send your resume with your salary requirements to:resumes@coolair.com ",Production Manager Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32205",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-165704585.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=14,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),583f6d005fe291d00609abcdcba9ede3
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Animal Exclusion Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and provide exclusion and animal-control services as outlined in job orders. This will include setting traps, working on roofs using a safety harness, and removing wildlife from homes. As you will also seal entry points to prevent animals from re-entering residences, a background in the construction trades (particularly roofing and carpentry) would be ideal. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Performs exclusion services and animal removal at customer locations according to company policy and in compliance with regulatory requirements. Applies company standards in servicing customer locations. Responds to customer inquiries; solicits new business; and adheres to required safety regulations. Responsibilities 1. Performs exclusion services and animal removal at customer locations according to company policy and in compliance with regulatory requirements. 2. Sets up and builds exclusion traps, cuts flashing and forms hardware cloth to specifications. 3. Works in a safety harness from roof tops as needed in the performance of exclusion services and wildlife removal. 4. Removes animals trapped in exclusion devices according to company policy and in compliance with regulatory requirements. 5. Drives company vehicle to customer locations. Maintains safe driving record. 6. Maintains service equipment and vehicle in clean and proper operating condition. 7. Responds to phone and in-person service call requests on a timely basis. 8. Contacts customer to confirm scheduled services. 9. Assists in current and/or potential company sales through contact on work related project. 10. Trains and coaches other associates. 11. Maintains knowledge of federal, state and local regulations regarding exclusion and removal work. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED). • Three to six months related exclusion experience and/or training including ladder and/or roof and harness work. • Six months experience utilizing basic hand tools, small power tools, & related equipment. • Licensing and certification as required by federal, state, and local law. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend instructions, correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Mechanical and carpentry skills • Ability to add, to subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintain a valid driver’s license. • Ability to read, to comprehend, and execute safety procedures and instruction labels. • Ability to carry out instructions in written, oral, or diagrammatic form. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Animal Exclusion Technician – Field Service Rep Entry Level Job in Salinas,"Full Time, Employee","Salinas, CA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Animal-Exclusion-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Salinas-CA-US-165107237.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,2b94782133667f157acb9e96b024203c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Plastics Engineer - Lamination The Colonial Group specializes in the placement of outstanding talent in the chemical, mineral processing, general manufacturing, and CPG industries.  Our clients understand our decades of industry experience give us unique insight and access to top talent at all levels.  We are a nationally recognized, award-winning firm (Top 5%), dedicated to helping both clients and candidates form a mutually beneficial relationship.Our client is seeking a highly skilled Plastics Engineer to provide leadership in designing and developing composite materials, including reinforces plastic fabrication processes. If you are a committed and driven manufacturing professional who is ready to move their career to the next level with a challenging assignment, this may be an opportunity for you.Requisites ·         Bachelor of Science degree in Plastics, Composites, Polymer Engineering, or Mechanical Engineering, and a Master's degree is a plus.   ·         10+ years of experience in plastics product design, plastics processing, and program management of products made from thermoplastics, along with thermoset and composite materials and processes.·         Experience with the full spectrum of thermoplastics, from commodity grades to specialized engineering grades, as well as reinforcers, thermosets and elastomers.·         Working knowledge of Mold Flow, Microsoft Office Software, and Project Management tools.   Responsibilities·         Responsible for designing and developing composite materials and other goods made with plastic and fiberglass, including reinforced plastic fabrication processes.·         Create specifications for composite sheet manufacturing, establish manufacturing standards, and evaluate existing and new machinery to produce desired products. ·         Use appropriate analytical and test methods in designing products, selecting appropriate manufacturing materials and processes, and writing test plans to ensure that the product meets or exceeds customer's requirements.  ·         Research and develop new manufacturing processes, and create and improve extrusion machinery.·         Monitor all manufacturing processes and maintain optimization of all equipment and provide support to developing an ISO structure. ·         Ensure quality output of composite materials, along with developing and designing new materials.·         Interact with customers, suppliers, and internal resources.·         Indentify and review materials for improved performance but yet  maintain product quality.·         Perform required tests and validate all manufacturing process and analyze all customer requirements.·         Design necessary components. ·         Create new reports and verifications.·         Manage timelines for design, fabrication, and qualification of plastic/composite products.·         Analyze moldflow, part advisor analysis, finite element analysis, and stress/fatigue analysis on plastics.",Plastics Engineer Job in Pittsburgh,Full Time,"Pittsburgh, PA",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/Plastics-Engineer-Job-Pittsburgh-PA-US-165985216.aspx?mescoid=1700183001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f6d044d51a9da37b2b3f9e98d06737d0
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"MAINTENANCE GUN CLUB HELP General duties, landscaping and maintenance. Must have mechanical ability. Full time. Advancement possible. Leo at PPGC 683-4420",Maintenance Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,80903,Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Maintenance-Job-US-165786265.aspx?ch=newscols&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,,3ef94069ee4fc58d8dcaa32f7e1ad93a
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance TechniciansWe are currently accepting applications, for full time Maintenance Technicians at our Navarre, Ohio automated food production facility. Positions offers a 4-day work week with a full benefit package plus paid vacation, 9 paid holidays per year, funeral leave and a 401K.Maintenance Technicians must possess basic machining skills & knowledge in industrial electrical control wiring and troubleshooting, hydraulics, pneumatics, light industrial machines for food production and packaging equipment, fabrication and welding.Starting wage is negotiable.Apply online or in person:Monday thru Friday 8 - 11:30 am & 1 – 4 pmNickles Bakery, Inc. 15 N. Main St. Navarre, Ohio 44662EOE /Disabled/Vet",Maintenance Technician Job in Navarre,Full Time Employee,"Navarre, OH 44662",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Navarre-OH-US-165263345.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,806abccec5ab39219a3e0f7df3a9b262
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionQuad/Graphics is seeking a Finishing Electrical Mechanical Technician, responsible for performing skilled mechanical and electrical maintenance work including repair, inspection, modification and improvement of Finishing equipment. This position will work nights, 7:00pm – 7:00am and be available to work a rotating shift of 4 days on / 3 days off including weekends and holidays. Must be available to train on days for up to three months. The Electrical Mechanical Technician will communicate thoroughly with production and maintenance staff; make recommendations for creating new procedures and improving existing procedures. QualificationsMust be a self-starter capable of working independently and prioritizing workload based on production needs. Must be willing to work flexible hours and work overtime as needed.The ideal candidate will have a mechanical/electrical background and be familiar with Industrial ink-jet printers and 110/220/480v power. Must have the ability to systematically solve problems; experience with industrial preventative maintenance, Servo Drive and basic computer skills. Knowledge of standard machine shop equipment: mill, lathe, welding, plumbing etc. is preferred. Allen Bradley PLC experience a plus. Must have own hand tools. Willingness to work 12 hour shifts rotating days, including weekends and holidays. Education and/or Experience: Technical degree in Mechanical/Electrical or Industrial Maintenance preferred but not required. 3-5 years related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience required. Computer literate, Microsoft Outlook and Excel a plus.Additional Company InformationWe offer excellent benefits to eligible employees, including 401(k), holidays, vacations and more. EOE Minorities/Females/Protected Veterans/DisabledDrug Free Workplace",Electrical Mechanical Technician Job in Bolingbrook,Full Time,"Bolingbrook, IL 60440",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrical-Mechanical-Technician-Job-Bolingbrook-IL-US-163656241.aspx?mescoid=1700215001001&jobPosition=14,,,35e4c45a172fcb23fd34c30966fca299
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Termite Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-termite treatments as outlined in job orders. This will often require that you enter crawl spaces, attics, and other confined spaces to ensure complete coverage. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company products to residential structures according to work orders and as needed based on service requests; completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Responsibilities • Prepares job sites for termiticide treatment. • Applies termiticides to residential structures according to work order specifications, safety procedures, and label instructions. • Verifies that job specifications are appropriate for work orders. • Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. • Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. • Completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintain licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintain valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Termite Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Dothan,"Full Time, Employee","Dothan, AL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Termite-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Dothan-AL-US-165728097.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=7,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,67c7107ddd82e18470bcc460be5ac3c1
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities   Repairs ultrasound probes to like new status. Works with small and intricate parts to restore them to working condition. Works with plastic compounds to restore parts. Troubleshoots ultrasound probes and other technology to restore it to working condition. Troubleshoots mechanical assemblies and restores to like new status. Performs basic solder for re-termination of wire. Ability to think creatively to find repair solutions.      Operational Quality   Ensures compliance with quality policies and all ISO registration requirements.     Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities   Understanding of mechanical assemblies is required. Working knowledge of plastic compounds is a plus. Ability to perform basic soldering is a plus. Qualifications   Proficiency with Microsoft Office™ word processing, spreadsheet, and database programs is required. Understanding of mechanical assemblies is required. Working knowledge of plastic compounds is a plus. Ability to perform basic soldering is a plus.    Additional Information:",Probe Technician - Charlotte,"Full Time, Employee","Charlotte, NC 28269",,http://jobview.monster.com/Probe-Technician-Charlotte-NC-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-165098634.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f5e97a3a3d77b38b840f238ab4fb3125
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position: Maintenance MechanicLocation: San Jose, CA 95116Duration: 12 Months with higher extension possibilities Position Description:·         In your role as a Maintenance Mechanic you will be a part of a team in a collaborative culture, focused on strengthening our future by: -Providing emergency/unscheduled repairs of production equipment during production. -Performing scheduled maintenance repairs of production equipment including replacing failed components such as bearings, motors, starters, solenoids, etc. -Providing preventative maintenance, equipment setup and change over for production use. -Identifying and diagnosing problems as well as replacing or repairing parts. -Adjusting functional parts of devices and control instruments. -Dismantling defective machines and equipment and installs new or repaired parts, following specifications and blueprints, using precision measuring instruments and hand tools. -Preparing and setting up machinery for scheduled production runs. -Performing mechanic skills including, but not limited to: mechanical, electrical, pneumatic and hydraulic troubleshooting and repair of packaging and production machines. -Reading and interpreting equipment manuals and work orders to perform required maintenance. -Complying with all OSHA Safety and Health rules and maintaining clean and orderly work areas. -Must effectively communicate with peers, supervisors, and upper management on a daily basis. -Documenting work tasks using computerized maintenance management system.     Skills Required: ·         Ability to work any shift, however, this position is nights -Ability to work 12+ shifts (position is from 7pm-7:30am) -Ability to work rotating shifts -Be multi-crafted with skills including electrical power and controls, PLCs, mechanical, print reading, welding and fabrication. -Have light machinist duties. -Be self-motivated and have the ability to work independently to solve problems and implement solutions. -Have the interpersonal skills to develop good working relationships with peers, supervisors, and upper management. -Ability to pass written and practical mechanic test. -Ability to lift objects up to 80 lbs.     Experience Required:·         Experience and ability to work in fast paced environment. -Ability to install and trouble shoot the following: *Variable frequency drives *Programmable logic controllers *Conduit *Motor control centers *Control panels     Education Required:·         High School Diploma or equivalent     I would highly appreciate if you reply me with your Updated Resume in word format and the Required Details mentioned below at christian.santos@apideltech.com Required Details:·         What is your expected salary for this position?·         When are you available to start a project?·         ""Upon offering the position in order to ensure Drug and Crime free Environment, our client mandates a Criminal Background check"" Would you be comfortable with that?·         What are your Day and Evening phone numbers?   Please give me a call on 773-231-5153 for a detailed discussion. I look forward to hearing from you.    Thanks & Regards,Christian SantosTechnical Recruiter | Recruitment & Staffing DivisionTelephone: 773-231-5153Fax : +1-847-847-2810Email ID: christian.santos@apideltech.comApidel Technologies LLC Apidel Technologies is a WMBE (Women & Minority Business Enterprise) and an E-Verified employer.",Maintenance Mechanic Job in San Jose,Full Time,"San Jose, CA 95116",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-San-Jose-CA-US-164895911.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=19,,,e8b6c354e788b9ef8e6598d0ece2ac0b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONTitle:Journeyman Plumber Qualifications:Must be able to read, write and understand English;Good understanding, proficiency and competence in the plumbing trade;Working familiarity with the Code and technical standards and the ability to apply the Code Requirements correctly;Basic knowledge of plumbing theory and the ability to use trade skills on the jobsite;Working knowledge of the tools of the trade and the ability to properly use themSalary is based on experience.Send resume to info@midbronx.org             ",Journeyman Plumber Job in Bronx,Full Time,"Bronx, NY 10451",,http://jobview.monster.com/Journeyman-Plumber-Job-Bronx-NY-US-164897433.aspx?mescoid=4700814001001&jobPosition=16,,,213ea665291c3c65ff798bb47c8ac659
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hertz Equipment Rental Corporation (HERC) is an industry leader specializing in construction and industrial equipment rental. Since 1965, we have provided rental equipment and services for projects and applications including but not limited to commercial and residential construction, industrial and manufacturing plants, and entertainment services.In addition to providing equipment and tools from brand names our customers trust, we employ knowledgeable and dedicated employees at our 260 branches throughout the US and Canada. We are committed to providing the highest quality of service to our customers.The purpose of the Field Service Mechanic position is to utilize the mechanical expertise of the candidate to support the needs of the branch in a professional, safe and timely manner. An individual in this position will work to keep all equipment in peak running condition through an effective preventative maintenance program and a detailed repair schedule. This incumbent is a master technician and assumes a leadership role of product knowledge within the branch and acts as a professional representative of HERC at all times. He/she performs at a high standard of quality level within the branch. He/she has mastered the operating standards of the facility, the region and corporation.Key responsibilities:Follow a consistent and regular schedule to perform various types of maintenance on heavy equipment, construction equipment and various pieces of machinery at various job sitesRepair assorted heavy equipment as required to ensure proper operating condition at the job siteDisassembles engines and reassembles after a thorough examinationAbility to diagnose and troubleshoot fuel systems, electrical systems, hydraulic systems and propane systemsConduct oil changes, lubrication of equipment, tire replacements, hose repairs, battery replacements and assorted servicesRecondition and replace assorted parts of the heavy equipmentMust be able to operate and test equipment such as boom lifts, forklifts, compressors, portable and stationary generators, hydraulics, pumps and assorted tools and equipmentDiagnoses problem areas for any significant wear or tear on the equipmentMaintain work area in a clean and organized mannerProduce timely and detailed service reports and repair logsFollow all company’s filed procedures and protocolsBuild positive relationships with customersPerform additional duties as assignedRequirements:Valid driver’s license with active medical cardOwn a general mechanic’s tool set, capable of supporting a heavy equipment fleet, and be willing to expand their own personal tool collectionEducational Background:High school diploma and/or GEDProfessional Experience:3 to 5 years of experience repairing, maintaining and operating assorted construction equipment, aerial equipment, generators, air compressors, pumps and safety equipment3 to 5 years of experience working in the field at various job sites repairing and maintaining equipment and machineryKnowledge:Must have detailed knowledge and previous work experience working on internal combustion engines (gas and diesel), DC electrical systems, propane systems, hydraulics, track equipment and various construction equipmentPossesses a solid understanding of welding techniquesSkills:Understands the importance of time managementAbility to read and comprehend the standards of operating procedures, owner’s manuals and product/warning labelsAbility to operate large, heavy machineryMust be able to operate a 2 way radio, if necessaryAbility to lift 50+ poundsMust possess solid written and verbal communication skills and be able to perform basic computer operationsCustomer serviceCompetencies:Team orientedGeneral maintenance abilitiesStrong organizational skillsMust exhibit a high level of safety consciousness and a clear understanding of equipment safetyGood communicationIf you are looking for an exciting and rewarding career with a growth-oriented company, HERC is the right place for you! As an industry leader, HERC offers the opportunity for training, development, and advancement. In addition, we offer highly competitive compensation and benefits package, including a generous vacation program. Apply today to be part of a team built for success!Hertz is a Drug-Free Workplace. All employment is contingent on successful completion of drug and background screening.EEO/AA: Females/Minorities/Disabled/Vets",Field Service Mechanic Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time / Employee,"Virginia Beach, VA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Mechanic-Job-Virginia-Beach-VA-US-165788432.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=19,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a0069d0a5257d0411cef0a13f9047a18
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:11,No,jobs.monster.com," Are you ready to take your customer service skills to the next level?  As part of our ongoing commitment to our customers, we are seeking an energetic, motivated individual who can help complement our 5 STAR service department and become a valuable team member who understands our mission on transparency and the delivery of 100% customer satisfaction.You will be working directly with the best service technicians in the industry to ensure our drive for excellence is maintained. Not only will you be guaranteeing our Manufacturers standards are met, but our customer expectations are exceeded.  We are Spitzer Automotive!  Our Group has multiple locations spread throughout the Northern OH, Mansfield, Pittsburgh, PA and Homestead, FL, areas with 11 new vehicle franchises. We are looking for a Title Clerk to join our award-winning team. Spitzerprovides a rare blend of outstanding leadership and a culture that is distinctively people-oriented. We offer you a professional working environment with continuous training and performance excellence as a team member of one of the largest and most successful privately held retail automotive groups in the nation.JOB DESCRIPTION   JOB TITLE:Assistant Service Manager LOCATION:Amherst REPORTS TO:Service Manager FLSA STATUS:Exempt JOB SUMMARY: Service Advisor is responsible for selling, identifying and documenting service, maintenance, and repair service for customers. Responsible for scheduling service to be performed. ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Works with customers and technicians to identify required maintenance.Performs road test of customer vehicles.Advises customers of necessary/suggested services.Offers additional services and repairs to customers.Computes cost of replacement parts and labor to restore vehicle to condition specified by customer.Estimates cost of mechanical, electrical, or other repairs.Enters itemized estimate on service order and explains estimate to customer.Schedules appointments with customer.Maintains CSI at or above designated standards.Meets dealership’s standards for repair/order production.Follows Safeguards rules and regulations. OTHER FUNCTIONS & RESPONSIBILITIES: Performs other related duties as assigned.  MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:Successful track record Strong record of positive CSI results Team oriented Submit to and successfully complete MVR, background check, and pre-employment drug test Valid driver's license with good driving record  PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:At least 1-2 years sales experience required, dealership experience preferred Reynolds & Reynolds a plus REQUIRED CERTIFICATIONS AND/OR LICENSURES: None PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand and use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls.  The employee is occasionally required to walk; sit; climb or balance; kneel; crouch or crawl; talk or hear. Must be able to lift and/or move 50 lbs. This includes repetitive bending and lifting of items.  Must be able to work under hot or cool, wet, and sometimes-dusty, and loud conditions.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  ",Assistant Service Manager Job in North Jackson,Full Time,"North Jackson, OH 44451",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Service-Manager-Job-North-Jackson-OH-US-165542144.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=1,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),6133bcc2b5a1b22264bde8bb02730cad
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Green America Recycling is seeking full time Solid Waste Fuel Technicians to join our team.  We're looking for self-starters capable of working with limited supervision. Objective: The primary objective of the Solid Waste Fuels Technician is to prepare and feed solid waste fuel material to the recycling process.Organization Structure: The Solid Waste Fuel Technician reports directly to the Shift SupervisorSpecific Accountabilities:Recycle fifty-five gallon drums by emptying, scraping clean, smashing and loading into hopperOperates mobile equipment as needed to move materialsOperates hand tools (shovels, brooms, squeegees, scrapers, etc.)Strictly adheres to all safety policies and proceduresInspects mobile equipment to ensure safe and reliable operationPerforms minor repairs; consults with maintenance on equipment failuresQualificationsHigh School or EquivalentMust be able to work nights and weekendsMust be able to wear full face respirator (requires being cleanly shaved)Experience operating mobile equipment preferredMust be able to be on call and work overtimeAbility to communicate orally and in writingMust be a team playerAbility to pass pre-employment screening which includes physical, background check and ten (10) panel drug screenPhysical Demands:The physical demands described herein are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to finger, handle or feel.  The employee is frequently required to taste, smell, stand, walk, reach with hands and arms, climb stairs and maintain balance while stooping, kneeling and crouching.  The employee is frequently is required to climb ladders.  The employee is frequently required to communicate orally and in writing.  The employee will frequently be required to walk on wet and/or gravel covered surfaces that may be in artificially lit conditions.  The employee is occasionally required to sit.  The employee must continuously move up to 25 pounds, frequently lift up to 50 pounds and occasionally move up to 100 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distant vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus.  Work Environment:The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently in the proximity of moving mechanical parts.  The employee is frequently exposed to high, precarious places; fumes or airborne particles, confined space, outside weather conditions, artificial lighting and excessive heat.  The employee is regularly exposed to wet and /or humid conditions, proximity to electrical equipment and vibration.  The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate and occasionally loud.  The above job description has been designed to provide general guidelines of the identification of tasks, duties and qualifications for the titled position and/or its successors.  The description is not all-inclusive of the duties that are performed by the incumbent and the incumbent may be assigned to duties other than those listed in this document as the work environment and essential functions of the job change.  This equal opportunity employer requires applicants to submit an application or complete resume detailing education, work experience, qualifications and references.  Applicants can apply online by visiting http://www.greenamericarecycling.com/careers/ or in writing to:Green America RecyclingAttn:  Human Resources10107 Hwy 79Hannibal, MO 63401",Solid Waste Fuels Technician Job in Hannibal,Full Time,"Hannibal, MO 63401",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Solid-Waste-Fuels-Technician-Job-Hannibal-MO-US-165968499.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=9,,Entry Level,6cca914acdebf1f9ff53bc33ba814764
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:13,No,jobs.monster.com," Electrician – Tucson, AZContract to Direct$19/hr-$25/hrMonday-Friday 7:00am-3:30pmJob DescriptionSummary Independently performs maintenance, troubleshooting, repair and modification of a wide variety of electrical equipment and related systems/hardware such as low voltage switch gear (>480V), UPS systems, motors, motor controllers, lighting etc.  May assist with instrumentation/control systems and/or HVAC troubleshooting and repair. Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following:  Other duties as assigned. Repair and replacement of lighting systems, light bulbs, transformer battery systems, generators, etc. Tests major electrical circuits and panels to determine correct hook-up and load capacity by using such instruments as volt meters and amp meters.Troubleshoot and repair electrical motor controls and/or replace. Electrical wiring and terminations, including identification of wire.Basic troubleshooting of electrical equipment and systems.  In support of instrumentation/controls systems technicians, analysis and troubleshooting of control circuits and calibration of electrical control equipment and systems.  Updating of electrical specifications, drawings, schematics, and as-builts. Uses service and repair manuals in conjunction with parts manual to specify / identify required work and order of requisition parts.Troubleshooting and repair cause of ground faults and overload breaker trips.Cable splicing up to 500 MCM.Assist in planning, executing and contractor coordination of electrical substation maintenance and repairs.Interface with management, clients and other technicians to resolve technical problems. Assist other technicians with maintenance activities in differing disciplines. Work scheduled and/or emergency overtime after hours (early morning or late night), weekends, and/or holidays as required.Complies with all safety requirements and programs at a VPP certified project.Other duties as assigned. Education & ExperienceHigh school diploma or general equivalency degree (GED) with advanced vocational training/schooling in the electrical field.Minimum of 5 years of experience in the electrical and electrical control systems maintenance field. Ability to read and understand schematics drawings and blue prints.Training in electrical hazards, Lockout/Tagout and electrical safety in an industrial setting. Knowledge of applicable codes, NFPA 70, standard practices, etc. Certificates, Licenses, RegistrationsState of Arizona Electrician license desiredValid driver’s license. ",Electrician // Tucson,Full Time,"Tucson, AZ",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrician-Tucson-AZ-19-25-hr-Job-tucson-AZ-US-165808442.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=20,19.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,,baf2104ef7f105bf64210dd2d8caa2f5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.The Vice President of Operations is responsible for overseeing  field operations to ensure network reliability and satisfactory delivery of telecommunication services to residential and business customers.  They are primarily responsible for service installation and repair, and network rehab and maintenance work.  They oversee this for both central office and outside plant areas. The position oversees a team of Area Operations Managers who have teams of Area Plant Supervisors who manage the bargained-for technician organization responsible for doing the installation, repair, rehab work.   The organization is not only responsible for ensuring network reliability and operational efficiencies, but also for partnering with the Local Planning and Engineering and Construction teams to prioritize and plan capital investments related to network upgrades or maintenance and rehab jobs. This position is also responsible for growing the customer base and driving revenue through: strong alignment with sales organization, interactions with community leaders and customers, ensuring service quality, support of the technician referral programs, and prompt handling of customer issues.    The VPO  is a strong leader who works to develop and groom his/her organization through frequent communication, market visits, and skip level meetings. Key ResponsibilitiesManage self and team to established safety standards, service quality metrics and sales and revenue targets Manage to operating employee and non-employee budgetsDrive sales focus on consumer and business segments by partnering with business sales leads, retail sales and market development managersPartner with peer organizations (C&E, Planning) to ensure network standards and reliability as well as operational efficienciesRepresent company professionally in the local business communities and on occasion before local government and regulatory entitiesContinually evaluate process, procedures to ensure operational optimization Job RequirementsKeen and relentless  focus on results and driving operating improvementsTen or more years in telecommunications or closely related fieldEight or more years in managementUnion workforce management experience preferredBudget management experienceCollege degree preferredEffective leadership and coaching skillsAbility to create and present powerful and meaningful presentations regarding performance of marketStrong analytical and critical thinking skills Ability to travel the state frequently  340 employees380 M revenue accountability$38M budget responsibility _________________________________________________________________________________________________Talent DevelopmentEmpower employees to take responsibility for their jobs and goals. Manage and delegate day-to-day activity, including escalations, with an expectation of accountability and regular feedback.  Embrace and Drive a “Culture of Learning” by expanding professional, leadership and technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing professional publications; establishing personal; benchmarking state-of-the-art practices and participating in professional societies to ensure growth in alignment with technology and industry changes Lead employees using a performance based management and development process that provides an overall context and framework to challenge and encourage employee contribution.Coach, mentor, and develop staff, including career development planning.  Continuously drive growth in overall employee_________________________________________________________________________________________Process DisciplineFacilitates change by challenging existing process and the status quo. Drive continuous improvement.  Drive and support systems implementations that reduce manual work and provide efficiencies for the department Establish and maintain relevant controls and feedback systems to monitor the operation of the department and provide management reporting _________________________________________________________________________________________________Business AcumenUnderstand and lead the work of the team, plan and maintain work systems, procedures and policies, and manage the overall operational, budgetary, and financial responsibilities and activities necessary to effectively run the department________________________________________________________________________________________Employee EngagementConsciously create a team culture that is consistent with the overall Company's  - that emphasizes the identified Mission, Vision, Guiding Principles and values of the organization Foster a spirit of teamwork, trust and unity among department members that allows for disagreement over ideas, healthy conflict and expeditious conflict resolution, the appreciation for diversity as well as cohesiveness, supportiveness, and working effectively together to enable each employee and the department to succeed  Have a thorough understanding of the Corporate strategy and direction.  Embrace the final decisions made and “own” articulating such and bringing the team on board Alternate Location: US-New Mexico-AlbuquerqueRequisition #: 40716 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",VP OPERATIONS Job in Albuquerque,Full Time Employee,"Albuquerque, NM 87102",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/VP-OPERATIONS-Job-Albuquerque-NM-US-166012699.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=20,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e6cc8255cec1c032b56c800d9185d202
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a leading manufacturer of food products, due to ongoing expansion it now seeks multiple Refrigeration Technicians to join its operations in Oklahoma.Client DetailsOur client is a leading manufacturer of food products, due to ongoing expansion it now seeks multiple Refrigeration Technicians to join its operations in Oklahoma.DescriptionReporting in the Maintenance Manager the Refrigeration Technician will provide industrial maintenance support to ensure the safe and effective operation of the production facility.The Refrigeration Technician duties will also includes include the maintenance, repair and safe operation of the production facility's mechanical infrastructure, including ammonia-based refrigeration systems, HVAC systems and boilers.Additional responsibilities include the repair, troubleshooting and maintenance of the facility manufacturing systems.ProfileAmmonia refrigeration system safe operation, maintenance, repair, HVAC system maintenance and repair, and meeting PSM requirements, Maintenance and repair of plant support systems including boilers, air compressors, high pressure hot water, plumbing and equipment movers2 years electrical, electronics, or HVAC degree or equivalent training / experience5 years Maintenance experience in manufacturing, preferably in the food industryJob OfferCompetitive hourly rates in addition to:Family medical clinic, on-site fitness centers, medical, dental & vision insurance, paid vacation, holidays and personal time, 401(k) plan",Refrigeration Technician - Multiple Shifts Job in Oklahoma City,"Full Time , Employee","Oklahoma City, OK",,http://jobview.monster.com/Refrigeration-Technician-Multiple-Shifts-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-165037065.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=9,"55,000.00 - 62,000.00 $ /year",,73bdea3be32826c39749d1748be32584
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; &nbsp; City:&nbsp; LouisburgState:&nbsp; North CarolinaPostal/Zip Code: 27549 &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden, a division of Oldcastle, is one of the largest manufacturers of bagged and bulk decorative mulch, soil, stone, and limestone products in the nation with over 40 production facilities.&nbsp; We take pride in serving a diverse group of customers including independent garden centers, mass retailers, landscapers, contractors, and homeowners. &nbsp; Job Summary &nbsp; This position requires operating a forklift in a rugged 50+ acre outdoor, paved and unpaved environment.&nbsp; The successful candidate must be able to work in a fast-paced, covered and uncovered manufacturing facility. &nbsp; &nbsp; Job Duties &nbsp; Operate stretch wrap machines, film roll up-enders, and extended boom arm forklift equipment Organize product on the yard according to inventory procedures Safely load product onto and unload product from flat beds and box trailers Validate packing slips, ship tickets, and other delivery documentation by auditing, recording and interpreting shipping documentation, weights &amp; measures, labels and production schedules &nbsp; Requirements &nbsp; 2 years’ experience operating 5,000 lb forklift in an outdoor yard environment High school diploma or GED, or equivalent combination of education, training and experience Ability to perform routine inspection, fueling &amp; preventive maintenance duties (lubrication, cleaning, battery change) Ability to read and write in English Math, communication, and comprehension skills to interface with transportation, dispatch, &amp; direct trailer hitch operations Ability to successfully pass internal Forklift Certification Training and demonstrate safety procedures.&nbsp; Able to perform job tasks in sometimes dusty, hot and/or cold working conditions &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive benefits&nbsp;programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and advancement &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle is the leading North American manufacturer of building products. With over 2,000 locations and 30,000 employees, we are a proud reflection of many small to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. We provide a decentralized, entrepreneurial environment, where decisions at all levels drive performance. Each of our businesses works with great autonomy to service their local markets, while leveraging the group’s resources and best practices. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to work and grow! Take charge of your career and leverage the network of resources and growth opportunities. If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today. Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. &nbsp; EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Oldcastle Lawn &amp; Garden is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. #30 &nbsp;",Forklift Operator - Louisburg,Full Time Employee,"Louisburg, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Forklift-Operator-Louisburg-NC-Job-Louisburg-NC-US-166065955.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=17,,,bea96472e1b78875b3884e727f7fbe83
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field Service Engineer – Salt Lake City, Utah PANalytical is the world leader in x-ray analysis systems – with the world’s largest installed base, an extensive product range and an unrivaled sales and service network.   PANalytical prides itself on exemplary customer service.  We are looking for a highly motivated, customer focused individual to fill an immediate opening for a Field Service Engineer in the Salt Lake City, Utah area.  This is an excellent opportunity for an individual who is self directed, and detail oriented.   Work in this position includes installations, troubleshooting, repairs and maintenance of complex scientific and analytical instrumentation.   Our top priority is to provide the best PANalytical experience ever.  That means we are relentlessly aiming for the highest quality customer service in order to maximize our customer's economic growth targets.   Job Requirements:Repair and maintenance of complex scientific and analytical instrumentationPerform installation of equipment from delivery to sign-offRespond to customer by telephone within 4 hours to evaluate problemLog and track case details within PANalytical's CRM system to document service history and data analysisPerform preventative maintenance per maintenance schedule and PANalytical guidelinesProactively inform appropriate personnel on all problems using ESCALATION procedureMaintain excellent communication with direct Manager on all mattersNotify Call Center of location and progreess daily for loggingHandle parts return and repair in accordance with all policies and guidelinesKeep customers well informed on any open issuesManage direct account responsibility with minimal supervisionAssist in different areas within the DistrictPerform all the above duties in accordance with applicable ISO9000 directives and company policyAbility to lift up to 50 lbsUp to 80 % travel (including Overnight Travel and some international travel)Must have ability to obtain a credit card, passport and have a valid driver’s license Provided by PANalytical: Training                                               Excellent medical, vision and dental benefitsLaptop                                                Flexible medical/dependent care spending accts Cell phone                                            Generous paid time off plans Company Car                                         Fitness reimbursement - $350Gas card                                              401(k) including company contributionEquipment for home office  Experience/skills: At least 3-5 years of experience in electronics, applied physics or in the chemistry field and/or recent and relevant class work  Excellent customer relationship skills including, communication, accountability, and the ability to understand customer needs and how best to handle these.  Must be able to make sound decisions no matter what the cirucumstance, and effectively document actions taken.  Above average and clear written and verbal communications skills required. Education: Bachelors degree preferred, in Electronics, Physics, Chemistry or at a minimum an Associates degree in either of these fields. Salary: Starting salary is very competitive and commensurate with experience PANalytical is an equal opportunity employer. If you need special assistance in applying for this position, please contact 1-800-279-7297 and ask for Human Resources. Please indicate the reason for your call and interest in this position at PANalytical.      ",Field Service Engineer - Salt Lake City,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Engineer-Salt-Lake-City-Utah-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-133897670.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d2d2bb36518fb1e93bf22b21a20cf656
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"CoLiant Solutions, Inc., a National Infrastructure Service Company, is seeking highly motivated and professional Field Service Technicians. The ideal candidate will possess 3 years industry experience in one or more of the following areas:                                    CCTV, Fire, Security, Voice/Data, and Access Control Experience and Certifications preferred NICET certificationBosch Fire & Security PanelsKnowledge of March Networks and Verint recording platformsWheelock Voice Evac systemsLenelSoftware HouseOSHA 30 training preferredCoLiant Solutions values our employees and welcomes those that want to be a part of a positive team environment dedicated to serving our customers with excellence. This job will include travel require, excellent written and verbal communication and the ability to work both self-directed and as a member of a crew team. CoLiant takes care of its team, so our team can take care of our valued customers.CoLiant Solutions offers: Medical, Disability, & Life Insurance, Bonus potential, Paid Holidays, per diem for travel, hotel card, and gas card.CoLiant Solutions, Inc. is proud to be and Equal Opportunity Employer and Drug-free Workplace. ",Low Voltage Technician-CCTV/Access Control / Fire- Job in Greensboro,Full Time,"Greensboro, NC 27401",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Low-Voltage-Technician-CCTV-Access-Control-Fire-Job-Greensboro-NC-US-163366602.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8aff08a54e9ba27b52208be157c3df60
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Mechanic Pipe Fitter & SheetmetalCompany: Merritt Island Air & HeatLocation: Merritt Island, FL 32952Positions: Field Supervisor; PipefitterIndustry: Commercial/Industrial; Manufacturing (including Sheet Metal Shops)-------------------Merritt Island Air & Heat is currently seeking an Experienced Commercial HVAC Pipefitters & Sheetmetal Mechanics.Minimum of 5 years of previous experience as related to HVAC Commercial and Industrial Environment.Clean Driving RecordReliable TransportationVerifiable Past Work ReferencesBenefits/401k/Vacation/EOE/Drug FreeVisit http://www.miacfl.com/commercial/employment.html to obtain an application. Fax resume to 321-453-4745",HVAC Mechanic Pipe Fitter & Sheetmetal Job in Merritt Island  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Merritt Island 32952,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Mechanic-Pipe-Fitter-Sheetmetal-Job-Merritt-Island-165177682.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5239ecd8d7c8622e23390a50d56d0a4b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for multiple Home Energy Raters in the South Bay AreaDo you seek a career in green building?Do you enjoy working independently?Are you good in math and eager to learn about Building Science?If you answered yes to these questions, this may be the position for you.The Energuy is a mission-driven company of Home Energy Raters, one of the largest in California. We provide Title 24 Energy Code compliance testing /verifications, and Home Energy Ratings for Energy Upgrade California. Our expertise helps homeowners increase their energy efficiency, reduce their utility bills, and make their homes more comfortable, more durable, and safer & healthier to live in. We also helped them get back $3 million in rebates in 2015 alone.The Energuy is looking to add motivated, intelligent, and energetic people to join our team. While each Rater works independently, we actively promote a team environment with heavy emphasis on cross training, mentoring, and career advancement.This career offers:Competitive pay. $14.00 for trainees, $15.00 to $20.00 for fully certified experienced RatersMileage that is reimbursed at $0.35 per mileIndependenceFreedomHands-on field workA chance to help people and improve the environment.However, successful Raters are also highly responsible people willing to do what it takes to get the job done.  Although not required, prior HVAC experience, construction experience, HERS training, and/or Spanish fluency is a plus.The ideal candidate for the position would:Possess a valid California driver's license and a substantially clean driving historyHave a reliable car and auto insuranceHighly organized with strong time management skillsBe able to communicate effectively, both orally and in writingBe good at math and eager to learnHave basic computer skills including the ability to scan, fax and emailPossess a smart phone and be responsive to calls & textsAbility to provide exceptional customer serviceCapable of completing work on a timely basisAvailability week days, some evenings, and Saturdays. Physical requirements includeThe ability to crawl through confined, dark spaces, such as attics and crawlspacesClimbing laddersCarrying equipment up to 50 lbsIf you are interested in this opportunity and would like to learn more, please forward your resume.Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to the individual's race, color, sex, national origin, religion, age, disability, genetic information, status as a military veteran or any other characteristic protected by applicable",Energy Consultant - HERs Rater HVAC Job in Milpitas,Full Time,"Milpitas, CA 95035",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Energy-Consultant-HERs-Rater-HVAC-Job-Milpitas-CA-US-165267701.aspx?mescoid=1700193001001&jobPosition=16,14.00 - 20.00 $ /hourCan increase with experience,Entry Level,d953f4c09562bcd035a12e0ad25528f9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY OF POSITION:A Service Technician performs warranty and non-warranty service repairs at customer's homes throughout a specific geographic region. Must be able to diagnose customer issues and determine if a situation is a warranty item or not, and appropriately explain the circumstances to the customer.KEY DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:• Creates and executes MPS plans; meets MPS commitments and works within the guidelines of MPS; reflects Milgard's business values and the Milgard philosophy in all business interactions.• Incorporates Milgard's vision and values into day-to-day activities and behaviors; guides and motivates others to remain committed to the Milgard philosophy.• Adheres to all facets of safety policies and procedures.• Proper usage of personal protective equipment.60% Performing and Documenting Field Service Work.Responsible for assisting the Service Tech III in making adjustments, replacing parts and pieces, performing water tests, taking measurements, and documenting all work performed or needing to be performed both written and through imaging. Potentially will have days where work is performed on their own.25% Driving.Responsible for driving to locations as dictated by pre-set appointments according to territory assigned. Responsible for maintaining safe driving habits and clean drivers license in accordance with company policy. Responsible for Service Truck inspections and reporting truck condition.5% Requisition Parts.Responsible for requisitioning parts from internal supplier necessary to perform field service work.5% Documentation Review.Responsible for reviewing service work orders generated for accuracy of shipper information for parts ordered by customer care coordinator, parts to be requisitioned from internal supply, special tools that may be required to complete service call, routing information (Thomas Guide Page and Section No.).5% Team Building and Support.Responsible for participating in team/department meetings.The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees in this position. This is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities.EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:• A minimum of three years prior customer service experience required.• Valid Class C drivers license with a clean DMV record.• Prior glass or window experience is desirable but not required; however, technical/mechanical ability or background is preferred.EDUCATION/LICENSES/CERTIFICATION/FORMAL TRAINING:• A high school diploma or GED.ESSENTIAL ABILITIES:• In depth knowledge of product lines in order to repair products in the field.• Attention to detail with strong organizational skills.• Excellent written and oral communication skills and customer service skills.• Proficient use of hand tools to include: tape measure, level, saws, drills, etc.• Able to compute basic math problems.• Problem solving ability and ability to handle stressful situations.• Good hand eye coordination and the ability to discern colors.• Sense of direction with ability to use Thomas Guide, self-motivated, and mechanically inclined.• Must be physically capable to climb ladders up to 40 feet, work off scaffolding, lift and carry up to 50 lbs., and work days frequently in excess of 10 hours.• Ability to work in, and promote a team environment.• Proper usage of personal protective equipment.• Adheres to all facets of safety policies and procedures.PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:• Prolonged standing and repetitive motions, bending, stooping, pushing, and pulling.• May be required to frequently lift up to 50 lbs.• Hand dexterity and strength.• Overtime may be required, including some weekends.WORK ENVIRONMENT:• Forty (40%) percent of all work activities are performed inside the cab of the service vehicle. The remainders of work activities are performed outdoors.Milgard does not tolerate discrimination of any type, and offers equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons without regard to race, color, religion, sex, natural origin, age, disability or medical condition, marital status, veteran status or any other considerations made unlawful by Federal, State or local laws. We believe in providing eligible and qualified employees with opportunities to advance. Milgard is an at-will employer.",Service Technician - Denver Job in Aurora,,"Aurora, CO",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-Denver-Job-Aurora-CO-US-165190382.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,Entry Level,ceeffc433ef759eea962d879993450b5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company pesticide products to residential locations according to schedule and as needed based on service requests; calls customers to confirm scheduled services; completes required production forms; assists in sales to current customers. Responsibilities 1. Applies company pesticide products to residential locations according to schedule, safety procedures, label instructions, and as needed based on service requests. 2. Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. 3. Calls customers to confirm scheduled services. 4. Responds on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. 5. Completes required production forms at end of daily route. 6. Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. 7. Assists in sales to current customers through contact on route. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintains licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintains valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Topeka,"Full Time, Employee","Topeka, KS",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Topeka-KS-US-165728058.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c7828663ed7681e3a6e2b4bf3b5f0b3f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for a stable, reliable career? Now hiring PRODUCTION WORKERS, MAINTENANCE TECHNICIANS AMPI is a leading milk marketing cooperative owned by dairy farmers across the Upper Midwest.We take pride in producing award-winning dairy products for customers around the globe. Benefits include:  Health Insurance  401(k)  Dental Insurance  Vacation and Holiday Pay  Sick Pay  Tuition Reimbursement  Safety Incentives  Newly added Skill set Premiums  Advancement Opportunities Applicants must be able to work nights, Holidays and weekends. For more information about these positions or to apply online vistit us at www.ampi.com Applications are being accepted during regular business hours at 14193 County Road S Jim Falls, WI 54748 AA EOE M/F/Vet/Disability. All applicants must complete a drug test and background check.",Production Workers,Full Time,"Jim Falls, WI 54748",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Production-Workers-Maintenance-Technicians-Job-Jim-Falls-WI-US-165318080.aspx?ch=chippewafalls&mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=20,,,c51a7051473e83fd099569575361fa9f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sunset Automotive Group is southwest Florida's largest automotive group with 17 franchises at 14 locations in Sarasota and Manatee counties. We are currently seeking an Automotive Lube Tech/Entry-Level Service Technician to join our elite team at Sunset Kia of Venice, FL.  Duties This is an entry-level technician position where some basic skills are required.   Applicants with previous experience and certifications are encouraged to apply.  Employees with skills and good work ethic will be given the chance to train and develop into a certified Kia Service Technician. Perform work as outlined on repair order with efficiency and accuracy, in accordance with dealership and factory standardsDrain oil from crankcase and refills with required amount of oil.Replace oil and air filters.Inspect vehicle fluid levels, replaces or replenishes as necessaryOperate all tools and equipment in a safe manner.Lubricate moving parts with specified lubricants. Requirements Must be able to work Monday - Saturday (Up to 6 days a week)Automotive Schooling and/or ASE Certifications  preferred.Successful candidates will be subject to background check, including criminal and driving recordvalid Driver's License Benefits Medical InsuranceDental InsuranceVision Insurance401(k) Retirement PlanShort-Term and Long-Term Disability CoverageLife InsuranceFlexible Spending AccountsPaid Time OffCompany-paid Factory TrainingEmployee DiscountsPay Plan based on experienceNo State Taxes! If you are looking for a place to work where you will have opportunities for advancement and be appreciated, this might be the place for you! Enjoy your job and the people you work with at Sunset Automotive Group. For more information, or to apply now, you must go to the website below. Please DO NOT email your resume to us as we only accept applications through our website. https://sunsetautogroup.applicantpro.com/jobs/374206-41665.html",Auto Lube Technician - Sunset Kia of Venice Job in Venice,Full Time,"Venice, FL 34285",,http://jobview.monster.com/Auto-Lube-Technician-Sunset-Kia-of-Venice-Job-Venice-FL-US-165831218.aspx?mescoid=4900870001001&jobPosition=18,,,9e5b5d41f7fd682d1f28e314f80bf10e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position will contribute to the production team and help ensure that goals are met safely and efficiently while conforming to all company policies. The Production Crew Janitorial employees will perform cleanup and monitor overall housekeeping and environmental compliance, complete light landscaping and facility repairs/improvements.Essential Functions: (This job may include any combination of the following duties)Environmental and Janitorial: Inspect and perform maintenance/cleanup on drain inlets, retention ponds, and waste receptacles. Collect dismantled scrap and core materials. Remove debris. Perform landscaping and vegetation control. Identify & address safety risks in the customer area. Other duties as prescribed by procedure.Miscellaneous: Assist customers as needed in a courteous manner. Prepare Gaylord boxes and pallets for shipment. Review and complete logs for regulatory and tracking purposes. Maintain and replace storm water control devices. Assist in the review and maintenance of mechanical equipment.Other duties as required.Required Skills:Qualifications:Ability to wear and maintain all prescribed PPE and follow basic safety practices.Ability to follow verbal and written instructions including comprehension of basic safety messages and labels (waste oil, gasoline, flammable, etc.).Ability to complete basic safety, environmental, and code of conduct training.Able to work required hours which may include weekend and holidays and OT. May be asked to work at more than one location.Ability to work efficiently in extreme weather conditions - rain, snow, hot sun, cold - for a full shift.Experience in automotive repair or dismantling, preferred but not required.Experience with automotive parts and/or retail customers, preferred but not required.Experience with tools and machinery, preferred but not required.Physical Activities Required to Perform Essential Functions:Standing, walking, bending, and stretching are required regularly to perform customer care, production, and environmental/safety responsibility functions.Manual dexterity to handle tools and the ability to move 50 pounds are regularly required to perform routine functions.Manual dexterity to maintain the facility clean by mopping, sweeping, etc. as required.Vision must be sufficient to perform job functions safely as described above.Able to work on feet (stand and walk) for assigned work shift.Job Conditions:Exposure on a regular basis to outdoor weather conditions.Periodic exposure to minimal chemical hazards. PLEASE NOTE: The above statements are designed to outline the functions and position requirements of this job. It does not identify all tasks that may be expected, nor address the performance standards that must be maintained.",Production Crew - Environmental/Janitorial (-) Job in San Francisco,Full Time,"San Francisco, CA",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Crew-Environmental-Janitorial-161-255-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-165995138.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=7,,,5c2dc2239533e7c4f6c96e0fa0de3ef4
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Associates in the Maintenance Technician position are responsible for maintaining and repairing all production equipment to produce quality flexible packaging materials on time in accordance with specific work instructions and applicable safety and quality assurance procedures.Responsibilities and Duties:This job description and performance standard document has been prepared as a guide to ensure better communication and understanding.  All responsibilities, however, have not been included, nor could they be.  Your Supervisor/Manager may from time to time ask you to perform other related duties not specifically included in this description.  Likewise, this description will be revised when required to meet current business needs.·         Checks all company tools and equipment at the beginning and end of each shift to ensure all company tools and maintenance equipment are accounted for and in good working order.·         Works proactively and with a sense of urgency through all aspects of repair and maintenance, and while performing preventive maintenance tasks.·         Thoroughly reviews and understands all maintenance procedures including Preventive Maintenance (PM) procedures outlined in the PM Program. This consists of following the PM task sheets, which are issued with preventive maintenance assignments. These PM task sheets provide the information needed to complete preventive maintenance on each individual machine. This system also allows us to monitor the technician’s time and materials for each individual machine as well as maintaining scheduled intervals. The maintenance technician is accountable for all work that is performed, so must be able to do high quality work at all times to ensure proper repairs and preventive maintenance.·         Performs all work to high standards of quality by complying with all regional and local codes for electrical and plumbing tasks.  Complies with repairs and maintenance procedures outlined in the equipment manuals from the machine manufacturers.·         Notifies Maintenance Manager when materials and parts consumed in repairs for replenishment purposes, especially when utilizing critical, long lead time parts for major machines. ·         Must maintain an open line of communication with fellow maintenance team members and PPT associates to coordinate any issues that need to be passed   from shift to shift. ·         Ensures that all responsibilities and functions performed are in accordance with company and quality procedures as set forth in the Personnel Handbook and the Quality Manual.  Participates in quality and AIB programs, and stays updated on changes to both.·         Supports the company emphasis on teamwork and cooperation to achieve our goals by performing other duties as assigned including working in other departments from time to time and helping with periodic AIB cleanup issues.·         Generates improvement ideas and embraces improvement projects to better the business. Skills and Qualifications:·         Detail-orientation required for completing required paperwork and information system’s inputs with a high degree of accuracy. ·         Previous maintenance job experience in an industrial production environment with the related safety training is preferred.·         Able to read and understand blue prints and machinery manuals, and accept verbal direction to successfully complete procedures and assigned tasks.·         Capable of performing mathematical calculations, and properly using tape measures and micrometers.·         Flexibility in work assignments and priorities is required to address the dynamic needs of our customers and shifts in production requirements.·         Good verbal and written communication skills required, and proven experience with effective teams and continuous improvement methods strongly preferred. Working Conditions and/or Physical Requirements:·         Must be able to lift and ensure proper handling of items up to 75 pounds.·         Must be capable of standing for the duration of a work shift less breaks and lunch.·         Must be capable and willing to work in excess of a normal workweek with notice, as outlined in the Personnel Handbook, as maintenance coverage demands dictate.·         Due to the nature of our business Maintenance Technicians must be available for possible call-ins during off hours in the event of major machine break downs.·         Must be able to ensure work quality in a fast paced production environment.·         Must be able to troubleshoot, identify, prioritize, and meet multiple expectations for area of responsibility.·         Must provide your own hand tools and tool box, with the company providing all other specialty tools and equipment. ·         Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.·         Willingness to be trained in the proper handling and disposal of Hazardous waste.",Maintenance Technician Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, KS 66111",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Kansas-City-KS-US-165693456.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,,,a6b8b6ab35074b0de6e3e78fc99de2cb
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Escrow Assistant needed for a contract to direct opportunity with Yoh's client located in San Francisco, CA. The Big Picture - Top Skills You Should Possess: - Provides support to Escrow department - Administrative duties related to escrow - Prepares documents and handles the complete escrow transactions - Answering phones as needed for cross coverage What You'll Be Doing: - Provides support to Escrow department by assisting with customer service and administrative duties related to escrow closings - Order demands/homeowners association statements/documents - Opens orders, inputs closing statements from a worksheet prepared by Escrow Officer - Prepares documents for closing and handles the complete disbursement and follow up of all escrow transactions - Communicates requirements and other information to clients including Title - exceptions - Interprets earnest money agreements as they relate to closing and prepare all - documents require for transactions - Answering phones as needed for cross coverage What You Need to Bring to the Table: - High School diploma or equivalent - 1-2 years Escrow Experience - Strong customer service orientation - Detail orientation - Excellent verbal communication - Problem solving skills - Strong organizational skills Get Hired, Apply Now! Recruiter: Jill Maravilla Yoh makes finding and applying for jobs simple. Partner with Yoh to find the right opportunities across multiple industries in the US and UK. Find out more here! Yoh, a Day & Zimmermann company, is an Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V. Click here to contact us if you are an individual with a disability and require accommodation in the application process. J2W: PROF; MONJOB TAX TERM: CON_W2 J2WNWCORP Ref: 1071989 SFSF: PROF Nearest Major Market: San FranciscoNearest Secondary Market: Oakland Job Segment: Real Estate, Sales #TrackingJobBody ul{padding:0px;}",Escrow Assistant Job Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Escrow-Assistant-Job-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-166002022.aspx?mescoid=1300114001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,fce5e640eac5b6fbb58fc8a060038c4c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Maintenance Electrician Location: Knox, Indiana Join an award-winning company!Toll Integrated Systems seeks a Maintenance Electrician to handle new projects, preventative and routine maintenance on industrial machinery and production equipment at our manufacturing plant in Knox, Indiana. Responsibilities include support of overall electrical and mechanical systems and new equipment installation. Primary responsibiilities include: Repairing, replacing or installing new electrical circuits and controls to equipment; repairing as needed: switches, photo eyes,  proximity sensors, pushbuttons, contactors, and motor startersMaintaining building groundsRepairing and maintaining automated saws, conveyors, and truss assembly linesPerforming work order repairs, inspections, and adjustmentsParticipating in plant safety, health and environmental programs Don't miss this opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!2016 WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6)in Quality of Products/Services Offered(after Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)- FortuneQualifications:A minimum of 5 years of experience with 480v and low voltage, 24-volt control systems, and troubleshootingWorking knowledge of network infrastructure, installation of cat 5/6 cabling and troubleshootingAbility to set up and operate welders, drill press, grinders, hand tools, and other metal-working equipment for basic fabrication needsFamiliarity with hydraulics, pneumatics, and mechanicsAbility to read and interpret wiring diagrams and mechanical drawingsAbility to write detailed repair reportsGood verbal communication skillsExperience in a production-driven manufacturing environmentPost-secondary education or a technical trade certificate is a plusOSHA 10, PPE, and ECPL training is a plusWe offer an excellent benefits package, including comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match, discounted stock purchase, discounts on mortgages, homes, appliances, and much more Come see why Toll Brothers and Toll Integrated Systems have been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry!APPLY ONLINE TODAY! As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award-winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",MAINTENANCE ELECTRICIAN Job in Knox,"Full Time, Employee","When you choose Toll Brothers, you enjoy all the special advantages offered by ""America's Luxury Home Builder™.""Build Your Career with an Industry Leader Position: Maintenance Electrician Location: Knox, Indiana Join an award-winning company!Toll Integrated Systems seeks a Maintenance Electrician to handle new projects, preventative and routine maintenance on industrial machinery and production equipment at our manufacturing plant in Knox, Indiana. Responsibilities include support of overall electrical and mechanical systems and new equipment installation. Primary responsibiilities include: Repairing, replacing or installing new electrical circuits and controls to equipment; repairing as needed: switches, photo eyes,  proximity sensors, pushbuttons, contactors, and motor startersMaintaining building groundsRepairing and maintaining automated saws, conveyors, and truss assembly linesPerforming work order repairs, inspections, and adjustmentsParticipating in plant safety, health and environmental programs Don't miss this opportunity to join one of the nation's most respected Fortune 1000 companies!2016 WORLD’S MOST ADMIRED COMPANIES LIST (#6)in Quality of Products/Services Offered(after Apple, Walt Disney, Amazon, Alphabet, and Nordstrom)- FortuneQualifications:A minimum of 5 years of experience with 480v and low voltage, 24-volt control systems, and troubleshootingWorking knowledge of network infrastructure, installation of cat 5/6 cabling and troubleshootingAbility to set up and operate welders, drill press, grinders, hand tools, and other metal-working equipment for basic fabrication needsFamiliarity with hydraulics, pneumatics, and mechanicsAbility to read and interpret wiring diagrams and mechanical drawingsAbility to write detailed repair reportsGood verbal communication skillsExperience in a production-driven manufacturing environmentPost-secondary education or a technical trade certificate is a plusOSHA 10, PPE, and ECPL training is a plusWe offer an excellent benefits package, including comprehensive medical/dental, 401(k) with a company match, discounted stock purchase, discounts on mortgages, homes, appliances, and much more Come see why Toll Brothers and Toll Integrated Systems have been attracting and retaining some of the best professionals in the industry!APPLY ONLINE TODAY! As an innovative industry leader, we can offer you top benefits including:401(k) and discounted stock purchase plansCash bonuses paid for employee referrals; opportunity to win vacation tripsSignificant discounts on mortgages, homes, auto, life insurance and appliancesUse of Toll Brothers' luxury guesthouses located on our world-class golf coursesGreat team environmentPlus: Medical and dental insurance, paid vacation, holiday and sick leave, long-term disability, short-term disability, and educational assistanceVisit our award-winning web site for more information on our company at:Toll Brothers Career CenterTOLL BROTHERS AT A GLANCE With over 4,000 employees and FY 2015 revenues of $4.17 billion dollars, Toll Brothers is the nation's leading builder of luxury homes. Currently building in 19 states and 50 markets, we are the only national builder to focus primarily on the luxury move-up and empty-nester markets. We build custom and semi-custom single and attached homes, principally on land that we develop ourselves. Our homes have an average price in backlog of approximately $825,000. Toll Brothers builds luxury single-family and attached home communities and master-planned luxury multi-product residential golf course communities principally on land it develops and improves. The Company operates its own architectural, engineering, mortgage, title, land development and land sale, golf course development and management, home security, and landscape subsidiaries. The Company also operates its own lumber distribution, and house component assembly and manufacturing operations. ALL POSITIONS LISTED ARE CURRENT HIRING NEEDS!Unsolicited resumes sent by search agencies will be considered non-commissionable.",AllReal Estate/Property ManagementConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/MAINTENANCE-ELECTRICIAN-Job-Knox-IN-US-165657342.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f0f7d3342f731ca643592b74842db73e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ultradent, the global name in oral health is seeking a Manufacturing Maintenance Mechanic to join Ultradent's Manufacturing Team.  As an eligible Ultradent employee, you can expect the following:  Benefits:  Medical/Dental & Other Insurances (eligible the first of month after 60 days)Health Savings Account MatchMatching 401KOn-site cafeteria (breakfast & lunch)On-site Fitness CenterEmployee access to discounted Ultradent productsFive days paid between Christmas and New YearsEducation Assistance  Job Duties:  Work as a team member in production by ensuring equipment maintains quality standards and expected throughputTrain other machine operators on safe and effective operation of equipment and provide leadership and direction to machine operators and other production workersPerform established and required preventive maintenance to all equipment and keep necessary recordsObserve machine operations, control boards, and gauges to detect malfunctionsTroubleshoots and problem solves equipment problemsObserves flow of materials to ensure proper functioning of equipment and processesRecords details of machine malfunctions and records/reports OEE each shiftEnsures compliance with safety standardsSetup and adjust equipment to produce quality products according to specified standardsComplete and maintain proper equipment documentation and complete reports as requiredProvide break relief as directed by supervisorProperly document quality documentation as required by processOther duties as assigned by management  Skills Required:  Must be able to communicate effectively Must be able to determine solutions with critical thinkingElectrical and mechanical experience a plusAttention to detail is imperativeBasic math skills are essentialExperience in implementing continuous improvement methodologies a plus (Lean, Six Sigma, 5S, TPM, TOC, SMED, etc.) Experience with manufacturing equipment preferredCNC machine repair and maintenance a plus!  Experience/Schooling/Degree Required:  Candidates should have prior machine mechanic experience Must be 18 years of age or olderAny technical certifications a plus  Ultradent is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regards to race, color religion, sex, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.  VEVRAA Federal Contractor: For more information please contact us at recruiting@ultradent.com",Maintenance Mechanic Job in Riverton,"Full Time, Employee","Riverton, UT 84095",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Riverton-UT-US-165270657.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,b6153d540b6e7c7a3f5af45070b60e02
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Roosevelt State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Utah Postal/Zip Code: 84066 &nbsp; Burdick Materials, is a member of the Oldcastle Materials Mountain West Division; Our purpose, commitment to the future, and formula for growth is to champion the safety, empowerment, and development of our employees.&nbsp; We strive to be The Preferred Source of quality sand, rock, landscape products, ready-mixed concrete, asphalt, paving and construction services.&nbsp; We succeed as a team by embracing integrity, mutual respect, innovation, service, sustainability, and financial strength. &nbsp;&nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; Position Overview &nbsp; This is a skilled position involving the safe and efficient operation of various types of construction equipment including but not limited to Loaders, Back Hoes, Track Hoes, Haul Trucks, Water Trucks, Etc. &nbsp; Key Responsibilities (Essential Duties and Functions) &nbsp; Operate equipment safely and efficiently. Responsible for safe slopes on excavations and proper barricading. Locate utilities and other buried lines prior to digging. Perform minor servicing and maintenance or refer major problems to the supervisor. Knowledge of trenching and shoring standards. Keep time and material records. Knowledge of aggregate sizes and classifications. Knowledge of weight requirements of loads leaving the pit. Travel from interstate highway to rural dirt roads from various locations. May assist Laborer at various job sites as needed.&nbsp; May perform physical tasks involved with laying pipe and utility lines, and/or tasks involved with road construction and laying asphalt, etc. &nbsp; Qualifications &nbsp; To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.&nbsp; The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or ability required.&nbsp; Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disability to perform the essential functions. &nbsp; Education/Experience High school diploma or general education degree (GED) is preferred. &nbsp; Work Requirements Previous heavy equipment operation experience or training is highly preferred. &nbsp; Knowledge/Skill Requirements Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos.&nbsp; Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out detailed, but uninvolved written or oral instructions. Ability to work well with others in a group or one on one setting. &nbsp; Certificates, Licenses, Registrations Valid Driver’s License is preferred &nbsp; &nbsp; Key Competencies Customer Service - Manages difficult or emotional customer situations; Responds promptly to customer needs. Teamwork - Contributes to building a positive team spirit. Judgment - Exhibits sound and accurate judgment. Planning/Organizing - Uses time efficiently. Professionalism - Approaches others in a tactful manner; Reacts well under pressure; Accepts responsibility for own actions. Safety and Security - Observes safety and security procedures; Determines appropriate action beyond guidelines; Reports potentially unsafe conditions; Uses equipment and materials properly. Adaptability - Adapts to changes in the work environment; Changes approach or method to best fit the situation; Able to deal with frequent change, delays, or unexpected events. Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time. Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals. Initiative - Asks for and offers help when needed. Innovation - Generates suggestions for improving work. Quality - Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Applies feedback to improve performance. &nbsp; Physical Requirements &nbsp; The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.&nbsp; Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. &nbsp; The employee is frequently required to sit, climb, and use hands to signal and handle equipment. The employee is occasionally required to stand, walk, crawl, kneel, bend, and reach with hands and arms above their shoulders.&nbsp; The employee must occasionally lift and/or move anywhere up to 50-75 lbs.&nbsp; Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision and depth perception. &nbsp; Work Environment &nbsp; The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.&nbsp; Reasonable accommodation may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. &nbsp; While performing the duties of this Job, the employee is regularly exposed to moving mechanical parts; outside weather conditions and vibration. The employee is occasionally exposed to high, precarious places and risk of electrical shock. The noise level in the work environment is usually loud. &nbsp; The statements included in this job description are not intended to be all-inclusive.&nbsp; They represent typical elements and criteria necessary to successfully perform the job.&nbsp; Other duties may be assigned as required.&nbsp; Requirements for this job are subject to modification by the Company and its designees, and reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Burdick Materials is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Burdick Materials is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp;",Equipment Operator Job in Roosevelt,Full Time Employee,"Roosevelt, UT",,http://jobview.monster.com/Equipment-Operator-Job-Roosevelt-UT-US-166042332.aspx?mescoid=4700802001001&jobPosition=14,,,baa0aee832adb66ade2b0173d330743b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Aramark Aramark (NYSE: ARMK) is in the customer service business across food, facilities and uniforms, wherever people work, learn, recover, and play. United by a passion to serve, our more than 270,000 employees deliver experiences that enrich and nourish the lives of millions of people in 22 countries around the world every day. Aramark is recognized among the Most Admired Companies by FORTUNE and the World’s Most Ethical Companies by the Ethisphere Institute. Learn more at www.aramark.com or connect with us on Facebook and Twitter. Responsibilities Job Summary: Second shift supervisor at Arkansas Children's Hospital 3-11PM. To assist management in maintaining or improving cleanliness quality through inspections, training and employee accountability, including employee counseling or disciplining. Supervisors must build upon established employee or customer relationships, improve employee morale, and help develop subordinates on a continuous basis.   Essential Tasks & Responsibilities: Conduct daily inspections for quality and safety. Make necessary corrections. Understand all employee work assignments and schedule for adequate coverage. Conduct training and retraining as necessary. Follow recommended training process. Maintain effective business relationship with staff. Build upon and develop employee satisfaction and knowledge. Enforce department policies, follow up on daily assignments, and conduct counseling or disciplinary action. Maintain loyalty and honesty with employees, peers, customers and managers. Monitor special projects and on-call or new employees. Tour areas of responsibilities at least 2-4 times daily. Initiate or ensure corrective action is taken. Audit building keys, pagers, and payroll on a daily basis. Ensure all projects, maintenance, or cleaning challenges are communicated effectively for resolution. Control supply inventories and distribute equipment effectively. Supervise equipment performance and make necessary corrections. Assist in performing employee performance evaluations and make recommendations on employee performance ratings. Observe and report the need of furniture or other building fixtures repairs. When necessary, complete custodial work assignments. In case of emergency, perform all duties as assigned. Provide functional/operational support to work area as essential personnel during times of emergency, catastrophe, inclement weather, etc. Complete all other assigned tasks by management in which the employee is capable of performing. Qualifications   High School Diploma or equivalent required. Must be physically able to lift, lower, push and pull objects up to 50 lbs. unassisted. Ability to stand, climb, bend, stoop and crouch for extended periods of time. Must be able to initiate and maintain good customer and co-worker relationships in a team environment. Must have the ability to follow oral or written instructions and directions. Must be able to communicate effectively with both written and verbal skills. Bi-lingual preferred (English and Spanish). Must have the ability to supervise others, demonstrate ""quality customer service"", and good human relations skills. Pays special attention to detail.   Additional Information:Position Start Date: 2016-04-01",Custodial Second Shift Supervisor - Arkansas Childrens Hospital-EVS Job in Little Rock,"Full Time, Employee","Little Rock, AR 72202",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodial-Second-Shift-Supervisor-Arkansas-Childrens-Hospital-EVS-Job-Little-Rock-AR-US-165825917.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,3a654a48baf09dcb9e4e0b418baaf0ca
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Energy Specialist is primarily responsible for completing walk through energy efficiency assessments, the installation of energy efficiency equipment and products, and for deepening customer awareness of and participation in rebate programs and the Utility's energy efficiency program. They are also responsible for responding to general customer inquiries regarding utility services they receive and for directing the customer to the appropriate contact at the utility company. You will also be working with others who are passionate about energy efficiency and making a positive impact on the industry. * Deliver professional, high quality services to utility customers* Complete walk through energy assessments of properties that identify key natural gas and electric saving opportunities (all living space, basement, attic, and exterior perimeter of building)* Install energy saving devices including energy efficiency lighting, programmable thermostats and hot water saving devices* Build quick rapport with utility customers. Initiate conversations with customers regarding energy usage.* Clearly explain and articulate energy assessment findings to building owner including explanation of energy efficiency rebates* Respond to general utility customer service inquiries and explain other energy rebate offerings and services to customers during home visit (Smartmeter, Refrigerator/Freezer Recycling, Lighting and white good rebate programs, on-bill financing, etc.) This could include showing customers short videos on Utility company websites or helping them sign in to their utility account online.* Assist Marketing team as directed in with participation in larger trade show and seminar events.* Actively identify and recommend ways to improve program operations and delivery * Continuously drive improvements in quality, customer satisfaction and productivity * Accurately complete and maintain all required paperwork, records and documents, etc.* Follow and comply with all safety and work rules and regulationsSpecific qualification for the role include:* 2 year Associates degree or equivalent experience* One of the following:o Residential building constructiono Heating and Air Conditioning System install, sales or serviceo Other energy efficiency designations or certificates including:* Advanced Home Energy Professional (HEP)* Building Analyst* Envelope Professional* Residential Building Envelope Whole Hose Air Leakage Controller Installer* Heating* Air Conditioning and Heat Pumpo Air sealing and building insulation experience* & Sit Down – articulate findings and recommendations* BPI Fundamentals or above is a requiremento Two years of previous related work experience* 1-2 years of experience in marketing, community organizing, or a related field - Preferred* Strong interpersonal, interviewing and communication skills. * Must be able to handle a wide work variety and work in a fast paced environment.* Strong data entry skills in entering information in tracking systems/databases.* Home Energy Specialisto Building Science & HVACo Assessment and Visual Inspectiono Customer Interview & Sit Down – articulate findings and recommendationso BPI Fundamentals or above is a requirement* Must be a detail-oriented, organized, self-starter, and have an ability to prioritize workload. * Proficient in Microsoft Office, specifically Word, Excel and Outlook.* Ability to communicate effectively, both verbally and in writing with customers, clients and employees.* Knowledge of mathematical concepts such as fractions, percentages and ratios* Valid driver's license and reliable transportation* Willingness to travel up to 75% of the time Franklin Energy Services nis an Equal Opportunity Employer. Build a rewarding career in a dynamic and growing industry!PI93391363Apply Here",Energy Specialist Job in Bremerton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Bremerton, WA 98310",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Energy-Specialist-Job-Bremerton-WA-US-165815552.aspx?mescoid=1700193001001&jobPosition=20,18.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,b7c2ece167b894006d2f29699d1de45d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Town of Wrightsville Beach, NC is now accepting applications for the position of Facilities Maintenance Mechanic. Please visit the Town's website atwww.townofwrightsvillebeach.com for complete job details and an employment application.",Facilities Maintenance Mechanic Job in Wrightsville Beach,Full Time,"Wrightsville Beach, NC 28480",Government and Military,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Facilities-Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Wrightsville-Beach-NC-US-165197644.aspx?ch=newswtnc&mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,,ace957bb6512936161449cbe89354cbc
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a leading manufacturer and provider of Fire and Security Equipment, seeking an experienced technician for their team in New Jersey. The Fire and Security Equipment Installation Technician will participate in delivery, service or installation jobs, including engineering, drawings, programming, documentation, installation, management of sub-contractors, start-up, testing and customer acceptance. Responsibilities:Coordinates job schedules in conjunction with other subcontractorsTests, calibrates, and verifies systems and peripheral devicesVerifies Fire and Security Systems functional performance to ensure proper operationsPromotes good customer relationshipsMaintains proper documentationKnowledge of customer requirements and participation in preparation of job quotes and upgradesRequirements:High School Diploma or GED required, Degree in Mechanical or Electrical Engineering a plus3 years of experience working with Fire and Security Equipment2 years of experience working with IT networksValid driver's license and solid driving recordExperience working with Access control systems and/or HVAC systems preferredNICET Level I or II Certification preferredAbility to read architectural, mechanical and electrical construction drawingsExperience with system integration, networking and software interfaces",Fire and Security Equipment Installation Technician Job in Morris Plains,Full Time Employee,"Morris Plains, NJ",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Fire-Security-Equipment-Installation-Technician-Job-Morris-Plains-NJ-US-165850125.aspx?mescoid=4900864001001&jobPosition=3,"45,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4b51e31b2b912540f9c232a11ed04bf3
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Andover area client has an immediate need for a Production Sourcing Coordinator. The Production Sourcing Coordinator is heavily involved in pre-production activities to ensure that products are properly designed for manufacturing. This role reports to the Production Manager and works with overseas vendors to provide timely, accurate and efficient production of product orders. Responsibilities include:Coordinate all aspects of product orders from start to finishTrack & ensure on-time delivery Identify and resolve any vendor related issuesEnsure quality control of all products received prior to and during production runsAttend meetings to distribute information about orders, customer requirements and production deadlines Review production approval samplesArrange compliance testing of products to ensure they comply with Government regulationsThis is a full-time, contract-to-hire opportunity paying $40,000/year. Hours are 8:30-5:00, Monday-Friday.  Requirements:Understanding of production processes in a contract-manufacturing environment- vendor relations experience in Asia preferredGood computer skills with proficiency in MS Office programsStrong negotiation and communication skillsMust be detail oriented and have strong organizational skills to manage multiple prioritiesMust work well in a cross-functional team environmentMoore Staffing Services is a people focused staffing firm offering thoughtful and life changing career planning advice and free computer training to our candidates.  Our broad industry expertise includes manufacturing, healthcare, life sciences, construction, technology, human services, academic, financial, insurance and publishing. Need career, interview or resume advice? Have a question about a particular company or industry? Email me at john@moorestaffing.com.  I would love to help you. Accomplish more with Moore! ",Production Sourcing Coordinator Job in North Andover,Full Time,"North Andover, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Sourcing-Coordinator-Job-North-Andover-MA-US-164653028.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=16,"0.00 - 40,000.00 $ /year",,7545cb10c85f6ed1b386fcdac110afff
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"' . General Description:Assemble forklifts, pallet trucks or masts.  Perform mechanical and electrical modifications to trucks in order to satisfy customer requirements.Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Assemble forklifts, pallet trucks or masts using engineering drawings, schematics or verbal direction Operate crane to move larger parts or equipment Perform functional tests and inspections to ensure product quality prior to delivery to the final inspection area Assemble sub-assemblies and wiring harnesses Maintain a clean and orderly work station at all timesQualifications: Automobile or truck mechanic experience preferred Ability to read and interpret engineering drawings and schematics Familiar with hand and power tools Basic computer skills required Attention to details and quality a must Must be able to work flexible hours and overtime on short notice Must be able to stand for an entire shift and lift up to 50 lbs. Welding experience a plus Ability to operate a crane and forklift safelyEducation: High school diploma or equivalentSupervisor Responsibilities: None . '",Mechanical Assembler Job in Summerville,Full Time,"Summerville, SC",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanical-Assembler-Job-Summerville-SC-US-166024700.aspx?mescoid=5100914001001&jobPosition=5,,,6778199da15b12f017a44b2ac4050130
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:40,No,jobs.monster.com," Package Operator  Extreme Adhesives is a growing, top 10 Adhesives & Sealants Company that has more than doubled in size in the past 5 years. Extreme offers a competitive wage rate with a comprehensive benefit programincluding medical, dental, vision, 401k Savings Plan with Company contribution, paid vacation and paid holidays.    Summary of Responsibilities:  Packaging in pails cartridge and pails;Review order and select proper packaging for material;Create proper labels to affix to containers;Complete proper paperwork for packaging;Operating a Fork Lift safely;Maintain good housekeeping standards. Requirements: High School diploma or equivalent;Ability to read, understand and follow directions;Position involves working in manufacturing environment with strict safety policies and rules that employees must abide by. Certain areas of the plant may be dusty, noisy, and odorous. All employees must abide by all Personal Protective Equipment requirements (e.g. company provided steel toed shoes, safety glasses, etc.)With or without accommodation, must be able to climb stairs and ladders, bend and squat, stand for extended period of time, and have the ability to lift 50 pounds.  Royal is an E-Verify Employer and is committed to a drug free workplace.EOE/M/F/D/V   ",Package Operator Job in Raymond,Full Time,"Raymond, NH 03077",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Package-Operator-Job-Raymond-NH-US-165911026.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=10,12.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,237ca60833ed27b041e2082d526bdebd
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are two schedules available for this position:Tuesday-Saturday 3:00 PM to midnight ORMonday-Friday 3:00 PM to midnightSUMMARY Loads, unloads, and moves materials within or near center, cross dock, trailers, yard, or work site by performing the following duties. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES included the following. Other duties may be assigned.Reads work order or follows oral instructions to ascertain materials or containers to be moved. Receives items for shipment, inspects visually for identity, quantity, and condition. Checks for obvious damage and segregates items requiring special handling. Opens containers as directed by work instructions or supervisor. Loads and unloads materials onto or from pallets, trays, racks and shelves by hand or with forklift or other handling equipment. Loads materials into carrier vehicles and installs strapping, bracing or logistic bars padding to prevent shifting or damage in transit. Completes receiving and shipping documents accurately and completely per ProTrans specifications with the scan gun. Counts, weights, and records number of units of materials moved or handled in PTI System. Ensures proper identification. Identifies all shipments by proper marking and labeling, including special handling instructions. Coordinates transportation requirements. Coordinates any special handling problems. Gathers data for preparing reports. Warehouses and stores inbound and outbound cargo awaiting processing and/or onward movement. Stacks or assembles materials into bundles and bands bundles together as direct per work instructions. Lifts heavy objects by hand or with power hoist, and cleans work area, machines, and equipment. Conducts safety and equipment checks daily. Operates machinery such as banding, taping, and sealing. Follows all safety procedures. Actively works to improve individual and center safety record. Actively works for continuous quality improvement. Identifies and implements continual improvement initiatives to enhance the performance of the position, team, and company.REQUIREMENTSHigh School diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Must have at least two years of recent experience with sit down forklift and warehouse experience. Must have basic math skills Scanning experience required Able to lift a maximum of 75 pounds Computer literate Must have experience in shipping/receiving materials Bilingual English/Spanish a plus ",Material Handler Job in Greer,Full Time Employee,"Greer, SC 29650","AllTravel, Transportation and TourismTransport and Storage - Materials",http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-Job-Greer-SC-US-166015512.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,9f2edea1b4ee60d7c915fb5bafd542db
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Project Administrative assistantCompany: Advantage Air Conditioning Of Virginia Inc.Location: Sterling, VA 20164Positions: Administrative SupportIndustry: Commercial/Industrial; Residential/Light Commercial-------------------This position requires you to work hand in hand with construction team and the General Contractors to provide all of the required construction documents not limited to Submittals, RFI's and LEED documents. You will need to speak intelligently with Vendors, Engineers, General Contractors, and our staff to acquire the proper information to perform the processing of the documents.",HVAC Project Administrative assistant Job in Sterling  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Sterling 20164,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Project-Administrative-assistant-Job-Sterling-165472756.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2e1e570f8c91c1b1d9f09fb71fd18a7d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance Mechanic need in Groveport, Ohio.  FARO Logistics, Inc. is currently looking for a Maintenance Mechanic at our Groveport location. The ideal candidate will have basic mechanical aptitude and a desire to improve their mechanical skills. This position will work alongside of our current Maintenance Mechanic and gain additional knowledge and skills in the commercial maintenance area. Candidates must be dependable.  Position is 1st Shift, Mon-Fri 7am – 3pm with occasional overtime  Interested candidates must submit an application and pass a pre-employment police background check. Applications can be found on our website www.farousa.com or can be picked up during office hours (8am-4pm M-F) at: 7070 Pontius RoadGroveport, Ohio 43125 humanresources@farousa.comfax (614) 497-8318 FARO was founded in 1988 in Columbus, Ohio and focused solely on warehousing and transportation services in the Central Ohio area. Today, the company has blossomed into a uniquely diversified organization. With operations in Dallas, TX; Norwalk, CA; Santa Fe Springs, CA; Jacksonville, FL; Chicago, IL and Columbus, OH we’re able to offer our clients a wide array of 3rd party logistics services from coast to coast.  FAROLogisticsSolutionsis an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. It is the philosophy, intent, and commitment of FARO Logistics Solutions, Inc. to adhere to a policy of equal employment opportunities for all applicants and employeeswithoutregardtorace, sex, religion, creed, color, national origin, citizenship, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic characteristics, veteran’s status, age or any other status protected by law.  ",Maintenance Mechanic Job in Groveport,Full Time,"Groveport, OH 43125",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Groveport-OH-US-165230493.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=17,,,34ebf7b3a45ad8950902387b4c5962ff
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: ConfidentialLocation: Porter, TX 77365Positions: Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial; Residential/Light Commercial-------------------Refrigeration/HVAC service technician needed.",HVAC Service Technician Job in Porter  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Porter 77365,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Porter-165428608.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),eb7e01c7b6f5ffb5a40cc1f353bbf16c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Tampa State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Florida Postal/Zip Code: 33619 &nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®, a division of Oldcastle, is the leading supplier of products specified to close the building envelope. They include: custom-engineered curtain wall and window wall, architectural windows, storefront systems, doors, skylights and architectural glass. &nbsp; &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope, Tampa FL&nbsp;is seeking a safety conscious, energetic, self-motivated, team oriented individual to lead the Insulated Section in our Production Department. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;This is a general laborer position performed in a manufacturing environment.&nbsp; Muscular, cardiovascular and upper/lower body manipulation is used to move the glass/object through the glass fabrication process (bending, twisting, and reaching). Gripping, cupping, clamping hand and wrist motions are required to support, carry, and maneuver glass/objects to platform heights of three feet in a manner considered safe for self and others.&nbsp; This position requires that material including glass be moved from one position/location to another in an effort to expedite the glass/object throughout the plant.. The on/off-loading of glass from, tables, rolling racks, delivery trucks, or wood crates for eight or more hours daily. Position requires standing and walking on a concrete floor while wearing steel-toed shoes for eight or more hours daily. The ""team concept"" instituted for shop floor production workers requires each worker to perform different functions on a rotating basis. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;Equipment used:&nbsp; glass carts, crane, pallet jack, glass cups, glass sheet pull tool, tape measure, &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;Employment is contingent on passing a background check, pre-placement physical, and drug screen. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;ONLY ONLINE APPLICATIONS CONSIDERED &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;Requiremen &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;t &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-2+ Years in a Leadership Role &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-The Ability to lift up to 75lbs on a regular basis &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to grasp and squeeze small parts and large items like glass &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Read, understand, and communicate paperwork and labels. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Understand units of measurement and be able to perform general mathematical equations &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to stand on concrete for up to 12 hours per day &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to wear protective sweater, hard hat, steel toe boots, safety glasses and ear plugs &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to work in varied temperatures consistent with same climate conditions of the region (Heat, humidity, etc.) &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;Preference &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Read and use a tape measure. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Flexibility to work in other departments as needed. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to multitask, prioritize and work under time constraints. &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to work with co-workers and supervisors with good teamwork skills &lt;span style=""color: black; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Experience in a manufacturing environment. &lt;span style=""color: black; line-height: 107%; font-family: ""Courier New""; font-size: 9pt; mso-fareast-font-family: ""Times New Roman"";""&gt;-Ability to work 1st or 2nd shifts, Mon-Fri, with periods of required over time before and after normal shift hours and on occasion, Saturday and Sunday. &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®&nbsp;is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®&nbsp;is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. &nbsp;",Insulated Lead - Glass Production - Tampa Job in Tampa,Full Time Employee,"Tampa, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Insulated-Lead-Glass-Production-Tampa-Job-Tampa-FL-US-166042342.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,,baf9d44fcd545b893c466647b86d391f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Twin Mills RV Resort, a full service RV Camping Resort, is currently seeking the following maintenance positions to join their team in Howe, IN.Maintenance Supervisor - Permanent Full TimeMaintenance Level III – Permanent Full TimeMaintenance Level I - Seasonal Part Time (4 positions) Job Responsibilities include but not limited to: General building maintenance and upkeepGrounds maintenance to include general landscapingPool maintenance including chemical application, water testing,  logbook recordingBasic plumbing, electrical, HVAC, and carpentry repairsOther tasks/special projects as assigned RequirementsEducation and Experience: High School diploma or equivalentMinimum of 1 year of relevant work experience in a similar role preferred Skills and Abilities: Valid driver’s license with good driving recordMust be able to lift up to 50 lbsKnowledge of multi unit water and sewer systems operations preferredExperience with basic machinery including tractors, lawn equipment, power toolsOrganizational skills and the ability to pay attention to detailExcellent communication skillsCertain positions are subject to flexible scheduling that may include weekendsProvide exceptional customer service and be a ""team player,"" willing to assist other staff Compensation and Benefits: Competitive payBenefits package available for Permanent Full Time, year round positions To Apply: Contact the Resort direct at (260) 562-3212 and ask for the Resort Manager to schedule an onsite interview. We thank all applicants. Only those selected for an interview will be contacted. No relocation funds are available.                                                                         EOE ",Maintenance Supervisor Job in Howe,Full Time,"Howe, IN 46746",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Supervisor-Job-Howe-IN-US-165373162.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=12,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),4d5ee7f68cf96956053917c78dfba6ce
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Due to continued company growth and expansion, ABRA Auto Body & Glass, a division on Dahl Automotive, is seeking qualified team members for its La Crosse repair center! SIGNIFICANT SIGN-ON BONUS offered for qualified candidates! THE PAINTER PREP is responsible for preparing vehicles for refinishing and other work involved with vehicle painting following the written order and ABRA's operational excellence processes. Auto Body Vo-Tech certificate preferred, but not required. THE PAINTER is responsible for refinishing all vehicles, following the written order and ABRA's operational excellence process. Auto Body Vo-Tech certificate preferred, but not required. THE BODY/COLLISION TECHNICIAN is responsible for repairing vehicles, to restore them to pre-accident condition. Our ideal candidate will have previous, related experience. Auto Body V-Tech certification, and I-CAR ProLevel training all preferred, but not required. These positions play key roles in delivering on ABRA's promise of speed, quality, and guest satisfaction. Candidates with a strong desire to learn and grow as an apprentice are encouraged to apply! ABRA Auto Body & Glass, a division of Dahl Automotive, offers competitive wages and a competitive benefits package including health, dental, 401(k) retirement plan, and paid time off. For more information or to submit a resume, contact: heather@dahlauto.com Pre-employment drug screen is required. We are an equal opportunity employer.",Painter / Body Collision Technician Job in La Crosse,Full Time,"La Crosse, WI 54601",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Painter-Body-Collision-Technician-Job-La-Crosse-WI-US-165664238.aspx?ch=lacrosse&mescoid=4900866001001&jobPosition=14,,,47434046db19742c119d8b8259db16c6
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview: We are the maker, marketer and distributor of branded food products that have been American favorites for decades. Our employees located in more than 20 offices and plants across North America rally around our mission, Reinvigorating Iconic Brands. We work to transform our brands to be more profitable for our customers and more enjoyable for our consumers.   At Pinnacle Foods, every employee has the opportunity to make an impact—from marketing and research & development, to manufacturing, finance and sales—each function plays a critical role in our success. By living our values of trust, candor and ownership we create great relationships that help us deliver results and drive meaningful change for our brands and business.   Responsibilities: SCOPE OF POSITION : The Maintenance Supervisor will be responsible for leading the maintenance, reliability and continuous improvement initiatives of all plant process control equipment, systems and facility. Assist Plant Maintenance and Operations departments in obtaining optimum understanding and training on such systems.   ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Supervise craft personnel that investigate, diagnose, test, calibrate, install, repair, and perform preventative maintenance on all equipment and systems throughout the plant, to ensure optimal asset utilization, safety, food safety, productivity, efficiency and reliability. Provide advanced or specialized knowledge, skills and tools to restore equipment operation and process integrity. Provide support to the Maintenance department, Operators and Engineers to correct malfunctions, enhance performance and promote continuous improvement. Interface with suppliers and OEM’s to properly select equipment and quickly rectify problems. Provide primary, plant-wide support for PLC systems and equipment including software & firmware, processors, I/O, communication networks, programmers, and related equipment. Identify and provide training in the use of advanced electronic equipment and trouble-shooting techniques to diagnose & correct equipment or process malfunctions. Must be able to read and interpret technical drawings and documentation of all types (mechanical, electrical, electronic, schematic, hydraulic, pneumatic, etc.) in order to accurately apply their skills in any particular situation. Assist project management staff in the installation, testing and commissioning of capital equipment. Participate in CI efforts and safety programs throughout the plant and practice safe work practices. Facilitate accurate and adequate equipment spare parts inventories.   SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES : This position provides direct supervision to maintenance staff. Qualifications: QUALIFICATIONS : Candidate must have a minimum of 2-3 years experience as a leader in a manufacturing setting. (high-speed packaging environment a plus) It is desirable to have experience in AutoCAD and be proficient in Microsoft Office applications. Applicant must display electrical/electronic mechanical aptitude and troubleshooting skills down to the component level.   EDUCATION: Bachelor of Science in an Engineering or related discipline, preferred but not required.     EXPERIENCE: Minimum of 3 years of maintenance supervisory experience, required. Minimum of 5 year of related maintenance experience, required. Demonstrated “hands on” management experience. Experience working with capital and controllable expense budgets, preferred. Experience working in a food manufacturing environment, preferred. Experience working with a diverse group of people. Experience facilitating continuous improvement processes in a fast paced manufacturing environment, preferred.   SKILLS/PROFICIENCIES : Strong interpersonal and communication skills and ability to effectively communicate throughout all levels of the organization. Solid analytical skills using tools such as statistics, downtime tracking, mechanical history, project planning, etc. to identify opportunity areas. Ability to use innovative approaches to resolve complex problems. Proficient in PowerPoint, Project Manager, Excel and Word. Ability to quickly come up to speed on complex production processes. Ability to analyze data and information, and to make effective and timely decisions. Ability to work with others to identify opportunities. Ability to work under pressure and to react to situations with a strong sense of urgency. Solid problem solving, project management, multi-tasking and prioritization skills. Detail oriented, organized, reliable and resourceful. Ability to work effectively both independently and within a team environment.       Pinnacle Foods is an Affirmative Action/EEO Employer –qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard toprotected veteran or disability status, race/color, religion, gender, nationalorigin, age, sexual orientation, gender expression, gender identity or anyother legally protected basis.",Supervisor,Full Time Employee,"Fayetteville, AR",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Supervisor-Maintenance-Job-Fayetteville-AR-US-166089546.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=3,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e635f9cea8f4c8988c696d6661137e78
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Purely Med Gas, Inc. is a cutting-edge, growing organization that is a recognized leader in the Medical Gas Systems industry. Founded on integrity, loyalty and a steadfast dedication to our customers, we are searching for a highly motivated Field Service Technician to join our team of specialists. The Field Service Technician is an organized self-starter responsible for the hands-on maintenance, troubleshooting and repair of existing piped Medical Gas and Vacuum systems. Applicant must demonstrate:Superior customer service and communication skillsAdvanced mechanical aptitude; skilled in diagnostics, isolation of issues, and activation of corrective actions plan including basic electricity and controlsA positive, courteous and solution-based mentalitySkills in scheduling, computer reporting, detailed documentation, truck inventory management, attention to detail and accuracyAbility to read and understand service manuals, technical schematics and building floorplansWillingness to travel and work within numerous healthcare facilities throughout the upper Midwest; some after-hours work and overtime opportunities available The wage and benefits package will be based upon the experience and qualifications of the applicant. Paid Holidays and Vacation provided. Training / credentialing programs will be provided. ",Field Service Technician - Medical Gas Job in Minneapolis,Full Time,"Minneapolis, MN",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Medical-Gas-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-165775439.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),402cd21507dda0374b2eaf5f0702d774
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Indianapolis State:&nbsp;&nbsp;Indiana Postal/Zip Code: 46268 &nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®, a division of Oldcastle, is the leading supplier of products specified to close the building envelope. They include: custom-engineered curtain wall and window wall, architectural windows, storefront systems, doors, skylights and architectural glass. &nbsp; Summary &nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®&nbsp;is seeking Full-Time individuals to work in our Indianapolis&nbsp;location. This position involves the operation of a vertical grinder to grind or polish glass edges. The operator tracks, locates, and records edger production on schedules provided by the leader.&nbsp; Essential Duties and Responsibilities &nbsp; Must be able to read and understand sketches and interpret their meaning onto glass edges Must be able to read schedules and understand edger's production demands based on information schedules Operate a grinder to fabricate a quality ground or polished edge Operate overhead crane and vacuum lift Perform routine maintenance on machines Complete daily work sheets and forms&nbsp; Adherence to all safety policies and procedures when performing tasks&nbsp; &nbsp; Skills, Knowledge, and ability Requirements &nbsp; Basic computer familiarity&nbsp; Ability to read and use a tape&nbsp;measure Read and perform mathematical calculations and measurements with numbers, fractions, and decimals Use of edging machine, dolly, crane,&nbsp;glass cups, tape measure, pliers, glass cutter, and other various tools &nbsp; Physical Requirements &nbsp; Ability to lift, &nbsp;bend, twist, walk, and reach frequently Must have the ability to lift and/or move up to 75&nbsp;lbs unassisted Ability to work in varied temperatures consistent with same climate conditions of the region (Heat, cold, humidity, etc.) &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®&nbsp;is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Oldcastle BuildingEnvelope ®&nbsp;is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. &nbsp;",Glass Edger Operator - nd Shift - Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Glass-Edger-Operator-2nd-Shift-Indianapolis-IN-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-166065041.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,,,6792a25b196496c96f52267eb3b1580e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Currently there is a need for an experienced Reefer Technician in the south end of Chicago, Il. Technicians must be able to complete basic trailer maintenance as well as repair reefer components. Engine diagnostics, 608/609 certification, and experience working with refrigerant is preferred. 2+ years' experience working in a Truck/Trailer Maintenance setting is required. Military Mechanics are welcome to apply!! Must have a valid driver's license. Background checks will be completed.Compensation:$20.00 - $27.00/hour. Starting wage will depend on previous experience. Comprehensive Benefits available after the 90 day probationary period. Signing Bonus available on a case by case basis.Shifts:Days, 8:00am - 5:00pm (Monday - Friday).We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Reefer Technician Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Reefer-Technician-Job-Chicago-IL-US-165812277.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=7,,,e1b9dc7153658b6fb83dae96c909c73c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Mazak CNC MFG   / Programmer positions in SE USA  1)  western NC   mazak integrex and variaxis..  any CAM software   ok but MUST be good with some cam software.  will manage 2.  process planning, tooling, etc..   medical environment  new  position in new dept. (also  need setup person)2)NE FLA  Mazak mill, lathe, and preferbale Integrex Milltuyn  expert for all round SR MFG engineering.   3D printing a plus.   If not, will be trained.   Mazak 3 and WILL  Pay $$  ""need a true superstar, guru, smart, hard working and a a leader.  Willing to pay premium salary to get the best there is"" I need a true superstar, guru, smart, hard working and a a leader.  Willing to pay premium salary to get the best there is.  It’s a very exciting opportunity for someone. IF MANAGERAL CANIDATE WILL PAY to 100k  but not higher4)  Georgia   Combination of mastercam  and mazaks including 2 new Integrexs 4) North Carolina   setup and programmer  mazaks, okumas, fadals, Moris..   strong with tooling as well CAD/CAM Recruiters also has many  positions  inlc   in SE USA   other.  If we  can be of help let us know.   we are not on any ""networks""  so resumes  stays just with us. resume to bill(AT)cadcamrecruiters. (DOTKOM) with details   please (where? what looking for etc ideal job)    resume in word  preferred  not PDF   www.cadcamrecruiters.com    since 1981   please send me details with resume though or  call me direct   541 **1100  area code( 704) keywords  mazak machinist  mazak machinist powermill powershape UGNX programmer  ugnx nc programmer ug/postbuilder  post-processor developerUGNX CNC programmer   UG programmer grip nc programmer open api  UG CNC programmerUGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer mold designer mold designermastercam programmer edgecam programmer smartcam nc programmer hypermill programmer powerrmill nc programmer powermill programmer bobcad nc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer mastercam post developer manufacturing engineer jobs cnc manufacturing engineer UG CNC  roeders  high speed machining  engraving embossing jobs moldmaker jobs master moldmaker  roeders high speed machining lang machines  lang engraving featurecam  partmaker programmer delcam programmer  featurecam nc programmer surfcam programmer surfcam programmer gibbscam nc programmer  gibbscam cnc programmer vericut solicam esprit nc programmer  esprit cnc programmer  dptechnology C++ software developer featurecam  sinker edm sinker edm  charm,illesprgrammer  C++ MILL/lathe software developer murata chiron deckel mazak integrex  mazatrol programmer  mazak quadrex mazak integrex  mori-seki NT series okuma multus IGF programmer winpro IGF programming ironcad teksoft procam nexus 5 axis programmer mill-turns  millturn programmer toolmaker moldmaker moldflow willemin  willemin mikrons  delcam  powermill okuma multus  open-mind  hypermill MORI MATSUURA cimatron cimatroncnc machinist  cnc programmer cnc machinist etc mastercam NC programmer  mastercam 5 axis programmer   cnc programmer  router programmer   mastercam x4  5 axis cnc programmer hanwha lathes screw machines, screw machine jobs, screw machining jobs, Swiss CNC screw machines, Swiss CNC screw machine jobs, Swiss CNC screw machining jobs, Swiss CNC jobs, CNC machines, CNC machine jobs, CNC machining jobs, and CNC jobs.  Swiss screw machines, Swiss screw machine jobs, Swiss screw machining jobs, Swiss CAM screw machines, Swiss CNC Jobs, Swiss CNC careers, Swiss Type Cam screw machines, and Swiss Lathes.  candidates include Citizen Cincom, Turrett, Collets, Swiss CAM screw machine jobs, Swiss CAM machining jobs, Swiss CAM jobs, machine tools, machine tool jobs, manufacturing jobs, sales jobs, engineering jobs, precision machining jobs, production machining jobs, Acme screw machines, Acme Gridley and Allen Bradley.  We often look for Bechler, Bridgeport, Brown & Sharpe screw machines, Bryant, Chiron, Cimco, Cincinnati, Cincom Citizen,  and Citizen screw machines.  Resources Group job opportunities, opportunities, Tom Medvec jobs, Other equipment includes Maier, Hanwa, KMX, Cone Blanchard, Conomatic, Davenport screw machines, Deco, Emco, Escomatic, Wire EDM machines, Euroturn automatic screw machines, Fadal, Fanuc controls, Fusion controls, Gatling, rubber molds rubber molds Gibbs, Giddings & Lewis, Gildemeister, Gorton, Greenlee, Griffo Bros,  and Haas.  Medvec Resources Group also looks for Hardinge, Hitachi Seiki, Howa,mazak integrex  Hurco, Hydromat, Index, Integrex, Kingsbury,mold designer mold design  cimtron designer cimatron designer mold designer jobs injection mold jobs vacuum mold jobs cimtron mold designer jobs Kitamura, Kummer, Makino, Matsuura, Mazak, rubber molds injection molds Mazak Integrex, Mazatrol, Miyano screw machines, Mori Seiki, Nakamura, National Acme, National Cold Heading Machines,  and New Britain.  Other equipment also includes Nomura, Okuma, Omni Turn, Peterman, Petermann, Sabre, Schutte  star lathe  swiss lathe  mold design jobs  mold designer  powermill jobs pwershape jobs swiss lathe programmer swiss lathe machinist  traub lathe citizen lathes  star lathes nomura lathes tsugami lathes citizen wincnc marubeni winTS  winpager  a-20 a-16  a-32  fixed barstock bl12/25 lergocad grinding engineer   grinding Manufacturing engineer thermwood router  thermwood programmer esprit cnc programmer esprit nc programmer stra lathes citizen lathes wiss programmer  mastercam programmerstamping dies die engineer stamping engineer trim dies punch dies stamping engineer trim dies cnc supervisor lockheed gneral dynamics  northrup grumman cnc mananger cnc foreman  cnc supervisor swiss lathe citien lathe 5 axis programmer mastercam guru mastsrcam expert  mazak lathe mazak machinistmastercam cnc programmer UGNX CNC programmer   Unigraphics cnc programmer  UGNC programmer MILLTURN PROGRAMMER partmaker partmaker  partmaker mazak integrex  masetrcam programmer  mastercam cnc programmer mazak machinist UGNX programmer  ugII nc programmer ug/postbuilder  post-processor developer UGNX CNC programmer  UG programmer grip nc programmer open api  UG CNC programmerUGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmer catia cnc programmer  catia cnc prgrammermastercam programmer edgecam programmer smartcam nc programmer hypermill programmer powerrmill nc programmer powermill programmer bobcad nc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer mastercam post developer manufacturing engineer jobs cnc manufacturing engineer UG CNC  roeders  high speed machining  engraving embossing jobs moldmaker jobs master moldmaker  roeders high speed machining lang machines  lang engraving featurecam  partmaker programmer delcam programmer  featurecam nc programmer surfcam programmer surfcam programmer gibbscam nc programmer  gibbscam cnc programmer vericut solicam esprit nc programmer  esprit cnc programmer  dptechnology C++ software developer featurecam sinker edm sinker edm charm,illesprgrammer  C++ MILL/lathe software developer murata chiron deckel mazak integrex  mazatrol programmer mazak quadrex mazak integrex  mori-seki NT series okuma multis IGF programmer winpro IGF programming ironcad teksoft procam nexus 5 axis programmer mill-turns millturn programmer Mazatrol proficiency MAZAK INTEGREX MAZAK VARIAXIS MAZAK QUICKTURN MAZATROL FUSION MAZATROL MATRIX mazak 300y MAZAK 300hy mazak fh1080 MAZAK eia PROGRAMMER MAZAK camware PROGRAMMER MAZAK qtn-250 mazakeai / iso programming       Mazak Variaxis 630 - 5X (5-axis)edgecam partmaker featurecam swiss lathes surfcam gibbscam gibbs cam unigraphics nc programmer catia nc programmer worknc tebis hypermill delcam powermill mastercam alphcam NC programmer CNC process engineer BSME BSME CAD/CAM teamcenter PLM enovia smartcam smartcamcnc gibbscam programmer giobbs cam gibbs programmer matsercam oprgrammer cnc programmer CNC PROGRAMMER CNC MANUFACTURING ENGINEER CNC MACHINIST heidenhain control mikrons willemans starcnc citizen lathe esprit NC programmer esprit cnc programmer willemins unigraphics trainer catia trainer cnc instructor machining instructor  5 axis NC programmer 5 axis cnc programmer 7 axis cnc programmer mazak integrex nexus mazatrol Star screw machines, Strohm, Swiss screw machines, Swiss CAM screw machine tools, Torin, Tornos screw machines, Tornos Bechler, Tornos Deco, Toyoda, Traub screw machines, Tsugami screw machines, Ultramatic, Unigraphics, and Warner & Swasey, Wasino, Wenzel, Wickman, Yasnac controls, calipers, collets, turret, single spindle, single spindled screw machines, multi spindle, multi-spindled, multiple spindled screw machines, axis, multi-axis, automatic screw machines, screw machine tools, live tools, cold forming, cold heading, hydraulics, pneumatics, manufacturing, processes, HMC, VMC, HTC, Pro-Engineer, Pro-E, production machining and high volume machining.  precision machining, cnc machining, Swiss machining, Swiss CNC machining, Swiss CNC screw machining, Transfer Machining, vertical mill, horizontal mill, mills, vmc, hmc, multi-axis mills, fanuc controls, Transfer Machines, single-spindle, singlespindle, multispindle, pneumatics, Swiss CNC Lathes, Swiss CNC mills, Swiss CAM machining grinding cnc turning centers, cnc machining centers, micrometers, mikrons, CNC coil link machining, wire forming machines, maintenance, tooling, and quality., supervisor, foreman, leadman, president, vice president, general manager, business unit manager, product manager, plant manager, operations manager, vp of operations, shop manager, manufacturing manager, department manager, manufacturing supervisor, production manager, production supervisor, machine center supervisor, engineering manager, Director of Engineering, manufacturing engineer, process engineer, estimating engineer, applications engineer, tooling engineer and field service technician., electrical controls engineer, maintenance manager, maintenance technician and project management project manager, project engineer, cnc programmer, delcam trainer mastercam trainer  Swiss CNC programmer, setup, set up operator, machinist, machining specialist, quality manager, quality engineer, quality assurance, quality inspector, quality control, supplier quality engineer, supplier quality, mechanical inspector, sales account manager, sales manager, national sales manager, regional sales manager, machine tools sales manager, and sales engineer.  sales representative, Lean manufacturing, continuous improvement, hydraulics, calipers, Rizmatic, Eubama, Tonshoft, automatic screw machines, turmat, Wirth Et Gruffat, CNC Turning, SPC, Master CAM, autocad, cad, cam, kaizen, kan ban and APQP ASQE, BSME, FMEA, PFMEA, PPAP, JIT, 8D, EDM, FDA, GMP, GD&T, M&G Codes, MRO, 5S, MPS, MP2, MRP, R&D, OEM, R&D, RF, TPM, CMM, RF, PLC, CNC controllers, Six Sigma, Quality Professionals, Root cause analysis, corrective actions, auditing, supplier auditing, process audit, supplier development, PPAP Coordinator, A.I.A.G, AIAG, CQM, CQE, 7-Y, 5-Y, control plans, Gage R&R, Gauge R&R, SPC, QS-9000, QS9000, QS 9000, TS-16949, TS16949, ISO-13485, ISO-9000, and root cause., CQM, CQE, CQA, CQT, GMP, medical device, process validation, FDA, metrology, program manager, first article, QMS, process audits, system audits, ASQ, QSR, vendor surveys, and testing. Supplier Quality Engineer, six sigma black belt, precision metals, rotary transfer, robotics, automated assembly, automation, fluid power, medical device manufacturing, automotive manufacturing, aerospace manufacturing, commercial components, consumer products, military manufacturing and industrial manufacturing manufacturing engineering positions grinding engineer grinding Manufacturing engineer thermwood router thermwood programmer grinding specialist grinder engineer grinding engineer grinding programmer  grinder programmer edgecam partmaker featurecam swiss lathes surfcam gibbscam gibbs cam unigraphics nc programmer catia nc programmer worknc tebis hypermill  delcam powermill mastercam alphcam NC programmer  CNC process engineer BSME BSME  CAD/CAM teamcenter PLM enovia mazak mazatrol okuma multus fanuc robdtil mori-seiki NT series HAAS REPAIR MORI-SEIKI REPAIR HURCO REPAIR CITIZEN LATHE REPAIR  STAR LATHE REPAIR MIKRON REPAIR heidenhain controls iTNC530 control WILLIMEN REPAIR MATSURRA REPAIR MAZAK REPAIR  MAZATROL REPAIR  CNC MAINTANANCE ENGINEER  CNC REPAIRMAN CNC SERVICE REPAIR MAINTNANCE MANAGER  MACHINE TOOL REPAIR MACHINE TOOL REPAIR MACHINE TOOL MAINTENNANCE CNC REPAIR  LECTRONIC REPAIR FANUC REPAIR FANUC MAINTANACE CMM REPAIR BROWN AND SHARPE PC DMAS OKUMA REPAIR deckel maho dmg multus mill-turn mill turns haascnc CNC PROGRAMMER CNC MANUFACTURING ENGINEER CNC MACHINIST edgecam partmaker featurecam swiss lathes surfcam gibbscam gibbs cam unigraphics nc programmer catia nc programmer worknc tebis hypermill delcam powermill mastercam alphcam NC programmer CNC process engineer BSME BSME CAD/CAM teamcenter PLM enovia smartcam smartcamcnc mazatrol programmer mazatrol matrix CNC PROGRAMMER CNC MANUFACTURING ENGINEER CNC MACHINIST heidenhain control mikrons willemans starcnc citizen lathe esprit NC programmer esprit cnc programmer Blanchard, Conomatic, Davenport screw machines, Deco, Emco, Escomatic, Wire EDM machines, Euroturn automatic screw machines, Fadal, Fanuc controls, Fusion controls, Gatling, rubber molds rubber molds Gibbs, Giddings & Lewis, Gildemeister, Gorton, Greenlee, Griffo Bros,  and Haas. Medvec Resources Group also looks for Hardinge, Hitachi Seiki, Howa, Hurco, Hydromat, Index, Integrex, Kingsbury,mold designer mold design  cimtron designer cimatron designer mold designer jobs injection mold jobs vacuum mold jobs cimtron mold designer jobs Kitamura, Kummer, Makino, Matsuura, Mazak, rubber molds injection molds Mazak Integrex, Mazatrol, Miyano screw machines, Mori Seiki, Nakamura, National Acme, National Cold Heading Machines,  and New Britain.  Other equipment also includes Nomura, Okuma, Omni Turn, Peterman, Petermann, Sabre, Schutte  star lathe swiss lathe  mold design jobs  mold designer  powermill jobs pwershape jobs swiss lathe programmer swiss lathe machinist  traub lathe citizen lathes  star lathes nomura lathes tsugami lathes citizen wincnc marubeni winTS  winpager  a-20 a-16  a-32  fixed barstock bl12/25 lergocad grinding engineer   grinding Manufacturing engineer  thermwood router  thermwood programmer esprit cnc programmer esprit nc programmer stra lathes citizen lathes wiss programmerstamping dies die engineer stamping engineer trim dies punch dies stamping engineer trim dies cnc supervisor lockheed gneral dynamics  northrup grumman cnc mananger cnc foreman  cnc supervisor swiss lathe citien lathe 5 axis programmer mastercam guru mastsrcam expert  mazak lathe mazak machinistmastercam cnc programmer UGNX CNC programmer   Unigraphics cnc programmer  UGNC programmer MILLTURN PROGRAMMER partmaker partmaker  partmaker mazak integrex  masetrcam programmer  mastercam cnc programmer mazak machinist UGNX programmer  ugII nc programmer ug/postbuilder  post-processor developer UGNX CNC programmer  UG programmer grip nc programmer open api  UG CNC programmerUGNX cnc programmer ug nc programmermastercam programmer edgecam programmer smartcam nc programmer hypermill programmer powerrmill nc programmer powermill programmer bobcad nc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer unigraphics cnc programmer mastercam post developer manufacturing engineer jobs cnc manufacturing engineer UG CNC  roeders  high speed machining  engraving embossing jobs moldmaker jobs master moldmaker  roeders high speed machining lang machines  lang engraving featurecam  partmaker programmer delcam programmer  featurecam nc programmer surfcam programmer surfcam programmer gibbscam nc programmer  gibbscam cnc programmer vericut solicam esprit nc programmer  esprit cnc programmer  dptechnology C++ software developer featurecam sinker edm sinker edm charm,illesprgrammer  C++ MILL/lathe software developer murata chiron deckel mazak integrex  mazatrol programmer mazak quadrex mazak integrex mori-seki NT series okuma multis IGF programmer winpro IGF programming ironcad teksoft procam nexus 5 axis programmer mill-turns millturn programmer Mazatrol proficiency MAZAK INTEGREX MAZAK VARIAXIS MAZAK QUICKTURN MAZATROL FUSION MAZATROL MATRIX mazak 300y MAZAK 300hy mazak fh1080 MAZAK eia PROGRAMMER MAZAK camware PROGRAMMER MAZAK qtn-250 mazakeai / iso programming Mazak Variaxis 630 - 5X (5-axis)edgecam partmaker featurecam swiss lathes surfcam gibbscam gibbs cam unigraphics nc programmer catia nc programmer worknc tebis hypermill delcam powermill mastercam alphcam NC programmer CNC process engineer BSME BSME CAD/CAM teamcenter PLM enovia smartcam smartcamcnc gibbscam programmer giobbs cam gibbs programmer matsercam oprgrammer cnc programmer CNC PROGRAMMER CNC MANUFACTURING ENGINEER CNC MACHINIST heidenhain control mikrons willemans starcnc citizen lathe esprit NC programmer esprit cnc programmer willemins unigraphics trainer catia trainer cnc instructor machining instructor  5 axis NC programmer 5 axis cnc programmer 7 axis cnc programmer mazak integrex nexus mazatrol Star screw machines, Strohm, Swiss screw machines, Swiss CAM screw machine tools, Torin, Tornos screw machines, Tornos Bechler, Tornos Deco, Toyoda, Traub screw machines, Tsugami screw machines, Ultramatic, Unigraphics, and Warner & Swasey, Wasino, Wenzel, Wickman, Yasnac controls, calipers, collets, turret, single spindle, single spindled screw machines, multi spindle, multi-spindled, multiple spindled screw machines, axis, multi-axis, automatic screw machines, screw machine tools, live tools, cold forming, cold heading, hydraulics, pneumatics, manufacturing, processes, HMC, VMC, HTC, Pro-Engineer, Pro-E, production machining and high volume machining.  precision machining, cnc machining, Swiss machining, Swiss CNC machining, Swiss CNC screw machining, Transfer Machining, vertical mill, horizontal mill, mills, vmc, hmc, multi-axis mills, fanuc controls, Transfer Machines, single-spindle, singlespindle, multispindle, pneumatics, Swiss CNC Lathes, Swiss CNC mills, Swiss CAM machining grinding cnc turning centers, cnc machining centers, micrometers, mikrons, CNC coil link machining, wire forming machines, maintenance, tooling, and quality., supervisor, foreman, leadman, president, vice president, general manager, business unit manager, product manager, plant manager, operations manager, vp of operations, shop manager, manufacturing manager, department manager, manufacturing supervisor, production manager, production supervisor, machine center supervisor, engineering manager, Director of Engineering, manufacturing engineer, process engineer, estimating engineer, applications engineer, tooling engineer and field service technician., electrical controls engineer, maintenance manager, maintenance technician and project management project manager, project engineer, cnc programmer, delcam trainer mastercam trainer  Swiss CNC programmer, setup, set up operator, machinist, machining specialist, quality manager, quality engineer, quality assurance, quality inspector, quality control, supplier quality engineer, supplier quality, mechanical inspector, sales account manager, sales manager, national sales manager, regional sales manager, machine tools sales manager, and sales engineer.  sales representative, Lean manufacturing, continuous improvement, hydraulics, calipers, Rizmatic, Eubama, Tonshoft, automatic screw machines, turmat, Wirth Et Gruffat, CNC Turning, SPC, Master CAM, autocad, cad, cam, kaizen, kan ban and APQP ASQE, BSME, FMEA, PFMEA, PPAP, JIT, 8D, EDM, FDA, GMP, GD&T, M&G Codes, MRO, 5S, MPS, MP2, MRP, R&D, OEM, R&D, RF, TPM, CMM, RF, PLC, CNC controllers, Six Sigma, Quality Professionals, Root cause analysis, corrective actions, auditing, supplier auditing, process audit, supplier development, PPAP Coordinator, A.I.A.G, AIAG, CQM, CQE, 7-Y, 5-Y, control plans, Gage R&R, Gauge R&R, SPC, QS-9000, QS9000, QS 9000, TS-16949, TS16949, ISO-13485, ISO-9000, and root cause., CQM, CQE, CQA  mastercam programmer mastercam cnc programmere spindle, single spindled screw machines, multi spindle, multi-spindled, multiple",mazak programmer/ Manufacturing engineer Job in Charlotte,Full Time,"Charlotte, NC 28210",,http://jobview.monster.com/mazak-programmer-Manufacturing-engineer-Job-Charlotte-NC-US-161726606.aspx?mescoid=1700194001001&jobPosition=4,"58,000.00 - 82,000.00 $ /yearbonuses",,d3d8feec4a0f3c131db6f22afacfe4ab
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"I.                   JOB DESCRIPTION              TITLE:  Janitor/Maintenance Tech             DEPARTMENT: Operations                                                                  FLSA:  Exempt                                     REPORTS TO: HR & Operations Director Hours: Monday  to Friday, 11 am to 7:30 pm  Salary: $50,000 plus comprehensive benefit package including:  1. Medical and dental benefits at a very competitive cost with company cost sharing.  The company pays 60% of the insurance premiums for individual plans and 40% of the insurance premiums for 2 party and family plans2.      A Flexible Spending Account and Dependent Care Account fundable with Pre-tax dollars4.      Company paid Life Insurance (there is no cost to employee; benefit is one year's salary paid to  designated beneficiary).5.      Company paid Long Term Disability (no cost to employee; covers 60% of pay if circumstances qualify for LTD status).6.      A 401k plan (Eligible to sign up for the 401k plan after a one year waiting period and during open enrollment).7.    Paid Time Off including earned sick time, some holidays, and accrued vacation days after 90 day probationary period  Description Futures Clinic is a non-profit, full-year school for children with autism and other related disabilities. Janitor/Maintenance Tech is to perform a variety of daily janitorial, custodial and general minor maintenance tasks to ensure cleanliness and safety of the building, vehicles and grounds.  Job Duties/Responsibilities:Vacuuming, sweeping, and mopping of flooring and stairs.Shampoo carpets as needed.General paintingStrip & wax floors when school is closed for vacations/holidays.Clean and sanitize bathrooms and clean mirrors.Clean sinks, countertops, microwaves, and refrigerators in break rooms.Restock supplies in bathrooms, break rooms and common areas.Empty all trash cans and replace liners, clean receptacles as necessary.Dusting and cleaning office desks, furniture & window sills that are not cluttered.Wash windows, walls or glass as needed.At the end of each day either wash dishes left in sink or fill/empty dishwasher as necessary.At the end of each day, ensure all lights in the building are off.Inventory & purchase of cleaning supplies, paper product & soap for building.Maintain janitor closets in a clean, organized and safe manner.Maintain janitorial equipment in a clean, safe and operable condition.Proper labeling, dilution and use of all chemicals.Clean up cafeteria during student lunch shifts.Clean up occasional urine, vomit, and other student bodily fluids. Clean spills/toilet overflows and other hazards with proper supplies.Shovel/Sweep/Salt all sidewalks/employee entrances & vehicles in the winter if necessary after landlord completes.Change light bulbs in overhead fixtures and emergency exit signs and lights as needed.Hang pictures/white boards/posters properly on office walls as requested.Perform minor plumbing repairs such as plunging toiletsReplace electrical outlet covers as needed.Replace ceiling tiles as needed.Obtain quotes for large building repair/maintenance.Greet and monitor outside contractors entering building for repair work. Once repairs are completed follow up with the Office Manager. Table set-up/tear down for special occasions, meetings or eventsOccasional moving of furniture.Other routine maintenance duties as assigned.Notify Office Manager when building needs major repairs.Maintain all company vehicles (gas, oil changes, windshield wiper fluids, inspection stickers). Essential Functions:  Bathroom/kitchen cleaning/sanitizing, vacuuming/mopping floors, dusting, emptying trash, general minor building & vehicle maintenance.  Supervision Received and Given:  Position will report to the HR, but maintenance work order system will be initiated and employee will be expected to work independently most of the time with flexibility to move from job to job with janitorial work being top priority to keep office clean and orderly.  Educational Requirements:Good communication and interpersonal skills.Good client/customer service skills.Ability to follow oral and written instructions.Ability to prioritize multiple tasks.Ability to work effectively with a team.Ability to work independently as needed to support the group effort.Basic knowledge of cleaning products or willing to learn.Some experience with minor repair work such as patching/painting walls, minor plumbing repairs, hanging/anchoring pictures/boards on wall.Ability to stand or be on feet for good portion of the dayAbility to lift 50+ pounds on occasionAbility and willingness to do occasional work on ladder Experience/Knowledge/Skills:High School Diploma or GEDSix months or more of related experienceValid Massachusetts Driver’s License requiredComputer literate or willingness/ability to learn email system and potential computerized Work Order System",Janitor/Maintenance Tech Job in Beverly,Full Time,"Beverly, MA 01915",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Janitor-Maintenance-Tech-Job-Beverly-MA-US-165861507.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,"50,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),cce22dea0f8d4dad68916796c81ece9e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Checkered Flag is the largest locally-owned dealership group in Virginia. At Checkered Flag we don't just sell cars, we provide a complete car buying experience. We are the preferred automotive team in Virginia Beach and Norfolk; and we deliver the highest level of employee satisfaction.As a Body Technician at Checkered Flag, you will be at the forefront of the automotive industry. You will have the opportunity to work with the latest equipment and technology in state-of-the-art facilities.  ResponsibilitiesThe Checkered Flag Body Shop is under new management and is looking for a master class “A” Autobody Technician/Body Shop Foreman.As a Body Technician, each day will bring new opportunities, but you will always be involved in:Perform work as outlined on repair estimate assigned with efficiency and accuracy, in accordance with dealership and factory standards.Advise Collision Consultant immediately if additional work or parts are needed, if work outlined is not needed, or if repairs cannot be completed within the time promisedLearning new product and technical information and techniques to stay proficient in automotive parts QualificationsWe are looking for someone who is high energy, driven, and has proven customer service skills. A successful candidate will be highly detail-oriented with solid organizational and time-management skills, possess excellent communication and interpersonal skills, along with strong customer service and active-listening abilities.  Applicants must have at least 8 years of experience, excellent references and produce only first class work.  Training is a plus to include either I-CAR, ASE, manufacturer training, Chief certifications or a combination of the above. Position requires attention to detail, ability to “blueprint” the repair to the most minor components and fasteners, ability to work on high line vehicles with prompt cycle times, and excellent communication skills with management, the crew, and insurance representatives. The ideal candidate is someone with a winning attitude who sees obstacles as opportunities.High school diploma or equivalentI-CAR, ASE, manufacturer training and/or Chief certificationsSomeone with dealership experience preferredPassion to change a onetime customer into a “Customer for Life” BenefitsAt Checkered Flag, we realize our employees are our number one asset. That is why we offer continued growth opportunities for employees who have talent, energy, and ambition to succeed in a world class environment.  Take a look at some of the benefits you will enjoy as a member of our team! A sign-on bonus is available based on skill level and experience and relocation assistance maybe available. Checkered Flag is a large dealer group specializing in high line vehicles and we are always very busy.Medical, dental, vision coverage and more!Company paid Life and Short Term Disability Insurance401(k) retirement savings plan with Company profit sharingPaid Time OffPaid day to participate in local charity eventsReferral bonusesPaid trainingRecognition events to recognize top performersEmployee and family discounts Come and join a dynamic industry leader!  If you are looking for a phenomenal career as a Body Technician, Checkered Flag is the place for you.Apply now at: https://workforcenow.adp.com/jobs/apply/posting.html?client=cfmcco&jobId=47658&lang=en_US #Check out our website at www.checkeredflag.com !All applications and resumes are kept strictly confidential. Checkered Flag Motor Car Company, Inc. is an EEO Employer and a Drug Free Workplace.",Body Technician Job in Virginia Beach,Full Time,"Virginia Beach, VA 23453",,http://jobview.monster.com/Body-Technician-Job-Virginia-Beach-VA-US-163851985.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=15,,,7df04ec78b62aa2338cb6c38a642d522
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you need to RE-TOOL your career?Do you want to work for an internationally known and industry leading manufacturer of precision tooling products?  Then Guhring, Inc. is the place for you. Guhring, a subsidiary of globally recognized Guehring oHG is currently seeking a 2ND SHIFT BRAZER for our Brookfield, WI facility. Guhring designs and builds its own multi-axis CNC universal grinding machines and robotic auto-loading accessories used to manufacture precision cutting tools from solid carbide blanks.The BRAZER is responsible to set up and operate an induction coil brazing machine to perform a variety of brazing related functions with polycrystalline diamond (PCD) imbedded tooling to  customer specifications. Preps tool bodies for last stage cutting surface finishing. Perform frequent changeovers for small quantity custom orders. *Training will occur on 1st shift initially before switching to a 2nd/3rd shift training*PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBLITIES:Receive and review work assignments; verify that work pieces and routing match regarding count, type and proper sequence. Assignments require intricate work and very close tolerances.Follow established procedures for machine set up, including; select proper coil size, V-blocks and programs or temperature values to be used;Applying appropriate type of brazing wire or paste to the cutting tool body where a PCD chip will be inserted and attach the chip(s) per print specifications.Use the brazing machine to melt/cure the flux and then clean off any excess material from cutting tool body.Continually inspecting finished tools for correct dimensions.Enter all production information into the data collection system.Monitor equipment performance; report problems and request required maintenance to avoid unnecessary downtime and machine damage or repairs.Perform SPC procedures on all jobs.Perform all other duties as assigned.Responsible for keeping area clean at all times.SKILLS/EXPERIENCE:Previous experience with basic machine operation or related technical training.Familiarity with brazing or soldering operations requiring attention to detail.Must be able to read, understand and follow written instructions and shop drawings.Must be able to use required precision measuring and testing equipment.",ND SHIFT - BRAZER/SOLDERER Job in Brookfield,Full Time,"Brookfield, WI 53008",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/2ND-SHIFT-BRAZER-SOLDERER-Job-Brookfield-WI-US-166069309.aspx?mescoid=5100950001001&jobPosition=4,"Position is intended as a Temp-to-Hire. Once hired on, eligible for standard benefits package - health, dental, vision, 401k, STD, LTD, vacation, paid holidays.",Entry Level,d52471a0c5390ed963eeb399afb0478f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance Technician openings with this manufacturing client located in the Lakeland, FL area for first, second, and third shifts. These positions will be responsible for providing technical support to manufacturing operations by installing, testing, diagnostic trouble shooting and repairing production assembly equipment. Overtime is typically available. Local candidates or those able to self relocate as there is no relocation allowance.Responsibilities for the Maintenance TechnicianProviding technical support to manufacturing operations by installing, testing, diagnostic trouble shooting and repairing production assembly equipmentPerform daily scheduled as well as unscheduled maintenance to include mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, and pneumatic equipmentRequirements for the Maintenance Technician3-5 years experience in a manufacturing, technical, or mechanical environmentAny experience working in a high volume manufacturing, technical, or mechanical environment is a plusBenefitsThis Job is located in Lakeland, FL -> United States",Maintenance Technician - Manufacturing/Hydraulic/Pneumatic / Mechanical Job in Lakeland,Full Time Employee,"Lakeland, FL 33805",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Manufacturing-Hydraulic-Pneumatic-Mechanical-Job-Lakeland-FL-US-165294086.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=3,"48,730.00 - 48,730.00 $ /year",,96ff22dbdf46556911c16be4b9b0a81c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:03:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a new and exciting opportunity to use your skills in a successful and growing company? Do you desire a fast-paced, casual work environment that is driven by employees who thrive on innovative thinking?  If you have a desire to work in an energetic, collaborative environment, then check out this opportunity at Proto Labs! About Proto Labs: Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Proto Labs Is: #4 on Forbes list of Best Small Public Companies in the United States 2nd fastest growing public company in Minnesota by the Twin Cities Business Journal Top 100 Best Places to Work in the Twin Cities by Star Tribune – 4 times!   Position Overview: Provide direction in Finishing to support molding with a focus on quality, schedule, and efficiency.  Provide training and guidance to develop temporary and permanent Finishing employees.  Coordinate with quality inspectors, molding personnel, and Supervisors, to meet schedule and quality requirements.  Participate in shift hand-offs for smooth and effective shift transitions.   Specific duties include: Assign Finishing Operators to presses with focus on quality, schedule, and efficiency. Provide direction and guidance to Finishing Operators. Train Finishing Operators on all essential functions of Finishing. Coordinate with molding personnel on schedule and start-ups. Provide directions and instructions to assure parts are packaged according to requirements. Count/weigh parts to verify order quantities are completed. Support Finishing Operators so that all presses are properly staffed during break times. Perform finishing work and operate presses as necessary to assure proper coverage. Coordinate with quality inspectors on part quality issues. Perform shift hand-offs to assure a smooth and effective transition. Enter order information into computer. Transport completed parts from injection molding to final inspection area. Adhere to all quality and safety standards within the department. Maintain clean and organized work area with emphasis on safety, quality, efficiency, and utilization. Continually seek to improve work processes and individual performance. Adhere to all company policies and operational procedures. Perform additional tasks as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Able to comprehend and follow printed and computer-screen instructions, and direction from supervisors or technical leads. Must be punctual and have good attendance. Able to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment. Able to read and write in English, and do basic arithmetic. Able to use a computer and calculator. Able to use measuring instruments such as scales and calipers. Able to work safely with sharp tools/objects, such as but not limited to, hobby knives, utility knives, diagonal-cutting pliers Patience, tolerance, and an understanding that people learn in different ways and at different rates. Substantially meets the skill and physical requirements of the Finishing area (must be able to demonstrate job skills and actions). Self-motivated with strong organizational and time management skills Good written and oral communication skills. Must have strong teamwork skills and able to work closely with others without conflict. Strong attention to detail is required. Demonstrated ability to influence and teach others.",Finishing Coordinator - Weekday Night Shift Job in Rosemount,Full Time Employee,"Rosemount, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Finishing-Coordinator-Weekday-Night-Shift-Job-Rosemount-MN-US-165978993.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,9a200f48331d2d2ce0a5ebb4fb485ee0
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Detroit manufacturer is looking for DIRECT HIRE Maintenance/Repair Techs -Must have at least 5 years of experience repairing machinery  -Experience repairing and maintaining Presses and stamping machines preferred -Familiar with hydraulics, pneumatics and maintenance logs is a plus -2nd shift position 3:30pm – 12am  -Wage based on experience ranging from $17-$25/hr",Machine Repair / Machine Maintenance Job in Detroit,Full Time,"Detroit, MI 48238",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Repair-Machine-Maintenance-Job-Detroit-MI-US-164867777.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0713e828c4c4ec66054870094a9c4922
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description The DIRECTV Installer is responsible for providing excellent customer service through installing, troubleshooting, maintaining, and upgrading satellite television systems and equipment. ESSENTIAL DUTIES: Installs and programs equipment Troubleshoots, diagnoses, repairs, replaces, and upgrades components Checks satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance Maintains accurate installation, service, and inventory records Ensures adequate supply levels by inventorying stock and communicating needs to warehouse Treats customers with respect, courtesy, and professionalism at all times Coordinates schedules with customers Listens to descriptions of problems, answering questions, and resolving issues Communicates the wiring plan and equipment lay-out with customer prior to the installation Educates customers by conveying verbal information clearly and concisely Follows industry codes, regulations, and standards Adheres to policies and procedures while working autonomously Maintains a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies, including practicing safe driving techniques Acquires and applies information needed for prompt decision making Refers to and interprets schematics, manuals, and manufacturer's instructions Updates and improves job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities, reading technical publications, and participating in on-going technical training Supports co-workers and builds positive working relationships with all team members Meets or exceeds performance goals and quality standards Meets or exceeds productivity standards by prioritizing tasks and working efficiently Other duties as assigned EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS*: Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement High school diploma or equivalent required Must possess a valid driver’s license in the primary state of residence Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner Solid written communication skills required Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SWiM, and Ka/Ku, as required Must be able to expect and embrace change Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS*: Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40 feet in length Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations Must be able to stand for extended periods of time An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers' homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment) of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual’s weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we Entertain the Future. Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Nashville\Lebanon\Brentwood\Murfreesboro\Madison TN Job in Portland,,"Portland, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Satellite-Installation-Technician-Nashville-Lebanon-Brentwood-Murfreesboro-Madison-TN-Job-Portland-TN-US-165630684.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=6,,,80c61857b24fb83188f4560494c02cf6
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fort Wayne area manufacturing plant seeks experience electrical maintenance tech. Must have solid mechanical /electrical and PLC skills for consideration. Associates and maintenance certificates a big plus. Excellent opportunity for an electrician looking to work in a highly automated plant!  Job Purpose:Maintains production and quality by ensuring operation of electrical systems, apparatus, and electrical and electronic components of machinery and equipment.Duties: * Ensures operation of electrical systems and equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements on robots, conveyors, programmable controllers, transformers, voltage regulators, and machinery wiring; following electrical code, manuals, schematic diagrams, blueprints, and other specifications; troubleshooting. * Installs new machines and equipment by installing power supply wiring and conduit to and between machines and equipment; using hand tools and test equipment. * Repairs electrical systems and equipment by diagnosing malfunctioning apparatus, such as transformers, motors, and lighting fixtures; determining faulty wiring; inspecting and testing malfunctioning machinery. * Controls downtime by informing production workers of routine electrical preventive maintenance techniques and monitoring compliance. * Repairs and replaces faulty electrical components by using testing equipment and hand tools to install relays, switches, motors, printed circuit boards, and position-sensing devices. * Programs automated machinery by operating, testing for malfunctions, and verifying repairs to robots, robot controllers, and programmable controllers. * Maintains electrical equipment, parts, and supplies inventories by checking stock to determine inventory level; anticipating needed equipment, parts, and supplies; placing and expediting orders; verifying receipt. * Conserves electrical maintenance resources by using equipment and supplies as needed to accomplish job results. * Provides electrical maintenance information by answering questions and requests. * Prepares electrical maintenance reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends. * Maintains technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing technical publications; establishing personal networks. * Maintains continuity among work teams by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs. * Maintains safe and clean working environment by complying with procedures, rules, and regulations. * Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Electronics Troubleshooting, Problem Solving, Equipment Maintenance, Power Tools, Basic Safety, Technical Zeal, Supply Management, Technical Understanding, Judgment, Attention to Detail, Job Knowledge",Industrial Maintenance Electrician Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time,"Fort Wayne, IN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Maintenance-Electrician-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-165545907.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=11,19.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,,9c07b7212830846becd0b669c0eae79e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"IFA Rotorion NA, LLC is the North American headquarters for one of the world's leading suppliers of drive shafts for the automotive industry.  Located in Charleston, South Carolina and Novi, Michigan, IFA Rotorion brand is well-known and respected around the world.  Our unique combination of German and American culture provides our associates with an excellent working environment and comprehensive total compensation package.   Due to the continued growth of our business we are seeking an experienced, energetic and motivated individual to join our Charleston, SC team as a Production Supervisor covering part of our 2nd and 3rd shift operations.  Job Summary:              In this cross-shift position (2nd/3rd shift) you will have responsibility for meeting departmental safety, quality, costs, and delivery goals.  Objectives will be met through training, motivating and managing employees in a team oriented production environment where Lean Manufacturing Principles, 8D’s, and continuous improvement are the norm.  Essential Functions:Developa production/manpower plan based on production forecasts. Assist in the development and implementation of lean manufacturing practices such as: 5S, use of poka-yoke, visual management, material flow, etc.Support the development of associates to diagnoses equipment malfunctions to the root cause level and ensure corrective actions are completed to eliminate repetitive failures. Maintain time and production records, responds to customer concerns & ensure production targets are met by making adjustments to the production schedule, equipment and or processes as appropriate.Ensure training & development of associates, encourage associate involvement through participation in improvement activities, Kaizen events, suggestion system, and open communications. Responsible for understanding company policies, practices and procedures and for developing employees by coaching, counseling, and disciplining in accordance with such policies, practices, and procedures.  Education/Experience/Specific Skills:Ability to work a cross-shift between 2nd and 3rd shiftAssociates degree or equivalent education and experience.Minimum three (3) to five (5) years’ experience Supervisory experience in a manufacturing environment required.Familiar with Tier I and/or Tier II automotive supplier specifications preferredDemonstrated understanding of TS 16949 and/or ISO9000 requirements is required.Excellent interpersonal skills and proven ability to train, motivate, and lead employees.Demonstrated knowledge of Microsoft Office computer software applications.Previous experience working with an enterprise resource system (SAP R3 preferred).Knowledge of Statistical Process Control. What we offer:At IFA Rotorion, - North America LLC we take great pride in selecting employees who will contribute to our success while finding personal reward and satisfaction in their work. That is why we offer a competitive total compensation package which includes: Competitive Base SalaryHealth/Dental and Vision InsuranceLife / Long Term & Short Term Disability InsuranceCompany Matching 401(k)Paid Time OffTraining & Development Opportunities among many other benefits Apply today! If you are interested in a career with a growing company that will encourage you pursue and achieve your career goals while contributing to its success,apply for our Production Supervisor position today by submitting your resume, cover letter and salary expectations to Human Resources using our online application at:  https://home2.eease.adp.co m/recruit/?id=19093112 or by routing your resume and cover letter to Human.Resources@IFA-Rotorion.com.  Equal Opportunity Employer/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity  Application deadline:  April 30, 2016  ",Production Supervisor Job in Charleston,Full Time,"Charleston, SC 29456",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Job-Charleston-SC-US-165969638.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1a2d1d94080a8a399464923c44a5d4c4
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Apply pesticides to structures according to schedule, safety procedures and label instructions. * Drive company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. * Call customers to confirm scheduled services. * Respond on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. * Complete required production forms at end of daily route. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Assist in sales to current customers through contact on route. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position, you will apply company product to customers’ structures according to schedule and as needed based on service requests. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: High school diploma or general education degree (GED); One to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. * Valid Driver’s license At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). We perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Moore,"Full Time, Employee","Moore, OK",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Moore-OK-US-164972177.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=4,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,12b793da781138ed0ca118fb19902ca2
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"LOCATION: De Pere JOB TYPE: Contract to Hire - Full Time SHIFT: First Shift JOB ID: 84071 PAY: $10.00 PROFESSION: Printing DATE POSTED: 4/7/2016 Summary: QTI is accepting applications for Machine Finishing Assistants to work for an Award-Winning client in De Pere. This company is rapidly growing and looking to bring on talented team players with a desire to grow with the company. If you take great pride in your work, this is an excellent opportunity for you. These are temp-to-hire openings that offer full benefits when hired. Employees with previous experience, mechanical aptitude and a desire to succeed, can be trained as machine operators. This is a 1st shift position that works from 6am to 2pm, Monday through Friday. Responsibilities: Assisting the machine operators by making boxes, getting supplies, bringing paper Check for quality issues Qualifications: Good work history Mechanically inclined self-starters Pre-employment drug screen Thank you for choosing QTI! M5",Machine Finishing Assistant Job in De Pere,"Full Time, Employee","De Pere, WI",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Machine-Finishing-Assistant-Job-De-Pere-WI-US-165891648.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,4dcc1026b8d3e3a9409923fe73a5f02f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:08,No,jobs.monster.com,3rd Shift Packer Positions Available Pay rate starts at $9.00/hourCandidates must be available for overtime hours and available to work weekendsMust be detail oriented Clean background and own transportation is requiredMust speak and read EnglishAll interested must come in to apply 801 E. Landis AveVineland NJ 08360609-503-4647*Please bring 2 forms of State ID ,rd Shift Packers Job in East Vineland,Full Time Employee,"East Vineland, NJ 08360",All,http://jobview.monster.com/3rd-Shift-Packers-Job-East-Vineland-NJ-US-165406763.aspx?mescoid=5301083001001&jobPosition=10,9.00 - 9.00 $ /year,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ad978d030508d7b2d1003078a4a424ce
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for ASE technicians, and general service technicians. NEW 12 BAY SHOP looking for the best, great pay for right people must be able to repair vehicles of all models.                                                                 Call Richard at 540-847-9714                                                                                              WE WANT THE BEST",Automotive Technician/Mechanic Job in Wilmington,Full Time,"Wilmington, NC 28403",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Automotive-Technician-Mechanic-Job-Wilmington-NC-US-165851428.aspx?ch=newswtnc&mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),458efb822e74393735899c7a829e3fcc
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Union Specialties Inc. is currently interviewing for an Analytical Bench Chemist to join our R&D Team in Newburyport MA.  The primary role of this position will be to facilitate the development of product formulation requirements of waterbased polyurethane including: formulation development, product performance evaluation, stability study, specification creation, and support of production scale up activities.  Additional responsibilities include the following:  •   Perform application trials in support of assigned lab projects; conduct analytical testing of polyurethane based articles and coated substrates in accordance to a broad range of test protocols specified by ASTM or other industry organizations•   Design new formulated finish products, conduct evaluations and qualifications to include alternative raw materials for functionality, stability, and cost reduction opportunities, and communicate results Assistant Vice President of Technology and other functional teams•   Develop, validate, troubleshoot, and transfer analytical methods•   Evaluate and interpret analytical data•   Provide scientific guidance and training to customer as needed•   Work directly with Assistant Vice President of Technology to perform troubleshooting and root cause analysis on customer quality issues, and assigned development initiatives.•   Work as directed with Manufacturing in formulation optimization in support of successful production scale up•   Provide technical support to Sales and Marketing in recommending specific polyurethanes and formulated finish products, including answering technical inquires in response to internal and external customer communications.•   Evaluate SOPs and operation instructions in accordance with industry guidelines and standards•   Record and report on pertinent research and development. Write research and development communications periodically as needed. Required Education and Experience•   Bachelor’s Degree in Chemistry or Polymer Science with 3+ years experience in waterbased polyurethane chemistry or related discipline.  •   Experience with an understanding of polymers at the molecular level•   Lab skills in general analytical chemistry and quantitative analysis•   Experience in using or familiarity with modern chemical lab instrumentation•   Hands-on experience in managing an analytical lab - including routine maintenance, calibration and training - is preferred•   Strong analytical and problem solving skills•   Ability to manage multiple projects with various priorities and deliver results in a timely fashion•   Excellent written and verbal communication skills•   Ability to work independently with minimal supervision",Analytical Bench Chemist Job in Newburyport,Full Time,"Newburyport, MA 01950",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Analytical-Bench-Chemist-Job-Newburyport-MA-US-166088749.aspx?mescoid=1900259001001&jobPosition=11,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /yearBonuses",Experienced (Non-Manager),ab1db7fb719d615ad62b3f5ca03cebaf
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Termite Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-termite treatments as outlined in job orders. This will often require that you enter crawl spaces, attics, and other confined spaces to ensure complete coverage. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company products to residential structures according to work orders and as needed based on service requests; completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Responsibilities • Prepares job sites for termiticide treatment. • Applies termiticides to residential structures according to work order specifications, safety procedures, and label instructions. • Verifies that job specifications are appropriate for work orders. • Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. • Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. • Completes required production forms at end of daily work order assignments. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintain licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintain valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Termite Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Montgomery,"Full Time, Employee","Montgomery, AL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Termite-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Montgomery-AL-US-165728106.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,8a9238ac4647a23831f9f9d1624c1bec
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Reference Code  489020 Industrial Manufacturing Company is looking for: POSITION: Manager, Quality AssuranceLOCATION:  Umatilla OR / Kennewick WA Area SALARY: 60-70KDEGREE: PreferredEXPERIENCE: 5+ Years as a Quality Supervisor or ManagerRELOCATION: Available GENERICSUMMARY This person will be of such caliber and experience that they will provide the necessary strength and confidence to perform and/or manage the core QA/QC and Food Safety responsibilities.  This position provides input and assistance to numerous other departments contributes independent thoughts and proposals for improvement within the organization and provides a solid QA/QC base for success and growth in for the company as a whole. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned.Manages activities of Raw Materials and Finished product quality initiativesProvides effective and timely training guidance motivation corrective action and performance reviews to Supervisors; communicates expectations objectives and provides feedback on a regular basis.Coordinates resolution of problems that arise as a result of observations and product testing. Attends raw material processing runs to assure specification compliance or to learn more about processor abilities.Oversees placement of raw materials on hold and coordinates final disposition determinations.  Initiates release from hold and/or approval of donation/disposal in a timely manner.Works with Warehouse Manufacturing Information Services and Planning personnel to develop and implement procedures for handling storage labeling and lot tracking of raw materials. Works with RD Manufacturing and Sourcing personnel to screen new ingredients and qualify new suppliers using basic screening procedures and evaluations in finished products. Oversees usage of materials on Special Handling assures appropriate labeling of materials communication",Supervisor,"Full Time, Employee","Umatilla , OR",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Supervisor-Quality-Assurance-Job-Umatilla-OR-US-165996328.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=5,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,e7ac745ccf0daac273bdc948fe7009a3
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Yard worker will be responsible  for maintaining fence, sanitation, power and storage equipment in clean and proper working condition and ensure that all equipment leaving yards meet.Empty and clean portable toilets for delivery.Safely operate steam cleaner, forklift and air tools.Complete daily forklift inspection report.maintain safe and clean area.   ",Yard Worker Job in San Leandro,Full Time,"San Leandro, CA 94577",Goodwill Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/Yard-Worker-Job-San-Leandro-CA-US-165554970.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=11,13.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,df4d042234bd4f290f3cdb15d7137305
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Industrial TechnicianMy client, located in central Tennessee, is a Tier 1 automotive supplier to a number of the largest automobile companies in the world.  Due to continued growth, my client is in need of a highly skilled multi-craft Industrial Technician to join their team.  This individual is needed immediately.  Successful candidates must have the following minimum qualifications and will be tested: Minimum Qualifications:·        High School Diploma or GED·        Some formal training, tech school, or Associates Degree preferred·        Solid, proven, electrical and mechanical experience in an industrial environment·        Strong background with PLC’s and HMI (AB PanelView, RS 5000, etc.)·        Machining experience·        Must have the ability to multi-task·        Robotics experience is a plusIndustrial Technician Responsibilities·        Routine and semi-routine maintenance to industrial parts and equipment·        Electrical maintenance·        Mechanical gearboxes and alignment·        PanelView and HMI·        Relay Logic Motor Controls·        PLC troubleshooting and development·        AC drives and servo’s·        Machining·        Networking·        Tooling·        Drafting/Blue Print reading·        Robotics troubleshooting/repair/service/maintenanceIf you are looking for a stable, learning organization that believes in advancement of the skills and careers of its employees, has a fantastic pay and benefits package, and you meet the requirements above, please send your resume in Word format to patrick@mrbethlehem.com.  The right candidates will be tested and interviewed NOW.",Industrial Maintenance Technician Job in Manchester,Full Time,"Manchester, TN 37355",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Manchester-TN-US-162943917.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=12,20.00 - 28.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),73c03aad368ee4c41b8e07b01ccbfe1c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"HVAC INSTALLERS:Are you at the top of your field? Do you want to be recognized for your hard work?We are looking for someone that resides in the Mount Laurel, NJ location.We are seeking an ELITE STAR- an HVAC Installer with 2+ years experience! We hire only the best and the brightest. We are Horizon Services, a dynamic, rapidly-growing HVAC Installation & Service Company and we have been voted by our employees as one of the best places to work in Delaware and Pennsylvania- isn't it time you found out why?Our reputation is growing in the region as a Top Notch Company, and we are looking to hire only Top Notch Installers for our New Jersey location.As the area's Leading HVAC Company, this is what you will receive:• Work 4- 10 hour days• Ability to earn the highest wages paid in our industry (base wage combined with an exceptional bonus program)• Incentives, bonuses, contests, awards • Full family benefits package available, including medical, dental, vision, company uniforms, life insurance, Long term disability, short term disability, tool fund, truck policy, 401K with company match and much more! • Paid Vacation Time • Weekly training with a Nate certified instructor• Great working environment and a superb support staff • Opportunity for advancementIf you consider yourself to be one of the Best HVAC Installers in the region, please forward your resume. Pre-employment motor vehicle check, drug screening and background check required. For more information, or to apply now, you must go to the website below. Please DO NOT email your resume to us as we only accept applications through our website. https://horizonservices.applicantpro.com/jobs/375260-19566.html",HVAC Installers $ SIGN ON! Job in Mount Laurel,Full Time,"Mount Laurel, NJ 08054",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Installers-1500-SIGN-ON!-Job-Mount-Laurel-NJ-US-165775444.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=6,,,77f1217139cdc9fcd5b7ba2b03040273
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: * Apply pesticides to structures according to schedule, safety procedures and label instructions. * Drive company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. * Call customers to confirm scheduled services. * Respond on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. * Complete required production forms at end of daily route. * Maintain vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. * Assist in sales to current customers through contact on route. * Other duties as assigned. SUMMARY: At Terminix®, our people bring tremendous pride and integrity to everything we do. In turn, we provide a working environment where these skilled professionals can achieve true satisfaction in their own lives. We are proud to offer our exceptional associates competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits and outstanding opportunities for professional development. If you're committed to providing the highest level of customer service, we have an ideal opportunity for you. In this position, you will apply company product to customers’ structures according to schedule and as needed based on service requests. QUALIFICATION REQUIREMENTS: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE: High school diploma or general education degree (GED); One to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. LANGUAGE SKILLS: * Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. * Ability to write simple correspondence. * Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. MATHEMATICAL SKILLS: * Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. * Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS: * Licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. * Valid Driver’s license At Terminix, people come for a job and stay for a career. As a Terminix associate, you’ll enjoy excellent compensation and benefits as well as the opportunity for the professional growth and respect that comes from working for an industry leader. Qualified candidates must have a high school diploma or general education degree (GED). We perform criminal background checks, motor vehicle record checks and drug screening. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Lakeland,"Full Time, Employee","Lakeland, FL",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Lakeland-FL-US-165107729.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,6a02f648c3509bd587e2e6c18eecd121
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"The City of Chesterfield is accepting applications for the positions of Part Time Custodian. Position works under the general supervision of the Building Maintenance Supervisor. Performs all janitorial tasks necessary to clean and care for all city facilities. Applicant must possess knowledge of methods, materials, and equipment used in general cleaning practices and procedures. Must posses a valid Missouri Drivers License and be able to work evenings and weekends. High school diploma and/or equivalent and two years experience in janitorial work preferred. Wages are $12.00 hourly for a maximum of 1,000 hours annually. City Employment Application must be submitted for consideration. Submit completed City Employment Application and resume to Chesterfield City Hall, 690 Chesterfield Parkway West, Chesterfield, MO 63017.  Mark applications, ""Attention: Part Time Custodian."" Position open until filled. EOE.",PART TIME CUSTODIAN Job in Chesterfield,Full Time,"Chesterfield, MO 63017",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/PART-TIME-CUSTODIAN-Job-Chesterfield-MO-US-118145301.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=15,0.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,81bf36a64087967180d2f80e6b4f5aba
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Schweinitz Enterprises Industrial Manufacturing – Electro-Mechanical Maintenance TechnicianJob DescriptionWe are seeking an experienced Industrial Electrical Maintenance Technician to join our growing team and fill an immediate need. Schweinitz Enterprises is the industry shaping global leader in industrial manufacturing and servicing overhead cranes and other hoists. We serve a broad range of customers, including manufacturing and process industries, shipyards, ports and industrial plants. A successful Industrial Electrical Maintenance Technician will have an electrical and mechanical background, and will have the ability to trouble-shoot 480 VAC 3 phase motor control systems among other duties. Industrial Manufacturing – Electro-Mechanical Maintenance Technician Job Responsibilities:As an Industrial Electrical Maintenance Technician, you will be responsible for performing preventative maintenance up to and including complex repairs on electric overhead traveling cranes. The maintenance technician will also spend time consulting with customers on repair and safety related issues.Other responsibilities of the Industrial Electrical Maintenance Technician will include:·       On-site visits to customer locations troubleshooting, repairing and inspecting overhead cranes industrial motor controls·       Update and maintain customers bearings and mechanical gearbox systems ·       Generating sales leads during service calls·       Completing all appropriate documentation·       Minimal overnight travel may be required to assist other branches and/or to attend training or other meetings Industrial Manufacturing – Electro-Mechanical Maintenance Technician Job RequirementsAs an Industrial Electrical Maintenance Technician, you will be required to show a strong knowledge of AC/DC theory, as well as the ability to trouble-shoot 480VAC 3 phase motor control systems.Other requirements for the Industrial Electrical Maintenance Technician include:• A minimum of 3 years’ experience in an industrial maintenance environment and/or equivalent military experience·       Hands-on background in the industrial electrical and mechanical fields·       Electro-mechanical maintenance experience in the industrial electrical field (480 vacs, 3 phases) ·       In-depth understanding of motor control circuitry and related troubleshooting procedures. ·       Industrial Mechanical/Electrician with plant maintenance experience PLUS·       Experience in the inspection, repair and maintenance of industrial overhead cranes ·       Willingness to work overtime and on-call rotation is required•              Possession of a valid driver’s license and clean driving record•              Strong communication skills•              Proven commitment to safety•              Comfort with working at heights Industrial Manufacturing – Electrical Maintenance Technician Benefits:At Schweinitz Enterprises, we recognize and appreciate all of our team members’ hard work and dedication. Therefore, we are proud to offer our Electrical Maintenance Technician’s compensation package. Benefits available to the Electrical Maintenance Technician’s include: •              Base pay•              Great benefits•              Company vehicle•              Gas card•              Cell phone•              Extensive training  ",Industrial Crane Technician Job in Little Rock,Full Time,"Little Rock, AR",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Crane-Technician-Job-Little-Rock-AR-US-165016655.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=17,20.00 - 25.00 $ /hourvehicle+ gas card+great benefits+ot after 8 hours worked per day+cell,Experienced (Non-Manager),7a3ff141801c11c517293f59b9a435bc
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field electrician for a long established Stockton company. Includes installing ag electrical services, wire and conduit, pump panels, trenching, some trouble shooting. We offer full family Kaiser medical, paid holidays, retirement and a great working atmosphere. Must have a current CA drivers license and be drug free.",Electrician,Full Time,"Stockton, CA 95203",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrician-field-work-Job-Stockton-CA-US-165183105.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=20,"18.00 - 23.00 $ /hourFull family medical, Paid Holidays",Experienced (Non-Manager),2a3a9eaea43c92535d6238d9c3008c98
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hunter Engineering Company is a global leader in the development and manufacture of automotive service equipment. Our computer based products set the standard in the industry. We offer an excellent health and benefit package, along with an exceptional drug-free working environment. We are currently seeking a full-time, second shift Welding Robot Operator for our Raymond, MS facility (3:30 p.m. - 12:00 p.m.). Position, align, fit and weld metal components together to fabricate or repair products according to specifications. Set up robot to weld metal components. Read and interpret blueprints or layouts and manufacturing operation sheetsRead measuring devices such as, tape measure, square, straight edge, combination square, calipers and rulersHold, position, and read tape or rods to assist in layoutSet up robot by calling up program/software for appropriate productChange robot fixtures as needed High School Diploma or GED required Must be able to pass a welding evaluationAt least one (1) year welding experience in a fabrication environment required Must be able to read blue prints Must be able to use measuring tools such as calipers and squaresMust be able to lift up to 50 lbs Pre-employment background check and drug screen required PI93115683Apply Here",Welding Robot Operator Job in Raymond,Full Time Employee,"Raymond, MS 39154",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Welding-Robot-Operator-Job-Raymond-MS-US-164859311.aspx?mescoid=5100949001001&jobPosition=8,19.65 - 20.65 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,7cfa7090e742658eba743c1285496f8c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Integrated Medical Systems International, Inc. (IMS), a wholly owned subsidiary of STERIS Corporation, provides surgical instrument and device management, as well as clinical consulting, for more than 2,500 healthcare facilities. IMS offers fast turn-around time, competitive pricing and a commitment to helping customers avoid expensive replacement instruments through effective maintenance and proper handling.  IMS is rapidly growing our business and offers a dynamic environment, challenging work, and opportunity. JOIN us in our efforts as a Repair Technician Come grow with us. . .   Due to our tremendous growth, Integrated Medical Systems (IMS) is searching for entry-level surgical instrument repair technicians to join our team and help continue to provide superior service to our customers!  Headquartered in Birmingham, Alabama, IMS services hospitals in sharpening, refurbishing, and maintenance of surgical instruments. The ideal candidate will possess a background in metal/jewelry shaping and polishing, watch making and repair, machinists, surgical tech, or those mechanically inclined.  We offer a very comprehensive apprentice training program.  Position will either work at a national repair center, on-site at our customer facility, or on our fleet vehicle. Summary The primary role of the repair technician is to perform repairs on medical instrumentation.  Technicians must be familiar with various types of surgical instruments and understand how to best maintain and repair them.  Repairs are completed either on a mobile laboratory, on-site in the hospital or at an off-site company repair center.  All repairs completed to the highest quality standards and in a timely manner.   Essential Job Functions ·       Identifies surgical instruments by various type, use and functionality. Inspect instruments to determine what type of repair and/or adjustment is required. ·       Disassembles malfunctioning medical instruments or equipment, troubleshoots and uses standardized testing procedures; examines and tests mechanisms for defects. ·       Replaces or repairs defective parts; may require modification or manufacturing replacement components. Reassembles medical instruments or equipment and tests assembly for conformance to specifications. ·       Ability to estimate repair costs. ·       Inspects instruments and tests equipment periodically and adjusts calibration to ensure functioning within specified standards. ·       Abides by all Company safety and health policies and procedures.  Must use personal protective equipment if required. ·       Determines correct spare parts required to complete repairs. If the parts required are controlled by inventory numbers, the technician is responsible for performing all necessary inventory transactions to ensure inventory accuracy. ·       Perform repairs on surgical instruments designated “TIER 1”, which are considered the most basic types of instruments and/or types of repairs.  In certain situations, technicians may specialize in particular repair categories. ·       Work will be performed on a mobile truck, in-house repair center, or in hospital lab. ·       If assigned to a truck, work with CIRC to manage and balance workload to minimize customer disruption. Help CIRC identify additional revenue opportunities. ·       Exercise mechanical skills for precision, alignment, sharpening and repair of surgical instruments. ·       Complete all necessary paperwork (i.e., logging instruments and completed repairs). ·       Improve results for assigned area to increase revenue, profit, personnel development, and asset readiness.   Experience/Requirements ·       High school diploma or general education degree (GED); and one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience ·       Preferred Surgical Technician experience or experience working is a Central Sterile Department in a hospital ·       Alternatively, experience working in a medical instrument/device instrument very desirable ·       Individuals with experience working as a Craftsman/woman in detailed repair work such as metal/jewelry shaping and polishing, watch making/repair often have transferable skills to this position ·       Good hand/eye coordination (manual dexterity) ·       Basic organizational skills ·       Basic troubleshooting and problem solving skills ·       Good attention to detail ·       Willingness to listen and learn ·       Demonstrated ability to work in a fast-paced environment ·       Able to spend long periods sitting in a confined space ·       Willing to work overtime and weekends, flexible shifts as required, and assist in other areas of repair centers as needed ·       Ability to effectively communicate with Customers, peers and management ·       Mechanical and Mechanical aptitude  ·       Basic PC skills including knowledge of Microsoft Office products ·       Understanding of and willingness to adhere to basic company expectations (Customer focus, teamwork, integrity, accountability and professionalism     IMS, a wholly owned subsidiary of STERIS Corporation. STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.   IMS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department.   IMS is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status. Job Requirements:  Experience/Requirements   High school diploma or general education degree (GED); and one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience Preferred Surgical Technician experience or experience working is a Central Sterile Department in a hospital Alternatively, experience working in a medical instrument/device instrument very desirable Individuals with experience working as a Craftsman/woman in detailed repair work such as metal/jewelry shaping and polishing, watch making/repair often have transferable skills to this position Good hand/eye coordination (manual dexterity) Basic organizational skills Basic troubleshooting and problem solving skills Good attention to detail Willingness to listen and learn Demonstrated ability to work in a fast-paced environment Able to spend long periods sitting in a confined space Willing to work overtime and weekends, flexible shifts as required, and assist in other areas of repair centers as needed Ability to effectively communicate with Customers, peers and management Mechanical and Mechanical aptitude  Basic PC skills including knowledge of Microsoft Office products Understanding of and willingness to adhere to basic company expectations (Customer focus, teamwork, integrity, accountability and professionalism IMS, a wholly owned subsidiary of STERIS Corporation. STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services. IMS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department. IMS is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.Click Here To Applyhttps://spectrumsurgical.hua.hrsmart.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=11406&site_id=35",Surgical Instrument Repair Technician Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN 46202",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Surgical-Instrument-Repair-Technician-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-165797790.aspx?mescoid=4900895001001&jobPosition=10,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,678e090536c9980ade6c36b730d1d510
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description The DIRECTV Installer is responsible for providing excellent customer service through installing, troubleshooting, maintaining, and upgrading satellite television systems and equipment. ESSENTIAL DUTIES: Installs and programs equipment Troubleshoots, diagnoses, repairs, replaces, and upgrades components Checks satellite TV systems for correct functionality and optimal performance Maintains accurate installation, service, and inventory records Ensures adequate supply levels by inventorying stock and communicating needs to warehouse Treats customers with respect, courtesy, and professionalism at all times Coordinates schedules with customers Listens to descriptions of problems, answering questions, and resolving issues Communicates the wiring plan and equipment lay-out with customer prior to the installation Educates customers by conveying verbal information clearly and concisely Follows industry codes, regulations, and standards Adheres to policies and procedures while working autonomously Maintains a safe work environment by following safe practices and adhering to safety policies, including practicing safe driving techniques Acquires and applies information needed for prompt decision making Refers to and interprets schematics, manuals, and manufacturer's instructions Updates and improves job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities, reading technical publications, and participating in on-going technical training Supports co-workers and builds positive working relationships with all team members Meets or exceeds performance goals and quality standards Meets or exceeds productivity standards by prioritizing tasks and working efficiently Other duties as assigned EXPERIENCE/QUALIFICATIONS*: Must meet DIRECTV state-specific minimum age requirement High school diploma or equivalent required Must possess a valid driver’s license in the primary state of residence Must be able to speak clearly, concisely, and to communicate effectively in a courteous and professional manner Solid written communication skills required Must be able to work full time, up to and including six days a week; which may include nights, weekends, and holidays, as required Must meet company hiring criteria for pre-employment screening, including drug test, criminal background check, fitness for duty, and MVR check Must be able to obtain all necessary certifications, including SBCA, Service, SWiM, and Ka/Ku, as required Must be able to expect and embrace change Working knowledge of Microsoft Office and inventory software systems preferred SBCA and/or other industry certifications preferred Six months experience in telecommunications, electrical, construction, or related field preferred Working knowledge of handheld electronics, including smart phones, ipads, etc., preferred PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS*: Must be able to lift up to 75 pounds and climb ladders up to 40 feet in length Must be able to work in tight spaces, including attics and crawl spaces Must be able to work outside in extreme weather conditions, including precipitation and temperature variations Must be able to stand for extended periods of time An essential duty of the position of Technician is to install satellite dishes with the use of a ladder on customers' homes. The ladders used by DIRECTV have been rated by the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) to hold a maximum total weight (including tool belt and equipment) of 375 lbs. To allow for the weight of equipment an individual’s weight cannot exceed 325 lbs. DIRECTV employees are committed, dependable, professional and accountable. We value integrity, honesty and respect for others. We have high standards for how our employees conduct themselves at work and in the communities we support. Come join our team as we Entertain the Future. Job Installation Technician",Satellite Installation Technician Nashville\Lebanon\Brentwood\Murfreesboro\Madison TN Job in La Vergne,,"La Vergne, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Satellite-Installation-Technician-Nashville-Lebanon-Brentwood-Murfreesboro-Madison-TN-Job-LA-VERGNE-TN-US-165630688.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=5,,,972a401b3865325e3a4fcb488acd8700
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Picking orders from inventoryUnloading, moving and storing materialsUtilizing manual lifts, reach trucks and transfer equipment (requires applicable safety and operational training)Storing and stacking materials according to company standardsIdentifying and verifying partsReporting inventory shortages and recommending new ordersRemoving damaged materials from stockOperating RF scanners and other hand-held devices",Material Handler Job in Franklin,Full Time Employee,"Franklin, IN 46131",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-Job-Franklin-IN-US-166072781.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=10,11.00 - 16.25 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,6a4539459d7a807eb11ec29fecbf2118
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sears Home Improvement Products and Services, a member of the Sears Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ: SHLD) family of companies, is one of America's largest home improvement companies for siding and windows installation with operations in 45 states. Our products include siding, custom manufactured and installed windows, custom home entry doors, kitchen remodeling, custom cabinet refacing and Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC).Join the Sears Home Services team as an HVAC Service Technician!This position has a Sign on Bonus$3000 for HVAC Master License$2000 for HVAC Journeyman LicenseReceive half within 1st 30 days of employment and the other half after 6 months.**MD Journeyman/ MD Master license required**No On Call Work! No Sundays! Join Us Today!  Are you looking for a role that offers you an opportunity to be a part of a dynamic, innovative organization? Then, we have the opportunity for you at Sears. The brand your family has trusted for over 150 years! New culture, New branding, New YOU!  We are seeking an experienced HVAC Service Technician with a great attitude and the ability to help customers with their in-home repairs. This is an exciting opportunity to join the Sears family! Apply today!HVAC Service Technician – Repair Technician – Appliance MaintenanceBenefitsAt Sears, we provide competitive pay and ongoing training in a collaborative, supportive, and team-oriented setting. In the repair technician role, you will enjoy working independently as a representative of a leading retailer and in-home service provider.For the In-Home Service Technician, we provide the following:• Service van• Specialized tools• Uniforms• Laptop computer• Smartphone• Home dispatched (most locations)• Industry training• Various incentive plans• Career opportunitiesPlease take a moment and view our “day in a life of a repair technician video” at this link: Click here to See yourself at sears (Appliance Tech video)  QualificationsJob ResponsibilitiesAs an HVAC Service & Repair Technician, you will have the opportunity to repair ofcustomers' products (Heat Pumps, Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning, Gasand Oil Furnaces & Boilers) while maintaining the highest level of customerservice. HVAC Service Tech responsibilities include:• Providing timely and quality repairs of customers’ products• Maintaining high-quality customer service and care• Promoting and selling additional products and services• Meeting key performance metrics and/or productivity goals• Providing knowledgeable and courteous repair service• Looking for ways to improve business performance and enhance the customer experience• Communicating benefits of the Value Added Services Process to the customer• Maintaining truck stock inventory within the prescribed company guidelines and standards• Following the truck maintenance schedule and keeping a clean, organized truckHVAC Service Technician – Repair Technician – Appliance MaintenanceJob RequirementsAs an HVAC Service Technician, you must be highly organized and possess excellent communication skills. We are seeking a dedicated team player who is able to ensure fast, flexible, and expert service to every customer via excellent time management skills.Requirements of the Service Technician role include:Ideal candidates will have 2+ years' experience in HVAC service and repair. Strongtroubleshooting and problem solving skills required. • CFC Certification & MD Journeyman License is required (applicants holding a master-level trade/occupational license(s), ie HVAC/Mechanical, Electrical, General Contractor, Plumbing may be used to qualify or given hiring preference and additional compensation based on business needs)• High school diploma or general education degree (GED)• Working mechanical knowledge, including the use of tools and test equipment• Ability to perform accurate repair of customer product• Must complete all technician training elements within required timeframes• Ability to follow directions and specific process steps to ensure quality workmanship• Flexibility to work variable and flexible hours, including overtime• Ability to use a computer for parts inquiries and ordering• Must possess and maintain a valid state driver’s license• Must pass pre-employment drug screen and criminal background checkJoin the Sears Home Service family!Apply today! EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",HVAC Journeyman/ Master Service Tech (Prince George's County,Full Time,"Clinton, MD 20735",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Journeyman-Master-Service-Tech-Prince-George's-County-MD-Job-Clinton-MD-US-164898558.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=11,Commensurate with Experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),56103a22ded803fa73ae2a49dd942f76
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ascent, LLC is a leading provider of comprehensive solutions for the planning, design, engineering, development, and operation of data centers and other mission critical facilities. Headquartered in Saint Louis, MO, Ascent specializes in powerful, efficient, and technologically advanced mission critical facilities and offers clients a broad range of delivery models spanning shell & core, build-to-suit, turnkey, and outsourced critical systems operations. Founded in 1998, Ascent provides a full spectrum of fast track services that include project programming, design management, facility assessment, development and construction management, commissioning, and ongoing maintenance operations. Today, Ascent focuses on providing clients with innovative solutions and services yielding the highest levels of operational autonomy, efficiency, and control. Ascents clients include some of the most demanding mission critical organizations spanning multiple industries, Fortune 500 firms, and service providers.  Our business is growing fast and we are currently seeking a talented Critical Systems Maintenance Technician for the operation of a data center facility. Ascent, LLC was named one of St. Louis' Top 50 Places to Work in 2012 and 2013! TITLE:  Critical Systems Maintenance Technician LOCATION:  Northlake, IL HOURS: Must be available to work any shift, site is open 24x7 RESPONSIBILITIES: ·         Coordinate all preventive, corrective and emergency maintenance activities, including those activities performed by Ascent, Client or Vendor staff.·         Manage Ascent, Client and Vendor staff in the maintenance of buildings and grounds.·         Perform initial troubleshooting to mechanical and infrastructural systems, including:  Electrical systems, HVAC systems, plumbing systems, life safety systems, security systems, roofs, drains, shop equipment, A/V systems, emergency power systems, and systems furniture.·         Inspect buildings, space, grounds and/or equipment regularly for problematic or unsafe conditions.·         Perform and oversee general and preventative maintenance tasks to include:  Equipment checks, equipment performance monitoring, cleaning, lubrication and service of a wide variety of components/devices.·         Manage facility renovations, upgrades, and build-outs including overseeing vendors.·         Implement and manage projects as required and associated items such as costs for any projects for Ascent or Ascent Clients.·         Manage and maintain site Building Management Systems, CCTV, Access Control System and Maximo.·         Support overall site operation of the data center facility.  ·         24 X 7 maintenance staffing of Data Center Facility with rotational on-call. QUALIFICATIONS:  ·         3-5 years related work experience required·         HS Diploma or GED required·         Technical, vocational or on-the-job training in the following areas:  Electrical, HVAC, mechanical, process controls·         Maintenance experience in 24x7 and/or critical support environment·         Professional appearance, good communication and organizational skills are required·         Proficiency with basic operations of a computer; knowledge of MS Excel, MS Word, MS Project and Auto Cad is a plus·         Possess competent knowledge of use and care of tools and equipment used in facilities and/or grounds maintenance.·         Possess competent knowledge of building codes and safety regulations·         Potential candidate must be able to work any shift and on-call as necessary This position reports to the Data Center Manager Ascent, LLC offers a full benefits package including medical, dental, short/long term disability, life insurance, 401(k), vacation, holidays and more.  Interested candidates should email their resume to humanresources@ascentcorp.com or apply online at www.ascent-corp.com.   Ascent, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer ",Critical Systems Maintenance Technician - nd/rd Shift Job in Northlake,Full Time,"Northlake, IL",Engineering Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Critical-Systems-Maintenance-Technician-2nd-3rd-Shift-Job-Northlake-IL-US-162554297.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3a5ad7481bad17544e06a17bb1e7115b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"OverviewCanon Solutions America is a Canon U.S.A. Company providing integrated systems technology that comprise one of the strongest solutions portfolios in the document management industry. If you have an interest in technology and technical experience, this may be the position for you! Canon Solutions America Field Service Specialists provide repair and service support to our customer base. They work with analog, digital, networked, and integrated business equipment. Field Service Specialists will receive comprehensive training to learn the most up-to-date techniques and skills to work with Canon products. Canon Solutions America offers a competitive compensation package including base salary, travel allowance, medical, dental, vision, 401(k) Savings Plan, profit sharing, opportunity to earn incentive trips, success sharing, tuition reimbursement, vacation, and much more!ResponsibilitiesAs a Field Service Specialist, you will be required to repair and maintain all assigned equipment to recommended standards and specifications. You must be able to meet customer demand, possibly requiring overtime. You will meet or exceed minimum established performance standards for productivity, technical quality, and customer satisfaction for all assigned products. You will assist other departments in accomplishment of goals and objectives as directed. Your qualifications must include a degree or certificate in electronics or electrical engineering from an accredited college or technical school or equivalent related experience. The ability to provide excellent customer service is necessary. Successful work experience in the document management industry is highly preferred. For select positions, applicants must also have a valid driver's license, clean driving record, and their own automobile. Canon Solutions America, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristics protected by law. EOE Minorities/Females/Individuals with Disability/Protected VeteransPI93292322Apply Here",Field Service Specialist - Copier Repair Job in San Francisco,Full Time Employee,"San Francisco, CA 94111",,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Specialist-Copier-Repair-Job-San-Francisco-CA-US-165427315.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4b10163bcbd979dac94892e5444f9591
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are offering a lucrative sign-on bonus to qualified candidates. Seeking a challenging and fast-paced work environment? Sears Auto Center is going through an exciting transformation!! Sears Auto Center is looking for professional automotive service technicians with experience and ASE certifications to join with our team. The ideal candidate is responsible for providing professional, timely, and courteous customer service in the installation, inspection, repair, alignment, brake, and mechanical areas of the Automotive Center. As part of any Sears Auto center positions you will be responsible for providing professional, timely, and courteous customer service — helping our customers understand their auto service needs. [#video#https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YhZoUk2cM3Y{#560,315#}#/video#] QualificationsJob Duties/Responsibilities:• Diagnoses and repairs to specifications – brake and hydraulic, exhaust, primary and/or advanced fuel ignition and electrical, suspension and alignment, air conditioning and computer systems.• Explains technical diagnoses and needed repairs to non-mechanical individuals which may include employees and customers• Continuously learns new technical information and techniques in formal training sessions in order to stay ahead of the rapidly changing automotive technology world.• Demonstrates a sense of responsive urgency to every customer no matter what service is required• Uses the Quality Service Evaluation (QSE) form to understand customer service adviser's and customer service manager's instructions• Maintains an organized neat and safe bay.Required Skills:Certified Technician/Mechanic• Maintains an organized neat and safe bay.• 1-2 years of automotive mechanical diagnosis, problem-solving and repair experience to succeed in this position.• A high level of motivation and energy and strong customer service skills are also required.• Must have a Valid Driver’s License.• Pre-employment drug test and background check will help assure we build teams of people who can best work with others and serve customer needs.Advanced Technician/ Mechanic• At least 2-3 years of strong automotive mechanical diagnosis, problem-solving and repair experience• 5 ASE certifications are preferred for this position.• You’ll also need a high level of motivation, energy and a customer-focused attitude.• Must have a Valid Driver’s License.• Pre-employment drug test and background check will help assure we build teams of people who can best work with others and serve customer needs.Master Technician/Mechanic• 5+ years of automotive mechanical diagnosis, problem- solving and repair experience as you mentor and teach Teammates while discussing problems with customers• You will also need strong leadership skills and a customer-focused attitude to go along with a high level of motivation and energy.• 8 ASE certifications are required.• Must have a Valid Driver’s License.Pre-employment drug test and background check will help assure we build teams of people who can best work with others and serve customer needs.Education Requirements: HS Graduate or EquivalentDriver's License Required: YesTravel Requirements: YesAge Requirement: 18+ EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Service Technician (Sign On Bonus) Job in Cheektowaga,Full Time,"Cheektowaga, NY 14225",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-Sign-On-Bonus-Job-CHEEKTOWAGA-NY-US-164900073.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,Commensurate with Experience,Experienced (Non-Manager),225f0f86c4ee5ecfbb0db6e174877291
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Responsible for providing management and guidance to finishing department. Responsible for planning, monitoring and scheduling of staff and work operations in the department in a safe and efficient manner. Through Supervisors and Superintendents, assures production objectives are met within cost, quality and safety standards. Responsible for employment decisions, reviews and overall development of department leaders. Accountabilities:Provides leadership and continuous improvement to the Finish Team in the areas of quality, cost/productivity, delivery and safety.Provides necessary resources and training, coaches/mentors associates on behavior relevant to MBCI values, policies, procedures and performance standards.Works with other Manufacturing Managers and departments to make facility process changes, and assures that OSHA and other safety and environmental regulations are met.  Performs other duties as assigned by General Manager. Knowledge, Skills & Experience:Minimum of 5-8 years of experience in a manufacturing and/or wood finishing environment.Demonstrated team participation and/or leadership and related continuous improvement successes.Must have 5 years managerial experience.Strong leadership, analytical, problem solving, delegation and conflict resolution skills.Knowledge of solvent and water based finishes such as toners, stains, sealers and topcoats.Knowledge of air assisted, airless and HVLP spray gun technology, UV flatline.Ability to maintain the professional competence, knowledge, and skill necessary for the satisfactory performance of all assigned responsibilities.A sound working knowledge of MRP, JIT and Kanban manufacturing systems, TQM problem solving techniques. Education:Bachelor’s degree in preferred. ",Operations Manager Job in Goshen,Full Time Employee,"Goshen, IN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Manager-Job-Goshen-IN-US-166072824.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=9,"95,000.00 - 105,000.00 /year",Manufacturing/Production/Operations,f1f814e9025ab2cb2c2f69674e0bc35d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warranty Technician An ideal Quality Assurance Warranty technician, performs maintenance and services repairs on heating, ventilating and air conditioning systems. Installs new units or replacement parts for existing customers that are covered under Horizon Service's Warranty Program. Has knowledge of the field's commonly-used concepts, practices and procedures and may be required to use said knowledge to collect and provide prompt accurate data used to measure and monitor the quality of work performed in the field. Performs a variety of tasks. Works under general supervision. We are looking for someone to work out of our Audubon, PA location.JOB DUTIES Ensure customer satisfaction Troubleshoot and diagnose problems with HVAC equipment Repair HVAC equipment Effectively communicate with customers and office staff Promptly and accurately complete all required paperwork Perform maintenance on HVAC equipment Quality inspections of job site Initiative to train and develop using the company provided resources Keep manager informed of new developments, changes or customer concerns Other tasks (administrative or other) per process or as defined by the area manager Replace or repair parts that are covered under Horizon Services Warranty program. Requirements: Must have excellent customer service experience, 3+ years working in residential HVAC. For more information, or to apply now, you must go to the website below. Please DO NOT email your resume to us as we only accept applications through our website. https://horizonservices.applicantpro.com/jobs/367760-19566.html    ",HVAC Warranty-Service Technician $-$ Hr. $. Sign On Bonus!!! Job in Audubon,Full Time,"Audubon, PA 19403",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Warranty-Service-Technician-25-30-Hr-1500-00-Sign-On-Bonus!!!-Job-Audubon-PA-US-165171340.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=2,Hourly,,540076fe264a579813747c63152e7275
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Baxter International Inc. provides a broad portfolio of essential renal and hospital products, including home, acute and in-center dialysis; sterile IV solutions; infusion systems and devices; parenteral nutrition; bio surgery products and anesthetics; and pharmacy automation, software and services. The company’s global footprint and the critical nature of its products and services play a key role in expanding access to healthcare in emerging and developed countries. Baxter’s 50,000 employees worldwide are building upon the company’s rich heritage of medical breakthroughs to advance the next generation of healthcare innovations that enable patient care. Summary: The Manufacturing Director is responsible for the development, coordination and execution of clinical and commercial manufacturing for syringe, vial and cartridge filling/packaging activities.  This position oversees a function of approximately 300 employees, including hourly production operators, trainers, supervisors, manufacturing warehouse operations, managers and manufacturing client representatives; and is responsible for the strategic planning of the department.  This position reports to the Plant Manager II. Essential Duties and Responsibilities (these are primary responsibilities of the role and the incumbent will perform other duties as assigned): Responsible for the outgoing quality, safety and efficacy of all finished product and ensure compliance with all applicable specifications, Standard Operating Procedures, FDA regulations (GMP’s) Develop and deploy the following: Leadership system that inspires trust.  Teach and create a culture of problem solving and respect for people EHS process for workplace health, safety, security, and ergonomics that is proactive and in place with key metrics in manufacturing Process to prioritize the needs of the customer and key stakeholders (including employees) and process to listen to internal and external “voice of the customer” Process to create a manufacturing strategic plan and goals, short and long term direction and performance expectations, communicating them to employees, customers, suppliers, and partners Formal communication plan incorporating various levels of the manufacturing organization. Formal kaizen system, driving small improvements from all manufacturing employees Process to evaluate key primary & secondary processes for manufacturing and that leadership teams are clearly aligned and metrics are consistent with overall value stream performance Standardized 6S certification program for manufacturingEnsure organizational performance and capabilities are reviewed on the shop floor utilizing visual controls and daily accountability processes governed by leader standard work at an appropriate time interval.  Determine key performance measures to assess continuous improvement, goals, and need to reduce waste, variation, and overburden. Responsible to participate in the review and approval of new projects, equipment, and technologies. Create an alliance with major support functions to develop the processes (Quality, Technical Services, Engineering - Maintenance, Supply Chain, Program Management, etc) to delight our customers. Partner with Engineering / Maintenance to optimize equipment efficiency and to drive TPM/OEE continuous improvement Budget development and maintenance to meet business needs Partner with Human Resources and working with subordinates create a process to consistently enforce standards, timely recognition of good performance, proper training, and professional development of manufacturing leaders Job Requirements (Education, Experience and Qualifications): ·         Bachelors Degree required (Science or Engineering major preferred) ·         Minimum 10 years experience in all aspects of the aseptic manufacturing process ·         Must have knowledge of GMPs and worldwide regulatory agency guidelines ·         Minimum 5 years in a leadership role ·         Lean Manufacturing experience required (i.e. value stream mapping, 6S, leading kaizen events to drive positive change on the floor, problem-solving methodology and teaching people to think) ·         Computer proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, and Outlook and the ability to use enterprise software (examples include:  JDE, BPLM, Pilgrim, Trackwise, etc.) Physical / Safety Requirements: ·         Duties may require overtime work, including nights and weekends ·         Use of hands and fingers to manipulate office equipment is required ·         Position requires sitting for long hours, but may involve walking or standing for periods of time.  ·         Ability to meet Grade A/B gowning requirements.   Equal Employment Opportunity  Baxter is an equal opportunity employer. Baxter evaluates qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, protected veteran status, disability/handicap status or any other legally protected characteristic. EEO is the Law EEO is the law - Poster Supplement Pay Transparency Policy Reasonable Accommodations Baxter is committed to working with and providing reasonable accommodations to individuals with disabilities. If, because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or interview process, please send an email to Corporate_Staffing_Deerfield@baxter.com or call 877-229-4748 (877-BaxHR4U) and let us know the nature of your request along with your contact information.     Additional Information:",Director,Full Time Employee,Location:,,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-Manufacturing-Job-Bloomington-IN-US-166022237.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=20,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,4d7361cc9cdd9af0f9955f0068afd1f7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Machinist / CNC Programmer / Operator - Akron, Ohio - JOB #5151Salary Range: $18 - $25hr+ Permanent Position with BenefitsNOTE: If you are applying for this position you must include the Job # and Title or you will not be considered for this position. Only U.S. Citizens or persons with a Green Card work permit may apply.Akron, Ohio area manufacturer is seeking a Machinist / CNC Programmer / Operator with proficiency programming and operating mills and lathesREQUIREMENTSHigh School graduate with addition trade school educationExperience ""on the job"" as a CNC machinist working with close tolerances of machined partsCNC Machine tool path editing and/or programming skills using Mastercam CAD/CAM softwareMust possess own machining tools (measuring tools: caliper, micrometer… and hand tools)Automated and hand drilling, grinding, turning, and cutting metal partsMust read and interpret parts schematics / blueprints / assembly drawings Candidates are required to pass a Criminal Background Check and a 10 Panel Drug Screen.Salary Range: $18 - $25hr+  Permanent Position with BenefitsTO APPLY:   Only U.S. Citizens or persons with a Green Card work permit may apply. Please reference Machinist / CNC Programmer / Operator - JOB # 5151 when applying to this position and email your resume to: mresumes@integrityjobs.comDue to the large amount of resumes we expect to receive only the most qualified candidates will be contacted. We will retain all other resumes for any future job considerations.Integrity Technical Services, Inc. 14 Whitehall Drive Suite 102Akron, Ohio 44278Toll Free: 1-888-262-3226Akron: 330-633-6500 Cleveland: 440-257-3232Website: www.integrityjobs.com (To view all of our open positions please visit our website) Integrity Technical Services, Inc. does not charge a fee for finding anyone a job. Integrity Technical Services is an Equal Opportunity Employer. ",Machinist / CNC Programmer / Operator Job in Akron,Full Time,"Akron, OH 44311",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Machinist-CNC-Programmer-Operator-Job-Akron-OH-US-160254804.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=19,18.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),d858514fe2b7f3716ac4ceabc5118a79
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sears Home Improvement Products and Services, a member of the Sears Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ: SHLD) family of companies, is one of America's largest home improvement companies for siding and windows installation with operations in 45 states. Our products include siding, custom manufactured and installed windows, custom home entry doors, kitchen remodeling, custom cabinet refacing and Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC).Sales Reps Wanted. Pre-Qualified Leads. No Cap on Commission. Sharon Hill- PA - 800 Calcon Hook Rd Bay 6, Sharon Hill, PA 19079 Complete the application here: https://sjobs.brassring.com/TGWEbHost/jobdetails.aspx?partnerid=455&siteid=185&areq=684241br Are you ready to join a winning sales team with pre-qualified leads, no cold calling, flexible schedule, and no cap on sales commission earnings?• All leads are provided, pre-qualified and confirmed• Relax, our appointment center will schedule all appointments for you & make any adjustments you need based on traffic or weather condition – it’s like having your own personal assistant!• No cap on commission earnings – sky is the limit!• Fully paid training program• Fuel reimbursement program• Company provided laptop for in-home presentations• Medical /Dental/ Vision coverageMore than half (57%) of homeowners in the US have a home improvement project on their to-do list this year.  Based on a recent survey by the Joint Center for Housing Studies at Harvard University, sales are expected to approach $300 billion this year – the highest level since 2007. Who better to partner with than the most reputable name in its 122 year history? Sears is the nation's largest home services provider with a leadership position in appliance repair, home improvements, product installation and heating and cooling maintenance, repair and installation.Based on the recent increase in demand, Sears is in need of Residential Sales Representatives in your area today. No experience? No problem – Sears will train anyone with the right passion and drive! There is absolutely NO CAP ON EARNINGS.  We provide all the tools you need to be successful, including paid training so you can focus on closing our top of the line products!For immediate consideration take the following step to see why Sears is the national leader with over 196K employees:Apply online at https://sjobs.brassring.com/TGWEbHost/jobdetails.aspx?partnerid=455&siteid=185&areq=684241br Questions? Call 1-877-827-9315Have more questions, read our FAQ’s for some of the most commonly asked questions:What are the requirements of the role?· A minimum of a High School Diploma or Equivalent· Must have valid driver’s license and carry required level of automobile insurance· Excellent communication skills (Written and verbal)· Able to lift and carry up to 40lbs· Computer proficiencyWhat is the day in life of a Sears Sales Representative?Please click on the link below to view a short video which describes ""A day in the life of a Sales Project Consultant."" http://www.sellatsears.comWill I have to do any cold calling or door knocking?No, you are not required to do any cold calling or door knocking. Your appointments are set up for you by the Sears Appointment Center. Not only do they set your appointments, they’ll make any adjustments you need based off of traffic or weather conditions. So it’s like having your own personal assistant.Will you provide training?Yes, we provided a 3-week PAID training program. We have training classes scheduled monthly, so you can be assigned to the next one quickly. QualificationsREQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:· A minimum of a High School Diploma or Equivalent· Must have valid driver’s license and carry required level of automobile insurance· Excellent communication skills (Written and verbal)· Able to lift and carry up to 40lbs· Computer proficiencyPREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:• Prior sales experience• Ability to negotiate contractsSears is an Equal Opportunity /Affirmative Action Employer – Minorities/Veterans/Females/Disabled EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Sales Reps Wanted for Sears. Invitation only interview Philadelphia Job in Sharon Hill,Full Time,"Sharon Hill, PA 19079",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Reps-Wanted-for-Sears-Invitation-only-interview-Philadelphia-Job-SHARON-HILL-PA-US-165001128.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=7,Commensurate with Experience,Entry Level,b606f9e1db4c6cecefc9e37161abfa6f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"GENERAL SUMMARY:The Facilities Specialist maintains the integrity of all building in an efficient manner, and performs a variety of employee and participant services with positive relations in accordance with operational and safety procedures. Position ensures daily and strategic facility needs are met.ESSENTIAL RESPONSIBILITIES:Ø  Receives work assignments, plans and/or generates work to be performed and obtains necessary tools, equipment and materials.  Completes assignments and paperwork in a timely manner.Ø  Provides proper care to the assigned equipment and tools.  Keeps work areas and common areas clean, organized and safe.Ø  Accurately completes requests, repair work and related records for the respective site, as required.  Ø  Maintains logs on preventative maintenance and daily activities, as required.Ø  Maintains supplies, inventories and deliveries.Ø  Responds to security and fire alarm issues.Ø  Effectively communicates to the appropriate party/parties the status, activity and conditions of sites and promptly reports any potential or existing problems. Ø  Works various shifts, to fill in for other staff, and to work extended hours, nights, weekends and holidays to ensure adequate coverage and perform necessary repairs and maintenance as needed. Ø  Responds to after-hours emergencies such as flooding, severe weather (including but not limited to snow and ice removal, clearing snow banks) power outage and other related situations including clean-up activities as requested in critical situations.Ø  Regularly inspects all areas of the sites and communicate deficiencies as well as suggestions for improvements and takes initiative to correct as appropriate.Ø  Promotes and maintain a high standard in the operation and appearance of the sites including proactive communication, routine follow-up and a high level of customer service. Ø  Performs other duties as required. JOB REQUIREMENTS:Ø  High school degree or equivalent.Ø  Previous (1-2 years) facilities experience.Ø  Prior healthcare experience or knowledge preferred.Ø  Ability to stand, walk, reach and use arms to perform tasks as well as push and pull objects and grasp with hands.Ø  Ability to use of various machinery and tools, including but not limited to, a snow shovel and/or blower.Ø  Regularly required to talk and hear and occasionally required to smell.Ø  Frequently required to sit, stoop, crouch, kneel, crawl, balance, climb stairs and ladders, work at heights and in environments with temperature ranges both while working outside and inside.Ø  Occasionally required to work around vibration or noise as well as dust. Ø  Regularly required to lift and/or move up to 50 lbs. and occasionally required to lift and/or move up to 75 lbs. or more.Ø  Specific vision abilities include close vision, distance vision, color vision and depth perception.Ø  Involves movement between departments, buildings, and floors to facilitate work.Ø  Basic skills necessary to operate computer for general day to day work and communication.  Ø  Frequent local travel in personal vehicle.",Facilities Specialist Job in Gloucester,Full Time Employee,"Gloucester, MA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Specialist-Job-Gloucester-MA-US-163180658.aspx?mescoid=4300758001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,425f1337fe7a14aee09fa4c831bb0a09
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:04:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Goodman Networks is a leader in the design, engineering  and deployment of fixed and mobile networks.  With a track record of success working with the largest service providers in North America, Goodman Networks is leading the industry in the deployment of new technologies such as LTE, Small Cell and DAS solutions.   Company vehicles provided! Seeking a challenging position that rewards hard work and quality service? Wanting to have opportunity to make money based on your performance and motivation to succeed? If so, Goodman Networks Field Services has the opportunity for you!   Goodman Networks is seeking motivated individuals to install and service DirecTV satellite systems residentially. This is a challenging and rewarding job working with the latest technology and providing excellent customer service. We offer paid training, steady work, and real opportunities for advancement. We prefer previous experience in Home Satellite System / Cable / Telephone Installation, but do provide paid training for those who have not installed before.   We are hiring in the following locations:                                                            Texarkana, TX  Hope, AR   Nashville, AR  Hope, AR  Lake Providence, LA  Hamburg, AR  Clarksville, TX  Many, LA  Center, TX  Monroe, LA  Marshall, TX    Castor, LA    Essential Functions: Work independently and responsible for the installation of DirecTV systems in residences and businesses Provide technology service and support to all of our customers Ensuring customer satisfaction at the highest level Determining the best location for customer satellites Making sure the customer is comfortable with all aspects of running the system by providing thorough explanations Running cables and hooking up receivers Stocking vehicle with necessary equipment on a weekly basis Continuing to learn about new technology Goodman Networks considers applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital or veteran status, or any other legally protected status. At least 21 years of age and legally able to work in the United States Possess high school diploma or GED Possess a valid driver’s license Working knowledge of hand tools and power tools Basic computer skills and comfortable operating electronic devices Strong customer service skills Excellent verbal and written communication skills Available for a flexible work schedule (weekends / holidays / evenings) Requirements: Be able to lift up to 80 lbs on a regular basis Be comfortable climbing up to heights of 40 feet Be able to work safely from a ladder rated for a maximum working load of 300lbs including all tools and equipment Be comfortable working in crawlspaces and attics Comfortable working outdoors in all types of weather throughout the year Benefits: Company vehicle will be provided after training Completely paid training and certification program (paid $10 per hour during the training) Biweekly pay at or above industry standard, depending on experience (after training period, paid per job completed) Medical, dental, vision, life, and short-term disability insurance 401K Paid employee referrals Health Advocate service Tuition Assistance Program Leadership and Service Excellence training opportunities Paid Time Off (PTO) Company perks, including employee discounts and free DIRECTV programming that includes NFL Sunday Ticket and NASCAR HotPass Additional income can also be earned by referring customers to additional products offered by Multiband Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 50%",AT&T / DirecTV Installation Technician - Broken Bow / Idabel,Full Time Employee,"Bossier City, LA 71111",Telecommunications ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/AT-T-DirecTV-Installation-Technician-Broken-Bow-Idabel-OK-Job-Bossier-City-LA-US-164939672.aspx?mescoid=4900863001001&jobPosition=18,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,42965fe431c55bdb681cc354320b7f5e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a new and exciting opportunity to use your skills in a successful and growing company? Do you desire a fast-paced, casual work environment that is driven by employees who thrive on innovative thinking? If you have a desire to work in an energetic, collaborative environment, then check out this opportunity at Proto Labs! About Proto Labs: Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Proto Labs Is: #4 on Forbes list of Best Small Public Companies in the United States 2nd fastest growing public company in Minnesota by the Twin Cities Business Journal Top 100 Best Places to Work in the Twin Cities by Star Tribune – 4 times!   Position Overview: Utilizes expert knowledge to set-up, and operate a variety of CNC Lathes to timely and efficiently produce complex prototype and production parts to required specifications.   *We have shifts available on the Weekday Days, Weekday Nights, Weekend Days and Weekend Nights. Specific duties include: Set-up, and operate CNC lathe machines in a safe and efficient manner to produce prototype and production parts to specifications, including complex or difficult part. Set up and operate numerical control (CNC) lathe machines that hold to the high quality machine standards required within the organization. Set up fixtures and tooling to run CNC lathe production processes Starts and observes machine operation to detect malfunctions or out-of-tolerance machining, and adjusts machine controls as required. Ensures operation of equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements; following manufacturer's instructions; troubleshooting malfunctions; calling for repairs. Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed. Select, align, secure holding fixtures, and set offsets for, cutting tools, attachments, accessories, and materials on lathes with minimal assistance. Select tooling, set up machines, and operate CNC lathes, to produce quality parts. Understand the concept of tool wear and cutter compensation. Recalibrate Lathe mills after maintenance was completed. Works with a wide variety of materials, tooling, and machine operations Inspects precision parts and makes necessary adjustments to maintain accuracy Install, adjust and maintain fixtures. Assist in new Lathe set up and changes. Adhere to all quality and safety standards within the department. Maintain clean and organized work area with emphasis on safety, quality, efficiency, and utilization. Continually seek to improve work processes and individual performance. Adhere to all company policies and operational procedures. Perform additional tasks as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Must have four years’ experience either in a production or job shop environment, setting up CNC equipment (lathe-machining) doing comparable work. Knowledge of CNC Lathe setup and operation is required Skilled in the use of measuring instruments such as indicators, gage, dial bores, and plate inspection methods, and in-process inspection of precision machined parts. Ability to maintain close tolerances (within .001”) of all processes required. Knowledge of cutting feeds, speeds, and tool life. Basic working knowledge of geometric dimensioning and tolerances (GD&T) preferred. 3 and 4 axis lathe setup and operation, and basic understanding of G & M code. Able to safely operate hand held and stationary power tools. Able to use a computer and calculator. Ability to comprehend and follow printed and computer-screen instructions, and direction from supervisors or technical leads. Able to read and write in English, and do basic arithmetic. Must have good Shop Math skills. Able to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment. Must be punctual and have good attendance. Strong attention to detail is required. Good written and oral communication skills",CNC Lathe Specialist - Weekday Night Shift Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Lathe-Specialist-Weekday-Night-Shift-Job-Plymouth-MN-US-165979006.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=19,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,b7759a2797db9828dba0522946680dc1
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Alene Candles LLC has an immediate opening for a 2nd shift Maintenance Technicians.The hours for this position are Monday - Friday 3:00pm - 11:00pmThese are full-time positions with medical/dental and vacation benefits.SUMMARY Perform routine repairs and maintenance of Alene Candles LLC facilities and support equipment.  Troubleshoot, repair, install, and maintain electrical/mechanical equipment used in the manufacturing areas. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES -Maintain and repair production and building support equipment (including automated, pneumatic and hydraulic machinery).-Perform various types of facility maintenance to include basic carpentry, electrical and plumbing.-Implement preventive maintenance and repair procedures to expedite timely repairs and reduce lost production time.-Maintain maintenance documentation for the equipment.-Use of welders, acetylene torches and brazing or soldering equipment.-Drive the company’s box-truck between buildings when necessary.-Maintain Alene standards of performance and comply with housekeeping, safety policies and procedures.-Perform other related tasks as directed. JOB COMPLEXITYUnder little supervision, perform repairs and maintenance from established OEM maintenance instructions and internal maintenance procedures.  The position encounters regular and recurring work situations with moderate complexity. Some of the work will be verified by another person. SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES  None Required. SPECIFIC JOB SKILLS REQUIREDThe ability to read and understand schematics and technical drawings.  Good electrical and mechanical ability and knowledge of pneumatics and hydraulics.  Understand the principals and theories of mechanical/electrical repair and maintenance techniques as well as those of carpentry, electrical, and plumbing. Communicate effectively; both oral and written. Strong problem solving skills, with the ability to think critically and work well with others in a team based environment. EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE High School diploma or general education degree (GED). Graduate of a technical school and 1 year of experience, or a minimum of 3 year's practical experience working with various types of building support equipment and production machinery.MATHEMATICAL SKILLSStrong basic skills including the ability to add, subtract, multiply and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals.   COMPUTER SKILLSPC skills to include at minimum Microsoft Word and Excel.  CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS Must possess a valid driver’s license. PHYSICAL DEMANDSThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use fingers and hands to keyboard data, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; and talk or hear.  The employee frequently is required to stand.  The employee is occasionally required to walk and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.  Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus. WORK ENVIRONMENTThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to fumes or airborne particles.  The employee is occasionally exposed to moving mechanical parts. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderateIf you are interested in this position please email your resume hourly rate requirement and shift preference to jtighe@alene.com",Maintenance Technician (nd Shift) Job in Milford,Full Time,"Milford, NH 03055",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-2nd-Shift-Job-Milford-NH-US-151649845.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e9e3ab65c73609c7fcb21dade551722a
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Metrologist / Quality Technician – DaysJob ID - 28459Location: Minneapolis, Minnesota Compensation: $52,000 to $60,000 Exciting opportunity working for a medical manufacturer in the Metro area of Minneapolis! This position will be a stepping stone for a career minded Quality professional. ResponsibilitiesProvide complete inspection layouts for new and revised tooling using basic and advanced inspection and math skillsFamiliar with the use of calipers, micrometers, CMM, VMM, gage pins, drop indicators, etc… Provides manufacturing engineering with precise inspection data during initial sampling as neededUse appropriate inspection equipment as defined on documentationPerform inspection or final and receiving inspection as assigned Work effectively with engineers, technicians, supervisors, and floor personnel to resolve day-to-day issues, achieve team objectives, and promote quality principlesQualifications:Minimum of one year hands on Quality Inspection experience in an Injection molding environment ASQ-Certified Quality Technician is preferredGood mechanical aptitude Ability to work independently, organize and interpret priorities Knowledge of and effective application of quality tools (CMM, Scope, Calipers, etc.) strongly desired Strong basic math and statistical skills, as well as effective communication skillsFeggestad & Hill, Incorporated is a contingency recruiting firm with a dedicated team specializing in sourcing highly qualified manufacturing employees for our clients. We offer free confidential services to help manufacturing professionals with their career transitions in a wide variety of positions including: Process Technicians, Supervisors, Maintenance Technicians and Managers, Process Engineers, Project Engineers, Engineering Managers, Plant Managers, Quality Engineers, Mold Makers, Tooling Designers, and more. Visit us online at http://www.fhjobs.com / view all of our job openings and to learn more about our company and staff. We look forward to hearing from you. ",Metrologist / Quality Technician Job in Minneapolis,Full Time,"Minneapolis, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Metrologist-Quality-Technician-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-159877618.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=1,"52,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),2221ea789f8f00e5fe51570bfb02a5ef
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Sales RepresentativeCompany: Superior Comfort Inc.Location: Bristol, RI 02809Positions: Counter Sales - Parts; Sales Coordinator; Sales Manager; Sales RepresentativeIndustry: Commercial/Industrial; Manufacturing (including Sheet Metal Shops); Residential/Light Commercial; Wholesale Supply/Manufacturer Rep-------------------Our company's extensive knowledge and continuous dedication to our customers is what sets us apart from our competitors. We specialize in all things HVAC from A/C and refrigeration, to furnace and boilers, covering both residential and commercial. We have a strong emphasis on EPA certified products, including geothermal solutions. We are looking for a motivated and positive person to add to our growing team! Our company has been in business for 11 years and growing rapidly. Our Company's reputation is very strong. If you’re looking for a promising future in the trade then we are confident we have it! Experienced in sales and estimating within the HVAC industry. A valid driver’s license is required. We offer competitive pay, paid health AND dental insurance. Simple IRA, paid vacations, and paid holidays are also available!Please email us your resume if you would like to apply.",Sales Representative Job in Bristol  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Bristol 02809,All,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Representative-Job-Bristol-165265211.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8eb7f0e6fc97ab78e418ed693355a25e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"OMNI Cart Services, Inc. has been in business for over 30 years and we are still growing. We clean, inspect and repair shopping carts and other backroom equipment for supermarkets and other stores. We are known for our quality work and excellent customer service and are looking for people to join our team and maintain our standards. Our workday usually begins at 5:00 am. We travel to the locations we service in a company truck equipped with an inventory of parts and tools needed to perform the job. Our average workweek is 50 hours, including travel time. About 30-35 hours per week is spent at the stores we service and the rest of the time is travel time. We do not normally work weekends. The job is done outdoors and requires the minimum physical requirements listed below. All cleaning is done with a pressure washing system. Repairs include: straightening frames, inspecting and replacing wheels and other parts, and brazing (a form of welding). As a Foreman you will be responsible for performing maintenance and service on shopping carts at customers' locations while maintaining OMNI's high standards of quality. Job duties include:Repairing or replacing defective equipment and parts using hand tools and power tools and then the reassembly of equipment. Performing routine preventive maintenance to ensure that carts and other equipment will function properly. Using tools ranging from common hand and power tools from hammers, hoists, saws, drills, and wrenches to precision measuring instruments and electrical and electronic testing devices. Assembling, installing and/or repairing wheels, casters, seatbelts, and other components. Diagnosing problems and determining how to correct them by checking repair manuals and parts catalogs as necessary. Recording maintenance and repair work performed along with estimating the cost of the work. Performing brazing and mig welding as needed to repair carts and other equipment. Supervising a service technician. Communicating with Operations Manager to ensure customer satisfaction on all jobs. Communicating with Store Managers at each location to maximize high service levels and gain new business. Parts delivery to other locations as needed.Warehouse work including receiving parts from vendors and shipping orders to customers, as needed.Skills Needed:Excellent written and oral communication skills. Ability to prioritize and meet objectives in a fast-paced environment. Mechanical knowledge of machines and tools including their designs and uses. Ability to perform routine maintenance on equipment and determine when and what kind of maintenance is needed. Use of logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions, or approaches to problems. Requirements:Ability to perform the minimum physical requirements of the job including: moving and turning carts weighing from 25 to 40 lbs, lifting tools and parts as needed, and bending to perform work. Previous successful employment, including at least 3 years with one employer. Prior supervisory experience. Outdoor work and approximately two weeks of overnight travel per month are required. (Additional travel may be necessary during training.)A valid driver's license along with a clean driving record. Other Information: Benefits include Health Insurance, paid Life Insurance, 401(k) Retirement Plan with 50% company match, Flexible Spending Account, paid Holidays, paid Vacation and Tuition Reimbursement Plan. Dental Insurance is also available. Average starting wages for this position are between $51,000 and $57,000 per year. **** WE ARE A DRUG FREE EMPLOYER ****",Shopping Cart Repair Foreman Job in Worcester,Full Time,"Worcester, MA 01606",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Shopping-Cart-Repair-Foreman-Job-Worcester-MA-US-164153571.aspx?mescoid=4701141002005&jobPosition=12,"51,000.00 - 57,000.00 $ /yearHourly + OT with bonus potential",Experienced (Non-Manager),fc059fe1fd2ad7aff4f6f80eff7cb715
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary The Maintenance Technician will be responsible for maintaining, operating, and repairing assigned mechanical building systems.   Essential Duties Thoroughly and accurately complete reactive and preventive maintenance paperwork. Assist in emergencies as needed Completes assigned PM’s and reactive maintenance repairs requiring, but not limited to the following skills: Food Production Equipment Heating, Ventilation and Air Conditioning Refrigeration Mechanical Repairs - pumps, motors, etc. Plumbing Electrical Instrumentation Perform other duties as assigned. *Job duties may be modified at any time. Job Requirements:2+ years of relevant maintenance experience preferred. Computer literacy helpful Entry level position  Must be able to do basic maintenance work which could include basic carpentry repair, electrical and plumbing.",OS - Maintenance Technician-temporary/on call Job in Hon,Full Time Employee,"Hon, HI 96813",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/OS-Maintenance-Technician-temporary-on-call-Job-Hon-HI-US-164862315.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a0845b43b797e0b37da18272d51fc8b4
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: EMCOR Facilities Services (EFS), an EMCOR core business, services over 1 billion square feet of space worldwide. From corporate campuses to single sites, EFS provides a range of services that support mission-critical areas of financial services, manufacturing, pharmaceutical, transportation, and government sectors. Job Title: Mobile Commercial Maintenance Technicians Job Summary: Reports to Operations Manager and leads key initiatives in an assigned geographical territory to ensure the effective, efficient, and timely delivery and fulfillment of EFS’s line of services and associated products to dispersed and varied customers through the deployment and utilization of a proprietary facilities supplier network. Performs preventive maintenance and corrective repairs on buildings, equipment and grounds Conducts “face to face” relationship between EFS and supplier in the service of the client’s requirements. Utilizes multiple trade skills such as carpentry, plumbing, electrical, painting, and roofing, HVAC, and other skills as needed to solve maintenance problems. Maintains commercial properties by self-performing the following duties. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Completes defined field inspections on a scheduled basis so as to incorporate feedback on supplier effectiveness and client feedback. Includes service inspections, and asset inspections. Performs assigned work orders according to schedule. Obtains necessary materials and supplies to complete all tasks. Attends weekly toolbox safety meetings with Operations Manager and other associates. Utilizes mandatory safety equipment to perform tasks. Obtains and completes EFS required training. Performs minor plumbing maintenance on existing systems (e.g. unclog toilets and drains, repair leaks in drains and faucets, replace toilets and faucet fixtures as needed, etc.) Performs routine painting, carpentry work, etc., as necessary to maintain our Client’s facilities in like new condition (e.g. repair a hole in dry-wall, prep the area, and match the paint to present a uniform and original like new appearance). Performs minor electrical maintenance as allowed without a license within state law requirements (e.g. repair or replacement of fixtures, wall switches, and outlets. Replace light bulbs, ballasts and sockets if necessary). Fully utilizes technology (routing software, tablets, handhelds, and company vehicles) to drive productivity and continuous improvement for service delivery to our customers. Estimates time and materials needed to complete repairs and works with the Operations Manager so they can provide our Client’s a written quote for work that we cannot perform within our basic dollar approval limit. Meets and/or exceeds Key Performance Indicators (KPI) for internal metrics to measure safety performance, completed field inspections,, effective use of technology, etc. Identifies out of scope work opportunities and presents to Operations Manager to be decided on. Creates a positive climate with the client, provides and generates customer satisfaction. Maintains timely and consistent communications with applicable Service Delivery and Procurement departments.Completes other duties as assigned or required. Qualifications: HS diploma or Degree/Certification, or equivalent professional experience in Landscaping, Trades (Electrical, HVAC, Plumbing, etc), or Specialty Floor Care, preferred.Up to three years' mechanical experience, including electrical, plumbing, carpentry required; or equivalent combination of training, education, and experience. Any combination of education, training, and experience which demonstrates ability to perform the duties and responsibilities as described including related work experience in one or more of the building trades. Past background in the landscape, janitorial or construction-related services industries highly preferred. Must possess applicable certifications, licenses, and valid driver’s license in good standing. Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization.Complete assigned work orders in a timely manner and communicate work order status via our Handheld or other designated business process.Ability to use and operate handheld device and business systems or document management Database software, including but not limited to Microsoft office, Lotus Notes, MS office (word, Excel).Complies with all applicable codes, regulation, governmental agency and Company directives related to building operations and work safety. Performs assigned day-to-day repairs, emergency and preventive maintenance.Maintain adequate knowledge of and comply with OSHA (Occupational Safety & Health Act) standards and Company safety policies at all times. Experience in the installation, maintenance, troubleshooting and repair of building mechanical systems, including HVAC, plumbing and electrical systems.Daily local travel between properties.Works required hours. Is available during non-work hours as needed and responds to emergency calls in a timely manner. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled Click here to apply online",Commercial Maintenance Technician - Entry Level Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-Maintenance-Technician-Entry-Level-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-165101582.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,dc101ddb3ac1bf2668e821bc62a4620a
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"North Glen Village, an All Age Mobile Home Community, is currently seeking a Maintenance Technician to join their team in Westfield, IN.Job Responsibilities include but not limited to: ·         General building maintenance and upkeep·         Grounds maintenance to include general landscaping·         Pool maintenance including chemical application, water testing,  logbook recording ·         Basic plumbing, electrical, HVAC, and carpentry repairs·         Other tasks/special projects as assigned·         Minor janitorial upkeep of clubhouse and pool area restroomsRequirementsEducation and Experience: ·         High School diploma or equivalent·         Minimum of 2 years of relevant work experience in a similar role preferred Skills and Abilities: ·         Valid driver’s license with good driving record·         Must be able to lift up to 50 lbs·         Knowledge of multi unit water and sewer systems operations preferred·         Basic plumbing, electrical and HVAC experience·         Experience with basic machinery including lawn equipment and power tools·         Organizational skills and the ability to pay attention to detail·         Excellent communication skills·         Provide exceptional customer service and be a ""team player,"" willing to assist other staffTo Apply: Contact the Community direct at (317) 432-0785 and ask for the Community Manager to schedule an onsite interview. Compensation and Benefits: In return for your excellent skills and abilities, ELS offers a rich benefits package including: competitive salary; bonus program; comprehensive medical, dental, and Rx coverage; 401K, stock options; employee stock purchase plan; paid holidays and vacations. It is our pleasure to provide the following insurance plans: life/AD&D, short and long term disability, and business travel/accident.We thank all applicants for their interest. Only those selected for an interview will be contacted. Only local candidates will be considered and no relocation funds are available.EOE",Maintenance Technician Job in Westfield,Full Time,"Westfield, IN 46074",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Westfield-IN-US-165409346.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,Benefits elegible,Entry Level,bf110f5e9a2ad7356a4f61da542ee2f2
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company pesticide products to residential locations according to schedule and as needed based on service requests; calls customers to confirm scheduled services; completes required production forms; assists in sales to current customers. Responsibilities 1. Applies company pesticide products to residential locations according to schedule, safety procedures, label instructions, and as needed based on service requests. 2. Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. 3. Calls customers to confirm scheduled services. 4. Responds on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. 5. Completes required production forms at end of daily route. 6. Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. 7. Assists in sales to current customers through contact on route. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintains licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintains valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in Pleasanton,"Full Time, Employee","Pleasanton, CA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pest-Control-Technician-%E2%80%93-Field-Service-Rep-Entry-Level-Job-Pleasanton-CA-US-164972186.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,e8076824d500bfcb5d084df6d1ce81b1
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"North Atlantic Consumer Products – Family Care / Chester, PA at Kimberly-Clark Organization Description: For more than a century people around the world have chosen Kimberly-Clark family care brands for value and performance. Our products include Kleenex, Cottonelle, Scott, and Viva. Tissue Machine 12 and Fiber Prep Asset Team Leader Requisition No. 160000L1 Position Purpose: Position is an Asset Leader that provides leadership for one LDC tissue machine and Fiber Preparation operation in order to ensure that mill objectives are met. Customers and Customer Requirements: Key customers are manufacturing operations teams, converting operations, and staff planning. Principal Accountabilities: • Safety: Provide an environment in which safety is a known value and leadership responsibilities for loss prevention and control are embraced. • Housekeeping: Establish and maintain continued high levels of housekeeping, appearance, physical condition, and sanitation to ensure conformance to government regulations, corporation policies and standards. • Quality: Ensure all quality objectives are met. • Cost: Manage to lowest possible unit cost while meeting all 9 manufacturing objectives. • Productivity: Ensure productivity standards are met for both Fiber prep operations as well as the TM12 rebuild and subsequent OPEX roll outs. • Customer Service: Ensure customer (internal and external) requirements are satisfied. • Human Resources: Embrace and model the upside down pyramid for Leadership behavior. • Motivation: Develop through action, example, and leadership a climate that fosters the desire and ability of employees to pursue ongoing improvement in processes and systems with which they work. • Corporate Ethics: Ensure excellent corporate ethics. • Business Objectives: Lead the attainment of all KPI’s and benchmarks across both operating assets. • Communication: Communicate fully with supervisors, subordinates as well as Sector leaders on all necessary topics. Dimensions: Total Hourly Personnel: 55 This position requires knowledge and ability typically associated with a Bachelor’s degree and 4-8 years of experience in related fields. Incumbent should have considerable knowledge and leadership experience in a manufacturing environment. Kimberly-Clark and its well-known global brands are an indispensable part of life for people in more than 175 countries. Every day, 1.3 billion people - nearly a quarter of the world's population - trust K-C brands and the solutions they provide to enhance their health, hygiene, and well-being. With brands such as Kleenex, Scott, Huggies, Pull-Ups, Kotex, and Depend, Kimberly-Clark holds No.1 or No. 2 share positions in more than 80 countries. With more than 140 years of history of innovation, we believe in recruiting the best people and empowering them do their best work. If fresh thinking and a passion to win inspire you, come Unleash Your Power at Kimberly-Clark. Kimberly-Clark is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other characteristic protected by law. The statements above are intended to describe the general nature and level of work performed by employees assigned to this classification. Statements are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities and skills required for this position. IND123 Additional Information:",Tissue Machine  / Fiber Prep Asset Team Leader - Chester,Full Time Employee,"Company: Kimberly-Clark Corporation Location: Chester, PA 19013 Job Status/Type: Full Time Employee Job Category: Manufacturing/Production/Operations Occupations: Operations/Plant Management Career Level: Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff)",,http://jobview.monster.com/Tissue-Machine-12-Fiber-Prep-Asset-Team-Leader-Chester-PA-Job-Chester-PA-US-165911739.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,80c31724e44a66cc96e9e18c50342782
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Electrical Maintenance Technician – Rogers, ARTemp to Perm or Direct Hire DOE$20H/R (+) DOEWeekend night shift. Hours will be 4:00 pm until 4:30 am Friday, Saturday and Sunday.           Self-motivated, with a high standard of work ethicsPositive attitude; willing to be an active participant of the teamWorking knowledge of plant equipmentFormal training in electrical/electronics; electrical experience and knowledge of (including but not limited to):Electrical prints and electronic schematicsFamiliarity with mechanical drawingsAC and DC motors and their associated control circuitsUse and interpretation of test equipment (volt-ohm-meter, amprobes, oscilloscope, etc.)Solid state componentsHigh voltage switch gearsProgrammable Logic Controllers (PLCs) and simple programming techniquesShop and work place safety procedures.Good troubleshooting abilities with the ability to troubleshoot to the component levelAbility to repair printed circuit boards, subassemblies and assemblies using acceptable industry practicesExperience and proficiency in performing electrical wiring, component and assembly installation;Willing to be respirator certified;Capable of performing the essential functions of the job, including lifting.Willing acceptance of call-in responsibilities and night shift Competitive salary and outstanding benefit programs, including 401K program; comprehensive insurance plan; paid vacation.   ",Electrical Maintenance Technician Job in Rogers,Full Time,"Rogers, AR 72756",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Electrical-Maintenance-Technician-Job-rogers-AR-US-164945799.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=1,20.00 - 25.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),037404dbbdca9497c9e2cde9bfa49a4b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionEaton's Life Safety & Mass Notification business is an industry-leading manufacturer of fire and life safety products and systems for commercial and industrial markets. We empower customers with the technology and resources they need to meet the challenges of the future. Eaton Corporation's Life Safety and Mass Notification Solutions facility in Long Branch, NJ is seeking a Production Supervisor. The Production Supervisor will be responsible for supporting production and/or warehouse needs for the Long Branch Facility. The key responsibilities of the Supervisor are to, coordinate, supervise and motivate all assigned employees to meet or exceed safety, quality, delivery, cost and efficiency goals. They will develop the team through training, coaching, mentoring and leadership and will report to the Operations Manager. This position will interface directly with all levels of manufacturing and be accountable for the principle job functions listed below. Essential Functions: •Provide direct supervision for production and/or warehouse employees in assigned area. Participate in employment and staffing decisions, performance management decisions. •Maintain departmental personnel records and reports on productivity, quality, and attendance. •Maintain all departmental, work, vacation, overtime and related schedules. •Develop and implement schedules and manpower requirements to meet or exceed production/warehouse plan. •Plans and prioritizes production/warehouse schedules based on customer delivery dates, efficiencies, and material supplies. •Monitor departmental productivity to ensure that established quality and production levels are maintained or exceeded. •All duties assigned by management and deemed pertinent to the continued success of Company and employee objectives and/or goals. •Champion use of Eaton systems and tools to ensure appropriate execution within assigned areas. •Engage direct reports in manufacturing LEAN initiatives including but not limited to Value Stream Mapping, operator standard work, 5S, pull systems, empowered work teams, and structured problem solving. •Provide coaching, motivation, and counseling to employees to encourage optimum performance and continued skill development. •Develop employees within areas of responsibility to work as a team to accomplish goals as set forth by the company and location. •Implement and support behavioral based zero incident safety culture. •Foster an environment that promotes Eaton’s goals, philosophies, and encourages continuous improvement. •Communicate company policies, procedures, and guidelines and ensure they are consistently practiced. •Communicate effectively with other departments to expedite the workflow and ensure the established quality expectations. Position Criteria: •Knowledge of manufacturing, warehouse and engineering systems and processes. •Willingness and availability to work occasional weekends if needed. •Strong computer skills (Microsoft Office Suite). •Ability to walk frequently. •Good understanding and positive support of standard personnel policies and practices. •Interpersonal communication skills: Demonstrated ability to build trust and credibility, provide ongoing coaching and feedback, and strive for continuous improvement. •Strong managerial courage and ability to work through resistance to change. Strong drive for results is essential, with self-directed leadership, requiring minimal supervision & being proactive. •Must possess high ethical standards and ability to abide by Eaton’s values and philosophies. •Must be comfortable working in a fast paced, changing environment. Basic Qualifications (Including Educational Requirements)Basic Qualifications: •Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution is required. •Minimum 2 years of management/supervisory experience in a manufacturing, warehouse, or operations environment is required. •Minimum 1 year of experience and consistent use of a warehouse management system (WMS) is required. •Must be legally authorized to work in the United States without company sponsorship now and in the future. •Relocation is not being offered, all candidates must reside within 50 miles of the site. Preferred Qualifications: •One year of experience working in an union environment. •Experience using SAP •Experience with Value Stream Mapping •Green Belt or Black Belt in Six SigmaEaton is a power management company with 2015 sales of $20.9 billion. Eaton provides energy-efficient solutions that help our customers effectively manage electrical, hydraulic and mechanical power more efficiently, safely and sustainably. Eaton has approximately 97,000 employees and sells products to customers in more than 175 countries. For more information, visit www.eaton.com At Eaton, we see things differently. We see opportunities to innovate, go above and beyond, and we work hard because what we do reflects who we are. If you see things differently—if you’re determined, motivated and focused on improving the world around you—then it’s time to see where a career at Eaton can take you. For more information, visit www.eaton.com/careers Eaton is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Eaton is committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",Production Supervisor Job in Long Branch,"Full Time, Employee","Long Branch, NJ 07740",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Supervisor-Job-Long-Branch-NJ-US-165993236.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=11,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,aa634fceb01e4a83dd07dd5318c57050
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"OD/ID GRINDER- $14.00-$22.00 HRESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.•Set up and operate equipment to efficiently perform job.•Understand the use of measuring tools and the calibration requirements.•Offer input on how to improve the operations.•Record how much time is spent on each job.•Modify CNC programs as needed.•Must have a full understanding of CNC operations and equipment.•Must understand use of different cutters and possess ability to determine correct feeds and speeds for those cutters.•Produces acceptable number of parts in established time frames.•Check finished dimensions to four place tolerance.•Follow the daily schedule.•Follow the guidelines for the verification system.•Able to perform basic inspection prior to heat treating.•Must be capable of making simple jigs and fixtures.•Must be able to make complex set ups.•Maintain a clean and orderly work area.•Comply with state and federal law safety regulations in addition to  safety and security procedures.•Adhere to company policies and state and federal laws and regulations relating to employment, including promoting a workplace free of discrimination and harassment.•Other related duties as assigned.PHYSICAL DEMANDS: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to work in a standing, sitting, or bent position for 10 hours/day and must be able to lift a minimum of 25 pounds with control.  The employee must be able to raise arms above shoulders and maintain dexterity for extended periods of time and also use hands to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; and be able to stoop or kneel for excessive periods of time.  The employee must be able to perform the physical demands of the job with or without reasonable accommodation.  The employee must be able to wear personal protective equipment.WORK ENVIRONMENT: While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently around large industrial machinery, and the employee constantly works near moving mechanical parts that create a moderately high noise level.QUALIFICATIONS:•Must have the ability and interpersonal skills to successfully work as a team member to obtain desired results.•Must be able to understand and apply work-related documents such as operating manuals, maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.•Must be able to understand and perform to job-related quality standards, methods, usage of inspection devices and reporting as required.•Must be able to travel domestically and internationally.•Must be a U.S. citizen or be able to comply with U.S. export regulations.•Must be able to read and understand blueprints and engineering drawings.•Must be able to locate, diagnose and correct problems in equipment and systems utilizing test equipment and/or prior work experience.•Knowledge of algebra and trigonometry preferred.•Must be able to train other employees as required.•Must possess excellent interpersonal skills.•Must be detail oriented.•Must be able to work all shifts including holidays and weekends.•Must be able to communicate through written, verbal, or other means of communication.•Must be able to work 50 hours per week, however, schedule may be adjusted according to business and operational needs.•Must be able to wear personal protection equipment, such as earplugs, safety glasses, and safety shoes.PREVIOUS EXPERIENCE/EDUCATIONAL QUALIFICATIONS:•High school diploma or equivalent.•Successful completion of the apprenticeship program or equivalent experience required.",OD/ID GRINDER Job in Freeport  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Freeport 16229,Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/OD-ID-GRINDER-Job-FREEPORT-US-165943650.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,14.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),98d4efebc0bf0f76515638f55ad1e868
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintenance TechnicianSpartanburg, SC Summary:Under General Direction of the Business Unit Manager, provides technical support to enable the Maintenance Department to independently carry out daily responsibilities and integrate all phases of electronic/automated equipment installation, updates, and repairs. Participates in continuous improvement processes and general upgrading of equipment and maintains equipment documentation as necessary. Solves mechanical problems and gives direction for proper repairs. Assigns tasks and trains other staff as needed. Performs other duties as necessary in support of Maintenance Department. Works independently on assigned projects that range from simple program modifications to major redesigns that may have mechanical, pneumatic, or electronic scope involving senior/advanced level work beyond scope of Machine Repairperson and Maintenance Electrician. Work may involve irregular work schedules and exposure to chemicals, high voltage from electrostatic equipment, loud noise, and hazardous waste. Job Responsibilities:Work is complex and difficult in character and requires strong technical and broad business knowledge. Requires independent problem solving and decision making with general direction given on project objectives and broad guidance from corporate strategy and goals. Requirements:Associates degree in technical discipline plus significant amount of related work experience; or completion of apprenticeship as mechanic or electrical and five years experience which includes advanced electronics/programming or equivalent.Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot, update, and work on all equipment in designated area of responsibility. Must have knowledge of electrical codes and electricity and be able to apply it to the job.Computer Aided Design skills required to create, updates, read, understand, and work using mechanical, machine, and/or equipment documents.",Maintenance Technician Job in Spartanburg,Full Time,"Spartanburg, SC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Spartanburg-SC-US-165816801.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,,,20c5fd65313735b695206ee50af81dcb
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client a successful and growing manufacturer of automotive aftermarket parts, is searching for a Welding Manager to lead their largest manufacturing facility. This facility, located in Lake County, Ohio, has state of the art equipment and over 100 weld employees on two shifts. This position will be responsible for managing and developing current and new employees, including temporary/seasonal workers as well as keep production schedule on track.Description: Welding Production Manager/LeaderPurpose:  Looking for a driven leader that expects continuous improvement, enjoys a fast paced environment, and thrives in driving productivity.  Our privately owned company is searching for a progressive leader with aspirations to grow with the company.  In this position, the right person will identify opportunities of process improvements, quality improvements, and productivity improvements.  This role is critical to the current and future success of the company and it will be treated as such.  Welding Process Manager Job Expectations:·         Drives manufacturing results through process ownership, development of process, coaching/developing your team. ·         Works with Production Planning to optimize throughput and ensure supply to our valued customers ·         Works with other departments to ensure proper usage and up-time on equipment·         Maintains working relationship with all employees under the company umbrella and contributes to a team effort while resolving personnel problems by analyzing data; investigating issues; identifying solutions; recommending action all while maintaining a safe and clean work environment. Overall Skills/Qualifications Needed To Meet Job Expectations:·         Excellent written/verbal communication skills (written and verbal English language proficiency is required) ·         Must be able to effectively communicate and interface with all levels of staff from clerical to executive management. ·         Must be relentless in his or her  DRIVE to succeed ·         Must have superior decision-making skills, problem-solving skills and conflict-management abilities. ·         Must have technical knowledge of multi-arm robotic cells (Fanuc preferred), including experience with seam tracking, touch sensing, and coordinated motion.  ·         Shall have the welding knowledge to ensure welds meet size, quality, and location specifications according to AWS standards, as well as be able to troubleshoot weld quality issues.·         Has experience setting weld parameters and is able to train others on proper welding techniques.  ·         Ability to drive the continuous improvement of all setup programs & work cell setups.·         Demonstrated ability to coordinate multiple functions from the shop floor. ·         Must yield high results working both well with a team and independently with little or no supervision. ·         Capable to help shape changing company culture·         Ideal person displays an entrepreneurial spirit toward his/her position·         Must be approachable. ·         Must be customer focused·         Intermediate to advanced user of Microsoft Office Suite. ·         Excellent analytical, group facilitation, and relationship management skills required. Welding Process Manager Daily Duties:·         Create and execute daily/weekly/monthly operational plan according to priorities established by: Master Plan, Dispatch Reports, and requests from Plant Operations Manager.·         Ensure that all personnel deliver desired results in supply, financial performance, and attracting and developing talent - daily·         Work with Quality Dept. to contain all non-conforming material, prevent recurrence of non-conforming product and assure that quality product leaves the Department.·         Train and develop Department personnel as required to achieve Department goals.·         Track and record daily indirect time and throughput per employee and develop planning for continuous improvement in reduction of hourly indirect time and department efficiencies.·         Review the daily production reporting data computer system for accurate counts, accurate time allocation per work order/employee and desired results vs. standard and plan vs. actual.Apply with resume for immediate consideration.  Company will relocate the right candidate for this opportunity. ",Welding Manager Job in Mentor,Full Time,"Mentor, OH 44060",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Welding-Manager-Job-Mentor-OH-US-155951287.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=4,"80,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /yearSalary will be based on experience , Negoitable",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e4bf5409c9914b0d7de138f9e4cfa998
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:38,No,jobs.monster.com,DIESEL TECHNICIANNight ShiftKeworth Sales Company has an opening for a heavy duty diesel technician with minimum 2 years of experience. Applicants must have tools. This is a FT position with benefits. Salary is DOE.www.kenworthsalesco.com,Diesel Technician Job in Heyburn,Full Time,"Heyburn, ID 83338",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Diesel-Technician-Job-Heyburn-ID-US-165326747.aspx?ch=twinfalls&mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=2,,,8e0bcd5acfd926c36062c4d43042d1b7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seamless CIS is looking for Independent and Sub-Contractors for the Kansas City area with Single Family Unit and Multiple Dwelling Unit experience for the Installation Project . We will be post wiring apartment buildings, high rise condos, and town homes with fiber optic lines. Task will include doing  the construction, the splicing, and the testing. Also, drop, aerial, and underground work. The MDU Fiber Technician will demonstrate the ability to use hand and portable power tools safely and efficiently in both indoor and outdoor environments. Drilling concrete, hammering and sawing EMT, PVC and micro duct pipe, install connectors and attachments as needed to NEC and local building codes. Install boxes and terminals both EMT and PVC. Install and secure EMT, PVC and micro duct pathway. Fire stop per state, fire codes, and practices (Materials are supplied).Must have tools and a reliable work vehicle (Truck, SUV, Van or Minivan). Some positions require traveling.This is a google fiber project.",Installation and Service Technician Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, MO",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Installation-Service-Technician-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-164859066.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=10,,,69c2bfb2095ba3314ea0dea236ea59f5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Innovators with Insight Cobham's values of Trust, Talent and Technology have driven us from our launch in 1934 by Sir Alan Cobham, an aviation innovator, to becoming a global leader in state-of-the-art aerospace and defense systems. And it's the insights of our innovators today that will secure our collective future. Innovators like you. About Cobham: Cobham is one of the world's leading companies engaged in the development, delivery and support of leading-edge aerospace and defense systems in the air, on land and at sea. Our clients and partners trust Cobham to deliver the mission-critical technology they need, and we trust our employees to draw on their ingenuity and passion to deliver those solutions. This leads to an empowering culture for our people. Our Leadership team is open, sharing plans for the next five years, driving retention by offering demanding, exciting work, and providing full guidance and mentoring. Cobham is seeking a Plumber. This position is located in Davenport, IA. Key Responsibilities:Installs, maintains and repairs gas, water, air, vacuum, plumbing, heating and sewer systemsUses a variety of hand and power tools common to the trade, for cutting pipe, connecting pipe with fittings and fixtures, and sealing jointsDiagnoses and troubleshoots problems with fire hydrants, sprinkler systems, pumps, valves, and bathroom equipmentPerforms a variety of duties related to plumbing including brazing, soldering, caulking, sweating, packing, sealing, etc.Minimum Requirements:Completed HS Diploma or GEDMust possess a current Journeyman's cardMinimum of three years of experience in industrial, commercial, or institutional plumbing: gas, water, air, vacuum, plumbing, heating and sewer systemsExperience reading blueprints, diagrams, and written instructionsThis position requires access to technology, materials, software or hardware that is controlled by export laws of the US. In order to be eligible you must be either a US Citizen or Permanent Resident.Preferred Qualifications:Experience inspecting backflow preventersGood interpersonal skills and be able to get along with co-workersAble to work with minimum supervisionAble to lift 30 pounds frequently, 50 pounds occasionally and 100 pounds rarelyAble to frequently perform overhead workExperience with all tools and equipment needed for performance of job dutiesGood problem solving skillsCobham is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and embraces diversity in our employee population. It is the policy of Cobham to provide equal opportunity to all qualified applicants and employees without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, or genetic information. Cobham will refrain from discharging, or otherwise discriminating against, employees or applicants who inquire about, discuss, or disclose their compensation or the compensation of other employees or applicants. See all of our latest opportunities at www.cobhamcareers.com or follow us on our LinkedIn page at www.linkedin.com/company/cobham . To be considered you must apply by going to www.cobhamcareers.com .",Plumber Job in Davenport,Full Time,"Davenport, IA",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Plumber-Job-Davenport-IA-US-165545257.aspx?mescoid=4700814001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2c952b4bc4c45324c07ab1245bb88524
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"John Deere Horicon Works Job Fair!!John Deere Horicon Works Facility in Horicon. 201 E. Lake St. - Horicon, WI 53032Saturday - April 2, 2016 - 8am and 10:00am. Pre-register onlineJob Fair to include:Applications, Assessments, Interviews and PhysicalsPERMANENT FULL-TIME POSITIONS:WeldersAverage compensation w/incentive pay, $16-$18 per hrAssemblersAverage compensation w/incentive pay, $15-$17 per hrHolidays, Vacation, Tuition Assistance and Healthcare. Career Advancement and OT OpportunitiesIf you are unable to attend the Job Fair you can also go online and apply for other recruiting dates at the Horicon facility. For information about the jobs, candidates can visit the Job Center of Wisconsin's web site at:  https://jobcenterofwisconsin.com/ - OR -To apply: Complete our online application at: www.JohnDeere.jobs/wageEOE This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41CFR 60-741.5(a) and 41CFR 60-300.5(a). These regulations prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability and qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities and qualified protected veterans.madison.com 320215",Job Fair Job in Horicon,Employee,"Horicon, WI 53032",All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Job-Fair-Job-Horicon-WI-US-164881067.aspx?ch=madison&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=14,,,b0e62ec614180398346e7440f6fb0877
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp; Schenectady State:&nbsp;&nbsp;New York Postal/Zip Code: 12303 &nbsp; Callanan Industries, Inc. was founded in 1883 as an aggregate mining company.&nbsp; Over a century later, Callanan Industries, Inc. continues to be a leading supplier of paving materials and construction services, providing a complete range of high quality aggregates, asphalt paving, and ready mix concrete products to state, federal, municipal, commercial, and private customers with operations throughout New York State and Western Massachusetts.&nbsp; Callanan Industries, Inc. was purchased by Oldcastle, Inc. in 1985. &nbsp; &nbsp; &nbsp; Job Description Summary Candidates will report directly to the site superintendent communicating production requirements and maintenance needs. Seasonal position with overtime required during the peak season Work in a safe and professional manner Report any accident or incident to supervisor Perform daily post inspections and Risk assessment forms Wear proper PPE at all times ( Personal Protective Equipment ) Operate plant according to production schedule using appropriate materials Monitor asphalt operation to ensure quality mix Performs a wide range of laboring duties within an Asphalt Plant Assist in plant maintenance and in compiling reports regarding plant production and maintenance Properly follow all company policies along with OSHA/MSHA regulations for safe working procedures and environment Perform general cleaning of work areas and maintenance areas. Assist other maintenance department staff in performing the duties necessary to assure the efficiency of operations of equipment/vehicles. Lift, carry and hold materials, tools and supplies. Perform other duties as assigned Requirements The ideal candidate will have the following: Experience in mechanical maintenance Demonstrate good performance, safety and attendance Demonstrate a willingness to work and communicate well with supervisor’s, truck drivers and other employees Demonstrate the ability to maintain MSHA, OSHA and all other company policies or Government state rules and regulation’s Operate equipment in a safe and professional manner General knowledge in Loader operation Operate and maintain equipment in a safe and clean condition Have the ability to follow through with efficiency on verbal and written instructions Maintain excellent attendance, and maintain a can-do, positive attitude Must pass physical exam, drug screen and background check before being employed by Callanan Industries, Inc. &nbsp; Preferences Prior experience in the aggregate or asphalt field Ideal candidate will have some familiarly with mobile equipment Education/Experience Prior experience is preferred, but training will be provided as needed High school graduate or equivalent &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive union wages Comprehensive union medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Callanan Industries, Inc. is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer &nbsp; Callanan Industries, Inc. is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. &nbsp; &nbsp; www.oldcastle.com www.callanan.com &nbsp;",Plant Operator/Ground Person Trainee Job in Schenectady,Full Time Employee,"Schenectady, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Plant-Operator-Ground-Person-Trainee-Job-Schenectady-NY-US-165650542.aspx?mescoid=5100990001001&jobPosition=1,,,d44280f9db6c6e5580a0dec2a5cf8b28
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the company.Locally owned and operated this fast paced automotive repair facility looking for qualified applicants to come aboard. Are you tired of where you are at? We are growing and need Good technicians to come aboard with us. We are looking for someone that has good qualifications as a technician that will help us achieve that next level and that we can help them further their career. We offer 401k, paid vacation and employee discounts. We believe in taking care of our employees because they are our family. JOB DESCRIPTIONTechnicianGENERAL SUMMARY Provides automotive services by performing inspections, repairs, maintenance, and installations efficiently, safely and according to quality and time standards.  Complies with Stores safety and environmental programs and practices.  Automotive services may include, but are not limited to drivability, suspensions, alignments, steering, heating and air conditioning, basic and ABS brakes and exhaust systems.Reports To:  Store ManagerAchieving High StandardsPrincipal Duties and Responsibilities:Promotes Store by presenting professional image, positive attitude, and clean work area.Road tests vehicles to ensure repairs are completed properly.Suggests additional work that is needed to the Service advisor so the customer may be notified.Completes service and repair assignments correctly, to pass quality inspections or test drives.Collects all necessary information before requesting parts (e.g., model year, etc.).Maintains sufficient personally-owned tools; keeps tools in good working order.Additional Duties and Responsibilities:Notifies store manager and service advisor if delays are expected.Maintains cleanliness of the customer's vehicle.Working Effectively With OthersPrincipal Duties and Responsibilities:Promotes a productive working relationship with others.Actively listens to concerns; takes action to respond to others’ needs.Speaks clearly, concisely, and effectively.Provides clear and legible record of service completed for both customer and Store use.Has an approachable style; fosters open communication through active listening.Additional Duties and Responsibilities:Assists Service advisors, if necessary, to explain completed repairs to a customer.Assists other technicians when needed.Handling PressurePrincipal Duties and Responsibilities:Effectively handles and implements changes in Service Department.Listens to and supports new ideas and approaches; adapts to change quickly.Maintains composure when faced with multiple demands.Meets or exceeds flat rate time allowances.Additional Duties and Responsibilities:Successfully performs overlapping tasks.Managing ComplexityPrincipal Duties and Responsibilities:Prioritizes work to meet demands and customer needs.Makes decisions regarding repair options; asks for assistance as necessary.Completes repair orders within specified time frame and alerts appropriate personnel if delayed.Additional Duties and Responsibilities:Takes necessary steps to minimize time spent waiting for parts.Coordinates with Service advisor to ensure parts are available to complete repair.Understanding and Using Business KnowledgePrincipal Duties and Responsibilities:Performs preventive maintenance, cleaning, and repairs on stores tools and equipment; ensures facility is clean and organized at all times.Follows all hazardous waste and OSHA safety regulations and company policies.Additional Duties and Responsibilities:Stays up-to-date on the latest technical services through training, bulletins, campaigns, etc.Acquires necessary training as required.Applying the BasicsPrincipal Duties and Responsibilities:Reviews and evaluates service write-up to determine if additional information is necessary and what type of diagnosis is needed.Uses computer to look up part availability and repair orders.Uses manuals including diagrams as necessary to complete the repair order.Properly disposes of used parts and returns unused parts to the parts service advisorCompletes time ticket correctly.Uses diagnostic procedure to identify the symptoms of the problem, the conditions under which they occur. Additional Duties and Responsibilities:Follows safety rules and regulations.Returns special tools and reference materials to their designated locations.SKILL REQUIREMENTSSkills required to perform principal/additional duties and responsibilities:Achieving High Standards focuses on ensuring customer satisfaction, getting results, displaying professionalism, and maintaining awareness to details.  This includes understanding the importance of serving the customer and anticipating their needs, being a “self-starter”, consistently achieving or exceeding goals, showing concern for all aspects of the job, monitoring activities over time and following ethical standards set by the company.Working Effectively with Others focuses on valuing teamwork, listening, speaking and writing effectively, and influencing customers.  This includes being aware of the impact of one’s own behavior on others, using active listening skills  to demonstrate understanding and sensitivity, adjusting explanations for different audiences to ensure understanding, expressing ideas clearly and organizing them in a logical and concise form, and persuading others to change their opinion based on the information that one provides.Handling Pressure focuses on adapting to change, maintaining composure, resolving conflicts, and multi-tasking.  This includes the willingness and ability to change work practices or priorities in response to changing conditions, maintaining performance under stress or opposition, maintaining quality while shifting back and forth between two or more activities, remaining sensitive to time deadlines and conflict situations, and settling disagreements by objectively analyzing viewpoints.Managing Complexity focuses on planning and prioritizing, problem solving, and making decisions.  This includes re-evaluating priorities and re-organizing workload to meet demands, identifying problems, determining relationship between “cause” and “effect” and examining information from different sources to formulate the best course of action.Applying the Basics focuses on referencing written information, applying basic math skills, using computer systems, following and learning new procedures, maintaining awareness of and following safety procedures, and troubleshooting problems.  This includes understanding information gathered from written text, diagrams and graphs; solving arithmetic problems; using computer systems to access and input information; and being able to locate and identify problems encountered on the job.Understanding and Using Business Knowledge focuses on applying technical knowledge, updating necessary training and certifications, and using knowledge of store operations.  This includes the ability to apply the appropriate technical knowledge necessary to complete automotive repairs and services.  This involves understanding and applying appropriate technical knowledge and experience to perform automotive services including maintenance, diagnosis and repair, and installation effectively using store resources, such as tools, electronic and driveability equipment, to perform the job.  Other skills include assisting in controlling costs and executing store policies and procedures to ensure customer loyalty.EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTSEducation, training and/or state/national certifications should clearly demonstrate the possession of the knowledge and skills stated above.  High School degree or equivalent preferredOther certifications or licenses as required by state lawDriver’s licenseASE certification in the following areas:Electrical or Electronic SystemsBrakesHeating and Air ConditioningSuspension and SteeringManual Drive Train and AxlesAutomatic Transmission and TransaxleEngine PerformanceEngine RepairEXPERIENCEMinimum 2 years’ experience in automotive repair or service; 4 or more years preferredTools required to perform repairs and servicesPHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:WORKING CONDITIONS:Moving about the store to complete auto service and repairUsing hand and/or power tools and equipment consistent with industry standardsUsing computer to look up informationStanding for 6 to 8 hours in a shiftBending, stretching, lifting, reaching, and climbingUtilizing physical and manual dexterityLifting up to 70 lbs.NoiseVibrationPaintDustExhaust fumesOther hazardous and non-hazardous materialsUse video display monitor",Automotive Mechanic Job in Aurora,Full Time,"Aurora, CO 80011",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Mechanic-Job-aurora-CO-US-165760344.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=19,15.00 - 35.00 $ /hourFlat rate,Experienced (Non-Manager),6afc908b9f7fc4fcb70f2da6fbc5fbd9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Anixter, we help build, connect, protect, and power valuable assets and critical infrastructures. From enterprise networks to industrial MRO supply to video surveillance applications to electric power distribution, we offer full-line solutions—and intelligence—that create reliable, resilient systems that can sustain your business and community. Through our unmatched global distribution network, supply chain management expertise and technical know-how, we drive efficiency and effectiveness to benefit your bottom line.Position Purpose:Responsible for specialized warehouse tasks in loading, unloading, order pulling, shipping, returns, forklift, fabrication, counter, or may have a generalized role working in all departments.Note: this position also entails driving responsibilities (up to 50% of the time)Responsibilities: include:- Complete tasks such as loading, unloading, sorting, picking, stocking, staging, fabrication and transportation of goods.- Load and unload materials to and from designated storage area, such as racks, shelves, or vehicles. - Stack or pile materials, such as lumber, boards, or pallets- Install protective devices, such as bracing, padding, or strapping, to prevent shifting or damage to items being transported.- Verify computations against physical count of stock.- Maintains condition of work area (i.e. free of trash, product in correct location, etc.). Follows company safety policies and procedures and encourages other associates to do the same.- Receive and fill orders or sell supplies, materials, and products to installers and subcontractors.- May drive truck to pick up incoming stock or deliver materials to designated locations or operate forklift or other machinery in order to complete tasks.- Performs other duties as assignedWe are looking for candidates with:- Must have valid state driver license in good standing.- Knowledge of machines and tools.- Forklift experience.-CDL license requiredEnvironmental requirements:- Typically in a comfortable environment but with regular exposure to factors such as temperature extremes, moving machinery, loud noises, and fumes, which may cause noticeable discomfort or a moderate risk of accident or illness.- Ability to lift and carry up to 50 pounds in a physical environment. Ability to stand for periods of time up to and exceeding 60 minutes. Ability to make repetitive movements, including, but not limited to, using a 10-key or calculator, bending, or squatting.- Typically requires overnight travel less than 10% of the time.We offer an excellent pay and benefits that includes:- Excellent medical, dental, life and disability insurances- 401(k) with company match- Tuition assistance- Paid holidays and vacation",Warehouse Associate / Driver Job in Nashville,,"Nashville, TN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Warehouse-Associate-Driver-Job-Nashville-TN-US-165953313.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=13,,,49db6d7dc234ad4bc97e3c2a11235086
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:05:45,No,jobs.monster.com," Job TitleService Technician Job OverviewWe are looking for a self-starter Service Technician with a strong electrical background to deliver the desired customer service experience.  Service Technician Skills Electronics Knowledge TroubleshootingEnglish SpeakingCommunicating SkillsResults DrivenConfidentiality Job Skills and RequirementsProven field service experienceAbility to troubleshoot, test, repair and service equipmentEnglish speaking and writing capabilitiesAbility to work flexible shifts and to adapt to changing work schedulesFamiliarity with technology and its applicationsTechnical degree or certificationCommunicate effectively with our dealers and customersBuild positive relationships with customersDiagnose errors or technical problems and determine proper solutionsProduce timely and detailed service reportsFollow all company’s filed procedures and protocolsCooperate with both in house and Headquarter technical team and share information across the organizationProvide  service and customer support during customer visits or on the phoneManage all on site installation, repair, or maintenance tasks ",Service Technician Job in Elk Grove Village,Full Time,"Elk Grove Village, IL 60007",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Technician-Job-Elk-Grove-Village-IL-US-163755565.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,"32,000.00 - 40,000.00 $ /yearBonuses, 401K",Entry Level,be16b8b0f6019fcd8c2b078f30230781
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:06:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"RIST Transport Ltd. a Division of Wadhams Enterprises is looking for a Diesel Mechanic for our Geneva Terminal2nd or 3rd Shift Position Available. Monday through FridayYou will perform a wide range of mechanical duties on tractors, and box trailers. Duties include all phases of inspection, preventive maintenance and equipment repair.We are looking for people with experience in a full service heavy equipment shop environment.You will be involved with diagnosis of mechanical problems and making the proper mechanical repairs on all forms of Heavy Duty Equipment.A NYS Inspectors license is a plus as is a CDL A or B licenceYes, we are looking for Professional Team PlayersWe provide a wide range of up to date major shop tools for the technicians use. As well as up to date diagnostic computer equipment. You will need to provide a good basic set of tools.Multitasking is a real plus.We offer:Excellent WagesPaid VacationsPaid HolidaysMedical and Rx CoverageDental Coverage401K Retirement PlansProfit SharingCompany Supplied UniformsOn-going professional trainingAre you looking to grow with an exciting,stable and growing company? Contact us today to arrange for a personal interview.",Diesel Mechanic Job in Geneva,Full Time,"Geneva, NY 14456",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Diesel-Mechanic-Job-Geneva-NY-US-152133617.aspx?ch=timesunion&mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8dbff56ff59914ac2fe99823657f0d15
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:06:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description   Weyerhaeuser's facility in Buckhannon, WV has the opportunity for skilled Industrial Mechanics with a thorough comprehensive knowledge of mechanical equipment, processes and techniques to safely repair, modify, install and maintain the facility and high-tech lumber manufacturing equipment, to join our Team.   Key Functions: Machinery lubrication Repairing & troubleshooting mechanical power transmissions Bearing installment, coupling, belts, sprockets and chain drive installations Repair and troubleshooting of Pneumatic and hydraulic systems Metal fabrication and basic principles of cylinder repair Some troubleshooting and exposure to industrial electricity issues Qualifications   The following qualifications are required:  All Applicants must have a high school education or GED. Stable employment history with a minimum of five (5) years' experience in Industrial Mechanical work.  Must be willing and able to work rotating shifts, to include weekends and holidays as operating conditions require.  A personal and total commitment to observe all safety rules and regulations. Experience with Machinery lubrication. Ability to repair and troubleshoot mechanical power transmissions. Previous experience with bearing installment, coupling, belts, sprockets and chain drive installations. Ability to repair and troubleshoot issues with pneumatic and hydraulic systems. Past experience with metal fabrication and basic principles of cylinder repair. Good working knowledge of basic industrial electricity issues. Commitment to follow all unit electrical / maintenance practices. Ability to pass a pre-employment examination. Ability to pass a post interview welding assessment.  Resume detailing work education and work history required for consideration. The following qualifications are preferred: Vocational or technical school certificate in related area. Past employment experience in a manufacturing environment. Experience with SAP, Maximo or other CMMS. Knowledge of fire protection systems. Air compressor maintenance experience. Ability to comprehend blueprints.     About Wood Products Serving the residential, multi-family and light commercial markets, our Wood Products businesses manufacture a wide range of structural framing materials and provides seamless building solutions, from design to installation to support. These teams move fast, work smart and never stop pushing to be and stay number one in the industry.     About Weyerhaeuser We grow trees and make forest products that improve lives in fundamental ways. Our wood products are used to build homes, where families are sheltered and raised. Our cellulose fibers are used to make diapers and other hygiene products that keep people clean and healthy. We innovate to use trees in products you may not expect, such as fabric, plastics and energy. At Weyerhaeuser, we’re working together to be the world’s premier timber, land, and forest products company.     Weyerhaeuser is an equal opportunity employer.  We are committed to taking affirmative action to employ and advance in employment women, minorities, qualified individuals with disabilities and protected veterans. *M",Journey Level Mechanic Job in Buckhannon,Full Time Employee,"Buckhannon, WV",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Journey-Level-Mechanic-Job-Buckhannon-WV-US-164275478.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4256305b094b11a52f1baf7a4053124f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:47:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:Assists the Engineer and other operators to ensure that quality, cost effective service is provided to each customer.Assist Engineer and co-workers in assembling, preparing, checking and loading of equipment required for a scheduled job.Assist Engineer and co-workers in setting up truck, unloading equipment, assembling, preparing tools and rigging-up on location.Guide subsurface tools in and out of well bore under the supervision of the Engineer.Operates hoist, performs routine measurement checks, calculations and adjustments to ensure accurate depth measurements.Assist the Engineer and co-workers in rigging down, loading of equipment and driving truck to shop.Clean and check unit, tools and equipment under direct supervision; performs routine maintenance in preparation for next job.Respond to customer assignments on short notice, day or night.Know and understand Weatherford Quality Policy and comply with all requirements of the Quality Systems Manual, Operating and Technical Procedures and Workplace Instructions.Must understand and comply with all safety rules and company policies of Weatherford.Work assignments carried out to the highest quality level.Perform various other duties and activities as assigned by supervisor within the physical constraints of the job.Performs all duties in a safe manner.Complies with Company safety policies and procedures.Complies with federal, state and local safety regulations and procedures.Operates Company vehicle in a safe manner, observing all company and governmental regulations.Attains and applies comprehensive knowledge of safety regulations and procedures. Corrects obvious hazards or unsafe working conditions and reports those that cannot be immediately corrected to the EngineerSKILLS & KNOWLEDGE:High School GraduateMathematical and mechanical aptitude.Must be certifiable in all applicable governmental compliance programs.Must have a Commercial Driver's License (CDL) with hazardous materials certification and be DOT qualifiable.PreferredPrevious Wireline experience",Wireline Field Operator Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time,"Oklahoma City, OK",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/Wireline-Field-Operator-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-165896536.aspx?mescoid=4700841001001&jobPosition=2,,,0804cbfbf1dbb851b71d27f566721fc1
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:48:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"&nbsp; City:&nbsp;&nbsp;MorrisState:&nbsp;&nbsp;IllinoisPostal/Zip Code:&nbsp;60450 &nbsp; Northfield is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over 120 operating locations and 4000 employees, Oldcastle Architectural operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces. &nbsp; &nbsp; Job Description Summary &nbsp; Manufacturing Equipment maintenance and repair Troubleshoot and diagnose equipment issues and make necessary repairs Perform preventative maintenance and maintain accurate records Ensure safety guidelines are followed and properly documented Lubricate and clean parts and equipment to ensure proper operation Maintenance of buildings and facilities Other duties as assigned, as needed, in order to satisfy customer needs Requirements &nbsp; Associate’s degree or equivalent in training, education or 5 years of experience in maintenance and controls Repair and programming of Allen Bradley, Mitsubishi and other manufacturers programmable logic controllers Repair and programming of Allen Bradley, Mitsubishi &amp; other manufacturers HMI’s Experience with Ethernet communication systems Repair and installation of variable frequency drives including Allen Bradley, Siemens, and Mitsubishi Ability to maintain and repair mechanical, hydraulic, electrical and electronic control equipment used in an industrial manufacturing environment Read blueprints, wiring diagrams, process sheets, and assembly schematic drawings Working knowledge of the NEC Ability to read and interpret instructions and operations manuals and follow step by step instructions Ability to size &amp; run conduit &amp; wiring Good interpersonal and communication skills Strong knowledge of safety and industrial hygiene Hydraulics, pneumatics and plumbing knowledge Able to work any shift Operate mobile equipment &nbsp; Physical Environment &nbsp; Lift tools, machinery parts and other objects weighing up to 60 -80 pounds each Endure intermittent bending, crouching, pushing, pulling, stooping and reaching Standing for extended period of time Able to work under extremem conditions such as hot or cold temperatures, noise, dust and dirt Preferences &nbsp; Computer skills Ability to work independently and meet deadlines &nbsp; What Oldcastle Offers You &nbsp; A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotion Highly competitive base pay Comprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programs Group retirement savings program Health and wellness programs &nbsp; About Oldcastle &nbsp; Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. &nbsp; Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! &nbsp; Join our&nbsp;Talent Community&nbsp;to receive an email newsletter with hot jobs &amp; career advice. Follow Oldcastle Careers on&nbsp;Facebook,&nbsp;Twitter,&nbsp;Instagram,&nbsp;Google+,&nbsp;Pinterest,&nbsp;WordPress (Career Blog)&nbsp;and&nbsp;LinkedIn! &nbsp; Northfield is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this&nbsp;link.&nbsp; Northfield is part of the&nbsp;Oldcastlecareers™&nbsp;network. #CBG #60 &nbsp;",Maintenance and Repair Mechanic / Electrical Controls Tech - Morris,Full Time Employee,"Morris, IL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Repair-Mechanic-Electrical-Controls-Tech-Morris-IL-Job-Morris-IL-US-165761555.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=15,,,b9cee843c98093c4695685f1d5cfec9d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:16:57:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a new and exciting opportunity to use your skills in a successful and growing company? Do you desire a fast-paced, casual work environment that is driven by employees who thrive on innovative thinking? If you have a desire to work in an energetic, collaborative environment, then check out this opportunity at Proto Labs! About Proto Labs: Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Proto Labs Is: #4 on Forbes list of Best Small Public Companies in the United States 2nd fastest growing public company in Minnesota by the Twin Cities Business Journal Top 100 Best Places to Work in the Twin Cities by Star Tribune – 4 times!   Position Overview: Setup, operate & troubleshoot CNC mills. Specific duties include: Install, adjust and maintain fixtures. Assist in Rework diagnosis and resolution. Recalibrate mills after maintenance was completed. Diagnose mill alarms and assist Milling Operators with recovery and provide technical assistance. Assist in new mill set up and changes. Assist launch of new processes and equipment. Perform approved exceptions to the milling process as needed Provide feedback regarding machining issues to management. Adhere to all quality & safety standards within the department. Maintain clean & organized work area with emphasis on safety, quality, efficiency, & utilization. Continually seek to improve work processes & individual performance. Adhere to all company policies & operational procedures. Perform additional tasks as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Able to use chemicals in accordance with safety standards. Able to work safely with sharp & heavy objects (e.g., utility knives, aluminum blocks). Able to use measuring instruments such as scales, calipers, dial indicators. Able to use a computer & calculator. Able to read & write in English, & do basic arithmetic. Able to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment. Must be punctual & have good attendance. Able to comprehend & follow printed & computer-screen instructions, & direction from supervisors or technical leads. Good written & oral communication skills. Strong attention to detail.",CNC Machining - Milling Specialist - Weekend Night Shift Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Machining-Milling-Specialist-Weekend-Night-Shift-Job-Plymouth-MN-US-166072032.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,8d90c05d05ab22de9b08c82f1641a18a
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:16:58:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYResponsible for generating, maintaining, troubleshooting and updating CNC machining programming primarily for the Finishing department. In addition to programming for machining and other miscellaneous machining requests, may support Pattern Repair Department as well as sales/engineering projects. This is a key support role for a growing robotic operations. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following. Other duties may be assigned. ·         Works in manner which demonstrates commitment to personal safety and that of others within the organization.·         Plans numerical control programs to control machining of metal parts, tooling and fixtures on automatic machine tools.·         Develops and maintains new CNC programs. Edits and upgrades existing CNC programs.·         Reviews blueprints and engineering specifications to determine correct machining process, resolves discrepancies, and assists in developing solutions to improve manufacturing methods and optimizes cycle times.·         Supports robotic processes serving machining centers.  QUALIFICATIONS To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEBachelor’s degree (B.A or B.S) from four-year college or university, preferred; or two year technical degree and two plus years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Key capabilities include MasterCAM/G code programming. Six Sigma and/or Lean manufacturing experience preferred. Choson Resource is an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status, or on the basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",CNC Programmer Job in Ardmore,Full Time,"Ardmore, OK 73401",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Programmer-Job-Ardmore-OK-US-166082476.aspx?mescoid=5100930001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5966f8f79947fd9a09dc2e21912f5a23
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:17:28:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"AUTOMATIC SCREW MACHINE SET-UP OPERATOR Badgett Corporation, located at 4009 S. 4th Street in Chickasha, currently has an opening for a Screw Machine Operator on our multi-spindle Acme-Gridley Screw Machines. Qualified candidates would be required to read blue prints, load bar stock into machine, inspect parts visually and with gages and perform other associated duties. Experience is preferred but will train desirable candidates. Salary DOE. We offer competitive wages and benefits. Interested candidates may apply in person or forward a resume to P.O. Box 730, Chickasha, OK 73023, Attn.: Human Resources. Badgett Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer.This job listing brought to you by The Chickasha Express Star",Automatic Screw Machine Operators Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,73018,Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Automatic-Screw-Machine-Operators-Job-US-165931222.aspx?ch=newschic&mescoid=5100937001001&jobPosition=18,,Entry Level,6070c2f1cd1717eecf8eef20c58c2613
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:17:48:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Clearwater firm seeks a full-time Lead Maintenance Technician for elderly apartment communities. Experienced and skilled in repair of buildings, facilities, apartments, equipment, and devices. Employees in this position are responsible for the satisfactory performance of light and heavy manual laboring tasks in a wide variety of construction and maintenance work to include: HVAC, plumbing, carpentry, refrigeration, electrical, appliance repair, alteration, etc. High school diploma or GED required. Possession of valid EPA/CFC certification and valid Florida driver license required. EOE/DFWP.",Lead Maintenance Technician Job in Clearwater,Full Time,"Clearwater, FL 33755",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Clearwater-FL-US-148125128.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=8,,,c3a287eb695774a5a868c5fd00b8be47
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:17:49:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Building Maintenance Technician  The Maintenance Technician is responsible for maintaining the physical asset of the property and maintaining company aesthetic expectations for the property in an efficient and effective manor and at the direction of the Manager. Responsibilities for this position include but are not limited to: inspection of all areas of the Property, all general and preventative maintenance for the property including mechanical systems, common areas (interior and exterior) and commercial units (except work that is contracted to third parties), upkeep of the property grounds, general custodial duties as needed, maintain supply inventories for regularly used parts and products, completion of work-orders, unit turn-over tasks including maintenance, painting, and cleaning (except work that is contracted to third parties), provide direction to porter/assistant maintenance personal as directed by the Manager, removal of ice and snow from the Property when necessary, completion of regular forms and employee paperwork, and other duties as required and directed by the Facilities Maintenance Manager. General Background and Minimum RequirementsØ Minimum 5 years property maintenance experience Ø Excellent organizational, verbal, and written communication skills a mustØ General understanding of building systems including but not limited to plumbing, fire safety, heating/ventilating/air-conditioning (HVAC), and electrical systems.Ø General understanding of tasks commonly related to building maintenance, including but not limited to painting, carpentry, plumbing, basic HVAC, and basic electricalØ General understanding on the safe use, storage, and purpose for tools, chemicals, and other products used commonly for building maintenance.Ø Ability to work independently and complete assigned tasks in a through and efficient manorØ A valid driver's license, reliable vehicle, and proof of vehicle insurance are required.Ø Flexible availability to meet business needs. Some on-call after hours are required. Equal Opportunity Employer / Drug Free Work Place. Employment offers are contingent upon successful completion of a background check (including personal/employment references, criminal checks, sex offender checks and driving abstract).In order to be considered for this position, please forward your resume and include your salary history.",Building Maintenance Technician Job in Davenport,Full Time,"Davenport, IA 52801",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Davenport-IA-US-164964778.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,,,d9f938cb7a0d0a9f968fa152ce900469
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:18:20:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Halterman's Toyota ScionMaintenance Technician $15-20/hr Compensation commensurate with experience Halterman's Toyota Scion is holding open interviews for TWO DAYS ONLY!Monday, April 11th, from 8:00am-12:00pmTuesday, April 12th, from 3:00pm-7:00pm(To confirm your attendance at the interview please click “APPLY” to submit your resume)Interview Location:Halterman's Toyota Scion1741 Paradise TrailEast Stroudsburg, PA 18301  We are Halterman's Toyota Scion the fastest growing Toyota dealership in Pennsylvania . Our vision is to be the best choice to buy and service cars, trucks, and SUV's in our region. We do this by attracting great people to join our team who will delight our customers and drive customer loyalty. We offer great career opportunities, along with excellent pay programs, benefits, comprehensive training, and a culture where we strive to help our associates remain motivated and highly successful.Job Description:Perform highly diversified duties to install and maintain facilities.Provide maintenance repairs of facilities.Perform service repair duties and responsibilities.Perform service skills including, but not limited to, carpentry, plumbing, electrical and painting of facilities.Perform regular preventive maintenance on facilities.Detect faulty operations, defective material and report those and any unusual situations to proper supervision.Comply with safety regulations and maintain clean and orderly work areas.IF YOU ARE INTERESTED IN THIS POSITION, PLEASE CLICK “APPLY"" TO SUBMIT YOUR RESUME Equal Opportunity Employer.​ Women & Men, former military & college graduates are all encouraged to apply! Participating dealership is a drug-free work environment.​ Apply now to schedule your interview.​  Applicants must be 18 years or older and be authorized to work in the US.​  Content of this ad and fulfillment of offers are sole responsibility of participating dealer.​Dealer Solutions 360 is an automotive recruiting company and has been retained by the dealership to recruit for their open positions, Dealer Solutions 360 is responsible for placing applicants in a dealership. Candidates will never be charged a fee for training. Candidates will be employed by the dealership prior to any required training.​  Keywords:  ""internet Sales"" or ""Automotive internet sales"" or BDC or ""business development coordinator"" or ""internet manager"" or ""internet director"" or ""internet sales manager"" or ""internet sales director""",Maintenance Technician Job in East Stroudsburg,Full Time,"East Stroudsburg, PA 18301",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-East-Stroudsburg-PA-US-164762397.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=12,,,77fbc4f7e51d917a48e61f6379f7dd6e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:18:20:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come and work for the leading manufacturer of commercial refrigeration equipment!!What We Need:Individuals with a storng work ethic and are dedicated to their job.Drug free and pass a company paid drug screen and physical upon hire.Conditioned for physical work and able to lift 60 lbs.At least 18 years of age.What We offer:A stead job and an opportunity for career advancement.A stable and successful, family owned business.Excellent employee benefits.On-the-job training.Guaranteed raises during your first year.1st Shift: $13.00/HR2nd Shift: $14.00/HRBoth Shifts Offer the Following:$0.50 at 6 months$0.50 at 1 year$.20 at General Factory Raise$.20 at General Factory Raise$1.40 per hour increase potential by the end of the first year!!Open the doors to a cooler career. Apply today at:www.truemfg.com/careersTrue ManufacturingWe are proud to be a Equal Opportunity Employer",Commercial Refrigeration Job in Mexico,Full Time,"Mexico, MO 65265",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-Refrigeration-Job-Mexico-MO-US-166018301.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,,0e4ed66700a2f3d726a9aec6eb2b2ebd
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:18:57:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Duties and Responsibilities: (Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position)· Assure fully adequate and timely completion of these services to include, but not limited to, planning, scheduling, and quality control.· Ensure initial cleaning for buildings/facilities for special janitorial services requests.· Ensure routine cleaning be scheduled so as not to interfere with operations.· Facilitate and coordinate all personnel and technical/operational processes to ensure internal and external customer satisfaction· Manage the operations, cleaning and general maintenance.· Regularly visit and ensure all off site locations are being well maintained, are clean and clear of clutter.· Ensure there is a consistent inventory of housekeeping supplies based on usage at each facility.· Keep accurate records of related distribution.· Guarantee systems are in place to ensure excellent communications of maintenance requests and the status of those requests are in place.Minimum Qualifications: (To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.)· Possess at least three (3) years of recent (within the past 10 years) responsible experience in the management and supervision of commercial and institutional janitorial services.· Specific experience in setting up and managing a variety of services including laundry, and housekeeping services is mandatory.Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:· Proficiency in oral and written communications in English.· Basic computer skills to include the ability to input data into the system and generate various reports and correspondence as required.· Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner.· Ability to apply concepts such as fractions, percentages, ratios, and proportions to practical situations.Chenega Corporation and family of companies is an EOE.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/DisabledNative preference under PL 93-638.We participate in the E-Verify Employment Verification Program.",Janitorial Services Manager Job in Charleston,"Full Time , Employee","Charleston, SC",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Janitorial-Services-Manager-Job-Charleston-SC-US-165414571.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5c0c8a5d4fceb82b89d7a0d5caf36dff
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:18:59:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Mechanic Maintenance TechnicianMartha's Vineyard Hospital Martha's Vineyard Hospital is a nonprofit, Critical Access Hospital dedicated to meeting the healthcare needs of our Island community. We serve a population of 15,000, which grows to 100,000 in the summer. Your life and your career will be richer for the time you spend here.We are currently seeking candidates for the following position:Mechanic Maintenance TechnicianFull Time; 40 hours/weekShift: Days, Including WeekendsHours: 5 8-hour shiftsAvailable: ASAPRequirements: High School diploma; 5-10 hour years plant maintenance experience; ability to use basic maintenance equipment; valid driver's license; ability to read/interpret blueprints; demonstrated knowledge of system design.Preferred: Familiar with Hospital Life Safety and OSHA codes, compliance and safety regulations; experience in healthcare/hospital setting.Contract: SEIU 1199To apply for a position, please visit www.mvhospital.org to submit your online application with resume for consideration. You may also submit applications to Human Resources at MVH: Human Resources DepartmentMartha's Vineyard HospitalPO Box 1477, One Hospital RoadOak Bluffs, MA 02557Fax: 508-693-4753We are an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer.",Mechanic Maintenance Technician Job in Tisbury,Full Time,"Tisbury, MA 02557",,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanic-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Tisbury-MA-US-165553171.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=19,,,196d3f112b50d58a3e31a57b56588792
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:19:24:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"A growing food company located near Philadelphia, PA is currently searching for a Plant Manager.  This position will oversee and manage production, quality control, procurement, inventory management, finance, sales and marketing. This position has executive leadership responsibility of every aspect of the company's operation and plays a critical role in strategic planning to guide the future growth and development of the company’s results/team!In return, the company offers a good starting salary, bonus program, benefits and relocation if needed. Salary range for this position is $100-120 plus 20% bonusApply now, this is an immediate need!!!!Qualifications & Requirements:       -Bachelor’s degree is REQUIRED-5+ years’ experience as a Plant Manager or Production Manager in a food production facility REQUIRED -5+ years’ experience in a FDA or USDA baking food production facility REQUIRED-AIB experience REQUIRED-Must have experience directing and managing a food production facility-Must have experience with Quality Systems in a food production facility-Must have experience with budgets, P&L, and capital budgets in a food production facility-Must have experience in demand planning and production scheduling in a food production facility",Plant Manager Job in Philadelphia,"Full Time, Employee","Philadelphia, PA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Plant-Manager-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165981705.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=6,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,c153f9cf19d0c1a02d16e2246ad6ea4b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:19:45:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"POSITION SUMMARY: We currently have one opening on the day shift (7 am to 3:30 pm) and one opening on the night shift (8 pm to 4:30 am). Hours are flexible for the positions but individual must be able to support day and night shift production schedules. Under moderate supervision of the Sr. Manager ? Technical Communications & Training will provide On-the-Job Training (OJT) in the safe and compliant operation of pharmaceutical packaging equipment that will enhance organizational efficiency and associate knowledge, skills and ability. In addition, the Technical Trainer will support and assist in development and delivery of OJT programs for Packaging Machine Operators (PMOs) and Mechanics in order to maintain effective, efficient, compliant and safe production operations in the manufacturing area. This position is categorized as compliance critical and, as such, requires and is assigned specific responsibility for ensuring continual and proper compliance with all division, corporate and regulatory requirements. It is the associate?s responsibility to observe all safety rules. Any condition thought to be hazardous or unsafe should be reported to your supervisor immediately. PRIMARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Provide On-the-Job Training (OJT) and mentoring including demonstration, observation and performance of job competency assessments of manufacturing associates including operators and mechanics to evaluate knowledge transfer. Conduct PMO OJT and observation to prepare associates for certification. Follow up on a regular, planned schedule to answer questions, provide feedback and verify proficiency.Conduct cross-training and periodic refreshers, as required. Support associates who have questions or need additional assistance in understanding their job responsibilities. Maintain organized OJT training records of all training conducted.Conduct classroom training to support OJT material Support on-boarding process and training for new hires.Conduct unbiased assessments and audits based on defined standards.Support the development and continuous improvement of OJT training programs and participate on teams developing training plans and OJT programs.During non-training or non-production periods, the technical trainer may be called upon to perform in other capacities such as: continuous improvement of training programs; cross-training of associates; assisting with other training programs; checking for accuracy in controlled documentation; and assisting in developing work instructions, checklists and other training material.Required to work various hours, shifts and weekends. Required to qualify as a Certified OJT Trainer by successfully completing AHP?s Certified Train-the-Trainer Program. EXPERIENCE AND EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS: Requires some training in fields such as Engineering, Mechanics or similar vocations generally obtained through completion of a four year Bachelor?s Degree program, technical vocational training, or equivalent combination of experience and education. Requires five (5) years of equivalent work experience or combination of experience and education. Previous training experience preferred. Demonstrated experience with preparing repackaging material and equipment for production runs, packaging concepts, practices and procedures is required. Excellent knowledge and understanding of blister packaging is essential. Three (3) years of experience in pharmaceutical packaging, maintenance or other cGMP regulated industry preferred. MINIMUM SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITY REQUIREMENTS: 1. Knowledge of pharmaceutical manufacturing/packaging2. Demonstrates working knowledge of departmental processes and procedures 3. Ability to simplify complex tasks 4. Effectively and efficiently communicate instructions, express ideas and answer questions within a group or one-on-one setting 5. Communicates with respect, listens effectively, reduces conflict and solicits participation/feedback of others when obtaining information or completing tasks 6. Demonstrates interest in training and a commitment to accomplishing the requirements of the OJT process 7. Carefully observes performance on individual tasks and shares these observations in a non-threatening manner 8. Exhibits a willingness to share knowledge and information 9. Communicates and disseminates experience, knowledge and tips to other associates. 10. Possess a positive attitude with respect to working with others, dealing with change and in supporting the organization?s goals Additional Information:",Technical Trainer Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Columbus, OH 43217",,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Trainer-Job-Columbus-OH-US-165984103.aspx?mescoid=2500380001001&jobPosition=1,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,51e2ab08c4c7c14bf1a1c8620d0bae85
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:19:46:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Field Service Technician As a Field Service Technician, you will be responsible for the installation, calibration and service of a customer’s weighing equipment. Field Service Technicians will be working on both mechanical and electronic scales in various industries and environments from grocery store scales to massive truck and train scales. We are looking for someone that is self-motivated, has a strong desire to learn a trade, and has a willingness to be part of a team that exceeds our customers’ expectations. The ideal Field Service Technician candidate will have knowledge in many fields including mechanical, electrical, and computer experience. We will provide basic and ongoing training to facilitate your growth and future with Fairbanks Scales.Responsibilities:Installation, inspection, calibration, repair and maintenance of industrial weighing and measuring equipmentComplete service documents and test reports for review with customers and managementProvide consultation and quotations on product and servicesParticipate in the marketing and sales effort of the Customer Support Center to expand service revenuesCompliance with all Fairbanks policies, along with OSHA, MSHA, DOT regulations and all other laws governing the workplaceRequirements:Minimum 1 year Field Repair and/or Industrial Maintenance ExperienceMust be able to lift/maneuver 50+ lbsMust have or be able to obtain Class B CDL including a pre-employment drug test, physical exam, and Motor Vehicle Record analysis Must pass pre-employment criminal background checkMust be able to pass State test for Service AgentMust be willing to work overtime (nights/weekends) as required to satisfy customer needsBasic knowledge of mechanical maintenance and electronics with ability to work outdoors for long periodsBasic knowledge of computers and software - Understanding serial outputs / networking would be a plusWorking knowledge of a digital volt meterAbility to travel out of town for training and overnight assignments within designated territoryBenefits:Competitive hourly rate with overtimeCompany provided truckCompany provided cellphone and tabletAll weather clothing/uniforms provided Vacation/sick paid time off Health, dental, life, accident insurance401k plan with employer contributions  WHO IS FAIRBANKS SCALES INC.?For more than 185 years, Fairbanks has manufactured and provided top quality industrial weighing equipment and dependable service through a network of Fairbanks sales and service representatives and authorized distributors. Fairbanks continues to break new ground in scale design, setting the new standard in weighing equipment and systems engineering while meeting the special needs of our customers.You can also visit us at www.fairbanks.comFairbanks Scales provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment.EEO/M/F/D/V",Field Service Technician Job in St. Paul,Full Time,"St. Paul, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-St.-Paul-MN-US-165224266.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5bbac7fb4edabc13845b3155b6a83911
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:20:57:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"OPERATIONS MANAGERHolroyd Precision Rotors, a world leader in the manufacture of helical screw rotors, have an exciting opportunity for an experienced Operations Manager based in their new state of the art manufacturing facility.  Reporting directly to the President of the business you will have direct responsibly for the operations and production lines within the plant. With accountability for approximately  20 employees and with an estimated turnover of $7 million this exciting new role gives the right person the opportunity to influence operational processes and deliver the manufacture of high quality, precision engineered parts.    We are looking for a highly dynamic enthusiastic individual, who thrives on problem solving and is driven to produce on-target results.  Working in our new purpose built manufacturing facility with large CNC machinary the post holder will have direct responsibility for:  Direct and control the company’s manufacturing operations to ensure all targets are met within specified time frames, quality standards and budgets.Direct and control the manufacturing operations staff, ensuring they are appropriately trained, motivated and carry out their responsibilities to the required high standard.Supervise operating processes to ensure the most efficient and effective use is made of plant resources. Take a lead role in the promotion and supervision of safety standards ensuring these are adhered to at all times.Generate and execute agreed production plans ensuring the optimum output is achieved. Carry out efficiency testing and monitor output to ensure production meets established standards in terms of both quality and quantity.Liaise with other departments to ensure all are aware of production requirements and remedy any potential problems.Provide advice and support to other departments on production issues.Lead the development of LEAN initiviates with a strong focus on continuous improvement and waste reduction.   Indirect responsibility for support functions: Human Resources and Finance.  REQUIREMENTSBachelor’s degree in Mechanical Engineering or equivalent coupled with extensive manufacturing experience.A minimum of 5 years demonstrableproduction/operations management experience.Strong background in precision engineering, preferably manufacturing. Experience of implementing LEAN manufacturing techiques 5s etc.Good understanding of OSHA and Health & Safety requirements for a heavy machining facility.Some knowledge of ISO quality standards. Excellent communication skills both written and verbal.Experience of using the Mircosoft suite of programmes.Desirable, knowledge of SAP, MRP or other ERP software.US Citizenship is required. Excellent salary and benefits package available. Holroyd Precision Rotors is an equal opportunity employer. For further information on our Group of companies please visit our website www.holroyd.com ",Operations Manager Job in Spartanburg,Full Time,"Spartanburg, SC 29303",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Manager-Job-Spartanburg-SC-US-165173445.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=7,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),50211ed6ccdf035c6c0fb7af6d102f26
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:20:58:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are looking to become part of an auto center that really values your skills and ability to provide quality service, consider joining the sears auto center team . Now is the perfect time to join as we are going through an exciting transformation of our business!!  The Express Service Technician is responsible for the successful tire, battery, and oil installation to customer vehicles following all automotive processes and procedures. This position interacts daily with customers, Customer Service Adviser, other technicians, and the Auto Center Manager. [#video#https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YhZoUk2cM3Y{#560,315#}#/video#] QualificationsJob Duties/Responsibilities:• Participates actively with team servicing of every customer vehicle to ensure fast, expert service• Dedicates work time to providing excellent customer service• Promotes teamwork to deliver times and accurate customer care during all operating hours• Demonstrates a sense of responsive urgency to every customer no matter what service is required• Uses the Quality Service Evaluation (QSE) form to understand customer service adviser's and customer service manager's instructions• Fulfills the customer's needs the first time, every time• Communicates with Auto Center Manager, Customer Service Adviser and other Technicians to meet Sears Automotive time standards and to exceed customer requirements.• Adheres strictly to Sears Automotive Dress Code standards• Protects customer's vehicle with floor mats, seat/steering wheel covers and, if necessary, fender covers• Racks vehicle safely following Sears Automotive training• Performs Multi Point Inspection (MPI) visual inspections and communicate with customer service manager and/or customer service adviser within 10 minutes• Maintains back shop cleanliness and equipment calibration to Sears Automotive standards•  Thanks customer, expressing appreciation for the business•  Performs miscellaneous duties as assignedRequired Skills:• Valid Drivers License• Successful completion of Sears Automotive Express Technician core curriculum• Commitment to safety: Use of appropriate personal protective equipment, back belt, safety glasses and safety shoes at all times• Maintenance of individual productivity as defined by the business sales per hour standard• Ability to stand and walk for prolonged periods of time• Ability to lift up to 50 pounds• Extended workdays of up to 10 hours, weekends and nights as necessary• Ability to handle stressful situations and work in a fast-paced environment• Ability to read and utilize reports• Extensive spoken communication for customer and associate relationship skills• Must have a valid driver's license• Pre-employment drug test and background check will help assure we build teams of people who can best work with others and serve customer needs.Preferred Skills:• Speed and expertise when installing tires and batteries• Commitment to teamwork and mentoring othersEducation Requirements: HS Graduate or EquivalentLicense/Certificate Required: YesDriver's License Required: YesAge Requirement: 18+ EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Express Service Technician,Full Time,"Ogden, UT 84405",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Express-Service-Technician-Auto-Job-OGDEN-UT-US-164956986.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=13,,Student (High School),55459e4194e4a47cf579c90059a972b4
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:21:02:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Well-established, veteran owned, industrial services company in the Wooster, Ohio area has an immediate opportunity for a Field Service Engineer experienced on CEMS(Continuous Emission Monitoring Systems) and COMS (Continuous Opacity Monitoring Systems). The successful candidate will be responsible for complex troubleshooting and repair of gas analyzers, performance of CGAs (Cylinder Gas Audits), site certifications in accordance with 40 CFR, parts 60 & 75 and opacity audits in accordance with 40 CFR, part 60. We are seeking candidates throughout the U.S. to work from their home. The travel is significant, but you will be home most weekends.  This position reports directly to the VP of Operations.Essential DutiesTravel to a customer’s location to perform emergency/demand repairs as well as scheduled/routine preventive maintenance/auditsInsure all service work is done accurately and in accordance with manufacturers specificationsCompletes work/services on or before due date promisedAccurately prepare all audit/certification documentationVerifiable ability to write reports, business correspondence, and purchasing informationProfessional aptitude to work independently completing projects to the highest level of customer satisfactionDemonstrated ability to work and travel efficiently without supervisionAbility to travel overnight via domestic air 50-80% of weekEnsure that strict safety standards are followed at all timesRequirementsMinimum five (5) years of direct gas analyzer, CEMS orCEMS/COMS troubleshooting and repair experience (‘operation’ does not count)Minimum AA degree in Electronics/Instrumentation, Navy/Air Force School requiredKnowledge of 40 CFR,parts 60, 63, & 75Ability to lift up to 100lbs and up to 50lbs overheadAbility to make vertical climbs in excess of 25 feet carrying moderate weight load and work at elevated heightsMust have color vision acuityGas analyzer & instrumentation and sample handling troubleshooting experience with a thorough understanding of pressures and flowsStrong Electronics Skill including ability to read schematicsUnderstanding of PLC & DAHS operational requirements and capabilitiesExcellent oral/written/computer skillsA valid driver’s license with acceptable driving record capable of passing DMV verificationOSHA certifications are a plusOur company is an equal employment opportunity employer.  In addition to our competitive salary and incentives, we provide the opportunity to become an integral part of the continued growth of our organization.  We hire only the best and the brightest. If you consider yourself one of the best Field Service Engineers in the country, please email your resume to Human Resources.",Field Service Engineer Job in Wooster,Full Time,"Wooster, OH 44691",,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Engineer-Job-Wooster-OH-US-165854342.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=10,"Excellent Pay, Benefits, 401k",,cd925b04f80a5b9a1ca8c505f1150d96
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:21:46:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Engage across all facets of the organization and build your career in a high visibility role with a strong and growing Tier-1 automotive supplierBring your broad-based, hands-on automotive manufacturing experience and your strong leadership skill to a high visibility role where you'll drive the operations function. As Operations Manager, you'll be the right hand to the Plant Manager, with responsibility for all operations in both Holt plants. You'll be instrumental in new product development and launch on the production floor. As important as technical skill, we need a strong leader who knows when to mentor, when to coach, when to delegate, and who takes pride in developing your team, and who will fit in with our strong culture of collaboration and partnership.You'll join a strong management team, and help us get to the next stage of growth. If you're willing to take all available information and take opinions into account before making decisions, then you'll be a great fit for our team. This is a huge opportunity for someone who is driven, who wants to build a career, who enjoys a family-driven and transparent culture, and who is ready to put in the time and energy to be a great Operations Manager. If this sounds like you, then send your resume today!To be a good fit for this Operations Manager opportunity you should have:5+ years of broad-based hands-on experience in an automotive manufacturing environment with direct assembly experience, and/or in a JIT Assembly and Sequencing environmentA technical background with some basic understanding of the big picture in automotive, including:The importance of the appearance of finished products and product qualityExperience in constraint management and the process of problem resolutionA basic understanding of materials and quality and engineering processes and systemsExperience managing metrics such as scrap, labor, and production efficiencyExperience managing large groups of people, ideally in a union environment, and an understanding of how to work effectively through othersExcellent leadership abilities, with the organizational and communication skills to work well with people from all facets of the organization, at all levels and across departmentsA valid driver's license to travel back and forth to the two facilities on a daily basis, which are about a mile apart World-class products & services from concept to delivery. Established in 2001, Dakkota Integrated Systems, a joint venture between Rush Group LLC and Magna International Inc., manages the complete assembly and sequencing of integrated automotive interiors for original equipment manufacturers. We deliver vehicle components for our customers, using our expert approach that is unparalleled in the automotive industry. Our workforce is unique and helps support the resurgence of the U.S. auto industry.EOE/AA/M/F/Vets/Disabled",Operations Manager Job in Holt,Full Time,"Holt, MI 48842",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Manager-Job-Holt-MI-US-165987188.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,,,0c421081ef9176a0b84e8f692536ddeb
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:21:47:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Streamline Circuits Corp., a leading provider of high quality Printed Circuit Boards, offering Rigid, Rigid-Flex and Multilayer Flex, has seen significant growth over the past year. We are committed to providing our customers the most advanced technology, quality and engineering support available. Customers utilize these resources to develop a cost effective product in a time sensitive manner. This is critical for today's customers who want and need to get their quality products to market first.Streamline is currently looking for the right person to join our team as a Junior Process Engineer as well as a Process Engineer. If you feel you meet the expectations and requirements below please send us your resume or drop by our facility to complete an employment application.Process EngineerJob Description:- Oversees and controls all production processes in the shop.- Evaluates process problems and implements corrective actions.- Writes process specifications to insure that processes are compatible with manufacturing objective. - Recommends possible changes or alternative approaches which would optimize performance, facilitate fabrication or improve reliability.- Conducts independent technical investigations involving the application of new process techniques and equipment.- Consolidates results of major process evaluation/modification projects.- Coordinates with technical staff to conduct evaluations, prototype or experimental runs.- Responds to non-routine or critical conditions and situations.- Provide technical guidance and/or training to lower level staff.- Advise company personnel in development, implementation, upgrading and maintenance of manufacturing process, including quality improvement management and program.Job Requirement:2 years Chemical or Industrial Engineering Degree- Requires Chemical or Industrial Engineering Degree or equivalent experience normally obtained with 4-6 years experience in advanced process or industrial engineering.- 5-7 years circuit board manufacturing experience with working knowledge of all manufacturing operations",PCB Process Engineer Job in Santa Clara,Full Time,"Santa Clara, CA 95050",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/PCB-Process-Engineer-Job-Santa-Clara-CA-US-166025861.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7d5db294e5db010485f8292c0bde8479
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:21:56:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description: EDM Programmer / OperatorImmediate FT opening available.  Benefits available.  Must be able to operate EDMs and various other machines.Duties:*Setup/ operate machine tools*Machine parts to make or repair metal parts, mechanisms, tools or machines*Determines dimensions and tolerances of piece to be machined*Determines sequence of operations and machines*Studies specifications- such as blueprints, sketches, schematics, damaged parts or description of part*Executes assignments using machine tools- ranging from Lathes to Milling machines, may operate computer controlled machines* Plans work assignment by studying drawings, blueprints, and manuals while following verbal and written directives* Sets-up equipment by setting adjustments to match specifications; testing tolerances.* Verifies parts by using precision measuring instruments; testing production routine.* Documents equipment changes by completing records.* Maintains safe and healthy work environment by following standards and procedures.* Accomplishes operations and organization mission by completing related results as needed while maintaining a high quality output *Other duties as assigned.Skills/Qualifications:Knowledge of operating Mills/ Lathes,  GDT Knowledge a Must, Manufacturing Quality, Controls and Instrumentation, Equipment Maintenance, Manufacturing Experience, Mechanical Inspection Tools, Decision Making, Tooling, Safety Management, Quality Focus, Judgment, Devlieg experience a plus, Must be able to Push/Pull/Lift 75 pounds",edm programmer / operator Job in Machesney Park,Full Time,"Machesney Park, IL 61115",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/edm-programmer-operator-Job-Machesney-Park-IL-US-166035670.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=8,12.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),7352259d268e1a965a061c6ed240998a
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:21:56:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Henkel Adhesive Technologies is a worldwide leader in bonding, sealing and surface treatments - thanks to our ambitious people. We create unique value for our clients and our technologies can be found in many objects touching our lives every day. Our success is built on constant innovation and people who strive for excellence. Working at Henkel is much more than just a job. It’s a passion. Have you got what it takes? We are seeking an Industrial Maintenance Mechanic that is responsible for maintaining and improving the operation of industrial mixing and filling equipment, as well as facility maintenance.  What we offer: ·         DAY ONE Medical benefit eligibility, 401K, Tuition Reimbursement, Bonus Opportunities and much more!·         Independently completes routine equipment/facility repairs.·         Operates tools necessary to perform assigned tasks, such as but not limited to drills, drill press, band saw, welding jigs, bench grinder in a safe and effective manner.·         Operates material handling equipment necessary to perform assigned tasks, such as but not limited to pallet jack, lift trucks, material lifts and sky jack in a safe and effective manner.·         Ensures training of employees is being executed in accordance with operations and safety training matrix and schedule.·         Ensures that all safety policies and procedures are followed. This includes Lock Out / Tag Out (LOTO) and Isolation, use of PPE, accident reporting, investigation, primary cause analysis, corrective action, implementation, and follow up·         Modifies work assignments based on workload fluctuations within the day.·         Notifies management of individuals not meeting required expectations or following proper procedures. Drafts corrective action process documentation, and communicates infractions to employees after approval by management. Who we are looking for: ·         High school diploma or GED·         Minimum of one year of industrial maintenance experience or Associates Degree in HVAC, electrical, mechanical, industrial maintenance·         Flexibility to work overtime, extended shifts and/or other shifts on occasion·         Proficiency in Microsoft Office·         Able to lift up to 50 pounds on an occasional basis and able to work on ladders/lift cages/skyjack.·         Minimum of three years plant manufacturing maintenance experience·         LEAN manufacturing experience to include 5S.  Henkel is an equal opportunity employer.  We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.Apply online if this sounds like your next challenge. Refer to the job ID mentioned above and get one step closer to starting your new job at Henkel.",Industrial Maintenance Mechanic - nd Shift Job in Mentor,Full Time,"Mentor, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Maintenance-Mechanic-2nd-Shift-Job-Mentor-OH-US-165399278.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),80041ad28b6240cab225e3128198c96b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:22:12:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Operations/Plant Maintenance$50-55K++Management TraineePlant Engineer Trainee(Heavy Equipment)(Recent Grad)My client, an international metal processing company is seeking recent grad (BSEngineering, Tech, and BA) with 0-3 years’ experience working in plant, construction or heavy equipment environment.  Candidate should be hands on “McGiver” type who can be trained to run a plant site (scrap, etc).  Individual will go thru a very extensive training program after graduating.  They will be assigned a site where they will be groomed for management.  Person should be flexible for relocation after training.  This is a great spot and a fast track for management.   ",Operations/Plant Maintenance Management Trainee Job in Youngstown,Full Time Employee,"Youngstown, OH 44503",,http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Plant-Maintenance-Management-Trainee-Job-Youngstown-OH-US-165914549.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=17,"$50,000.00+ /year",Entry Level,e4c4bc35a6b3a76e62269e3bb1bc4440
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:22:42:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Havel is a division of Shambaugh & Son and is a wholly-owned subsidiary of EMCOR Group, Inc. EMCOR is the world's leading provider of mechanical and electrical construction and facilities services, including planning, consulting, and operations and maintenance. Havel provides single source solutions that meet a wide range of facility design, installation, operation and maintenance requirements. For more than 50 years, we have learned to anticipate operational needs, identify new technology trends, and provide construction services for the mechanical (PHVAC) electrical, building automation systems and energy services industries. Job Title: Installation Technician, Access Control/CCTV Job Summary: Responsible for the installation and programming of access control and CCTV equipment.  Trouble-shoot and maintain devices as needed. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Physically install access control, CCTV (IP based and Analog) equipment, including the required infrastructure. Complete trim-out and programming of devices. Perform equipment maintenance as necessary. Qualifications: 3-5 years experience installing commercial access control and CCTV systems. Understanding of electric circuits and wiring in low voltage applications. Knowledge of access control theory and different types of door hardware, including maglocks & strikes. Proficient in forms of industry cabling, including cat5e, cat6 and coaxial. Basic understanding of computer networking and aptitude to become proficient in programming and networking configurations of utilized IP based equipment. Intermediate PC skills including knowledge of Microsoft Office. Able to interact with customers and represent the company in a professional manner. Detail oriented and able to work independently or in a team. Ability to travel to project locations throughout Indiana on an as-needed basis. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",CCTV Installation Tech Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time Employee,Location:,Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureConstruction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/CCTV-Installation-Tech-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-165757028.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,1b827bce5f9a191a35d72fb01d5d2558
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:22:55:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Goodman Networks offers a complete family of solutions to wireless carriers, OEMs, backhaul service providers, and enterprise customers. Additionally, our Field Services division is a valued partner of DIRECTV delivering high quality service installations, maintenance, and upgrades for residential and commercial customers. Solutions and services offered by Goodman Networks help these entities implement new technologies faster, enhance network performance, and improve business results.   Company vehicles provided! Seeking a challenging position that rewards hard work and quality service? Wanting to have opportunity to make money based on your performance and motivation to succeed? If so, Goodman Networks Field Services has the opportunity for you!   This position will be responsible for the daily activities of all assigned technicians. The Technician Supervisor leads and participates in weekly meetings, safety reviews, and training and up-training sessions. The Technician Supervisor also reviews reports with assigned personnel and measures their progress.   Essential Function: Ensure that assigned installers achieve complete customer satisfaction 100% of the time by performing work in a professional, timely and approved manner. Accompany installers to complete escalated, VIP and OOP work. Meet with assigned installers weekly to review standards, goals, QC results and performance metrics. Visit job sites in the field to train, up-train and quality check (QC) installers; perform repeat service calls and communicate findings. Oversee field training of new-hire installers. Report, investigate and resolve all accident, damage, and injury claims. Approve the rescheduling and cancellation of work of assigned installers. Perform field inspections of fleet vehicles. Process reports as required within the timeframes specified. Perform other duties as assigned. Goodman Networks considers applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, marital or veteran status, or any other legally protected status. HS diploma or GED At least 6 months experience as a Field Technician. Current and continued high performance of field work. Must have strong organizational, written and oral communication skills. Ability to manage priorities and multiple tasks simultaneously. Must have some computer skills, including experience with Windows based PCs and a solid working knowledge of Microsoft Excel. Physical Demands: Be able to lift up to 80 lbs on a regular basis Be comfortable climbing up to heights of 40 feet Be able to work safely from a ladder rated for a maximum working load of 300lbs including all tools and equipment Be comfortable working in crawlspaces and attics Comfortable working outdoors in all types of weather throughout the year Benefits: Company vehicle will be provided after training Completely paid training and certification program (paid $10 per hour during the training) Biweekly pay at or above industry standard, depending on experience (after training period, paid per job completed) Medical, dental, vision, life, and short-term disability insurance 401K Paid employee referrals Health Advocate service Tuition Assistance Program Leadership and Service Excellence training opportunities Paid Time Off (PTO) Company perks, including employee discounts and free DIRECTV programming that includes NFL Sunday Ticket and NASCAR HotPass Additional income can also be earned by referring customers to additional products offered by Goodman Networks Company Additional Information:",Technician Supervisor - Home Security - AT&T / Digital Life - Dallas Job in Plano,Full Time Employee,"Plano, TX 75023",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Technician-Supervisor-Home-Security-AT-T-Digital-Life-Dallas-Job-Plano-TX-US-165548545.aspx?mescoid=3300570001001&jobPosition=8,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,e5ae0173bc579c87045ee8515d46686b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:22:56:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production Associates are responsible for building our roof and floor trusses as well as our wall panel assemblies. Associates are trained in production, quality control, logistics and safety. Associates are encouraged to move up quickly to positions of more responsibility such as Crew Leader, Head Sawyer, Supervisor, Production Manager and more.La compania de 84 esta actualmente en la busqueda de individuos que tengan carrera en mente para crecer como lideres  en nuestra industria. Nosotros somos afiliados de 84 lumber, la mas privada e grande proveedor de materiales de construccion en el pais. La compania de 84 fabrica vigas para el suelo, techo de vigas y paneles de pared que se utilizan para la construccion de casas, condominios, apartamentos y edificios comerciales. Asociados en la produccion son responsables de la construccion de nuestra vigas del techo y el suelo, asi como nuestro panel de pared. Los Asociados son entrenados en produccion, calidad en control, logistica y seguridad. Se alienta a los asociados ascender rapidamente a puestos de mayor responsabilidad como Jefe de la tripulacion, Supervisor, Gerente de Produccion y mucho mas.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions; short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-oneAble to read and write their primary languageAble to stand or sit for long periods of timeAbility to lift up to 50 lbs. with or without reasonable accommodations. Capacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion de manera eficaz a los demas uno a unoHigh School diploma or general education degree (GED); or 1 to 3 months related experience and/or training.Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. ",Production Associate ( AR ) Job in Kings Mountain,Full Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Associate-2381-AR-003-Job-Kings-Mountain-NC-US-165789511.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=14,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f974e83ff44548c366c60d398e14dac9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:23:50:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe production manager position supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in all phases of the plant operation. They will direct and manage all plant operations with overall responsibilities for production, achievement of the production schedule, inventory control, safety and other production-related activities.  Contribute to the overall success of the production leadership team.Essential Functions & Responsibilities1.       Direct and manage plant operations for production of entire product portfolio.2.       Provide direction, development and leadership to production Supervisors and Leads.3.       Coordinate plant activities by planning and collaborating departmental managers to insure the total manufacturing schedule is achieved in a timely and cost effective manner.4.       Report production metrics daily and weekly to leadership team.5.       Implement cost effective systems of control over operating expenditures, manpower, wages and salaries.6.       Deliver overall plant performance for production and quality standards.7.       Control and minimize scrap, rework, labor overtime and repair expenses.8.       Maintain existing plant facilities and equipment; recommend adjustments to plant facilities and equipment when necessary.9.       Provide leadership and training to accomplish the company goals and objectives.10.    Implement and maintain preventative maintenance programs.11.    Incorporate and promote shop floor organization, safety initiatives, 5S projects and plant cleanliness among plant personnel.Competencies1.       7-10 years of manufacturing engineering experience 2.       3-5 years plant/production management with supervisory/leadership experience3.       LEAN/Six Sigma Experience with Kaizen leadership experience4.       MRP/ERP experience essential5.       Proficient computer skills and knowledge with Microsoft Office Suite, Visio and CRM tools6.       Communication Proficiency7.       Decision making, problem solving and strong analytical skills8.       Financial and budget management9.       Business Acumen10.    Ability to work in a cross functional team environment Supervisory ResponsibilityThis position manages all employees of the production department on all shifts and is responsible for the performance management and hiring and retention of the employees within that department. Work EnvironmentWhile performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently exposed to fumes or airborne particles, moving mechanical parts and vibration.  Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.The employee is occasionally required to sit; climb or balance; and stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl. The employee may occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.  Position Type/Expected Hours of WorkThis is a full-time position. Hours of work are Monday through Friday, 7:00 a.m. to 4:00 p.m., and/or as needed for the operation. TravelTravel is primarily local during the business day, although some out-of –the-area and overnight travel may be expected. Required Education and Experience1.       Bachelor's degree in related field or seven - ten years engineering experience in a manufacturing environment.2.       Exposure with managing an hourly workforce environment.3.       Experience in  material flow (fluid product manufacturing), small consumables, injection molding and or wax production, a plus",Production Manager Job in Fairlawn,Full Time,"Fairlawn, OH 44334",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Manager-Job-Fairlawn-OH-US-165941073.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=4,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e5585a8eb87555247f9934ec3c596cb1
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:23:51:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"ROCK RIVER VALLEY TOOLING & MACHINING ASSOCIATION Looking for a Career in Manufacturing?The Rock River Valley Tooling & MachiningAssociation and Rock Valley College willconduct an apprenticeship aptitude test forpeople interested in careers in CNC precisionmachining, tool & die making, mold making,and gear machining.April 23, Saturday 8:00 AMSamuelson RoadCenter at RVC4151 Samuelson Road$30 test feePRE-REGISTRATIONIS REQUIRED.Phone: 815-978-3698Email: don@rrvtma.com in Manufacturing?  http://adportal.marketplaceadsonline.com/gatehouse-adportal-test/CMS/temp/a8/07/a8070abf-33b5-43e0-99cc-c4ac50cc3168/ad_3rrvtooling.pdf",SUBSTITUTE TEACHERS Job in Rockford,Full Time,"Rockford, IL 61109",All,http://jobview.monster.com/SUBSTITUTE-TEACHERS-Job-Rockford-IL-US-165918582.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=20,,,0f9a29c81559d1f9cbda601ab1f22cad
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:00:59:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Attention – Human Resource ProfessionalPeak Behavioral Health Services is a 119 bed freestanding psychiatric facility with acute hospitalization, adolescent residential and partial hospitalization services.  Located in Santa Teresa, MN (on the outskirts of El Paso, Texas), Peak is an established provider of quality psychiatric services.  We offer outstanding job opportunities in clinical disciplines, psychiatric nursing, utilization/case management and other allied health fields.  This Position Drives The Peak ’s Mission, Vision and Values by:Preparing campaigns to successfully identify, recruit and on-board clinical/non-clinical talent;Interprets policies and procedures to assist managers in successful human resource management;Participate in facilitating initiatives in support of employee success and retention;Utilizing HRIS/payroll system reports in managerial decision making; Familiar with basic benefit administration i.e. open-enrollment, invoice reconciliation and COBRA;Successfully worked within a one/two person HR office (preferably within a hospital setting) with knowledge of professional licenses, training standards and other healthcare specific requirements. Our ideal candidate will:Possess an accredited bachelor’s degree in human resources or business with notable coursework.Active continuing education in SHRM or certification at the PHR or SHRM-PRH level.Candidate with success within a generalist role at a one/two person office within a healthcare setting is preferred.  Solid computer skills i.e. HRIS/payroll system, Microsoft Office (Word, Excel and Outlook) products and on-line ad placement.Benefits:Our fulltime Team Members are benefit eligible, thus able to participate in all fringe benefits according to current plan requirements:Health (choice of options), dental and vision insuranceLong and short-term disability policiesPaid time off (begins immediately, eligible following 90 – days)Quarterly performance bonus following six months of employment401(k) retirement savings with a matchWellness programsDiscount purchase programs",Human Resources Professional Job in El Paso,Full Time Employee,"El Paso, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-professional-job-el-paso-tx-us-174952700.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,Human Resources,80cf19f3b34ae6ed07f5585ae7f369e0
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:01:00:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job EmployBridge is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.Job Functions  Identify and partner with recruiting resources: utilize social media, attend networking events, career fairs, etc.  Develop and manage a strong talent pipeline: interview, evaluate, onboarding and placement of qualified candidates  Fill job orders timely and effectively per client requirements: status calls, arrival calls and quality checks as required by our company's service differentiators  Manage field employee workforce including: dispatching, coaching, counseling, disciplining andterminating as necessary  Act as primary liaison between clients and field employees  Generate new business through client service calls  Deliver top-notch customer service to candidates, field employees and client companies alike  Demonstrate the company's core values, operating principles and service differentiators Job Requirements  Ability to work independently and within a team environment  Excellent written and verbal communication skills  Ability to prioritize, attention to detail, multi-task and meet tight deadlines under pressure  Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced, high-volume environment  Recruiting or staffing industry related experience is a plus Report","ResourceMFG Job Application for Personnel Supervisor | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name ResourceMFG,Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/personnel-supervisor-job-gainesville-ga-us-175259115.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=11,,,a7668ea64c67611f7d8968a805ae9204
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:01:34:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client, a professional services firm in Boston, is searching for a Payroll Processor to join their team! Responsibilities include but are not limited to: process bi-weekly and monthly multi-state payroll using outside payroll vendor (ADP); compile and input change and pay data using ADP; compute retroactive pay, overpayments and partial pay accurately based on input data; receive and process payroll change information from local offices and online HR systems; receive and input bi-weekly timesheets; transmit payroll data for bi-weekly, monthly and special payment payroll to ADP; audit information for completeness and take appropriate action where needed; sort and distribute payroll checks, advices and reports; download/save payroll reports generated by ADP; prepare special payment files by using external programs for input to ADP; maintain data on ADP payroll system; assist payroll analysts in researching payroll issues and reconciliations; and other duties as assigned. The ideal candidate will have: at least three years of payroll processing experience with automated systems (Ceridian, ADP, Pro Business, Paychecks, etc.), including report writing tools; ADP EV5 experience preferred; Associates degree or comparable knowledge in a payroll-related field required; and proficiency in Excel. Qualified candidates apply today!Find Us on Facebook!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Company Profile: Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries. Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visiting www.beaconhillstaffing.com. We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Future™",Payroll Processor Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,BostonMA,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-processor-job-boston-ma-us-174893441.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=12,,Human Resources,85b35fc8bffeb3df4b25c770fbb8bfe7
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:01:58:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO) Summary:Provide a variety of administrative tasks to include coordination of temporary employee orientation; prepare new hire orientation packets; filing/fax/distribute mail; data entry; creating employee badges; Other duties as assigned. Qualifications:High School Diploma or equivalentProficient in Microsoft Office Suites to include Excel, Word, Power Point3 years of experience in administrative dutiesHuman Resources experience is a plus. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",HR Administrative Assistant Job in High Point,"Full Time, Employee","High Point, NC 27265",,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-administrative-assistant-job-high-point-nc-us-173452264.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=20,,Human Resources,af0aa33c284077fa00b7ca52cad0339f
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:01:59:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"RecruiterYour opportunities are endless.Imagine joining an organization whose number one priority is to provide you with the tools and teachings to allow you to be successful in your career.Are you…Motivated? Ambitious? Competitive?Do you enjoy…Working with people? Career growth? Making money?As a Recruiter, you will have the opportunity to build a talent community that is focused on local branch market growth. You will be responsible for providing a quality candidate experience and will work closely with candidates to generate candidate referrals and to identify clients' current and emerging staffing needs. You will work with candidates to understand career objectives and develop a plan in marketing their skills along with being responsible for negotiating pay rates. Work with leadership and Business Development Manager as an end-to-end resource on assigned client relationships in order to identify strategic, talent community needs, while adhering to the Experis methodology and processes.Conduct searches for candidates using traditional and creative sourcing methods, including but not limited to: internal database searches, online searches, Internet postings, job/career fairs, local colleges, referrals, user/technical groups and upcoming transition/re-market consultants. Provide information about Experis to candidates and promotes benefits of a career with Experis.Pre-qualify candidates for Experis standards and conducts the necessary discovery calls, checking candidate references, and assessments.Coordinate and assist in scheduling technical and client interviews, including candidate interview preparation and debriefing.Negotiate compensation with consultants in order to maximize profitability; prepare and send employee agreement and new hire package according to negotiated terms. Ideal Candidate:BS degree in Business, Human Resources or related field.Minimum 1-2 years of technical recruiting experience in a high volume environment, prefer staffing or agency background.Keep in mind, there are many perks that come with being employed with a large firm like Experis. We are a $1.3 Billion professional service company that can provide you with endless opportunities from a geographic and growth perspective.Experis, the professional arm of ManpowerGroup, is the global leader in project solutions and professional resourcing. We accelerate organization's growth with specialized expertise in IT, Finance and Engineering to precisely deliver in-demand talent and solutions for mission-critical positions and initiatives, enhancing the competitiveness of the organization and people we serve.Your next career opportunity starts now.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Recruiter Job in Raleigh,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Recruiter,"Raleigh, NC 27607",http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-job-raleigh-nc-us-174887425.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=1,,Human Resources,1778697979c15be818ac8337c3a04066
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:02:48:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for an opportunity with a well established organization?If you are we have a rewarding position for youl!Position Objective: Randstad, the 2nd largest staffing firm in the world, is looking to hire a Site/HR Coordinator. TheCoordinator will contribute to the execution of RIS work processes via support of the onsite account team directly supporting the client's specific strategic and operational goals. This person will specialize in ensuring compliance and coordinating efforts pertaining to unemployment hearings, applicant screenings (background, assessments, drug testing), safety, payroll, I-9s, and talent records and workers compensation by: - Developing and managing a talent pipeline that aligns with the client's needs and output requirements- - Participating in hiring process by administering skill assessments, processing applications, and references - Coordinating onsite and external drug testing efforts - Completing and auditing payroll to ensure accuracy and compliance with policies and procedures - Maintaining electronic and paper records to ensure effective, orderly and legal storage of personnel data - Maintaining talent records in Randstad Front Office - Distributing safety equipment and maintaining the necessary inventory - Undertaking any other tasks deemed appropriate to this role, as directed by the Site ManagerContact informationMaria LehmanEmail: Maria.Lehman@RandstadUSA.com Phone#:- 215/679-1489East Greenville PAgood to know youWorking hours: FTSkills:Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities: - Ability to develop strong working relationships with all levels - Proficient computer skills for accuracy in reporting and recording information - Experience in multi-tasking, prioritizing work and effective time management skills - Excellent written and verbal communication skills - Strong attention to detail and organizational skills - Excellent service orientation and professional demeanor - Ability and willingness to take on operational tasks Education: - HS Diploma required - Some college preferred Work Experience: - recruiting and employee relations experience a PLUSTo get started with the interview process today...apply to the ad, and email your resume to Maria.Lehman@RandstadUSA.com , you can also call us at 215/679-1489.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",HR Coordinator Job in East Greenville  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,East Greenville 18041,Manufacturing - OtherTransport and Storage - Materials Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-coordinator-job-east-greenville-pa-us-175123058.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=18,15.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,,10c8d1e0112f5865193f47457365c1ff
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:02:49:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Accountant Job in New York City, NYC Ultra-fast growing tech firm is in search of a Senior Accountant to join their New York City office. Modern, hip, progressive and collaborative only being to describe the feeling that you get when you walk in to their offices. Open work spaces, unlimited vacation, stock options, and an onsite lounge. These are just a few of the things that make this one of the most desirable tech firms to join. This role will oversee three, and is responsible the supervision of all operational accounting, GL maintenance, and all month end closing activities. The ideal candidate will have experience in public and corporate accounting and preferable have experience with SAAS or subscription-based revenue. If you would like to be immediately considered for this role, please email and update copy of your resume to brandon.smith@parkerlynch.com, today! Senior Accountant New York Job Responsibilities include: Assist with monthly, quarterly and annual close activities, which include preparation of journal entries, revenue recognition, capitalization and depreciation of assets, account reconciliations and producing GAAP financialsPreparation of the General Ledger, journal entries and reconciliations for month-end closeMonthly financial statement analysis and reporting of budget to actual variancesPreparation of a monthly account analysis of balance sheet and income statement accountsCompletion of sales tax filingsAssist with the internal and external financial and tax audit  Qualifications: Bachelor’s or higher degree in Accounting;Knowledge of US GAAP and IFRSExperience with subscription-based revenue Auditing skills, with the ability to research and reconcile difficult accounts5-8 years of relevant accounting experienceExcellent written, verbal, communication, and interpersonal skills with a customer service focus  Apply now by emailing your resume to brandon.smith@parkerlynch.com  ",Senior Accountant Job New York Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10009",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-new-york-job-new-york-ny-us-174909740.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=3,"95,000.00 - 105,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6e6c1e599e9d302396c803bb2c6c945b
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:03:47:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Employee Data Management (EDM) is part of the HR Shared Service Center and primarily handles employee data and status changes in the PeopleSoft HRMS system. The HR Support Specialist provides support across North America to Human Resources Managers and Business Partners for new hire processing and data entry. Services include communicating with Recruiting and Staffing, Human Resources and Payroll to ensure employees are set up accurately for pay in the HRIS system. The Support Specialist assists International Human Resources with Delegate master data changes as well as HRIT mass update changes due to mergers acquisitions and divestitures.Working hours: 40+Skills:Responsibilities: - Input of employee data into core HR system. - Provide customer support for inquiries related to inputting data in Employee Self Service - Provide customer support for inquiries related to inputting data in Manager Self Service - Research and respond to very complex employee data inquiries from clients or employees - Develop, create and distribute various reports for clients and management - Develop company specific EDM frequently asked questions (FAQs) - Develop company specific FAQs for mergers, acquisitions or integrations - Interface with Knowledge Management Specialist to ensure very complex FAQ information is properly communicatedRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Human Resource Support Job in Orlando,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Orlando, FL 32817",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-support-job-orlando-fl-us-175332457.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,14.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,,78a9a7100d5b33d438901283536ded52
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:03:48:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a people person and great at establishing relationships? Are you looking for an entry level role to expand your accounting knowledge? One of Accounting Principals’ clients has an immediate Junior Accountant job available for a quick adapting, sharp candidate. This is a contract-to-hire position at a well-established company that offers the opportunity to work with professionals that love working for this company. The ideal candidate will have a related degree to accounting with strong problem analysis and organizational skills. Junior Accountant Responsibilities:    •Prepare journal entries and account reconciliations •Assist with analyzing trends, costs, and revenue streams•Prepare monthly financial statements and closings•Responsible for bi-weekly payroll processing  Qualifications:•Minimum one year of work experience  •Bachelor's degree in Accounting or a related field•Strong knowledge of  GAAP•Proficiency in MS Excel If you feel that this position is a match, please submit your resume to us directly to Sara at sara.neuville@accountingprincipals.com For more open positions, visit the Accounting Principals website, www.accountingprincipals.com Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity!  ",Junior Accountant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94104",,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-accountant-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-174529091.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,abdd8f1c60988180e533b1617421705e
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:04:02:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pioneer in Commodities is looking to add a Human Resources Assistant to the team on a contract basis.  The Human Resources Assistant will have experience with payroll accounting, benefits administration and excellent communications skills.  The Human Resources Assistant will also have experience with onboarding, payroll and intermediate Excel skills.Requirements:Bachelor’s degree.Minimum of 2 years Payroll accounting experience (running, entries, billing and allocations).Experience with general Human Resources responsibilities.Intermediate Excel skills (updating pivot tables, vlookups from scratch).Pluses:Benefits Administration experience.Onboarding experience.401k experience.Fluency in Japanese.Apply today for immediate consideration!Job ID: 152950",Human Resources Assistant Job in Manhattan,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Manhattan, NY 10010",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-assistant-job-manhattan-ny-us-175184895.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=3,,Human Resources,a29385b23032fc74a41c8be8c00ad8b3
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:04:47:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job .Job descriptionBi-lingual HR Generalist, NW Washington DC - $60,000.00 annually. My client is a 70+ regional employee corporate employer looking to hire a dynamic forward thinking employee to join their HR team of 2 reporting to the Director of HR based in Canada. Are you bi-lingual (Spanish required). Are you proactive? Do you love HR? Detail Oriented? Proactive thinking? Analytical? Thorough? If this describes you, then we want to hear from you!!!! Responsibilities:The individual hired for this position will perform a wide variety of Human Resource functions including recruitment and other employment functions; employee relations; knowledge of FMLA, USA employment laws; payroll-related responsibilities; benefits; company activities; and other related initiatives and projects. The Human Resources Associate works as a collaborative member of the Human Resources team to provide effective services to support company goals and initiatives in the regional markets in DC, Canada and the Dominican Republic ( predominant area). This position will have 30% travel to the local markets. Other specific duties include:Recruiting for non-exempt and some exempt positionsProcessing garnishments and other invoices for the HR departmentPOC for benefits information and open enrollmentDrafting HR policies, procedures and processesResponding to unemployment, mortgage and reference verificationsPayroll-related activiites such as timecard reconcilliation, distribution of payroll reports, and provide other backup processing functions as neededOther administrative duties and projects of a highly confidential and sensitive nature Core hours are 9-5pm.Availability to work two days a week remotely from home.4-5 years recent experience as an Human Resources Generalist required.Bi-linugual fluency in Spanish requiredAnalytical, detailed, calm thinking personality preferred.Availability to travel to local markets to conduct HR audits.4 year Bachelor college degree requiredPlease send a formal resume to sybil.kalu@adeccona.com 703-885-5591 ( direct line ).Apply Online Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xadocorpx/cjt3/slide1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xadocorpx/cjt3/slide2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xadocorpx/cjt3/slide3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xadocorpx/cjt3/slide4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Adecco Direct Placement. Job Application for Bi-lingual Human Resources Generalist | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",Employee,Contact name Sybil Galligan,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/bi-lingual-human-resources-generalist-job-washington-dc-us-174887300.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=4,,,c824080dd9a98b50c44772c1e43974fb
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:04:53:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Tax Job in North Suburbs of Chicago, IL If you would like to hear more about this amazing Senior Tax Job located in the Northern Suburbs of Chicago, IL, then you must email your resume in WORD directly to:  morris.snitowsky@parkerlynch.com.  This particular Tax Job will allow you to gain exposure to both the Federal and State and Local sides of Tax. This terrific job is currently available with a large marketing and distribution company in Chicago, IL.  If you have six years of tax experience, which includes State and Local Income, sales and use, and some Federal Income tax experience, you may be the right candidate for this job.  If you are seeking a career that offers the ability to develop and mold a newly founded tax department, this is the role for you.  This opportunity welcomes individuals with strong leadership capabilities that value a realistic work/life balance.  Moreover, you will be offered tremendous benefits and a highly competitive salary. In this Senior Tax position you will have the following responsibilities • Incorporate tax knowledge to verify compliance with federal, state and local tax requirements• Spearhead tax department with familiarity of software, process and work-flows• Research and inform company on proper calculation and interpretation of Sales & Use tax• Interact with IRS, CRA and state agency audits, inquiries and tax notices• Assist with all corporate tax functions including Canadian entity• Act as the liaison between the outside tax firm and the parent company To qualify for this Tax job you should have most of the following qualifications • 3 years of relevant tax experience• Experience with sales and use tax• International tax experience• Familiarity with Corporate tax• CPA – Certified Public Accountant or MST – Master of Science in Taxation• Experience with JD Edwards If you like to hear more about this Senior Tax job, then please email your resume in WORD directly to:  morris.snitowsky@parkerlynch.com. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled ",Senior Tax Job - Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Northbrook, IL 60062",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-tax-job-chicago-il-north-suburbs-job-northbrook-il-us-175072722.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=16,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,62c70f88d46cabea406af913a8f5f65f
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:04:55:57,No,jobs.monster.com," Responsibilities and Requirements-• Facilitate the end to end recruitment process; including recruit/source, interview, selection and on boarding of new hires  • Collaborate with hiring managers to gain an understanding of department culture, business strategy, job requirement and talent profiles to deliver on the hiring needs of the business • Demonstrate ability to attract, influence and convert hard to find passive talent through your understanding of the business and employee value proposition • Conduct in-depth screens and assess potential technical candidates for level of interest, qualifications, and compensation• Minimum of 8+ years of technical recruiting experience, across various technical disciplines, including software engineering, system architecture, data services, mobile, cloud and all related functional software and services   ",Technical Recruiter Job in Aliso Viejo,"Full Time, Employee","Aliso Viejo, CA 92656",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technical-recruiter-job-aliso-viejo-ca-us-169754011.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f04b5a34def935e2270c9f3c39c18463
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:04:57:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Receivable Job Location: Queens, New York  Purpose: The person in this position is responsible for full cycle Accounts Receivable and providing support to accounting team.  Business Overview:  High-end, successful and growing construction company. They are looking for an Accounts Receivable Analyst to join its team.  Great team with a good work/life balance.  Job Responsibilities: • Process invoices and track aging reports• Monitor and update the work in progress schedules• Analyze invoices and follow up with any discrepancies • Support accounting team and AR Manager• Profitably analysis • Ad hoc projects as assigned Requirements: • Bachelor’s degree• 1+ years of relevant AR experience To apply for this Accounts Receivable job in Queens, please send your resume to alyssa.franco@parkerlynch.com. ",Accounts Receivable Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10175",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-job-new-york-ny-us-173490078.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=15,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4e766c88d9e00ed9ff3c8cbf445e73e7
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:05:40:09,No,jobs.monster.com," Billion $ Construction company seeks a construction accountant. This stable giant organization offers excellent benefits and growth opportunity for a professional individual with a minimum of a two years experience working experience for a commercial construction company and a Bachelor’s degree. The Construction Accountant will assist with more detailed activities associated with reviewing construction contracts and construction payables.  Responsibilities include:  Review construction invoices, construction purchase orders and financial terms of contracts.    Provide detailed information regarding costs attributed to projects.   Maintain the fixed asset records for each property on fixed asset software.  Account for the purchase of construction in process in accordance with company policies.  Maintain sufficient records to ensure that each purchase is adequately substantiated.    Evaluates financial return for capital requests.  Prepares and keys journal entries as needed.  Assists in special projects as required.   Assist departments and management in the capital budgeting process.  Fortune 500 company benefits are provided.  For immediate consideration, please email your resume to ken.casaccio@ajilonfinance.com  ",Construction Accountant Work life balance Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10017",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-accountant-work-life-balance-job-new-york-ny-us-171625883.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=19,"60,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,72a24ac2e01e70f3bb95617e1c76353b
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:05:47:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is looking for an individual for a contract to hire Accounting Clerk Job in Chicago, IL. You must have three years of accounts payable and accounts receivable experience and the successful candidate will have general knowledge of accounting practices. If you are interested in joining a fast-growing team with a great work environment apply now! Responsibilities:Review all accounts payable invoices for appropriate documentation Compile, sort, and verify accuracy of data to be enteredFile, sort, organize and box invoice batches and monthly journal entriesSchedule check and ACH runsAssist Accounts Payable with filing and electronic dataAssist the AP Vendor Maintenance desk with new vendor setupsAnalyze invoice/expense reports and record entriesGenerate reports and respond to inquiries regarding entered data as requestedWork with internal and external auditorsSpecial ad-hoc accounting projects Requirements:Three years of accounts payable and accounts receivable experience requiredIntermediate Microsoft Excel skillsWorking knowledge of computerized accounting softwareMust work well in a team environmentStrong organizational skills Excellent verbal and written communication skillsAbility to meet deadlines If you are interested in this position or other accounting opportunities then please click ""apply"" below and apply online at www.accountingprinciples.com.  ;",Accounting Clerk Job In Chicago,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Chicago, IL 60603",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-clerk-job-in-chicago-il-job-chicago-il-us-175045827.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=16,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,2c030924bddd8946ff0da14c7a1dfdac
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:05:48:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Accountant Job in New York City, NYC Fortune 50 company in New York City NYC is looking for a Senior Accountant to join their team of happy employees. The idea candidate will have at least 5 years of experience combining public and corporate accounting, exposure to an ERP software application (SAP, Oracle, etc) and have experience in a mid-sized to large organization. This direct hire position will pay up to $90,000. If you are interested in learning more about this opportunity, please email your updated resume to brandon.smith@parkerlynch.com , today! Senior Accountant New York NYC Job Responsibilities include: Assist with monthly, quarterly and annual close activities, which include preparation of journal entries, revenue recognition, capitalization and depreciation of assets, account reconciliations and producing GAAP financialsPreparation of the General Ledger, journal entries and reconciliations for month-end closeMonthly financial statement analysis and reporting of budget to actual variancesPreparation of a monthly account analysis of balance sheet and income statement accountsProcessing of payroll related journal entriesAssist with the internal and external financial and tax audit and examination processes  Qualifications: Bachelor’s or higher degree in Accounting;Knowledge of all accounting functions and related internal controls, including accounts receivable, accounts payable, fixed assets, and inventoryGood knowledge of US GAAP and willingness to research and resolve accounting applicationAuditing skills, with the ability to research and reconcile difficult accounts5-7 years of relevant accounting experienceExcellent written, verbal, communication, and interpersonal skills with a customer service focus  Apply now by emailing your resume to brandon.smith@parkerlynch.com ",Senior Accountant Job New York NYC Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10175",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-new-york-nyc-job-new-york-ny-us-175279103.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=7,"80,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,faa039072322185b5e0c9e5f1f7cc5f5
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:06:56:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Type Full-time Location El Monte - El Monte, CA 91731 US (Primary) Category Human Resources Essential job duties/responsibilities: Come join Cathay Bank and be a part of a successful organization that values Integrity, Strategic and Effective Leadership, Exceptional Employees, and Extraordinary Services to Customers.  Our employees play an integral part of our missions to be a bank with an open door and the premier financial partner to our customers and assist them in reaching their financial goals and dreams!   In 1962, Cathay Bank opened for business with the mission of providing financial services to the growing but underserved Chinese-American community in the greater Los Angeles area, thus becoming the first Chinese-American bank in Southern California.  Recognizing that the community it served was part of a more diverse one, Cathay Bank adopted the motto ""An Open Door for All.""  Its rapid expansion was fueled by successive waves of immigration, burgeoning trade between America and Asia, and the economic development of the surrounding community.   Today, Cathay Bank is a subsidiary of Cathay General Bancorp (NASDAQ: CATY), a publicly held bank holding company with over $11.5 billion in assets as of December 31, 2014.  Its service network extends from California and Washington on the West Coast to Nevada, Texas, and Illinois, and New York, New Jersey, Maryland, and Massachusetts on the Eastern Seaboard.  Overseas, it has a presence in the three important commercial centers in the Asian-Pacific Rim - Hong Kong, Taipei and Shanghai.   GENERAL SUMMARY The position is responsible for a varied range of employee relations activities. Consult and provide counsel/recommendations to leaders and managers while resolving issues or general complaints.  Provide education to the manager population on management best practices.  Investigate complaints and other matters while ensuring a resolution has been met that meets policy and business need. Ensure compliance with employee-related policies, procedures, and local, state and federal laws and regulations.  Demonstrates up-to-date expertise in Employee Relations and applies this to the development, execution and improvement of action plans. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS Provide leadership and engage in the resolution of employee relations issues:Investigate and offer recommendations/solutions to employee complaints and concernsAdvise managers in: employee coaching, counseling, performance monitoring and evaluation, employment laws and Bank policies In conjunction with the HR Director, develop, implement, and update Human Resources employment policies and procedures. Manage the online HR Policies and Procedures eManual; ensure policies are current and in compliance with state, federal and local employment laws. Assist with the annual employee compensation reviews (merit and equity incentive pay programs) and performance evaluation process. Stay current in state, federal and local employment laws, ensuring the Bank, management and employees are in compliance. Assist in identifying deficiencies and training opportunities for managers, supervisors and employees in employee relations matters. Assist the HR Director and Training and Development Director to develop, implement, facilitate and support on-going training related to employee relations, leadership, coaching and succession planning, as well as compliance with state, federal, local laws, and Bank policies, procedures, rules and regulations. Recommend ideas, programs, etc. to enhance the employee experience. Minimum qualifications/requirements: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration or Human Resources preferred.  PHR/SPHR/GPHR a plus or equivalent working experience - preferably in a corporate environment in the banking or finance industry. Minimum of 8 years of progressive human resources management with a minimum of 5 years of extensive employee relations experience.  Experience in developing human resources guidelines and procedures in a fast-paced ever-changing environment, preferably in the banking and financial services industry. Experience in developing programs that drive change in organizational culture is a plus. Excellent verbal and written communication skills.   Strong familiarity with all HR disciplines, as well as current best practices and HR trends.   Ability to establish and maintain effective relationships with all levels of employees required.  Strong attention to detail and analytical problem solving skills a must.  Able to independently manage projects.  Computer skills in Word and Excel.  Ability to travel to various sites. Motivated, resourceful, high energy, career-minded driven individual with a polished can do attitude.  Able to manage multiple priorities in a high volume environment where priorities change often. It is the individual responsibility of every employee to maintain a current awareness and understanding of appropriate banking laws, regulations, internal policies and procedures, and to comply fully with those laws, regulations, policies and procedures. From time to time, employees may be assigned tasks or duties as deemed appropriate by their supervisors. The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed, as an exhaustive list of all responsibility, duties and skills required of personnel so classified. div.form-group{padding:5px 0px 5px 0px;}",VP,Full Time,"El Monte , CA",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/vp-senior-employee-relations-manager-484-job-el-monte-ca-us-175238355.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=13,,,636947e45545c08e1591e3309cd912d5
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:06:57:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionOpen Position for a Career-Minded PersonJoin a winning team!Are you an entrepreneurial, service focused professional that has the ability to execute and inspire excellence at every level of the associate experience? Then consider a career with Raymour & Flanigan, where our most successful associates support people, cultivate relationships, and raise the bar every day. We have an immediate opportunity for a Risk Management Specialist based out of our Liverpool, NY Field Support Center's Central Services Department. If you are looking for a career where you can grow, learn and contribute at a high level, Raymour & Flanigan may be the company where you can realize your potential!Expectations:Provide superior customer service in every situation. Go above and beyond advocating for every customer/associate opportunity and request.Partner with team members to ensure that our vision of being a world class and robust Risk Management Department that protects our associates, preserves our assets and supports our guiding principles is realized.Manage time to ensure completion of daily, weekly and monthly deadlines.Provide responsive communication of information to managers, associates and customers.Problem-solve, organize and balance multiple priorities within a fast-paced environment.Maintain composure when handling unexpected challenges and competing demands.Perform additional functions that may be assigned at the discretion of management.Display passion and initiative to succeed in an entrepreneurial culture.Consistently demonstrate professional verbal and written communication, interpersonal and organizational skills.Proactively resolve issues as they come up. Qualifications:Proficient in PC-based applications, intermediate/advanced Excel skills.2-4 yrs work experience with experience in some or all of the following: Claims administration of Unemployment, Property and Causality, and Workers Compensation.Bachelor's degree preferred but not required.Excellent communication skillsDemonstrate ability to work independently, take on responsibility and team playerRaymour & Flanigan offers opportunities for advancement, plus a comprehensive benefits package that includes 401(k) with company match and profit sharing, health, dental and vision benefits, paid vacation, short- and long-term disability, associate merchandise discount, and paid life insurance.Raymour & Flanigan proudly supports a drug free and smoke free work environment.Raymour & Flanigan is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer that does not discriminate against any associate or applicant on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy), age, national origin, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, marital or familial status, genetic information or other basis protected by law.",Workers Compensation/Insurance Specialist Job in Liverpool,Full Time / Employee,"Liverpool, NY 13090",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/workers-compensation-insurance-specialist-job-liverpool-ny-us-174871151.aspx?mescoid=4300756001001&jobPosition=18,,Human Resources,ef2c944f4f7214cb1c1a3d60b5ab5ce9
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:07:48:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:Financial Analyst  Summary:We are actively seeking a well-qualified financial analyst who is eager to join a growing company.  This position will have an active role in the monthly reporting and analysis, ad hoc reporting, budgeting, forecasting and projections.  The ideal candidate for this position will have strong system skills, particularly within Excel.  Daily Tasks: Analyzing current and past financial data and performancePreparing reports and projections based on this analysisEvaluating current capital expenditures and depreciationEstablishing and evaluating profit plansIdentifying trends in financial performance and providing recommendations for improvementCoordinating with other members of the finance team to review financial information and forecastsProviding financial models and forecastingDeveloping, maintaining and distributing ad-hoc reports and financial models as needed   Qualifications: Degree in Accounting or Finance Must be proficient in Microsoft Office – strong in ExcelAbility to multitask and meet strict deadlinesExcellent time management and organization ability Independent worker and analytical thinker with the ability to conduct research, data analysis, and resolve complex problems Excellent oral and written communication skills required Experience working within Information Systems   This role is being offered on a temporary to permanent basis with competitive salary and benefits based upon prior work and salary history.  For immediate consideration, please submit your resume to christine.kiernan@accountingprincipals.com    ",Financial Analyst Job in Paramus,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Paramus, NJ 07652",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-analyst-job-paramus-nj-us-174902002.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4f526842c2c1e31631bee6ec2609cdd8
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:07:49:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you want to use your government contracts accounting experience with a company that will allow you to have a real impact? Parker + Lynch is partnering with a rapidly expanding government contractor to find their next Senior Accountant. This is a great opportunity if you enjoy a fast paced environment and a great company culture. As the senior accountant you will have the opportunity to assist the accounting department and drive business processes.  Senior Accountant Responsibilities Include:• Enter general ledger postings and manage bank reconciliations• Reviewing invoices and entering into the system• Monitor accounts receivable aging report• Work with customers to get invoices approved and paid• Regularly monitor accounts payable aging report • Processing vendor payments in accordance with contracts • Preparation of monthly accruals• Monitor and process employee expense reports• Assist with month, quarter, and year end closing process• Additional projects as needed A Qualified Candidate Will Possess the Following:• 10+ years of accounting experience• Government contracting accounting is a must• Attention to detail with excellent communication skills• Exposure to Deltek is a strong plus Apply today! Please send resumes to Jessica.hurlbut@parkerlynch.com for confidential and immediate consideration. ",Senior Accountant Job in Albuquerque New Mexico Job in Albuquerque,Full Time Employee,"Albuquerque, NM 87111",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-in-albuquerque-new-mexico-job-albuquerque-nm-us-174341975.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=12,"60,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,310db7a31892d315b5db06b61c669d61
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:08:36:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:This position has active involvement in many facets of a temporary and/or permanent placement business. The associate in this position will participate in recruiting, interviewing, matching, coordinating send-outs and filling orders. They will also work with client development, new account and retention sales calls, obtaining job orders, maintaining a high fill ratio, penetrating client accounts and taking a positive proactive approach in partnering with various organizational departments.EDUCATION:- High school diploma or equivalent required- Bachelor's degree in any discipline strongly preferredEXPERIENCE:- Minimum 3 - 5 years recruiting experience with strong staffing experience at a management or executive level desired. Human resources, corporate or client specific experience a plus.SKILLS REQUIRED: - Ability to successfully interface with clients (internal and external)- Strong interpersonal and communication skills- Proven ability to work within a team environment- Ability to make decisions, take direction and execute a plan- Detail orientation with follow-through shown in previous jobs- Able to communicate with and present at the executive level- Ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously- Ability to qualify and close deals- Sales abilities along with market knowledge and/or product/technical expertise- Knowledge of commonly used recruiting concepts, practices and procedures for sourcing and screening in a recruiting and internal staffing environmentGet to know us and find out ""What More Could YouDo"" at RandstadEqual Opportunity Employer: Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",Engineering Recruiter Job in El Segundo,Full Time Employee,"El Segundo, CA 90245",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/engineering-recruiter-job-el-segundo-ca-us-175274230.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=7,,,f00141ed7ee0e9414d7c887ad07d60e5
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:08:44:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"SPX FLOWBased in Charlotte, North Carolina, SPX FLOW is a global multi-industry manufacturing leader with approximately $2.5 billion in annual revenue, operations in more than 35 countries and over 8,000 employees. The company's highly-specialized, engineered products and technologies are helping to meet rising global demand for electricity and processed foods and beverages, particularly in emerging markets.Human Resources Analyst – Charlotte, NCThis role will aim to understand existing challenges, identify trends, and develop fact-based HR insights to aid the business in making well informed decisions.  Analyzing and interpreting data in order to provide the organization with insights for effectively managing employee data is essential so that business goals can be reached quickly and efficiently. This position will perform data analysis on current human capital to create reports, develop mechanisms, and create processes that ensure data integrity.  Additionally, this role will participate in organizational impacting projects that utilize data to make key decisions including but not limited to; Performance Management, Talent Requisition, Talent Management, Budgeting, etc across the enterprise. There is a high degree of project type work in addition to regularly scheduled and ad-hoc type analytics.  The ideal candidate for this position will be highly proficient in Excel and/or Access and PowerPoint, with experience in data driven workforce metrics, analytics, reporting and presentation creation. List of key responsibilities ·         Provide strategic analysis of workforce data to help drive informed decisions internally and across the organization·         Ability to understand commercial, operational and functional strategic priorities to enable collaboration with the business to optimize the link between HR·         Complete standard and ad hoc analyses across multiple sources of data with the goal of informing strategy and influencing change (some work could involve complex data manipulation and aggregation)·         Provide reporting and analysis to HR and other client groups as specified as well as recommending changes and improvements to existing processes and reports, and gather data as necessary to positively impact the HR team and business ·         Advise HR leadership in talent trends, both internal and external, to help drive HR Strategies.·         Proactively work to improve delivery processes (value add, efficiency, quality and speed)·         Produce a comprehensive headcount reporting and analysis to include researching variances from previous reports·         Create and manage a process to monitor and report on HR metrics and KPI analysis based on HR’s strategic plan and goal setting process·         Support Human Resources business issues to identify opportunities for improved workflow processes, reports and forms; and make recommendations to increase department efficiency. ·         Create leadership level summaries of data and presentations for HR and multiple client groups·         Research projects as assigned·         Support Human Resources management in the development, projection, monitoring and reconciliation of the department budget and related line items·         Collaborate with HR COE (Center of Excellence) groups (Compensation and Benefits, Talent and Org Development, and Talent Sourcing) to leverage data available from all HR systems Qualifications·         BA/BS degree in Human Resources, Business or related field·         Minimum of 4 years of relevant Human Resources experience ·         Minimum of 2 years of data analysis/reporting experience·         Demonstrated ability to collect and analyze data in a collaborative team environment·         Knowledge of HR processes and systems and how they impact HR business practices·         Strong business acumen skills and demonstrated ability to work in a global environment·         Excellent analytical skills with a strong working knowledge of problem solving and root cause analysis·         Strong project management skills and the ability to work collaboratively with all levels of staff to develop strong working relationships. In addition, time management and prioritization skills with the ability to perform with a sense of urgency. ·         Highly proficient in Excel, PowerPoint and other MS Office applications with advanced spreadsheet and formula knowledge·         Demonstrated experience working with leadership to understand requirements, provide recommendations and solutions/resolutions according to business needs·         Strong interpersonal and communication skills, both written and verbal with a keen sense of attention to detail·         Experience with HRIS (SuccessFactors) and other systems like SAP·         Ability to handle confidential/sensitive information on a frequent basis·         Must exhibit creativity, innovation, and critical thinking·          SPX FLOW is an EOE",HR Analyst Job in Charlotte,Full Time Employee,"Charlotte, NC 28277",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-analyst-job-charlotte-nc-us-174902277.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=16,,Human Resources,aeb88a0bae925240ae23800cf1f4a6fe
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:08:46:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Allied is a great place to grow! If you're up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today!  Once you click apply now, you will be brought to our career site. Please complete your online profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Our system allows you to view and track your status 24 hours a day. Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Allied Building Products is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Allied Building Products is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. #CAN",Manager of Human Resources - East Rutherford,Full Time Employee,"East Rutherford, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-of-human-resources-east-rutherford-nj-job-east-rutherford-nj-us-175058923.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=15,,,72d203668571af4d0d210e5ef98c4414
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:08:46:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Opportunities Safety-Kleen, a Clean Harbors company, is seeking an experienced Recruiter Extraordinaire, know internally as a Talent Consultant to recruit sales professionals and assist hiring managers across the US and Canada, build the teams they need, to accomplish the goals of the organization. They say ""nothing gets done in business until something gets sold"" and we are always looking for the best sales talent to get things done. The best sales recruiters understand that every interaction, both internal and external, is an opportunity to grow the brand, just as the best sales professionals understand.  We are the biggest player in a relatively small industry and we tend to fly under the radar but once you see this posting, you’ll be hooked - well, maybe after a little more research. Plus, what’s not to love about an opportunity with a company with revenues in the billions, 10,000+ employees and the 17th largest fleet of private vehicles? The Opportunity The Talent Consultant sources and attracts top talent, and delivers professional recruitment processes to ensure effective and efficient hiring. This is achieved through the development of local and national recruiting plans, employing effective sourcing strategies and resources as well as developing new and creative ideas. Responsibilities Responsible for sourcing, advertising, screening, interviewing and assessing candidates and developing effective practices to ensure a qualified, high caliber candidate pool is presented to hiring managers; Build strong partnerships with client groups and HR Business Partners to proactively manage staffing needs; Develop strategies to target and attract candidates using a variety of tools and techniques including personal networks, third party job boards, industry events, educational institutions, etc Research and recommend new sources for active and passive candidate recruiting, build networks and develop a pool of qualified candidates in advance of needs; Utilize the internet and social media to support sourcing and recruitment plans; Track analytical data regarding all facets of the hiring process to demonstrate recruitment effectiveness and to identify any gaps that need to be addressed;Coordinate, support and participate in various initiatives and projects. Key Qualifications Previous sales recruiting experience requiredStrong computer skills with regards to web-based programs, MS Excel and database management; Outgoing and dynamic personality would be an asset; Demonstrated ability in tracking and managing multiple projects with exceptional organization and follow-up skills; Highly developed verbal and written communication skills. Safety-Kleen Systems, Inc. has a commitment to excellence deeply rooted in a strong sense of tradition. Our entire business model revolves around keeping North American businesses green. We generate more than $1.2 billion in annual revenue as a world-class environmental service organization and market leader in industrial hazardous waste management, parts-cleaning technology, and oil re-refining. We collect over 200 million gallons of used motor oil each year and we have the largest re-refinery capacity in North America allowing us to re-refine more than 150 million gallons each year.We have more than 4,300 employees across the United States, Puerto Rico, and Canada. Together, we are building on almost half a century of innovation by developing new products and services to serve the changing needs of our thousands of customers across a broad range of industries and markets, from local auto shops to major corporations and government agencies. Every day, we help our customers resolve their waste management needs and reduce their carbon footprint. PROTECTION. CHOICES. PEOPLE. MAKE GREEN WORK. ™ *SKTO APPLY: Visit our career site at www.safety-kleen.com to complete your online application. Please be aware that due to the high volume of applicants that Clean Harbors receives priority is given to those that apply online. Only those candidates selected for interview will be contacted. Clean Harbors is an equal opportunity employer.Potential Applicants:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Sales Recruiter Extraordinaire Job in Richardson,Full Time Employee,"Richardson, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-recruiter-extraordinaire-job-richardson-tx-us-175050161.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=5,,Human Resources,fa492a30b6953792a431cc3bf656b84c
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:03:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client seeks a HRIS Associate with 5+ years of Workday implementation experience to play an essential role in the implementation of Workday in its Stamford headquarters.Client DetailsOur client is a global private asset management firm headquartered in Stamford Connecticut with offices in New York, Boston, Singapore, Hong Kong and Tokyo.DescriptionHRIS ASSOCIATE RESPONSIBILITIES INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO:- Implement, upgrade, support and maintain HR systems- Ensure proper design, configuration and documentation of system change requests- Conduct needs analysis and gather feedback on processes to identify potential system enhancements- Consider downstream impact on system changes and ensure appropriate communications are delivered to relevant groups- Conduct system testing, ensuring changes reflect the requirements outlined in the specification and preparing testing notes/documentation- Design, recommend, configure and maintain business processes that streamline work, ensure compliance with relevant procedures, define clear accountability and create efficiencies- Participate in the regular review and prioritization of HR systems configuration projects- Identify opportunities for improving the effectiveness of processes, systems, and reports- Develop, maintain and ensure accuracy of a set of standard queries and reports for end users to run, suggest new reports as needed, develop ad hoc reports in response to specific data requests- Assists in the development and maintenance of HR dashboards in the HRIS system to help influence and drive strategy, automating the delivery where possible- Document internal processes and audit procedures to ensure data integrity within systems- Respond to inquiries from HR and employees on functionality related questions and issuesProfileHRIS ASSOCIATE QUALIFICATIONS:- 4 year Bachelor's Degree- 4-6+ years of experience configuring and implementing HRIS-Workday experience required- Strong analytical skills with a good understanding and working knowledge of HR operations- Excellent time management, task prioritization, communication, and documentation skills- Ability to work in a fast-paced financial services environment- Ability to handle confidential material in a professional manner- Ability to prioritize and multitask multiple responsibilities- Must show initiative, be innovative, and be a team player- Detail-oriented individual who demonstrates a high level of accuracyJob OfferCompetitive starting salary and benefits, discretionary bonus, global asset management firm",HRIS Associate Job in Stamford,"Full Time , Employee","Stamford, CT",,http://jobview.monster.com/hris-associate-job-stamford-ct-us-174904744.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=9,,,a58aee289bf7cc498096e7b0ddf0cdff
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:15:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"*Looking for Only LOCAL candidates. “Permanent residents and those authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply.  We are unable to sponsor visas at this time” We have multiple positions open for our client who is currently seeking an  Benefits AnalystThis is a 6-month Contract position with a potential to extend Job details:Job title                :  Benefits AnalystLocation               : Charlotte, North Carolina - 28262Job type               : 6 Months (higher possibility of extension)  Job Description:Job Title: Payroll Specialist/AnalystThe QA/Research Payroll Delivery Specialist is client facing in and contributing to delivery of requested service levels and key performance indicators. The QA/Research Payroll Delivery Specialist is a Subject Matter Expert (SME) in the role's responsibilities and technology within their Domain.The PDS assumes responsibility for own processes by identifying trends that require adjustments in work approach.This role works with the Manager and others to resolve participant and plan administration issues/escalations.The PDS is responsible for the quality of their work and is required to meet Service Level Agreements. Responsibility AreasUnderstands relationships between Hewitt, Hewitt 3rd party providers, clients and clients 3rd party providersSupports Reported Service Level (RSL) and Key Performance Indicator (KPI) adherenceResponsible for communicating measuresRecognizes when inquiries are beyond the scope of own responsibilities and escalates to the Manager/Team LeadProvides or ensures timely quality delivery of own processesPeer reviews files, reports and outgoing correspondenceFollows Standard Operating Procedures (SOP)s/processes for accuracy and maintains own SOP documentationAdheres to internal and external audit requirements for specific clientsProactively looks for resolution of potential service delivery issues and provides input towards process improvementEscalate Client non-compliance of processes and procedures to Manager/Team LeadSupports client specific operational measures and service level agreementsMaintains interaction with client counterpartsIdentifies issues and resolves BAU (Business as Usual) participant issues; raises issues to Manager/Team Lead when requiredExecutes Data File processing and exchange with internal domains or third partiesSupports acceptance testing of ongoing processes as required (at live date and as changes are made)Able to run pre-written queries if requiredCommunicates with other Domains on participant specific issues with direction from Senior peers or Manager/Team LeadProvides training to new team membersActs as referral for the other domains and off-shore teams around process questionsSupports small client projects with BAU directionSupports service escalations from the client as well as on/off-shore team membersResponsible for own workflow and action accordinglyProactively looks for resolution of potential service delivery issues QualificationsFormal Education & CertificationBachelors degree or equivalent work experience requiredCPP certification strongly desired Knowledge & Experience3+ years of work experience in a multi-state payroll environmentExperience and Subject Matter Expert (SME) in project/implementation work, preferred as well as manual check calculations, executive compensation payroll processing, stock options, relocation, W2c, expat payroll processing, responding to pay and payroll tax inquiries from employees, calculations of under/over payments.Able to read and interpret regulatory and legislative updatesStrong subject matter expertise in one of the various systems being used to process a participant payroll issue like PeopleSoft, or SAP Strong attention to detail and executionStrong communication and customer service/communication skillsStrong analytical and problem solving skillsUnderstands fundamentals of Workflow Management and related reportsStrong payroll accounting competencyStrong understanding of internal controls, SOX, and SAS 70 reportsAble to work independently with minimum supervision.Ability to work under tight deadlines managing multiple tasks Top 3 - 5 skills(certifications/licenses):It is very important that the candidates have recent experience with the following skills as there will be “limited training” provided and they will be expected to hit the floor running:1) Siebel or Salesforce (ticket tracking system)2) PeopleSoft 8.0 and higher Experience a MUST3) State/Federal Tax Rules4) W2 and W2C Processing5) Workday6) FPC/CPP a nice to have What does your group support:Our team supports one of the largest clients our company services.We are responsible for ensuring Payroll is processed BW/SM for domestic employees and monthly for international employees. Additional Skills:             Technical SkillUnderstanding and utilization of workflow tools to maximize usageMS Office-working knowledge of MS Excel, Word, and AccessAbility to navigate and learn multiple systemsBasic understanding of internal controlsAbility to recognize a system defectAbility to Problem Solve and drive to root cause.Ability to translate manual check, executive compensation, stock options, relocation and expat payroll processes and communicate to employees or customer service representatives Contact:Julia –     juliap@askstaffing.comRajesh – rajeshk@askstaffig.com",Benefits Analyst Job in Charlotte,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Charlotte, NC 28262",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-analyst-job-charlotte-nc-us-175314814.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=15,,Human Resources,c54ad04e69255ac16faca28d3758f8d0
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:15:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Payable Clerk Job in New York City, NY If you are looking for an opportunity to become a member of a well-known media giant and have a strong accounts payable background, then you may be the perfect fit for this Accounts Payable Clerk job in New York City, NY.  This is a great place to enhance your skills in a fast paced and dynamic work environment. You will be working Monday-Friday and will have a great work/life balance. Here is some insight into what the role will entail:  Create purchase ordersProcess a high volume of accounts payable invoices on a weekly basisAudit employee's T&E receipts to ensure complianceProcess reimbursement checks and prepare weekly Travel and Expense ReportsAssist with 1099 filings at year endBook AP Accruals for month end closeReconcile accounts payable accounts and assist with ad-hoc reporting  To be successful, you should have:  A minimum of two years of accounts payable experienceStrong written and verbal communication skillsAdvanced Excel skills including pivot tables, v lookups and SUMIF functions orSAP or Great Plains is a major plus  If this Accounts Payable Clerk job in New York City, NY is something you want to be considered for, please apply now!   ",Accounts Payable Clerk Job in New York City,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10175",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-clerk-job-in-new-york-city-ny-job-new-york-ny-us-173852928.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,6618576a43429be7dd2bfd76c1f01109
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:15:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounting Principals is looking to fill a Temp to Direct Hire Accounts Payable/Accounts Receivable Accountant Job in Mission Valley, CA.  This opportunity will definitely turn into a direct hire offer based on the performance of the candidate. They are centrally located and are looking for someone who is capable of senior growth! Pay for this position is up to $21/hr. RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE AP/AR ACCOUNTANT JOB• High volume invoice processing (2 and 3-way match)• Obtain and verify approval of invoices prior to payment• Investigate discrepancies with vendors; ensure timely payment• Process bank reconciliations and payments QUALIFICATIONS• Minimum of two full years of progressive accounting experience• Strong AP background• Ideally Yardi software knowledge• Strong attention to detail and work ethic If you are interested please apply today or email your resume to evan.blakey@accountingprincipals.com To view our other Accounting opportunities in the Greater San Diego area, please visit our website at www.accountingprincipals.com.  ;",AP/AR Accountant Job in Mission Valley,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Diego, CA 92122",,http://jobview.monster.com/ap-ar-accountant-job-in-mission-valley-ca-job-san-diego-ca-us-174340621.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=6,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c56e0a92ed93f3af71abab12b346170e
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:15:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Collections Manager position in Miami, FL. Job Responsibilities   This position is responsible for, but not limited to, the following: Manage qualitative and quantitative performance metrics related to customer payments and department performance.Act as a business partner with Marketing for establishing proper credit management controls to minimize fraudulent orders and bad debts.Focus on continuous improvement initiatives with staff.Monitor aging and DSO for purposes of reducing past due accounts.Communicate effectively and professionally with customers and employees.Work closely with the sales staff for negotiating extended payment terms.Work with Accounting staff in support of financial reporting requirements.Responsibility for training, developing and coaching a team of A/R professionals. Responsible for day-to-day management of team, including performance management towards established department metrics and company policies.Coach a team in communicating and negotiating past due customer accounts.Oversight of review and reconciliation of daily cash postings using a lock box system.Oversight of the timely and accurate customer invoicing process.Oversight of periodic customer statements and notifications of past due accounts.Oversight of credit card payment processing and managing payment plans.Other tasks and duties as required.  Minimum Qualifications Bachelor’s degree or equivalent education. Advanced degree a plus.  4-6 years experience in a high-volume Credit Management role.  1-3 years of supervisory experience required.  Experience with SAP or other ERP system a plus.  If interested please apply online, and email resume to megan.cioni@parkerlynch.com",Collections Manager Job in Miami,Full Time Employee,"Miami, FL 33161",,http://jobview.monster.com/collections-manager-job-miami-fl-us-174509439.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=10,"0.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,0b231a31b697cd876cd7203e0a5d8a2c
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:16:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kforce is one of the premier leaders in the staffing industry, where Great People = Great ResultsSM. For over 50 years we’ve thrived on building relationships and making a positive impact in the lives of those we touch. We believe in acting with integrity, doing the right thing and giving back to our communities. A professional staffing services firm, Kforce stands for KnowledgeForce®, describing our highly skilled professionals. Our flexible and direct hire staffing specialists engage over 23,000 highly skilled Technology and Finance & Accounting professionals annually, connecting them with more than 4,000 customers. Our national network of 60 offices, two national recruiting centers, and 2,000+ associates support our ability to meet the needs of customers of all sizes, including 70% of the Fortune 100. Join the Kforce family and we will support you with expert training, innovative tools, an amazing culture, and a team of Great People that will cheer you on your road to success! Summary: The Talent Associate (recruiter, Technology)plays a critical role in fueling Kforce’s growth by connecting Great People together. The Talent Associate (recruiter, Technology)executes sourcing and recruiting strategies to identify and attract qualified and diverse candidates, and then matches them to opportunities with our clients. This position demands an exceptional balance of drive and commitment, coupled with exemplary interpersonal skills, topped off with a creative mindset. The Talent Associate (Recruiter, Technology)possesses the uncanny ability to successfully manage multiple priorities in a high-paced and fast-changing work environment. As an emerging business partner, the Talent Associate (Recruiter, Technology)will interact with internal and external contacts to facilitate the placement process while under the guidance of leadership. Responsibilities: Source candidates through networking, employee referrals, job boards, social media presence ad searches, career fairs, internet research and direct contact. Collaborate with Kforce colleagues to fully understand the client’s hiring objectives and requirements. Submit candidates, providing information needed to facilitate hiring decisions, including salary recommendations. Coordinate interview and follow up activities. As the candidate advocate, guide candidates thorough the recruiting process, including evaluation of skills and expertise, the interview process and salary negotiation. Facilitate the offer process, including salary negotiations, benefits and other terms and conditions of employment. Ensure pre-employment steps, including reference checks and background and drug tests are completed in a timely fashion. Manage consultants while on assignment; facilitate redeployment of consultants as assignments approach completion. Conduct all interactions with the utmost diplomacy and tact. Maintain confidentiality and treat others with conscientious respect. Connect with candidates, colleagues and clients on a regular basis to develop and maintain relationships, expand industry knowledge, and generate referrals and leads. Stay abreast of current recruiting trends and recommend creative strategies to meet hiring goals.Requirements: BA/BS degree preferred. 2-5 years professional experience in a staffing, corporate, recruiting or professional sales environment Ability to develop customer relationship management, consultative and negotiation skills. Proven organizational skills with attention to detail and the ability to self-manage, prioritize initiatives and work well in a team environment with competing demands and tight deadlines. Excellent verbal and written communication skills with an emphasis on tact and diplomacy. Strong internet research skills. Proficiency in MS office, including Word and Excel. Ability to grasp cutting edge technologies. CERTIFICATES AND/OR LICENSES: None required. TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS: Travel as required, up to 5%. Kforce is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status.",Recruiter,Full Time Employee,"Bloomington, MN 55435",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-technology-job-bloomington-mn-us-175299467.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),60040311482edb6a0d7a09eb140a44e6
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:16:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Public Accountant Job in Chester NJ A Public Accounting firm is looking for an experienced candidate for a Public Accountant Job in Chester NJ.  The firm is growing and looking to continue to expand their employees to account for continued growth.  VERY LOW TRAVEL REQUIRED!!! Most of their clients are local, so the travel involved is very minimal.  The environment at the firm is very open and friendly, and this opportunity offers a chance to rise in the company.  They are open to paying based on experience and are ideally looking for someone with 3-4 years in a public firm.  Public Accountant Job Responsibilities: Client accountingFinancial reportingTax engagements with appropriate levels of supervision.  Tax planningAudit engagementsBusiness development  Public Accountant Job Qualifications: 3-4 years of experience in a CPA FirmB.S. in Accounting or relatedCPA preferred  To learn more about the Public Accountant Position in Chester, NJ please submit your resume directly to me at Anthony.cresci@parkerlynch.com      ",Public Accountant Job in Chester NJ Job in Chester,Full Time Employee,"Chester, NJ 07930",,http://jobview.monster.com/public-accountant-job-in-chester-nj-job-chester-nj-us-174055491.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=8,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,8048bd5c01cbcac836a07968c361f047
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:16:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionJob Overview: The Developer Analyst will be responsible for executing, centralizing, and automating talent reporting for Macy’s integrated Learning Management system. This role will be critical in helping to provide regularly scheduled reports that will be used to drive key business decisions, demands for analysis, and assisting in building the HR analytics and reporting capabilities for Leadership Development programs and Learning & Development efforts enterprise-wide. Perform other duties as assigned. This position is based out of Downtown Cincinnati. Essential Functions: • Provides support in the areas of Learning Management reporting, Leadership Programs administration and analysis, predictive analytics and automation.• Provide both operational and insight reporting to key business functions that drive our business growth.• Supports the team through the use of data analysis to help influence changes to operations, processes, and/or programs.• Utilizes technology and analytical tools to analyze people and other cross-functional data.• Improves and further automates reporting capabilities through the use of Tableau, macros, and/or customized solutions.• Communicates findings through reporting and dashboards on a periodic/quarterly/annual basis.• Maintains and ensures quality assurance of key talent / HR data sets, reports, and metrics for consistent and accurate reporting. • Develops and supports Leadership Development programs through data tracking, ad-hoc reporting and analysis.• Support Macy’s annual compliance activities.• Maintains and optimizes existing HR processes, forms, and reports.• Develops specifications and documents requirements for complex queries.• Supports reporting training.• Regular, dependable attendance & punctuality. Qualifications: Education/Experience: • Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Human Resources, I/O Psychology or a related analytical field and a minimum of 2 years of relevant experience.• Experience with HRIS systems (Taleo, Peoplesoft), Oracle Enterprise BI suite, Hyperion/EPM, SQL, Tableau and MS SharePoint highly preferred. Communication Skills: • Strong written and verbal communication skills. • Ability to read, write and interpret instructional documents such as reports and procedure manuals. Mathematical Skills: • Must have above average mathematical skills, including the ability to compute rates, ratios, and percentages, and the ability to work with mathematical concepts such as probability and statistical inference. Reasoning Ability: • Ability to work well both independently and in a team environment. • Ability to handle multiple, time-sensitive projects while focusing on the quality of work delivered. • Ability to manage and maintain highly sensitive and confidential information.• Exceptional organizational skills and attention to detail. Physical Demands: • This position involves extended periods of sitting and the extensive use of computer and the office equipment. May involve stooping, kneeling, or crouching. Involves close vision, color vision, depth perception, and focus adjustment. Other Skills: • Strong analytical skills; comfortable working with and analyzing large sets of data and presenting results. • Capability to think multiple steps ahead; prepares for potential problems and escalates issues when appropriate.• Highly flexible with the ability to execute well in a fast-paced and rapidly evolving organization. • Advanced Microsoft Office skills, including Excel, Word and PowerPoint; ability with vlookups, pivot tables, and macros. Work Hours: • Ability to work a flexible schedule based on department and store/company needs. This job description is not all inclusive. Macy’s Inc. reserves the right to amend this job description at any time. Macy's Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer, committed to a diverse and inclusive work environment.Primary Location:United States-Ohio-CincinnatiJob:Talent and Organizational Development.inlinepanel{display: block !important; padding-top:10px;}",Developer Analyst,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH",,http://jobview.monster.com/developer-analyst-talent-development-job-cincinnati-oh-us-174978718.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=11,,Human Resources,f6521a83202c0fa5d877d72956ddfb13
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:16:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kforce is one of the premier leaders in the staffing industry, where Great People = Great ResultsSM. For over 50 years we’ve thrived on building relationships and making a positive impact in the lives of those we touch. We believe in acting with integrity, doing the right thing and giving back to our communities. A professional staffing services firm, Kforce stands for KnowledgeForce®, describing our highly skilled professionals. Our flexible and direct hire staffing specialists engage over 23,000 highly skilled Technology and Finance & Accounting professionals annually, connecting them with more than 4,000 customers. Our national network of 60 offices, two national recruiting centers, and 2,000+ associates support our ability to meet the needs of customers of all sizes, including 70% of the Fortune 100. Join the Kforce family and we will support you with expert training, innovative tools, an amazing culture, and a team of Great People that will cheer you on your road to success! Summary: The Talent Associate plays a critical role in fueling Kforce’s growth by connecting Great People together. The Talent Associate executes sourcing and recruiting strategies to identify and attract qualified and diverse candidates, and then matches them to opportunities with our clients. This position demands an exceptional balance of drive and commitment, coupled with exemplary interpersonal skills, topped off with a creative mindset. The Talent Associate possesses the uncanny ability to successfully manage multiple priorities in a high-paced and fast-changing work environment. As an emerging business partner, the Talent Associate will interact with internal and external contacts to facilitate the placement process while under the guidance of leadership. Responsibilities: Source candidates through networking, employee referrals, job boards, social media presence ad searches, career fairs, internet research and direct contact. Collaborate with Kforce colleagues to fully understand the client’s hiring objectives and requirements. Submit candidates, providing information needed to facilitate hiring decisions, including salary recommendations. Coordinate interview and follow up activities. As the candidate advocate, guide candidates thorough the recruiting process, including evaluation of skills and expertise, the interview process and salary negotiation. Facilitate the offer process, including salary negotiations, benefits and other terms and conditions of employment. Ensure pre-employment steps, including reference checks and background and drug tests are completed in a timely fashion. Manage consultants while on assignment; facilitate redeployment of consultants as assignments approach completion. Conduct all interactions with the utmost diplomacy and tact. Maintain confidentiality and treat others with conscientious respect. Connect with candidates, colleagues and clients on a regular basis to develop and maintain relationships, expand industry knowledge, and generate referrals and leads. Stay abreast of current recruiting trends and recommend creative strategies to meet hiring goals. Source prospective clients through referrals, networking, social media, internet research, sales leads and direct contact. Schedule and conduct clients meetings to introduce new clients to the value of Kforce, with an end goal of engaging them to utilize our professional staffing services. Prepare and present professional services proposals. Collaborate with Kforce colleagues to facilitate the placement process, which may include presentation of candidates, interview scheduling, client preparation and debrief and salary negotiation. As the client advocate, guide clients thorough the staffing process, ensuring they have full clarity of expectations. Manage relationships throughout the assignment; expand Kforce presence within existing client accounts. Continuously expand the Kforce client base through ongoing new business development. Conduct all interactions with the utmost diplomacy and tact. Maintain confidentiality and treat others with conscientious respect. Connect with candidates, colleagues and clients on a regular basis to develop and maintain relationships, expand industry knowledge, and generate referrals and leads. Stay abreast of current staffing trends and recommend creative strategies Requirements: BA/BS degree preferred. 2-5 years professional experience in a staffing, corporate, recruiting or professional sales environment Ability to develop customer relationship management, consultative and negotiation skills. Proven organizational skills with attention to detail and the ability to self-manage, prioritize initiatives and work well in a team environment with competing demands and tight deadlines. Excellent verbal and written communication skills with an emphasis on tact and diplomacy. Strong internet research skills. Proficiency in MS office, including Word and Excel. Ability to grasp cutting edge technologies. CERTIFICATES AND/OR LICENSES: None required. TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS: Travel as required, up to 5%. Kforce is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status.",Recruiter,Full Time Employee,"Boston, MA 02210",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-direct-hire-job-boston-ma-us-175299513.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0ceea2c6e478163eaf73a51d6d2465ff
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:17:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Career Showcase is a Job Fair Company that specializes in Accounting,Human Resources,Customer Service, Banking, Marketing, Sales and many others. We partner with many fortune 500 companies to help them find the best talent the market has to offer. Companies come to our fairs to interview and hire the BEST of the BEST professionals, account executives and managers.Our fairs are open to recent college grads through executive level candidates. Candidates that attend our job fairs are more likely to obtain the career they are looking for than those candidates that just ""apply"" to job postings.2016 EVENING JOB FAIRMANY COMPANIES ATTENDING @ 5pm!!NJ's # 1 EVENING RECRUITING EVENT INVITES YOU...**CENTRAL NJ FAIR**THURSDAY OCTOBER 27, 2016 @5pmHILTON GARDEN INN EDISON/RARITAN CENTER HOTEL50 Raritan Center Pkwy, Edison, NJ 08837*Time : 5.00 p.m....Be prompt to hear company presentations***YOU MUST PRE-REGISTER TO SECURE A SPOT AT THIS EXCLUSIVE HIRING EVENT http://careershowcase.com/event-details/?eventid=370&venueid=80 What to expectMANY COMPANIES ATTENDING!!! Our special ""INTRODUCTION FORMAT"" will give you the opportunity to hear about the companies in a ""THEATRE"" environment before the Career Fair even begins. EACH MANAGER/RECRUITER WILL BE PRESENTING THEIR COMPANY TO YOU. This will assist you in deciding which company you want to meet with. Dress Professionally Bring at least 15 copies of your resume Be ready to network with other candidates..A job fair is a great networking opportunity to connect with hundreds of other candidates in the marketplace Even if you are unsure about meeting with a company, approach them to “pitch"" yourself and your skills, you never know where it will lead Best chance to obtain the interview is to actually attend the event. Hiring managers are looking for those candidates that take the initative to actually ATTEND the fair Key Words: Account Executive, Sales Representative, Account Manager, B2B, retail sales, furniture, sales, financial services, customer service, Business Development Manager, Sales Manager, Financial Services, Insurance, Telecommunications, Pharmaceutical, Hospital Representative, Medical, Marketing, Advertising, Healthcare,office equipment, Telecom, Information Technology, Software, Security Services, Advertising, Payroll, Sales Management, Sales Trainee, Management Trainee, At home sales, cold calling, telemarketer, telemarketing, financial advisor, insurance sales, outside sales, outside sales representative, sales executive, salesman, salesperson, sales women, marketing, Melville, Long Island, New York, NY",HUMAN RESOURCES- JOB FAIR THURSDAY OCTOBER ...MANY NEW COMPANIES @PM Job in Menlo Park,Full Time Employee,"Menlo Park, NJ 08837",Business Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-job-fair-thursday-october-27-many-new-companies-5pm-job-menlo-park-nj-us-173427817.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,"30,000.00 - 150,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,43ce80a0d04b35a2e8b81e06a20682d7
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:17:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Permanent opportunity with Life Style Staffing. Full benefits package available and great room for advancement! We are seeking a professional and customer service focused candidate to join our team at our La Vergne, TN office as a Bilingual Staffing Representative. This position is responsible for maintaining and building client relationships by providing outstanding staffing services and solutions.Responsibilities include but are not limited to:Maintain staffing operations across the boardObtain daily staff requests from customers and fill positions efficientlyUphold accurate system for tracking staff over a variety of shiftsCoordinate staff to meet the organization’s requirementsMonitor overtime accumulation and attendance of employeesConduct interviews and orientations with potential candidates and newly hired employeesProvide facility tours to newly hired employeesConduct competency checks on new and existing employeesMaintain schedules for rotating staffSecure coverage for vacancy shiftsWork with the payroll manager to verify payroll accuracyProcess employee vacation requests and payroll inquiriesAdminister performance reviews and corrective actionsOther duties as assignedMust be bilingual Spanish/English. A college degree is preferred. Relevant experience in customer service, human resources, or recruiting is strongly preferred.Please submit your resume and salary requirements to: gad@lifestylestaffing.com Report","Life Style Staffing Job Application for Human Resources/Account Coordinator (Bilingual) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Gina Bounds,,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-account-coordinator-bilingual-job-la-vergne-tn-us-174244964.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=16,,,6f7f98bc5cfb164d99d18b1df06206bf
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:21:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:HEALTHCARE SUPERVISOR ? Competitive Hourly Pay Rate? 100% Health Insurance Paid? Ongoing Educational OpportunitiesShreveport healthcare agency has an immediate need for a home health supervisor! Company offer a competitive hourly pay rate, 100% health insurance paid by the company and ongoing educational opportunities at no cost through their online university. Candidate must have an understanding of the aging process with regard to the elderly and their conservative nature; possess the ability to multi-task and think multi-dimensionally; have the ability to self-motivate and make critical decisions in a fast-paced environment. Applicant will be responsible for coordinating and maintaining scheduling assignments for caregivers and clients; maintaining on-call caregiver availability schedule weekly; and coordinating caregiver assignments by matching caregiver qualifications to client needs. Do you really enjoy working with older adults as they walk through the later years of their lives? This could be your calling and your passion! Call today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1087743 Job Experience:,,, Polished and professional in appearance and communicationMS Word and MS Excel proficiencyProficient with internet, e-mail, and textingBasic understanding of medical terminologyBackground investigation requiredYears of Experience Required:",HEALTHCARE SUPERVISOR Job in Shreveport,Full Time Employee,"Shreveport, LA 71101",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/healthcare-supervisor-job-shreveport-la-us-175335119.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e28a6f3c5f414a510fe03523309e29e9
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:45:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO) Summary:In a senior individual contributor capacity, manages the design and administration of assigned broad based compensation programs and processes for assigned domestic and/or international region and/or business units. Serves as business unit/region subject matter expert and acts in an internal consultant capacity to all levels of business leaders thereby becoming a trusted compensation advisor. Studies and analyzes wage and workforce/labor trends for salaried and hourly jobs within assigned business units and proactively informs leaders. Partners with business leads in creating and executing on compensation strategies that align with business objectives and improve business performance in assigned regions and business units. May manage one or more highly complex enterprise level compensation projects/programs with an end-to-end project/program management approach.Qualifications:  Bachelor’s degree in Business, Management or Human Resource Management with minimum 5+ years of progressive experience in compensation and benefits or equivalent combination of education, experience or training10+ years of compensation experienceCCP or GRP certification preferredExcellent communication skills working all levels of the organization, including senior leadership both domestic and international  Strong qualitative and analytical skills required, including data manipulation, querying, and reportingMust be proficient in Excel spreadsheet development including the building of complex compensation models, formulas and calculations, functions, pivot tables, filters, lookups, table joining, and table management and Powerpoint skillsWell versed in areas of domestic and/or global compensation practices, including job analysis, documentation, evaluation, equity, market pricing, costing, salary structure design, merit programs, and other reward programs #LI-AH1 We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Manager Compensation Job in High Point,"Full Time, Employee","High Point, NC 27265",,http://jobview.monster.com/manager-compensation-job-high-point-nc-us-173333559.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=14,,Human Resources,e5d5f2f5e43f8a173717736fa81447c8
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:46:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Imagine Staffing is searching for a Human Resources Generalist on behalf of our client with manufacturing operations in Fridley, Minnesota. Working closely with this plant’s newly appointed Human Resources Manager, the Human Resources Generalist will be a strategic partner in the transformation of the facility’s HR policy and Employee Relations culture. The Human Resources Generalist will assist with administration of HR Policies and Procedures to ensure legal compliance, including but not limited to; recruiting/on boarding, benefits administration, workman’s compensation, training and employee relations. Roles & Responsibilities: Owns on boarding process; equipment/services ordering, network/system access, scheduling and conducting new hire orientation.HRIS entry including compensation changes.Management of labor and employee relations for employees and resolution of any problems.Assists in development and implementation of personnel policies and procedures.Oversees employee files to ensure legal compliance.Responsible for determining the appropriate access to computer systems for new hires and active employees and entering Footprints tickets.Point of contact for benefit questions as they arise including resolution of any problems.Administrative support for HR/Payroll, as needed. This includes document preparation, data entry, supplying unemployment information, complete employment verifications, routing all HR correspondence and other miscellaneous administrative duties.Assists with coaching and counseling in order to address behavioral and performance issues with hourly and salary employeesWorks with all levels of management on performance managementMaintains compliance with federal and state regulations concerning all areas of HR and employmentAssists HR Manager and EHS Manager in the management of workman’s compensation processAll other duties as may be assignedRequirements and Qualifications: Bachelors Degree required, with preferred field of study: Human Resources/Organizational Behavior/Labor Relations/Employee Relations3-5 Years’ HR Generalist experience, within a manufacturing or similar organizationLabor relations experience strongly preferredPHR certification or evidence of continued education preferredExceptional Customer Service SkillsAbility to work with confidential informationAbility to multi-task and problem solveStrong organizational and time management skillsAbility to exercise good judgment and diplomacy in dealing with executives, staff members, clients and visitorsStrong written and verbal communication skillsKnowledge of employment lawExperience in a labor relations capacity is strongly preferred",Human Resources Generalist,Full Time Employee,"Minneapolis, MN 55432",,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-generalist-labor-relations-job-minneapolis-mn-us-174948232.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=13,,Human Resources,17d792a8781b28e0658f0dc64bb9032e
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:09:58:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Staff Accountant- Nassau County Our client, a growing CPA firm in Nassau County, has an opening for a senior staff accountant to join their firm.  This is a great opportunity for a professional accountant to obtain hands on experience working in a family friendly, entrepreneurial environment.  Essential Job Functions of the Senior Staff Accountant This role, which will work directly for one of the firm’s partners, is a combination of tax and audit work.  The candidate should have experience preparing tax returns and financial statements for their client base and feel comfortable communicating directly with clients.   Senior Staff Accountant  Requirements• Bachelors degree in Accounting; CPA required• Minimum 5 years accounting experience • Detail oriented, able to prioritize workload• Excellent written and verbal skills If you are interested in the Senior Staff Accountant position, please send your resume as a word document to Abby.Gardy@Parkerlynch.com AND apply on-line. ",Senior Staff Accountant- Nassau County Job in Hauppauge,Full Time Employee,"Hauppauge, NY 11788",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-staff-accountant-nassau-county-job-hauppauge-ny-us-174902206.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=14,"65,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,07a1c1264b439072a0c2fbefb99807a4
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:10:28:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Would you enjoy working at a healthcare organization? Do you have strong, accurate data entry experience? Are you looking for a junior role? If so we have the job for you. This is an excellent opportunity to gain experience at a firm located in San Francisco, CA. They are looking for a Data Entry Clerk that is motivated and driven by the desire to provide excellent customer service, while working as a team. If your background meets the below requirements, this may be a great job opportunity for you!   You will spend your days: Entering billing informationValidating contracts and ensuring invoice accuracyResolving transaction issuesPerforming miscellaneous accounting duties  Our ideal candidate will have: Minimum one year accounting backgroundProficient in MS Excel and WordData entry experienceGreat attention to detail  If you feel that this position is a match for you, please reach out to Sara at Sara.neuville@accountingprincipals.com or apply directly on the Accounting Principals website, www.accountingprincipals.com Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity and we look forward to hearing from you! ",Data Entry Clerk Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94104",,http://jobview.monster.com/data-entry-clerk-job-in-san-francisco-ca-job-san-francisco-ca-us-174342909.aspx?mescoid=4300751001001&jobPosition=19,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,75360e8daf37e63d80e37b2252f80d5c
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:10:54:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Director of Accounting Real Estate Job Description SummaryOur client, a joint venture and rapidly growing real estate firm headquartered in Downtown Chicago is seeking to hire a Director of Accounting. As the Director of Corporate Accounting, you will be responsible for oversight of all accounting functions for the portfolio of businesses and manage a team of 6. This role will also include preparation of audit work papers, analyzing balance sheet accounts, preparation of financial statements and data analysis. The perfect candidate will have strong exposure to fund investments and working in a real estate joint venture setting.  Director of Accounting Responsibilities: Lead and supervise the accounting department processes and staffProvide and ensure institutional level accounting discipline and process across all assetsWork with partner accounting departments and personnel as neededManage the receivables and payables process across all assets and entities Manage the monthly, quarterly, and year end reporting process and ensure accuracy and timeliness.Ensure compliance with institutional fund accounting requirements at the property and JV levelEnsure compliance with lender reporting and manage lender ratiosManage (with external CPA) the annual income tax process and investor K1 reporting process Assist with due diligence efforts of potential acquisitions by reviewing financial statements Manage Debt and Equity at the property and partner level  Director of Accounting Requirements: Bachelor's Degree in AccountingMinimum of 5 years of accounting experience AND direct team management experience CPAU.S. GAAP working knowledgeStrong financial reporting and technical accounting skills Experience working for a REIT is requiredYardi preferred  Benefits & Perks Opportunity to work for Chicago's fastest growing REIT's Awarded “Top Employer” 4 years in a rowHealth, dental, vision, 401KGreat Vacation  Interested in applying for this job opportunity? Email your resume in Word format to neema.parikh@parkerlynch.com and put “Director of Accounting RE” in the subject line. Emailed resumes will have priority over online applications.",Director of Accounting - Real Estate Firm - PE Owned - Loop Job in Chicago,Full Time Employee,"Chicago, IL 60603",,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-accounting-real-estate-firm-pe-owned-loop-job-chicago-il-us-174744624.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=12,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,a480172dee0cbe99311a78da04ffc8fa
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:10:55:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Chickasaw NationIs accepting applications for the following:*Research Strategist (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 44980) *CNDH Surgery Center RN (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45401) *CNDH Clinical Informatics Manager (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45620) *HR Specialist (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45443)*CNDH ER Transporter (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45600) *CNDH Dental Assistant (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45602)*CNDH Clinical Outpatient Dietician (Purcell, OK); (Job ID: 45546) *Admission Specialist (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45551) *CNDH Scrub Technician (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45416) *CNDH Inpatient Pharmacist (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 44828) *CNDH Medical Support Technician (Purcell, OK); (Job ID: 43586) *CNDH Computed Tomography Technologist (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45311) *Assistant General Counsel I (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 44802) *ICW Attorney (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 40302)*Broadcast Productions Manager (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 44810) *Martial Arts Aide (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 44604)*Special Needs Assistant (Ada, OK); (Job ID: 45430) *Sr. Site Cook Aide (Ardmore, OK); (Job ID: 45506) *CYC Cook II (Sulphur, OK); (Job ID: 45716)For a description of the Chickasaw Na- tion, or to complete an application and view detailed information, please refer to http://www.chickasaw.net If you would like additional information, you may contact: 580.436.7259, orPO Box 1548, Ada, OK 74821. American Indian Preference.This job listing brought to you by The Ada Evening News",HR Specialist Job in  function wrap(EL,Full Time,74820,Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-specialist-job-ada-ok-us-175052899.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,72c6bf45573db2a6410d4d5e40f6034a
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:11:08:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Northwest Center for Behavioral Health Seeking Human Resource Manager$46,541+ The position plans, organizes, directs and administers componets of an ODMHSAS Human Resources program. This includes the completion of various human resources management activities and personnel actions, and the application of laws, rules and standards related to human resources and payroll administration.Requires: Bachelors and four years of professional experience in human resources administration, including one year in a supervisory capacity in the Human Resources Management field OR an equivalent combination of education and experience. NOTE: No substitution for the required supervisory experience. To apply send resume to: humanresources@odmhsas.orgreference job title & #2017-34 COFor more information call (580) 571-3230Human Resource Office1222 10th Street, Suite 201N, Woodward, OK 73801DMHSAS offers excellent benefit & retirement packages**Paid insurance package**EOE Reasonable accommodation to individuals with disabilities may be provided upon request. This job listing brought to you by The Woodward News Report","Northwest Center for Behavorial Health Job Application for Human Resource Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Address 73801,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resource-manager-job-woodward-ok-us-175052919.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=4,,,84565e066bbd4864d5aba3de910ee0ae
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:11:26:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Recruiter Position Features:? Opportunity within a Growing Industry? Professional Atmosphere? Great Benefits? Great Pay to $55K +Incredible position available with a dynamic, stable organization. This Healthcare Services company in Temecula has an urgent need for a Healthcare Recruiter. Responsibilities will include recruiting, creating job ads, conducting interviews, creating job descriptions, on boarding's, verifying compliance and so much more! Must have previous experience working with an Applicant Tracking System as well as a Degree in Human Resources or related field for a four year college. Apply for this great position as a Healthcare Recruiter today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1085466 Job Experience:,, jgomez@appleone.com Years of Experience Required:",$K + Recruiter - Growing Industry Job in Temecula,Full Time Employee,"Temecula, CA 92591",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/55k-recruiter-growing-industry-job-temecula-ca-us-175044150.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b449011f3fc650040e9c28f124cc4fc0
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:11:52:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are a large company with several facilities and are expanding our workforce. We are in need of a skilled CNC Lathe machinist. We offer excellent benefits to our employees and have 25 employees that have been with us up to 20 years.WHAT DOES THIS JOB ENTAIL?We provide quality job shop machining services to a diverse, and ever expanding group of both local and regional customers. We strive to keep pace with machining technology. Our state of the art CNC machine tools are the norm, rather than the exception. Whether it is regarding a single prototype part, or a large production run, our skilled machinists take pride in their work, insuring that the highest level of standards are met.WHY ARE YOU INTERESTED?GREAT BENEFITS. * 401 K * Health * Paid Holidays *Paid Vacation *  Promotes Growth within the Company.IS IT RIGHT FOR YOU?*Critical thinking including making decisions, self motivated and work independently to ensure job is completed*Minimum 5 years experience in a job shop environment*CNC Lathe with set up, program and machining*Fanuc controls experience*Must have own tools*Hold tolerances of +/- .0005*Must read blueprints and make part to print*Must have experience with mics and calipers to check parts*Must get materials for machining including Aluminum, Brass, Steel and Bronze.*Other materials used infrequently are Plastics, Titanium and Hastaloy.*Must have experience with Threading, Boring, OD/ID and face grooves.*Average part size of 75 lb.Please Submit Resumes To:Email: hotjobs@ppswork.com Fax: 330-374-9144or Call 330-374-9133",CNC LATHE MACHINIST Job in Wooster,Full Time Employee,"Wooster, OH",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/cnc-lathe-machinist-job-wooster-oh-us-174253074.aspx?mescoid=5100937001001&jobPosition=20,,Human Resources,7d14351b966b4a9405aab7f0748be591
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:11:57:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Accountant job in San Francisco, CA Accounting Principals has an immediate opening for a Senior Accountant job in San Francisco, CA. Located in the Financial District, this full-time, temporary position at a well-established company offers the opportunity to work with a talented team, competitive pay and benefits. The ideal candidate for the Senior Accountant position would possess a strong knowledge of general accounting, will be a self-starter, and will have previous experience with audit preparation. This position has the potential to become permanent for the right individual. Qualified candidates should submit a resume for immediate consideration.  Senior Accountant Job Responsibilities: Managing day-to-day accounting functions, including A/P, A/R and GL managementOverseeing bank accounts and treasury functionsPerforming all monthly balance sheet and main income and expense account reconciliationsPreparing documentation for tax returns Providing audit assistance for month-end and year-end close Preparing and distributing financial reportsMaintaining registration and reporting compliance for property and ownership entitiesAd Hoc duties as required  Qualifications: Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting, Finance or Business requiredMinimum 5+ years experience, Food and Beverage experience a plus! Advanced understanding of GAAP policies and proceduresProficient in Microsoft Office Suite, including Advanced Excel skillsExcellent written and verbal communication skillsStrong attention to detail and the ability to prioritize in order to meet strict deadlinesCPA a plus!  If you feel that this position is a match for you, please submit your resume to Romina at romina.palomino@accountingprincipals.com.For more opportunities, visit the Accounting Principals website. Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity!  Accounting Principals specializes in the temporary and permanent placement of premier accounting, finance and bookkeeping professionals. Every day, we place these pre-screened, highly-qualified men and women in both temporary and permanent roles with companies throughout the United States.   ",Senior Accountant Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94104",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-san-francisco-ca-us-175273093.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=5,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,998485d7a5faed9c9bdbf8afa092490a
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:11:59:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter job in Stanton, CA. Do you have experience recruiting for labor workers? If so, this is a great opportunity for you! It is a 3-4 month contract, but it can lead to a permanent opportunity if you have the skills and drive. Spanish is a huge PLUS! Duties/Responsibilities:• Meet with hiring managers to discuss job requisitions.• Run job postings.• Review candidates in applicant tracking system.• Conduct phone interviews.• Schedule in-person interviews.• Follow up with candidates and hiring managers.• Run background checks.• Schedule drug tests and physicals.• Onboard new hires.  If interested in our Recruiter job in Stanton, CA please apply today or email your resume to andrea.gutierrez@ajilon.com To view our other office and administrative openings, please visit our website at www.ajilon.com.  ;",Recruiter job in Stanton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Stanton, CA 90680",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-job-in-stanton-ca-job-stanton-ca-us-174606128.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=20,,Human Resources,3a3a2f7ca22765070bf5451d463b77a1
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:12:58:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Talent Hub Specialist/SourcerOur Talent Acquisition team is in the midst of developing a next generation Recruiting strategy that requires strong Recruiters and Sourcers who can think outside the box and develop new ways to generate high caliber pipeline and market intelligence for our global hiring efforts. As a member of this Talent Hub team at Cisco Systems, you will be responsible for:• Build active and passive targets in assigned alignments, using a variety of channels - online tools, research, proprietary databases, networking, job boards, blogs, employee referral programs and social media —that result in diverse, best-in-class candidate slates • Continuously manage, evaluate and implement sourcing tools and methods, leveraging available tools including candidate database, internet based tools (including social media channels), diversity channels, events and employee referral program to maximize ROI for staffing investments. • Define strategy of each engagement. Develop innovative sourcing strategies that include but are not limited to enhancing diverse recruitment efforts and implement a plan to adhere to business and staffing team objectives. • Business and/or technical acumen around Cisco and/or aligned with strategic areas • Act as an I&D advocate throughout sourcing processes, influencing and understanding organizational initiatives • Operational Excellence - Ensure consistent process and policy implementation • Strong partnership with Recruitment team to define skills requirements and develop market intelligence Desired Skills and Experience• Building and cultivating external networks / pipelines, based on alignments, that inform demand planning, candidate sourcing, collaborate (knowledge share)and candidate vetting • Developing and nurturing professional network to consistently build candidate pool for open reqs and future business needs • Leveraging social media and talent communities to attract and engage key talent • Providing an extraordinary candidate experience and act as an ambassador to the external talent markets • Strong understanding and/or desire to learn a full spectrum of technology stack • Good with Excel, PowerPoint, Extraction methodologies • Ability to think outside the box, be self motivated, and innovative",Talent Hub Specialist/Sourcer - Corporate Functions Job in Raleigh,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Raleigh, NC 27607",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/talent-hub-specialist-sourcer-corporate-functions-job-raleigh-nc-us-175029647.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=9,,,8cd5ccd4c794170a0ff045f0a40fa4d0
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:12:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recruiter for National Sales Team Job – Phoenix, AZ Ajilon Professional Staffing, a division of the Adecco Group, is hiring Recruiters to support the national sales team. Now is your chance to become a member of a dynamic organization, that offers rewarding career paths, inclusive work environments and hands-on training and support.  As a Recruiter, you will:• Utilize creativity to develop innovative strategies for attracting top talent• Excellent oral/written communication skills to screen candidates via phone, provide status updates to staffing managers,  and prepare resumes for submission• Proficient multi-tasking abilities to manage multiple work orders, adhere to scheduled follow-up calls and or emails, and build a solid database of qualified candidates for various positions• Professionally collaborate with internal and external members at all levels of the organization To qualify as a Recruiter you should: • Have a Bachelor’s degree  PLUS 2 years of experience in the staffing industry • Thrive in fast-paced environments that are high-volume and metrics-driven • Be comfortable utilizing multiple computer programs and tools simultaneously• Enjoy talking on the phone and helping people find positions which match their interests and qualifications www.ajilon.com or send a current resume, in Word format, to Tammy.Cavalari@AccountingPrincipals.com ",Recruiter Job in Phoenix,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Phoenix, AZ 85027",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-job-in-phoenix-az-job-phoenix-az-us-174895771.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=1,,Human Resources,80c949f36895f7bedb07b239654f8bb5
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:13:32:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job ProLogistix - a division of EmployBridge - has an immediate opening for a Staffing Personnel Coordinator in North Houston, TX. If you are an experienced staffing pro with exceptional customer service, the ability to wear multiple hats, and the desire to work and grow with an industry leader - then we would love to talk with you today!Job Functions:*Hands-on recruiting, interviewing, and selecting qualified logistics/manufacturing personnel for key accounts*Delivering top-notch customer service to candidates, field employees, and client companies alike*Orienting, onboarding, and helping to manage the field employee workforce*Demonstrating the company's and the area's core values, operating principles, and service differentiatorsJob Requirements:*Previous Staffing experience A PLUS!*Previous Recruiting experience A PLUS!*Solid customer service background and a flexible ""can do!"" attitude*Excellent interpersonal and communication skills*Ability to work independently and self-direct*Strong computer skills including MS office, Outlook, and the ability to quickly learn new systems*Strong multi-tasking skills and the ability to follow through with an appropriate sense of urgency*High volume, fast-paced environment*Ability to effectively work with people from all socio-economic strata*Ability to work after hours and on weekends if requiredAt Employbridge, we value all of our employees and are proud to offer a competitive benefit package that includes medical and dental, short & long-term disability, and life insurance along with a generous PTO structure, a Wellness Program, and a 401K plan.EmployBridge is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.www.employbridge.com www.prologistix.com Report","ProLogistix Job Application for Staffing Personnel Coordinator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Jenny Mason,Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/staffing-personnel-coordinator-job-houston-tx-us-175265249.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=15,,,9ea4660d6bf437ab8d69af79886f8b64
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:13:41:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall responsible for all human resource related activities including but not limited to HR administration, employee relations, policy administration, total compensation, recruitment, training, and performance management for all facilities.Supervisory responsibilities: More than 7 employeesExcelent Management and leadership abilitiesWorking hours: 8:00 am - 5:00 pmSkills:Bachelor or Masters degree in Human Resource Management or equivalentPHR or SPHR certification preferred or equivalent experienceMinimum of 10 years' experience in Corporate Human Resource Management Minimum of 10 years management experienceExperience working within a diverse environment and multiple lications Willing to travel 40-50% Principles and practices of employee administration, including methods and techniques using recruitment, selection, classification, training and safetyResponsible for center wide Human Resource planning and developmentProvides functional guidance for administrative support needKnowledge in HRIS systems, ADP and payroll softwareFirst-hand experience with discipline, performance management and conflict resolutionsAdvanced skills with Word, PowerPoint and OutlookExcel skills are requiredRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Human Resources Manager Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, TN 37167",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-manager-job-smyrna-tn-us-175265478.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=13,"80,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",,9b8859a3c8a4771a2925d5c2cb8de2cb
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:14:09:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking to use your finance, accounting, and leadership skills to continue to grow an industry leading service provider? Parker + Lynch is partnering with an Albuquerque company to find a Controller with strong analytical skills and a track record with financial leadership. As the Controller you will focus on preparing and analyzing financial data that drives daily and long term business decisions. If you are energetic and motivated with a desire to drive key business decisions, this is a great opportunity. This company offers a fun progressive culture and tremendous growth potential.  Responsibilities• Development of a costing system for our products.• Be responsible for the efficient operation of the day-to-day activities of the accounting department including: general ledgers, account, intercompany reconciliations, journal entries, fixed asset recording, banking transactions, accounts payable, check runs and monthly bank reconciliations.• Review and audit inventory.• Enhance and maintain internal controls.• Supervise billing, accounts payable, and accounts receivable.• Oversee monthly closing, ensure data presented are accurate, up to date and complete.• Prepare monthly financial statements, quarterly and year-end financial statements.• Prepare, distribute and file 1099s as well as any industry specific forms.• Assist with external audit.• Perform other related duties as required. Required Skills and Experience• Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or Finance• CPA is a strong plus• 5-8 years of relevant Controller experience• Strong technical, ERP, and MS Excel skills If you would like to be considered, please send your resume to megan.mcquay@parkerlynch.com ",Controller Job in Albuquerque New Mexico Job in Albuquerque,Full Time Employee,"Albuquerque, NM 87102",,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-job-in-albuquerque-new-mexico-job-albuquerque-nm-us-175265354.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,693d9ab80a6d3a24e4fd6a2bfaa7b3c5
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:14:10:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ajilon is hiring for a full-time Recruiter in Boston, MA. If you would like to work for an up-beat, exciting, new environment then this job is perfect for you. In this role, you will interview and determine job seekers for your clients. You must have two or more years’ experience in a high volume staffing world as well as a Bachelors’ degree. This job ranges between $40,000 and $52,000 plus commission, depending on experience. Roles and responsibilities for the Recruiter job include: • Communicate with a high volume of job seekers to prescreen and interview them throughout their entire hiring process• Utilizing Monster, CareerBuilder, LinkedIn and Indeed on a daily basis to attract quality talent as well as other job boards to find new business• Interview, call block and client meetings, on a daily basis Key Qualifications:  • Two or more years' in the staffing industry or workforce• Strong written and verbal communication skills• Excellent time management• Works well in a team environment If you are interested in this Recruiting job in Boston, MA or any other opportunities through Aijlon then please click the apply button below and/or email your resume in a Word format to Tate.Monroe@ajilon.com. ",Recruiter Job in Boston,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Boston, MA 02210",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-job-in-boston-ma-job-boston-ma-us-173769763.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=8,"50,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",Human Resources,251838f570b108a1a10889df00023527
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:14:23:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kforce is one of the premier leaders in the staffing industry, where Great People = Great ResultsSM. For over 50 years we’ve thrived on building relationships and making a positive impact in the lives of those we touch. We believe in acting with integrity, doing the right thing and giving back to our communities. A professional staffing services firm, Kforce stands for KnowledgeForce®, describing our highly skilled professionals. Our flexible and direct hire staffing specialists engage over 23,000 highly skilled Technology and Finance & Accounting professionals annually, connecting them with more than 4,000 customers. Our national network of 60 offices, two national recruiting centers, and 2,000+ associates support our ability to meet the needs of customers of all sizes, including 70% of the Fortune 100. Join the Kforce family and we will support you with expert training, innovative tools, an amazing culture, and a team of Great People that will cheer you on your road to success! Summary: The Talent Associate plays a critical role in fueling Kforce’s growth by connecting Great People together. The Talent Associate executes sourcing and recruiting strategies to identify and attract qualified and diverse candidates, and then matches them to opportunities with our clients. This position demands an exceptional balance of drive and commitment, coupled with exemplary interpersonal skills, topped off with a creative mindset. The Talent Associate possesses the uncanny ability to successfully manage multiple priorities in a high-paced and fast-changing work environment. As an emerging business partner, the Talent Associate will interact with internal and external contacts to facilitate the placement process while under the guidance of leadership. Responsibilities: Source candidates through networking, employee referrals, job boards, social media presence ad searches, career fairs, internet research and direct contact. Collaborate with Kforce colleagues to fully understand the client’s hiring objectives and requirements. Submit candidates, providing information needed to facilitate hiring decisions, including salary recommendations. Coordinate interview and follow up activities. As the candidate advocate, guide candidates thorough the recruiting process, including evaluation of skills and expertise, the interview process and salary negotiation. Facilitate the offer process, including salary negotiations, benefits and other terms and conditions of employment. Ensure pre-employment steps, including reference checks and background and drug tests are completed in a timely fashion. Manage consultants while on assignment; facilitate redeployment of consultants as assignments approach completion. Conduct all interactions with the utmost diplomacy and tact. Maintain confidentiality and treat others with conscientious respect. Connect with candidates, colleagues and clients on a regular basis to develop and maintain relationships, expand industry knowledge, and generate referrals and leads. Stay abreast of current recruiting trends and recommend creative strategies to meet hiring goals. Source prospective clients through referrals, networking, social media, internet research, sales leads and direct contact. Schedule and conduct clients meetings to introduce new clients to the value of Kforce, with an end goal of engaging them to utilize our professional staffing services. Prepare and present professional services proposals. Collaborate with Kforce colleagues to facilitate the placement process, which may include presentation of candidates, interview scheduling, client preparation and debrief and salary negotiation. As the client advocate, guide clients thorough the staffing process, ensuring they have full clarity of expectations. Manage relationships throughout the assignment; expand Kforce presence within existing client accounts. Continuously expand the Kforce client base through ongoing new business development. Conduct all interactions with the utmost diplomacy and tact. Maintain confidentiality and treat others with conscientious respect. Connect with candidates, colleagues and clients on a regular basis to develop and maintain relationships, expand industry knowledge, and generate referrals and leads. Stay abreast of current staffing trends and recommend creative strategies Requirements: BA/BS degree preferred. 2-5 years professional experience in a staffing, corporate, recruiting or professional sales environment Ability to develop customer relationship management, consultative and negotiation skills. Proven organizational skills with attention to detail and the ability to self-manage, prioritize initiatives and work well in a team environment with competing demands and tight deadlines. Excellent verbal and written communication skills with an emphasis on tact and diplomacy. Strong internet research skills. Proficiency in MS office, including Word and Excel. Ability to grasp cutting edge technologies. CERTIFICATES AND/OR LICENSES: None required. TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS: Travel as required, up to 5%. Kforce is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status.",Recruiter,Full Time Employee,"Burlington, MA 01803",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-direct-hire-job-burlington-ma-us-175299404.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d6ad44d44dca68ce72dae822686f478d
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:14:42:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bosch Thermotechnology Corporation is a leading international manufacturer of products for indoor climate control through heating and cooling, and for domestic hot water production.The North American subsidiaries of Bosch Thermotechnik GmbH are Bosch Thermotechnology Corp. and FHP Manufacturing, representing the internationally recognized brands Bosch, Buderus, and FHP. These brands represent a wide array of energy-efficient and environmentally friendly products including water source and geothermal heat pumps, solar thermal systems, complete hydronic solutions including condensing boilers, and tankless water heaters.By choice, we are committed to a diverse workforce - EOE/Protected Veteran/Disabled. Location is in Londonderry, NH. Your Responsibilities• Provide administrative support to the Regional President. • Conserves executive’s time by reading, researching and routing correspondence; drafting letters and documents; collecting and analyzing information and initiating telecommunications.• Maintains executive’s appointment schedule by planning and scheduling meetings, conferences, teleconferences and travel.(domestic and international) • Represents the executive by attending meetings in the executive's absence; speaking for the executive and taking meeting minutes. • Prepares reports by collecting and analyzing information.• Create professional PowerPoint presentations utilizing charts, diagrams and graphs.• Will handle the organization of “Town Hall” meetings, company events and workshops. • Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed. • Display a professional, detail-oriented and proactive approach.• Perform other duties as requested and required. • Provide back up for other positions when required.• Local area travel (Waltham, MA), with some domestic travel. Your competencies and qualificationsBasic Qualifications: • High School diploma or equivalent. (Associate or Bachelor’s degree preferred.)• Minimum 3+ years of Executive Assistant experience.• 5+ years of experience using Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Outlook in a Windows environment. Preferred Qualifications: • Proactive and organized, with the ability to take initiative. • Creative, detail-oriented, resourceful and self-motivated with the ability to deal well with change. • Results-oriented, with the ability to manage multiple tasks at one time.• Strong communication skills and the ability to work as a team member. • Professional demeanor, with the ability to make decisions. • Technically savvy, with a willingness to learn new technologies. • Ability to navigate web based systems; SAP experience is a plus. • German language or Spanish language skills are a plus.",Executive Assistant Job in Londonderry,,"Bosch Thermotechnology Corporation is a leading international manufacturer of products for indoor climate control through heating and cooling, and for domestic hot water production.The North American subsidiaries of Bosch Thermotechnik GmbH are Bosch Thermotechnology Corp. and FHP Manufacturing, representing the internationally recognized brands Bosch, Buderus, and FHP. These brands represent a wide array of energy-efficient and environmentally friendly products including water source and geothermal heat pumps, solar thermal systems, complete hydronic solutions including condensing boilers, and tankless water heaters.By choice, we are committed to a diverse workforce - EOE/Protected Veteran/Disabled. Location is in Londonderry, NH. Your Responsibilities• Provide administrative support to the Regional President. • Conserves executive’s time by reading, researching and routing correspondence; drafting letters and documents; collecting and analyzing information and initiating telecommunications.• Maintains executive’s appointment schedule by planning and scheduling meetings, conferences, teleconferences and travel.(domestic and international) • Represents the executive by attending meetings in the executive's absence; speaking for the executive and taking meeting minutes. • Prepares reports by collecting and analyzing information.• Create professional PowerPoint presentations utilizing charts, diagrams and graphs.• Will handle the organization of “Town Hall” meetings, company events and workshops. • Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed. • Display a professional, detail-oriented and proactive approach.• Perform other duties as requested and required. • Provide back up for other positions when required.• Local area travel (Waltham, MA), with some domestic travel. Your competencies and qualificationsBasic Qualifications: • High School diploma or equivalent. (Associate or Bachelor’s degree preferred.)• Minimum 3+ years of Executive Assistant experience.• 5+ years of experience using Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Outlook in a Windows environment. Preferred Qualifications: • Proactive and organized, with the ability to take initiative. • Creative, detail-oriented, resourceful and self-motivated with the ability to deal well with change. • Results-oriented, with the ability to manage multiple tasks at one time.• Strong communication skills and the ability to work as a team member. • Professional demeanor, with the ability to make decisions. • Technically savvy, with a willingness to learn new technologies. • Ability to navigate web based systems; SAP experience is a plus. • German language or Spanish language skills are a plus.",,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-assistant-job-londonderry-nh-nh-us-175153381.aspx?mescoid=4300746001001&jobPosition=20,,,52fda4468b9a3d00a36f5787116bfa64
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:14:56:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client is a boutique investment research firm that is located in Melville New York. They specialize in the analysis of consumer products, real estate and retail companies. The company is seeking a Senior Financial Analyst to join their rapidly growing team. This role would be ideal for a Long Island resident who is commuting to NYC working for a Hedge Fund, an investment bank doing equity or debt research. The firm has been in business for over 15 + years offers stability, quality of life, strong benefits and the ability to advance your career.The responsibilities will include: Manage a portfolio of companies and analyzing the financial statements, balance sheet, and cash flow statements, also provide trend and margin analysis. The analysis will include a deep dive into business trends and unique aspects about the company. In addition to company trend analysis, this role will also require industry analysis and industry trends. Some of the industry trends will detail emerging opportunities as well as trends that may be peaking. Write in depth unbiased research reports to provide client with actionable data that can assist them in running the day to day business and make longer term decisions. Qualifications include5+ years’ experience as a financial analystFinance, Economics degree and an MBA would be preferred but not required Strong written and communications skillsIf you are interested in the Senior Financial Analyst role located in Melville New York or for consideration to other roles Parker and Lynch is engaged. Please email steven.macri@parkerlynch.com ",Senior Financial Analyst Job in Melville,Full Time Employee,"Melville, NY 11747",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-financial-analyst-job-melville-ny-us-174737063.aspx?mescoid=1300108001001&jobPosition=3,"130,000.00 - 175,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c1e2e7428dc759d23e2e377982f1ea19
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:14:57:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is looking for an individual for a contract Partnership Tax Accountant job in Chicago, IL.  You must have a Bachelor’s Degree in Accounting.   You must also have experience with preparing and researching partnership tax returns. Partnership Tax Accountant Job Responsibilities: Research compliance for 20 fundsTax research and special projectsTax research for new acquisitions1st level review for specific accounts that are outsourcedReview and plan the tax calendar  Requirements: Bachelor’s Degree in AccountingCPA preferred, but not requiredExperience with Microsoft Excel skillsMinimum of two years’ tax experienceExperience with Partnership Tax Returns  If you are interested in this contract Partnership Tax Accountant job in Chicago, IL or other accounting opportunities then click “apply” below and apply online at www.accountingprincipals.com.   ;",Partnership Tax Accountant Job in Chicago,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Chicago, IL 60603",,http://jobview.monster.com/partnership-tax-accountant-job-chicago-il-us-173491583.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=13,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,bfb68037671070a675747878a7a61a1a
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:15:48:37,No,jobs.monster.com," Our client one of the area’s largest employers located in Melville New York is seeking a staff accountant. This Long Island based company that is very profitable and rapidly expanding is seeking to fill a staff accountant to join its team. This position will offer tremendous room for advancement as the company has doubled in size over the past 5 years. This role will report to the assistant controller and controller, thus it is a highly visible role within the organization.The responsibilities will include:• Assist with the preparation of financial statements and assist with the month end close • Detailed revenue and expense analysis• Prepare bank reconciliations for multiple entities•Prepare journal entries • Prepare balance sheet analysis for senior management to make actionable decisions.• Assist in sales tax filings• Special projects as requestedStrong excel skills are required and an accounting degree is preferred. If you are interested in this staff accountant role based in Melville New York or for consideration to other roles Parker and Lynch is engaged. Please email steven.macri@parkerlynch.com ",Staff Accountant Job in Melville,Full Time Employee,"Melville, NY 11747",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-melville-ny-us-173556925.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=7,"50,000.00 - 65,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,d671bdc048a5d42431a49dd64aa20e60
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:15:49:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"At the beginning of your accounting career, everyone is looking for that perfect job with one of the top companies in Chicago.  Here is your chance to be a part of a Fortune 500 company that is still growing rapidly and treats their employees with a great deal of respect!  They are looking for a staff accountant to join their growing finance team, which is centrally located in Chicago.  As one of the top rated companies to work for, they have low turnover and tremendous growth potential.   You will be responsible for compiling and analyzing financial information to prepare entries to general ledger accounts; reconciling and preparing accounting schedules, participating in P&L research and complex bank reconciliations. You must have 1-3 years’ experience relevant experience and a Bachelor’s degree in Accounting. They offer an incredible benefit package, 18 PTO days, generous 401k match and pension contribution, and health club on site, tuition reimbursement and much more!! Interested candidates should submit their resume directly to Marla.Lampert@parkerlynch.com ",Staff Accountant Job in Deerfield,Full Time Employee,"Deerfield, IL 60015",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-deerfield-il-us-172850345.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=17,"5,000.00 - 58,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1a9eb9ca615a0d015145453b8d9715f2
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:16:03:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"System One is currently seeking a Recruiter for a 3-month contract assignment located in Juno Beach, FL.  LOCAL candidates only. Job Purpose:Under general supervision, performs the professional/technical and non- technical recruiting activities (sourcing, screening, and interviewing) while complying with organizational policies and government regulatory guidelines.Implement the corporate college relations, recruitment and high school development programs to establish an ongoing supply of recent college graduates and to develop a partnership with local high schools. Primary (Essential) Job Functions (This list is not exhaustive and may be supplemented as necessary by the company.):Perform professional/technical and non-technical recruiting activities by identifying, negotiating and providing accurate job descriptions to search firms, interacting with candidates, organizing interviews, extending job offers, etc.Develop tracking and applicant flow process.Interact with search firms and employment agencies, and place advertisements in appropriate newspapers, trade journals, and other publications.Maintain college and high school relations by coordinating all related activities in a way which produces the best exposure and recognition from the administration department, faculty, students, and placement officers.Coordinate a variety of employment/recruitment activities with the area human resource officer in order to ensure consistency of interpretation of corporate recruitment policies, application and internal placement processes.Provide daily advice and interpretation to managers and supervisors as well as to outside applicants to make sure that federal, state, and corporate policies are administered in a consistent and fair way.Ability to meet attendance requirements.Ability to work extended hours. Required Minimum Qualifications:Bachelor degree in Human Resources, related field of study, or equivalent work experience3+ years of experience in exempt and on- exempt staffing Preferred Qualifications:Completion of SPHR (Senior Professional Human Resources) or PHR (Professional Human Resources) certification.Ability to work with multi-functional areas.Self-starter that takes actions without instructions.Ability to gain the confidence of all levels of management through high standards of performance.Excellent knowledge of HR operations and administrations.Excellent planning, time management, communication, decision-making, organization, and interpersonal skills.High standard of integrity and reliability.",Recruiter Job in Juno Beach,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Juno Beach, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-job-juno-beach-fl-us-175124820.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=11,,Human Resources,342b6f61e6d8af1ce1ec66499a69e708
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:16:22:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking candidates for a Bookkeeper Job in the Boca Raton area. If you are looking for a great opportunity with a client that goes out of its way to provide a healthy corporate culture then this job is for you. This client is in the Real Estate industry and has been in business for a healthy amount of time. The management staff are all down to earth and are very flexible with employee's schedules, so a lot of work-life balance here! Responsibilities include: Bookkeeping / accounting backgroundQuickBooks knowledge; Enter daily transactions for multiple entitiesBasic understanding of Balance Sheet / Profit & Loss Statement – guideline for creating and maintaining Work Papers to support all transactionsQuickBooks payroll knowledge; Enter payrollResponsible for maintaining numerous Excel spreadsheets  Required Qualifications: Experience in real estate/constructionExcel skills Quickbooks experiencePersonality is key (fun atmosphere)  To learn more about this position or other positions we may have please apply or reach out directly to garret.lemon@parkerlynch.com",Bookkeeper Job (Great Culture) Job in Boca Raton,Full Time Employee,"Boca Raton, FL 33486",,http://jobview.monster.com/bookkeeper-job-great-culture-job-boca-raton-fl-us-173712840.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=2,"45,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,fdc62e32c2f2ad3ffcc4e0732fa075ca
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:16:48:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Revenue Accountant Our client in the professional services industry is looking to hire a Revenue Accountant in their office in West Los Angeles. This individual will report to the Director of Credit & Collections and will be responsible for various AR functions and be the main point of contact for AR related issues. Our client provides great work-life balance and excellent benefits. Job Responsibilities:• Research, track and resolve issues in all AR areas• Ensure timely accurate engagement billing and direct billing expense• Credit memo processing• Manual journal entries and correcting invoices• Customer creation and maintenance• Ad-hoc assignments Requirements:• Bachelor’s degree in business• 3+ years of AR/Revenue experience• Excellent communication skills ",Revenue Accountant Job in Los Angeles,Full Time Employee,"Los Angeles, CA 90024",,http://jobview.monster.com/revenue-accountant-job-los-angeles-ca-us-173448685.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=15,"50,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,5b80af88172d1a53b59dc5f1ef74e165
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:16:49:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Title: HR ManagerLocation: Frederick, MDDuration: Temp to HireStart Date: ASAPPay:  Starting at $65,000 but is negotiable based on experienceReports to: Practice Manager, Owner(s)Schedule: Full Time (five, 8-hour days; may include some flex scheduling to include eveing and/or weekend coverage)We are seeking an HR Manager who will be responsible for all human resources functions of a growing 24/7, 365 day a year veterinary hospital. This candidate will be a “hands on” manager who has experience in all facets of Human Resources. The candidate maintain handbook and augment as necessary with policies to align with hospital needs. Maintain employee records with all necessary documentation. Have a proven track record of projects from inception through completion and implementation. Provide documentation and advise owners and team leaders on applicable law and regulations for a practice of 50+ employees. Working in conjunction with the Practice Manager the candidate must be able to effectively and proactively manage, delegate or perform the following.Essential Functions:Follow and uphold established proven processes, protocol and policiesProvide payroll support/back up to payroll administratorHealth insurance & retirement benefits– 401(k), health, dental, vision insurance, short term disability Develop and institute employee incentive programsAdminister professional development and continuing education programs for staff on all levelsImplementation and utilization of computer based programs (scheduling, on-boarding)A professional who is able to set and uphold firm boundaries with staffCreative problem solver, with ability to research and present solutionsStrong recruiting skills and ability to develop and execute “outside the box” hiring campaigns SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:HR CoordinatorJOB REQUIREMENTS:Excellent written and oral communication skillsExhibit leadership and organizational confidence and ability to present information to large and small groupsTech savvy is preferredAdvanced training and certification in HR is strongly preferredBachelor’s degree requiredMinimum five-seven years experience in an HR management positionLevel One Personnel is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or other status protected by law. Report","Level One Personnel Job Application for HR Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Job Title: HR ManagerLocation: Frederick, MDDuration: Temp to HireStart Date: ASAPPay:  Starting at $65,000 but is negotiable based on experienceReports to: Practice Manager, Owner(s)Schedule: Full Time (five, 8-hour days; may include some flex scheduling to include eveing and/or weekend coverage)We are seeking an HR Manager who will be responsible for all human resources functions of a growing 24/7, 365 day a year veterinary hospital. This candidate will be a “hands on” manager who has experience in all facets of Human Resources. The candidate maintain handbook and augment as necessary with policies to align with hospital needs. Maintain employee records with all necessary documentation. Have a proven track record of projects from inception through completion and implementation. Provide documentation and advise owners and team leaders on applicable law and regulations for a practice of 50+ employees. Working in conjunction with the Practice Manager the candidate must be able to effectively and proactively manage, delegate or perform the following.Essential Functions:Follow and uphold established proven processes, protocol and policiesProvide payroll support/back up to payroll administratorHealth insurance & retirement benefits– 401(k), health, dental, vision insurance, short term disability Develop and institute employee incentive programsAdminister professional development and continuing education programs for staff on all levelsImplementation and utilization of computer based programs (scheduling, on-boarding)A professional who is able to set and uphold firm boundaries with staffCreative problem solver, with ability to research and present solutionsStrong recruiting skills and ability to develop and execute “outside the box” hiring campaigns SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:HR CoordinatorJOB REQUIREMENTS:Excellent written and oral communication skillsExhibit leadership and organizational confidence and ability to present information to large and small groupsTech savvy is preferredAdvanced training and certification in HR is strongly preferredBachelor’s degree requiredMinimum five-seven years experience in an HR management positionLevel One Personnel is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or other status protected by law.",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-manager-job-frederick-md-us-172658645.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=15,,,a157c8c0a0cf52c1b10da12f0bc8a655
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:17:48:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Execupay, an industry leader in Payroll & HR technology, is looking for excited and motivated professionals who are good with numbers and have great customer service & communication skills to process payroll for small and medium sized businesses. Learn more about Execupay at www.execupay.com. If you thrive in a fast paced and ever changing environment, embrace solving client challenges, and like to work hard, have fun, and help small businesses, this position might be a great fit for you.  Your Role Accurately and timely process multi-state payrolls for 80 to 150 clients with payroll schedules on a weekly, bi-weekly, semi-monthly, or monthly basis.    Maintains a high rate of client retention through quality service, meeting and exceeding client expectations, building rapport/relationships and delivering an exceptional client experience.  Your Requirements:  High School Diploma or GED requiredMust have customer service experienceStrong phone presence and excellent communication skillsMust have strong organizational, time management, and prioritization abilitiesPayroll processing experience is a plus Your Benefits Employer Paid Medical InsuranceEmployer Paid Long-Term DisabilityEmployer Paid Short-Term DisabilityEmployer Paid Employee Life Insurance401k + Employer MatchVision InsuranceDental InsuranceSupplemental InsuranceEmployee Wellness ProgramFlexible Spending Accounts (FSA)Health Reimbursement Account (HRA)Paid HolidaysPaid Time Off  Report","Execupay Job Application for Payroll Specialist | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":",,Contact name Emma Pelham,All,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-specialist-job-san-antonio-tx-us-174901982.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=17,,,7104d0f0dccad06098dd9db59e03236d
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:17:49:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Construction Service Company in search for an IMMEDIATE Prevailing Wage Payroll Assistant with HR experience. Necessary skills and experience to be successful in this company:* Full charge Payroll processing - Prevailing Wage* Understanding of State and Federal laws pertaining to sick leave, FMLA and payroll.* Working experience in MS Office Outlook, Word, Excel * SAGE software experience is a HUGE PLUS for Cost Accounting* 1 year of experience in Construction industry. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1087342 Job Experience:,,Years of Experience Required:",PAYROLL/HR Assistant for CONSTRUCTION Company $,Full Time Employee,"Escondido, CA 92029",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-hr-assistant-for-construction-company-47-840-job-escondido-ca-us-175281515.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e2ccf18ebe29f00484e9c765949ffd64
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:18:53:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Payroll & Kronos System Administrator – Seattle, WA (Corporate Office) Do you like to analyze systems? Do you like building reports to create business efficiencies? Have you worked with Kronos, ADP platforms, and other benefit platforms? Then this is the job for you! Leisure Care has been in business for 40 years and we know that our employees make us strong.  We are currently seeking a Payroll and Kronos System Administrator to join the corporate office. Leisure Care’s unique philosophy of Five-Star Fun has made us one of the most desirable companies to work for and it has never been a more exciting time to join our team! The ideal candidate will have the ability to: Train and develop platform processes for all end users. Create effective tools and reports to ensure best practices. Support all testing of systems and process upgrades to all HR/Payroll/ACA platforms. Lead projects related to timekeeping, payroll functions, and HR/financial audits. Serve as a payroll backup.     Potential applicants must have excellent excel and report writing skills; experience with ADP products a plus. Strong knowledge of payroll systems, the ability to multi-task, be a team-player, attention to detail and exceptional analytical skills are required. Qualified candidates will have 5+ years of payroll work experience or Bachelor’s degree in a related field, or an equivalent combination of education and work experience. We offer an excellent wage and benefits package.  If you have a strong desire to apply for a fun and rewarding job, please apply today!     www.leisurecare.com Leisure Care is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Drug Free Company.   Click Here To Applyhttps://leisurecare.mua.hrdepartment.com/pm_module/cgi-bin/click.cgi?job_id=725&site_id=35",Payroll & Kronos System Administrator Job in Seattle,Full Time,"Seattle, WA 98104",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-kronos-system-administrator-job-seattle-wa-us-175279285.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c76d844574916c6dc7bc78c441202201
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:18:53:32,No,jobs.monster.com,".Addeco is assisting a local company in a search for a HR/PR Generalist & Accountant located in Hudson Valley Area. This is a direct hire and the client is looking for a candidate with 5 to 7 years of experience in both HR and Payroll. Must have excellent math skills and be detail oriented. Required SkillsMust be proficient in Web based payroll and Microsoft office Suite.Skilled in Paylocity Webpay is a plusExcellent communication skillsSkilled at supporting a Controller or Senior Accountant.Proficient in Expense reports, invoicing and collections.If this is a position you would like to learn more about, please call me at 631-844-7511 or email me at karen.thompson@adeccona.com Apply Online",HR/PR Job in Poughkeepsie,Employee,"Poughkeepsie, NY 12601",,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-pr-job-poughkeepsie-ny-us-174949671.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=11,,Human Resources,a9f8d028dac5554aaa71d3ca93c48adb
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:18:56:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Leading Financial Services Firm seeking an HRIS Associate with Workday experience. Must have at least 3-5 years of experience rolling out and implementing Workday.Client DetailsEstablished Financial Services Institution.DescriptionJob ResponsibilitiesImplement, upgrade, support and maintain HR systemsEnsure proper design, configuration and documentation of system change requestsConduct needs analysis and gather feedback on processes to identify potential system enhancementsConsider downstream impact of system changes and ensure appropriate communications are delivered to relevant groupsConduct system testing, ensuring changes reflect the requirements outlined in the specification and preparing testing notes/documentationDesign, recommend, configure and maintain business processes that streamline work, ensure compliance with relevant procedures, define clear accountability and create efficienciesParticipate in the regular review and prioritization of HR systems configuration projectsIdentify opportunities for improving the effectiveness of processes, systems, and reportsDevelop, maintain and ensure accuracy of a set of standard queries and reports for end users to run, suggest new reports as needed, develop adhoc reports in response to specific data requestsAssists in the development and maintenance of HR dashboards in the HRIS system to help influence and drive strategy, automating the delivery where possibleDocument internal processes and audit procedures to ensure data integrity within systemsRespond to inquiries from HR and employees on functionality related questions and issues ProfileDesirable CandidatesBachelor's degree4-6 years' experience configuring and implementing HRIS- Workday experience requiredRequires strong analytical skills with a good understanding and working knowledge of Human Resources operationsExcellent time management, task prioritization, communication, and documentation skillsAbility to work in a fast-paced financial services environmentAbility to handle confidential material in a professional mannerAbility to prioritize and multi task multiple responsibilitiesMust show initiative, be innovative and a team playerDetail-oriented individual who demonstrates a high level of accuracyJob OfferLeading Financial Services Firm, excellent Benefits, 401k",HRIS Associate Job in Stamford,"Full Time , Employee","Stamford, CT",,http://jobview.monster.com/hris-associate-job-stamford-ct-us-174944445.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,,,ec3099a8f7f099585ef1132607da4dc0
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:18:58:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time Accounts Receivable Job in San Diego, CA Are you struggling to find an opportunity that will allow you to have the work-life balance you have been dreaming of? Accounting Principals is working with a law firm that is located in Carlsbad, and they are searching for an Accountant who can assist with needs on a part-time basis. This is an incredible opportunity to gain experience with a company that is well-known in the legal field, while having a say on what your schedule will look like. This is a temporary to direct hire opportunity, and the pay will be up to $20 per hour, depending one experience. Responsibilities include: - Preparing bank reconciliations- Preparing month end reporting and journal entries- Monitoring AR Aging to coordinate collections efforts Qualifications:- At least two years of experience in an AR capacity- Proficient in Microsoft Excel- QuickBooks experience is required - Timeslips experience is a plus- Excellent attention to detail  If you are interested in a Part-Time Accounts Receivable Job in San Diego, CA then please click “apply now” or e-mail your résumé to Nicolette.Miller@accountingprincipals.com  To view our other opportunities in the Greater San Diego area, please visit our website at www.ajilonccountingprincipals.com.  ;",Part-Time Accounts Receivable Job in San Diego,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Carlsbad, CA 92009",,http://jobview.monster.com/part-time-accounts-receivable-job-in-san-diego-ca-job-carlsbad-ca-us-174903523.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=17,0.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ea5b03ff8ee2e9ce8f102cccd2a7f475
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:19:44:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Financial Analyst Job in New York City, NYC Fortune 500, publicly traded company has an immediate Staff Accountant Job in New York City. This is an excellent opportunity to join an organization that offers great benefits, training and the ability for promotion within multiple divisions of this international conglomerate. The Staff Accountant provides accounting and financial analysis to business unit leaders and senior leadership, assisting with accounting, reporting, forecasting and analysis.  This is a direct hire opportunity that pays up to $75,000. If you would like to immediately be considered for this role, please email your resume to brandon.smith@parkerlynch.com Staff Accountant Job Responsibilities: Assist with monthly, quarterly and annual close activities, which include preparation of journal entries, revenue recognition, capitalization and depreciation of assets, account reconciliations and producing GAAP financialsPreparation of the General Ledger, journal entries and reconciliations for month-end closeMonthly financial statement analysis and reporting of budget to actual variancesPreparation of a monthly account analysis of balance sheet and income statement accountsBook various revenue and expense accruals in conformance with GAAP & corporate policyPerform various analytics at month end involving P&L and balance sheet actuals vs. budget.  Staff Accountant Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in accounting1+ year in accounting or auditing; public accounting experience preferred.Team player with a positive attitude towards contributing and learning.Knowledge in the areas of financial statement preparation, GAAP, SOX, and revenue recognition.Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.Detail oriented with excellent organizational skills and deadline driven.   If you would like to immediately be considered for this role, please email your resume to brandon.smith@parkerlynch.com  ",Staff Accountant Job New York NYC Job in New York,Full Time Employee,"New York, NY 10017",,http://jobview.monster.com/staff-accountant-job-new-york-nyc-job-new-york-ny-us-174909577.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=4,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,073d825e3197b1df41c8b72cb28216c1
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:19:45:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"As Senior Manager - Sales you will build and grow your book of business by leading the Region in delivering the growth goals identified by the company for their core Strategic Staffing business –Provide effective and energetic leadership to the Business Unit to drive sales, maintain and increase profit, margin, and customer satisfaction. This position will report to the Director, Sales. The work culture is built on transparency, collaboration and high performance, yet entrepreneurial.   ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS Evaluate and manage new initiatives and business opportunities. Manage the end-to-end sales process for all opportunities including initial client communication, on-site presentations, RFI response, multi-day client workshops, RFP submission, negotiation and deal signing. The candidate is the focal point for all communication and sales activities with prospects and customers. Providing day-to-day leadership and direction to the Business Unit members in maintaining and expanding customer relationships and meeting revenue and margin goals within the business unit. Collaborate peers and units in sharing business knowledge to create a winning environment Establishes and maintains a consistent corporate image through promotional materials, and events. Directs sales forecasting activities and sets performance goals accordingly. Mentor Account Managers and direct their day to day activities. Directs staffing, training, and performance evaluations to develop and control sales and marketing programs. Fosters close, cooperative relationships with peer leaders, sales management, and sales and support personnel. Meet or exceed your quarterly and annual targets. Build and Develop professional relationships with key executive stakeholders within your client accounts. Assist in prospecting, developing, and closing new account sales. Actively extract and distill market-feedback: Identify client technical & business requirements and work with internal teams to help to scope and present solutions Attend events and network ",Sales Manager- Staffing Solutions Job in Mountain View,,"Mountain View, CA 94043",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-manager-staffing-solutions-job-mountain-view-ca-us-175199779.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=14,,Human Resources,c67dfb8352e5e6dc6461043d083e69c2
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:19:54:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"A growing pharmaceutical company is looking for an Accounting Manager. This position will work closely with upper management to report all the monthly accounting related to revenue and expenses  Responsibilities:  Responsible for month end close, prepare journal entries and present work to senior management as it relates to the Revenue and related expense   Assist in budgeting and related projects  Prepare audit schedules and interact with auditors  Supervise Staff Accountants   Responsible for financial statement reporting to Corporate   Manage Reporting and industry profitability   Preferred Experience:  5-7 years of general accounting and related experience in a pharmaceutical company and/or public accounting.Revenue and expense accounting experience a plus; Gross to Net Reporting a plusLarge Corporate experience BA in Accounting, CPA a plus   SAP experience a plus   Proficiency with GL software, Excel and Word   Excellent benefits and great working environment. Terrific company to contribute to the growth of the company and to be part of the team.     ",Accounting Manager job with a Pharmaceutical Company Job in Clifton,Full Time Employee,"Clifton, NJ 07011",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-job-with-a-pharmaceutical-company-job-clifton-nj-us-173556799.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=10,"110,000.00 - 125,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1e074154164b360f0190cea4aa772620
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:20:27:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Temporary Payroll Associate Job in West Chester Accounting Principals is partnering with a client in West Chester that is looking for a temporary payroll associate to join their team. This payroll associate will collaborate with other payroll team members for the responsibility of Time Keeping administration, daily imports into Kronos, employment verifications and assisting with payroll tasks. Job Duties: • Administer daily import of time files into Kronos.• Review Kronos for time keeping discrepancies.• Work with management, as needed, across companies on time keeping related issues.• Populated Kronos related fields in ADP.  • Administer personality and accrual balance imports into Kronos as needed• Complete employment verifications within specified time frame.• Will be cross trained on several payroll tasks to provide needed support for processing payroll. Requirements: • Associates degree in Business, Accounting, or related degree.• At least 3 years experience with time keeping and payroll preferred.• Candidates with Kronos and ADP systems experience with be preferred• Working knowledge of Microsoft Windows, Excel, and Word is required.• Ability to maintain a high level of confidentiality.• Must be a team player and have the ability to work independently.• Possess strong communication, problem solving, and organizational skills.• Solid work ethic  If you or anyone you know is qualified and interested in learning more about this great Direct Hire opportunity, please send me your resume directly at christopher.riley@accountingprincipals.com or apply directly at www.accountingprincipals.com  ;",Payroll Associate Job in West Chester,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"West Chester, OH 45069",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-associate-job-in-west-chester-oh-job-west-chester-oh-us-174956800.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=6,,Human Resources,a8f12a79a9a7f26e4d3f1af6bf803479
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:20:57:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you interested in becoming a part of a unique, hard working team in a fast-growing industry? Are you great at multi-tasking, organized, and willing to take initiative? Then we want to talk to you! Our client in Walnut Creek, CA, is looking to add an Accounting Assistant to their fun and energetic team! You will assist with accounts payable, accounts receivable, billing, payroll, and human resources. Your previous experience in an accounting department will be especially helpful, as you will be responsible for keeping track of the accounting cycle and the duties that accompany each quarter. You can make up to $50k annual salary, depending on your level of experience, and you will be able to participate in some great perks including tuition reimbursement, an in-house gym, competitive PTO, and much more!  As the Accounting Assistant, you will: Process invoices Assist the Controller and CFO with AP, AR, Billing, and Payroll duties Assist with month- and year-end close processesSupport sales, marketing and other departments as neededAssist HR with benefits enrollment  About you: You have at least one (1) year of experience as an Accounting Clerk, Accounting Assistant, or Office Manager in a fast-paced, hands-on environmentYou're familiar with basic accounting procedures as they relate to month- and year-end close You have experience with timekeeping as it relates to payroll and Human Resources You're excellent at multi-tasking and have been acknowledged for your willingness to take initiative You're proficient with MS Office Suite, including PowerPoint, Word, Outlook, and especially Excel  Interested in learning more about this Accounting Assistant position in Walnut Creek, CA? Submit your resume to www.AccountingPrincipals.com today!",Accounting Assistant Job - Walnut Creek,Full Time Employee,"Walnut Creek, CA 94598",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-assistant-job-walnut-creek-ca-job-walnut-creek-ca-us-174972258.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=17,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,c76fcd7b50083f5dce7d8447e9288280
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:20:58:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Known for high-quality products and exceptional service, this very strong and well respected manufacturing company is in need of an established accountant for the Senior Accountant Job, in Schaumburg, IL.  If you have a minimum of two years of experience in a similar role with a manufacturing company this is the job for you. You will be responsible for various GL account reconciliations, journal entries, inventory, and other month end closing processes. In this role, you will work closely with the accounting team and managers. The company offers excellent benefits, a friendly work environment, and a great team to work with.  Your Job Responsibilities:Prepare journal entries Process improvementsPrepare monthly balance sheet and sales account reconciliations Prepare schedules and financial analyses monthly/quarterlyPrepare ad-hoc reporting and analysis as requested Requirements:Degreed in Accounting or FinanceCPA /MBA+Two + years of experienceManufacturing or public accounting experienceHard worker with process improvementAdvanced Excel skillsLarge ERP is a plus they use JDE and PeopleSoftStrong communication To apply for the Senior Accountant Job in Schaumburg, IL please send your resume in a Word document to Alexis.Bokos@parkerlynch.com for immediate consideration.",Senior Accountant Job in Schaumburg,Full Time Employee,"Schaumburg, IL 60173",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-accountant-job-schaumburg-il-us-173979215.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=10,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,749b955a543ec62ecd8faa6126a1effe
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:21:46:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Landscaping company in Stow is seeking a full time Payroll/Data Entry candidate. Mon-Fri 830a-5p. $18 or negotiable to begin.DUTIES & ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS·               Manages payroll process and complete payroll for all staff·               Daily data entry responsibilities·               Records and reconciles payroll prior to transmission and validates confirmed reports·               Process correct garnishments/support orders·               Year-end reporting, including W-2·               Responsible for confidential information, keeping information under lock and key·               Ensures tax laws are recognized followed and applied·               Processing approved contracts·               Provides support for other divisions·               Assist Management with special projectsOTHER FUNCTIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES·               Displays strong time management skills·               Provides cross coverage for other staff members as needed·               Maintains required timely processing of the volume of data without decreasing accuracy·               This position requires great attention to detail and ability to think and not just ""do""·               Maintain detailed and organized filesREQUIRED LICENSES/CERTIFICATIONS·               Accounting degree preferred PAY AND COMPENSATION·               $18 and up (depending experience)Please send your resume to ppompeo @employtemps.comEmploy-Temps Staffing Services540 Graham RdCuyahoga Falls, OH 44221330-923-9243 (WAGE)Visit our website for a complete listing of available positions  www.employtemps.com Report","Employ-Temps Staffing Service Job Application for Payroll Clerk | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Philicia Pompeo Phone 330-923-9243 (WAGE) Fax 330-923-9145 Address 540 Graham RdCuyahoga Falls, OH 44221",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-clerk-job-stow-oh-us-175258817.aspx?mescoid=4300702001001&jobPosition=12,,,7d4f50e41e3f28ef9d1a3a1f972c116c
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:21:46:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We are actively hiring a Human Resources/Account Coordinator for our Maryville, TN office. As a Life Style Staffing Human ResourcesAccount Coordinator you will recruit, interview, evaluate candidates looking for employment. This role requires strong skills in leadership, relationship building and critical thinking to effectively recruit qualified candidates. This unique career offers independence, a positive environment and unlimited earning potential. This is a full-time, internal, direct hire position with Life Style Staffing.Duties:Maintain communication with candidates and clients to keep them up to date and informedPerform searches for qualified candidates using computer databases, networking, internet recruiting resources, media, and employee referralsOversee current employee attendance and performance; provide corrective actions as neededWork with our clients to monitor their staffing needs and project future staffing levels; conduct site visits at clients as neededPerform interviews with potential candidate and assess applicants' relevant knowledge, skills, soft skills, experience and aptitudes, and conduct all necessary background checks/reference checksDocument all applicant and client information correctly into databasePrepare and extend offers to select candidatesDesired Skills:Must thrive in fast pace environment and be a strong multi-taskerOperate with professional and confidential mannerismEmploy high levels of integrityDemonstrate superior communication, problem solving and time management skillsRequirements:Bachelor's Degree requiredExperience with Microsoft Office programs (Word, Excel, Outlook)Previous customer service or human resources experience desired Report","Life Style Staffing Job Application for Human Resources/Account Coordinator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Gina Bounds Address Maryville, TN 37801",,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-account-coordinator-job-maryville-tn-us-175271637.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=14,,,dec8b269f42dbdf526841073dfae09ef
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:22:54:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Controller job near Saukville, WI available with growing service / distribution company. Ideal candidate will possess an entrepreneurial spirit and a do whatever it takes type attitude, as company is looking for someone that will eventually want to have a “vested” interest in the company. The Controller will be the head of the Finance department and also partner with ownership in the strategic direction of the company, along with assisting in cash management and raising capital for expansion. For immediate consideration, email your resume to Dan.Hartmann@parkerlynch.com   Principal Duties and Responsibilities This list of duties and responsibilities is not all inclusive and may be expanded to include other duties and responsibilities, as management may deem necessary from time to time. Responsibilities include: • Oversees the functional areas of General Ledger Accounting, Accounts Payable, and Tax Reporting. • Directs and manages accounting personnel on a daily basis. Maintains a thorough understanding of the job responsibilities of each staff member and makes necessary recommendations for process changes and improvements. • Establishes and maintains policies, procedures, and practices relating to the management of all accounting functions including accounts payable, accounts receivable, billing, and general ledger. • Plans and directs the timely preparation and reporting of monthly financial results of operations in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, federal and state regulations and in accordance with financial reporting standards within the real estate and development industry. • Prepares the annual departmental budget and manages budget within its operational constraints. • Develops, implements and monitors a system of internal control processes and procedures to ensure the integrity of all fiscal functions. • Monitors, evaluates and advises on the fiscal performance of Company compared to budget and forecast. • Works with the President, on an as needed basis, to evaluate on the financial impact of long range planning, the introduction of new programs and business strategies as well as federal and state regulatory changes. • Optimizes appropriate fiscal strategies to enhance cash flow. • Develops a reliable cash flow projection process ensuring minimum cash availability to meet operating needs for Company.  Supervisory Duties and Responsibilities Supervises accounting personnel; is responsible for the overall direction, coordination and evaluation of the Accounting department. The Controller will carry out supervisory responsibilities in accordance with the Company’s policies, procedures, and applicable laws. Responsibilities include interviewing, hiring and training employees; planning, assigning and directing work; appraising performance; rewarding and disciplining employees; addressing complaints and resolving problems.  Work Relationships and Scope: Reports directly to the President & COO. Due to the nature of the position, the Controller works closely with all levels of the Company. The Controller must maintain effective and professional working relationships with the company’s management team.  Knowledge, Skills & Abilities • Bachelor’s degree in Accounting or Finance required; CPA is preferred. • A minimum of 8 years of related accounting/financial experience. • A well organized and self-directed individual who is disciplined in oversight of details and possess a “big picture” perspective with enthusiasm to initiate change where needed. • Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical information and deal with several abstract and concrete variables. • Ability to analyze and interpret financial reports and legal documents. Ability to respond to common inquiries or complaints from employee or regulatory agencies. Ability to write reports and business correspondence. Ability to effectively present information to top management and/or management board. • Proficient knowledge of Microsoft Office and Windows application and accounting software preferably Microsoft Dynamics.  For immediate consideration for this Controller job on the north side of Milwaukee, WI just email a Word Document of your resume to Dan Hartmann at Dan.Hartmann@parkerlynch.com or apply below. Local candidates highly preferred.  ",Controller Job in Saukville,Full Time Employee,"Saukville, WI 53080",,http://jobview.monster.com/controller-job-saukville-wi-us-173781761.aspx?mescoid=1100013001001&jobPosition=20,"80,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",Accounting/Finance/Insurance,8f6b7c70502a7e0ae946e72fc146d409
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:22:55:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job ProLogistix Search Group - a division of EmployBridge - is seeking a Direct Hire Recruiter. This person could work out of the Dallas, TX office, or Raleigh NC office. Ideal candidates are motivated individuals with previous experience working in a warehouse environment looking to start a career as a Direct Hire Recruiter. This position provides services to the logistics sector of our business. If you are a self-starter with the ability to thrive in a dynamic and fast-paced environment, a passion for delivering exceptional customer service, and the desire to join an outstanding team of staffing industry professionals, then we would love to hear from you!Job Responsibilities:*Identify qualified candidates through interviews and reference verification*Abide by all company policies including but not limited to fees, guarantees, client/candidate confidentiality, revenue sharing, candidate/client ownership and fair employment practices.*Consistently meet required activity volume and revenue production standards.*Track and report to management daily, weekly, monthly, quarterly activity and revenue production.*Participate in all training sessions and meetings scheduled.*Attract applicants by placing job advertisements to job boards, and creating referral-based candidate pools.Job Requirements:*Excellent communication skills*Strong organizational and follow-up skills*Ability to work independently and create own work*Enjoy communications via phone, Skype, and email*Problem solving skills*Professional presence and demeanor*Computer and Social media skills *Negotiation skillsAt EmployBridge, we value all of our employees and offer a competitive benefit package that includes medical and dental, short & long-term disability, and life insurance along with a Wellness Program, generous PTO structure, and a 401K plan.EmployBridge is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.www.employbridge.com Report","ProLogistix Job Application for Recruiter | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name ProLogistix,Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-job-dallas-tx-us-175201116.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=13,,,be2dbb8628358179e03bac29e952b010
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:22:55:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Attention HR Professionals! An exciting career opportunity is awaiting you at Federal-Mogul.We are seeking an experienced Human Resources Assistant to perform a variety of HR-related administrative functions to support our Smyrna Distribution Center. Essential Functions: Work closely with the HR staff to provide administrative support as needed on highly confidential human resource matters and special projects.Interact with employees to explain company personnel policies, procedures, and benefits. Maintain personnel information, track attendance, and update employment status changes in the HRIS system. Post job openings, gather resumes and applicant information, and schedule interviews.Maintain compliance with federal and state regulations concerning employment. Perform all miscellaneous Human Resources tasks as assigned.Skills and EducationAssociates Degree in Human Resources and/or Business Administration requiredMinimum 3 - 5 years of HR experience in an administrative roleExtensive working knowledge of ADP and Kronos software preferredDaily use of Microsoft office applications General knowledge of employment law",Human Resources Assistant Job in Smyrna,Full Time,"Smyrna, TN 37167",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/human-resources-assistant-job-smyrna-tn-us-175127154.aspx?mescoid=4300725001001&jobPosition=10,15.50 - 16.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),dcd232d5f1bcd9397e42a929022ba7c3
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:22:55:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounting Manager Job in San Francisco, CAWould you enjoy working for a nonprofit organization? Are you looking for a senior level role? Do you have Blackbaud software experience? Our client is looking for an impressive Accounting Manager that can assist with auditing team work and track reports. The ideal candidate will have the ability to work independently and with a high degree of accuracy. If you are looking to lead an accounting department for a well-known organization, apply today!   The Accounting Manager will:•Monitor collections and reconcile transactions•Audit credit card transactions•Comply with taxes and prep returns•Support month end balance The ideal Accounting Manager will have:•BA/BS degree•Minimum 4 years accounting experience•Strong entrepreneurial drive•Advanced MS Excel skills and Blackbaud experience If you feel that this position is a match, please submit your resume to us directly to Sara at sara.neuville@accountingprincipals.com For more open positions, visit the Accounting Principals website, www.accountingprincipals.com Thank you for taking the time to explore this opportunity!  ",Accounting Manager - NonProfit - San Francisco Job in San Francisco,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Francisco, CA 94104",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-manager-nonprofit-san-francisco-job-san-francisco-ca-us-174529917.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=2,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,1d382cc26e0085f29b09b2597811a126
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:23:12:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full Time Job Opportunity for Senior Cost Accountant in Middlesex County, NJ Our client is a premier manufacturing company and the leader in the cosmetic industry. They are seeking a Senior Cost Accountant to join their team. This is a great career opportunity for anyone who is interested in the manufacturing industry and a job that offers great work life balance and a truly amazing culture to work for.This role will be groomed in to a Manager position. The Cost Accountants primarily job responsibilities and duties include but are not limited to The daily review prior days closed work orders Calculate the overhead rate at beginning of year based on budget. Responsible for analyzing, reconciling and controlling inventory, cost, margins and productivityVerify costs where needed in the Bill of Material for both finished product and sub componentsContinuous process improvement (balance sheet risk, spending etc.)Communicate and explain manufacturing performance through P&L  To be considered for this position the ideal candidate must have 5-8 years of cost accounting experience preferably within the manufacturing environment A strong technical acumen (be able to perform system upgrades) Strong knowledge and understanding of ERP Systems (preferably SAP)Solid MS Office Experience (Expert with Excel)Understanding of standard costA Bachelor’s Degree is required.  To be considered for the full-time Senior Cost Accountant position in the Middlesex County, NJ or other opportunities, please contact Inga Yusufov at inga.yusufov@parkerlynch.com. The client is very eager to hire the right candidate, so don’t hesitate and email a Word format of your resume today!   ",Senior Cost Accountant Job in Edison,Full Time Employee,"Edison, NJ 08837",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-cost-accountant-job-edison-nj-us-172058543.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=11,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,bb11171908a33ab3b988c232a49e65fa
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:23:12:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis accelerates business growth and careers by intensely attracting, assessing and placing specialized expertise in IT, Finance & Accounting, and Engineering industries. We precisely deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. We also apply our expertise to provide a suite of proven workforce solutions that improve our clients' productivity, efficiency and cost containment. Experis is a dedicated business unit of ManpowerGroup a world leader in employment services for more than 60 years, and a recognized pioneer in the industry. Experis Engineering currently has an opening for a Recruiter within our internal team located in Southfield, MI or Grand Rapids, MI. The position will be responsible for identifying and retaining talent to further the success of our clients business goals.Are you interested? Please contact Bruce Rowles at bruce.rowles@experis.com or call at 614.210.2630Qualified recruiters will possess:6-12 months of recruiting experience for Professional related roles, such as:Technical rolesEngineering rolesProfessional rolesDocumented track record of exceeding business objectivesAdvanced interpersonal skillsExcellent written and verbal communication skillsCollaborative working styleHigh level of ambition and goal-orientationAbility to thrive in a high energy, metrics-driven environmentExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, disability, age, military or veteran status, and other characteristics protected under federal, state and local law. You can see it. More challenging work. A more interesting work environment. The opportunity to use your finely honed skills to make a real difference. And to collect pay that reflects your talent and expertise. If this is what you see for yourself, you need to talk to Experis. Through our reach and resources, Experis brings you career options that are unmatched. We've got the right opportunity.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Sr. Recruiter Job in Southfield,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Sr. Recruiter,"Southfield, MI 48075",http://jobview.monster.com/sr-recruiter-job-southfield-mi-us-175255223.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=4,,Human Resources,3264c90f36a129b18a58831039d2ae47
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:23:17:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Who We Are:Cogent is a transatlantic Tier 1 Internet service provider consistently ranked as one of the top 5 networks in the world and is publicly traded on the NASDAQ Stock Market under the ticker symbol CCOI. Cogent specializes in providing businesses with high speed Internet access and point-to-point transport services. Cogent's facilities-based, all-optical IP network backbone provides IP services in over 180 markets globally. Since its inception, Cogent has unleashed the benefits of IP technology, building one of the largest and highest capacity IP networks in the world. This network enables Cogent to offer large bandwidth connections at highly competitive prices.  Currently we are seeking a career oriented individual for an opportunity to be part of the in-house Recruiting team. Our recruiters work a full recruiting desk and handle the full life cycle of the recruiting process for all of their candidates. They work with executives and a team of Cogent sales managers to identify, screen, interview, present and hire qualified candidates. Responsibilities: ·         Develop recruiting strategies designed to identify both passive and active candidates. ·         Work with Sales Managers to identify target skill sets and key market segments.·         Evaluate candidates' strengths compared with sales manager’s requirements using psychological, behavioral and situational interviewing tactics.·         Complete necessary pre-employment processes including: candidate sales assessment, reference checks and background/drug tests. ·         Communicate with recruiting team by participating in recruiting best practices and providing accurate, thorough documentation on employees in applicant tracking systems or other documentation tools. ·         Maintain relationships with industry contacts to, gain industry knowledge, and build a referral network. ·         Present to Sales Management team on weekly conference calls and at large-scale meetings.·         Travel within North America on an as needed basis. Qualifications:·         Have a Bachelor's degree or related recruiting experience. ·         Have sales recruiting experience.·         Be available to work before/after typical office hours as work may demand. ·         Possess strong written and oral English communication skills. ·         Knowledge of Microsoft Office required.·         Have some familiarity with an applicant tracking system. ·         Ability to work to achieve an aggressive headcount goal.·         Capable of regularly using good judgment and discretion to accomplish goals and work requirements. ·         Be currently authorized to work in the United States for any employer. The chosen candidate will receive a competitive base salary, commission, and an exceptional benefits package including a comprehensive medical/dental/vision plan, a 401(k) plan, and vacation pay.  Cogent Communications is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Recruiter - Pasadena Job in Pasadena,Full Time Employee,"Pasadena, CA 91107",Telecommunications Services,http://jobview.monster.com/recruiter-pasadena-job-pasadena-ca-us-172319587.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=7,,Human Resources,bdf61976661e365f8f3c70772510318d
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:23:32:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Looking for a new career?  Do you have exceptional people skills, ability to multi-task, enjoy and thrive in a very fast-paced environment?  If so, we are recruiting for Corporate Recruiter position(s) located in the Capital Region.  These are excellent opportunities with well-established, growing companies!   Qualified candidates will possess:  Minimum of 3 years of full-cycle recruitment experienceHealthcare industry requiredHRIS experience preferredAbility to multi-task in a very busy environment Fusco Personnel has been a leading Recruiting Firm in the Capital Region since 1994.   Our success record speaks for itself! We specialize in executive searches, mid-level recruits, human resource consulting, as well as, temporary/contract and temp-to-hire staffing. There is never a fee to applicants. Fusco Personnel’s areas of expertise include information technology, finance, sales, human resources, accounting, engineering, bio-tech, clinical/non-clinical healthcare, and administrative/clerical personnel. Our superior service combined with our highly skilled bank of candidates set us apart from other firms.  Fusco Personnel is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer.  Recruiting Talent and Culture",Corporate Recruiter Job in Albany,Full Time Employee,"Albany, NY 12203",,http://jobview.monster.com/corporate-recruiter-job-albany-ny-us-175313256.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=2,,,60bd55eeaf9032daac4c4b04b6714441
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:23:50:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client in Staten Island has an immediately need to hire a permanent Accounts Payable Specialist to join their team.   The position reports to the Controller and involves all aspects of Accounts Payable - matching, batching, coding and processing checks as well as recording revenue.   Ideally looking for someone with solid QuickBooks skills   Looking low to mid $40,000's depending on experience.  For more details on this quick to hire permanent spot, please call Maureen at 732-623-8909 or email maureen.lillis@accountingprincipals.com",Accounts Payable Specialst in Staten Island,Full Time Employee,"Edison, NJ 08837",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-payable-specialst-in-staten-island-ny-job-edison-nj-us-174520139.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=3,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,27185e968449560385a4d5ad80ae6d43
United States of America,US,31/May/2016:23:51:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is looking for an individual for a contract to hire Accounting Analyst job in Chicago, IL. You must have five years of accounting experience. You must also have advanced computer software skills, including Microsoft Office. This individual will be responsible for the preparation of journal entries, the analysis of billings and credit card accounts and reconciliations. If you have the desire and ability to grow and learn quickly with a well-established company, apply now! Responsibilities:Compile and analyze financial information to prepare entries to accountsAssist in preparation of financial and operating reports including trial balances, adjustments and closing entriesReconcile credit card statementsPrepare and file the 1099Review general ledger activity regarding payables to ensure accuracy Prepare audit and tax schedules for periodic bank auditsPerform the processing and recording of accounts payable transactions and ensures that all invoices and employee reimbursements are paid accuratelyAssist in the analysis and interpretation of accounting records for use by managementMonitor inter-company and intra-company chargesPerform bank and general ledger reconciliationsAssist with the quarterly financial forecasting Requirements:Bachelor's degree in Accounting requiredThree years of accounting experienceAdvanced knowledge of Microsoft ExcelERP experience preferredBasic Knowledge of Generally Accepted Accounting PrinciplesDemonstrated experience as a valued team playerExcellent communication skills If you are interested in this position or other accounting opportunities then please click ""apply"" below and apply online at www.accountingprinciples.com.  ;",Accounting Analyst Job In Chicago,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Chicago, IL 60603",,http://jobview.monster.com/accounting-analyst-job-in-chicago-il-job-chicago-il-us-174242005.aspx?mescoid=1300101001001&jobPosition=1,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,d180e3a775611550c69a2b1686c533b3
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:00:58:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Vancouver  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Vancouver 98682,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-VANCOUVER-166742397.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=16,,General/Other: Medical/Health,78768c5df826c02e2c46d8048c130b28
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:00:59:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Supervises nursing service activities in assigned care unit for the duration of one shift and/or in the absence of the Head Nurse. Provides professional nursing care for patients in assigned care unit. Assesses, plans, evaluates, and documents the nursing process of assigned care unit as needed. NOTE: Incumbents in this position are not assigned to one particular care unit for extended periods of time. Does not include charge nurses assigned to specialty care areas.Job Requirements Education: a. BSN required. Experience a. Five (5) years of clinical nursing experience is preferred. b. Supervisory experience is preferred. Licensure/Certification: a. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license. b. CPR is required. Current specialty certification as required. Equipment/Skills: 1. Must possess advanced knowledge of general nursing theory and be able to apply the knowledge to complex problems. 2. Skill in supervision, teaching, organizing, counseling, problem solving, and critical thinking is required. 3. Familiarity with community/regional health needs and services is preferred. 4. Must have the ability to organize, coordinate, and direct; demonstrate judgement, diplomacy, assertiveness and initiative. 5. Must work well with others. 6. Flexibility in work hours to meet the needs of patients, physicians and staff. Working Conditions 1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods. 2. walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly. 3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies. 4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications. 5. Required to lift and move patients. 6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists. 7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area. There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.). 8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone. Other 1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department. 2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served. 3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities. 4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties. 5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate. 6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa. 7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN Charge Nurse,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Charge-Nurse-Day-Surgery-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644071.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,3b9b47fcd425014f1d576711b8e75119
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:01:45:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Manager of Information Security is responsible for working with and leading a team of Security Analysts to maintain a sound information security program. This role requires a combination of personnel management, project leadership, policy development, incident management, and security monitoring operations. The ideal candidate will be expected to have strong technical skills in this field as well as refined soft skills. Responsibilities include providing considered recommendations and technical mentoring on subjects ranging from alerts and events to the implementation and design of network devices, hosts, applications, and other IT infrastructure. This role includes an essential function in coordinating incident response efforts and ensuring stakeholders are informed in accordance with the Incident Response Plan. Ensuring all hardware and software systems are compliant with the corporate security policies and procedures. Manages daily reports of application and system logs to ensure all reported activity is justified.Manager of Information Security Essential Functions ·         Provide a security perspective and actively contribute to the management of a growing organization.·         Develops standards and procedures for Information Security, leveraging authoritative sources and industry best practice knowledge.·         Monitors and maintains effective security monitoring and oversight function for the Company.·         Develops metrics and monitoring for Information Security tickets, alerts, events and incidents.·         Ensure the development and implementation of an effective security education, training, and awareness program utilizing multiple venues.·         Works with the Service Desk, SOC, and Security teams to perform and maintain response and escalation procedures for security events.·         Defines security requirements and audits systems to determine if they have been designed and established to comply with established standards.·         Manage security controls to effectively protect company confidential and regulated data.·         Participates in design and planning functions of IT projects to ensure security is considered early and often by stakeholders.Benefits:·         401(K) includes 100% company match of the first 4%·         Medical and Dental Plan with Prescription Coverage and Vision·         Paid Time Off days and holidays·         Wellness Programs and On-site fitness facility·         On-site restaurant·         Team Share Quarterly BonusDesired Skills and ExperienceManager of Information Security Skills and Experience Requirements·         Bachelor’s degree in Management Information Systems, Information Security, Information Technology, Information Systems Management, or related field(s) required, equivalent combination of education and experience may be substituted in lieu of degree.·         Seven (7+) plus years Information Technology experience required.·         Four (4+) plus years Information Security experience required.·         One (1) to three (3+) plus years’ management experience required.·         Financial Services industry experience preferred.·         Extensive experience with several of the following technologies: firewall administration, web application security, penetration testing, security monitoring operations, digital forensics, security incident response, network infrastructure design and implementation, governance risk and compliance activities, security assurance auditing, cloud service security, vulnerability assessment and remediation programs, identity and access management, data loss prevention, system administration, asset management.·         Strong analytical and problem solving skills for resolving security issues.·         Strong organizational skills to balance work and lead projects. • Strong interpersonal skills to effectively mentor and lead junior level personnel.·         In-depth knowledge of information security management, practice and understanding of privacy and security regulations relevant to the private sector (e.g. PCI-DSS, SOX, GLBA, HIPAA, etc.) is required.·         In-depth understanding of a comprehensive information security program.·         Must possess the ability to build strong relationships with internal customers that result in positive support of IS processes.·         Self-motivated and results-oriented, including ability to prioritize several conflicting demands.·         Ability to maintain confidentiality.·         Certifications relevant to information security administration (e.g. CISSP, GSEC, GCCC) are preferred.·         Other information security certifications are a plusKeywords:  information security, cyber security, CISSP, ",Manager of Information Security Job in Knoxville,Full Time Employee,"Knoxville, TN 37923",,http://jobview.monster.com/Manager-of-Information-Security-Job-Knoxville-TN-US-166613879.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=17,"0.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",IT/Software Development,68ab62328dda61426eee0a1019e84810
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:01:46:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bilingual Help Desk Analyst Location: Richfield, MN 1st Shift - BILINGUAL Support (Spanish Speaker) Traits and Technical Experience needed for a prospective Analyst to succeed: -Basic understanding of computers, network devices, MS Windows environment, and other key systems used within the Client environment and according to the current project needs. -Comfort and familiarity with MS Office applications. -Great phone and interpersonal communication skills. -A moderate to higher level of customer service skills and training. -Ability to analyze network connectivity issues in an XP and Cisco environment. -Strong ability to shift gears and work appropriately with customers, colleagues and supervisors. -Ability to multi-task in a busy, fast paced environment. -Moderate time management ability. -Self-motivation is required. -Good written communication skills and grammar. -Ability to learn quickly and become a contributing member of the team within a short period of time. -Ability to look up and find information via knowledgebase and/or other means and come to a correct resolution. o MS Office Software o VPN/VNC/Remote Desktop o Printer Technology (Lexmark/HP) o Moderate understanding of computers, network devices, MS Windows environment, etc . . . o Comfort and familiarity with MS Office applications including Excel, Word, and Outlook. o High customer service skills and training. o Research ability to look up and find information via knowledgebase and/or other means and come to a correct resolution. o Previous retail experience is a plus o Use of a remote management tool such as VNC, Remote Desktop o Flexibility in scheduling availabilityExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Helpdesk Analyst - Bilingual Support Job in Minneapolis,,"Bilingual Help Desk Analyst Location: Richfield, MN 1st Shift - BILINGUAL Support (Spanish Speaker) Traits and Technical Experience needed for a prospective Analyst to succeed: -Basic understanding of computers, network devices, MS Windows environment, and other key systems used within the Client environment and according to the current project needs. -Comfort and familiarity with MS Office applications. -Great phone and interpersonal communication skills. -A moderate to higher level of customer service skills and training. -Ability to analyze network connectivity issues in an XP and Cisco environment. -Strong ability to shift gears and work appropriately with customers, colleagues and supervisors. -Ability to multi-task in a busy, fast paced environment. -Moderate time management ability. -Self-motivation is required. -Good written communication skills and grammar. -Ability to learn quickly and become a contributing member of the team within a short period of time. -Ability to look up and find information via knowledgebase and/or other means and come to a correct resolution. o MS Office Software o VPN/VNC/Remote Desktop o Printer Technology (Lexmark/HP) o Moderate understanding of computers, network devices, MS Windows environment, etc . . . o Comfort and familiarity with MS Office applications including Excel, Word, and Outlook. o High customer service skills and training. o Research ability to look up and find information via knowledgebase and/or other means and come to a correct resolution. o Previous retail experience is a plus o Use of a remote management tool such as VNC, Remote Desktop o Flexibility in scheduling availabilityExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",,http://jobview.monster.com/Helpdesk-Analyst-Bilingual-Support-Job-Minneapolis-MN-US-166670214.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=16,,,637b1bc76a6cce68dd9686f797bc19c1
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:02:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Infrastructure Project Manager Location: Clearwater, FLDuration: 3 month contract to Permanent hireCompensation: $65K to $70KWork Requirements: US Citizen, GC Holders or Authorized to Work in the USOverview:TekPartners has some of the most sought after Information Technology positions available. As a reputable company in the IT staffing industry, you can trust us to place you in the right position. We currently have an opportunity for an Infrastructure Project Manager in Clearwater, FL.  Skillset / Experience: Responsible for overall project management and planning associated with Office expansions, moves and closers, ensuring consistency with company strategy, commitments and goals. Work with stakeholders to gather and deliver requirements as it relates to IT. Primary Duties and Responsibilities: Work with the business team in coordinating the opening, expansion and closing of an office as it relates to IT. This includes working with 3rd party venders in the gathering of information such as site surveys, and floor plans. Work with 3rd party venders in cabling the location. IDF and MDF room configuration and layout. This include power requirement for the equipment to ensure the site has the correct plugs and circuits for the IT equipment Work with team to request the proper equipment based on the size of the office. Insure equipment is on site on time. Work with venders to install equipment and test. Work with business and vender on the ordering and setup of the VOIP phones and coordinate training for phones. Coordinate the installation of IT equipment with the business and property manager to make sure site is available and site contacts are informed and scheduled to be on site for installations. Maintain and store information on all sights with the appropriate information Provide management report on the status of the sites Conduct weekly status meetings with the business. Education and Experience Requirements: Bachelor's degree in a related Business or Computer Sciences discipline is preferred. 3-5 years' experience in IT with experience in networking, and telecom, opening and closing offices Working knowledge of circuit installation, and cable setup Additional Requirements:§ Must have positive attitude, work well under pressure and be a team player§ Must possess professional attitude to represent company in a positive manner§ Strong verbal and written communication skills§ Attention to detail and excellent organizational skills§ Strong interpersonal skills§ Excellent analytical capabilities§ Self-starter§ Strong work ethic§ Understand and follow posted work rules and procedures Accept constructive criticism Ability to maintain flexible work schedule, including evening and weekend work as needed",Infrastructure Project Manager Job in Clearwater,Full Time,"Clearwater, FL 33755",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Infrastructure-Project-Manager-Job-clearwater-FL-US-166706416.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,6d723f6ec97a665117c707fc8fe8411e
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:02:58:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Buffalo  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Buffalo 14213,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-BUFFALO-166734492.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=14,,General/Other: Medical/Health,71b424a8be4d80bbf7cf17a82d4c3ebf
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:47:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Primary Responsibilities· Assist a Sr. Project Manager with detailedbudget/resource/schedule tracking activities· Prepare and maintain detailed project documentation includingmeeting notes, issues and risks log, status reporting· Coordinate meeting logistics· Facilitate meetings· Prepare and deliver presentations with guidance RequiredQualifications:· Strong written and verbal communication· High attention to detail· Experience in eliciting task estimations, tracking deliverablesto a schedule, and updating project timelines· At least 4 years of experience working in an Enterprise ITenvironment, or relevant functional/business experience· At least 1 year in a project management role· Eager to accept guidance from Senior Project Managers· Hands-on experience with recent version of Microsoft Office,specifically Microsoft ProjectRecommendedQualifications· Undergraduate degree in math, science, engineering, or MIS witha GPA above 3.5· Hands-on Agile team experience or exposure· Actual experience with on-site, offshore and remote team members· Manner: Outgoing yet professional; Firm while diplomatic",Project Analyst Job in Ft. Lauderdale,Full Time,"Ft. Lauderdale, FL",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Analyst-Job-Ft.-Lauderdale-FL-US-166706392.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=9,,IT/Software Development,f6b1626423753fbd3bb7db997d95d47a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:47:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Knowledge of front-end web development with modern frameworks, responsive user interfaces and unit testing front-end code. Some of the technologies used - TypeScript, Javascript, Angular 2, Redux, NGRX, Bootstrap, GridStack, HighCharts, D3, HTML5, CSS, SASS, Selectors, RxJS, GIT",UI Developer Job in Redmond,Full Time,"Redmond, WA 98053",,http://jobview.monster.com/UI-Developer-Job-Redmond-WA-US-166753835.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=8,,,7d000f7b889661fe7b70ff04edafe5ce
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:47:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress.Job Requirements Graduate of a State Board accredited School of Nursing or equivalent. Experience: Six (6) months experience preferred. Licensure: Current license or permit to practice professional nursing in the State of Texas.",Registered Nurse,"Full Time, Employee","Beaumont, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-RN-Minor-Care-Job-Beaumont-TX-US-166643974.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,647c8b12a82be0c3adf2cfc7e4d0b87a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:47:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chestnut Health Systems’ Adult Chemical Dependency program is looking for part-time, PRN Adult Residential Counselors to work for our Bloomington, IL facility. Duties include:Monitoring clientsDocumenting activities.Record keeping. Assisting clients with daily programs.",Adult Residential Counselor Job in Bloomington,Part Time,"Bloomington, IL 61701",,http://jobview.monster.com/Adult-Residential-Counselor-Job-Bloomington-IL-US-166617200.aspx?mescoid=3900663001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,cc987f8d6f6e7c9cc9d5dac42b189c26
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:47:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHRISTUS HomeCare of Shreveport is seeking a Registered Nurse for Home Health on an as needed basis. This position maintains or shares accountability for comprehensive oversight of patient assignments as indicated by patient need. The RN will perform comprehensive patient assessment, prepare individualized Plan of Care (POC), and makes revisions to POC based on assessment. PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITYProvide direct care to patients within their homes on a pay-per-points role.KEY SKILLSMust be able to use independent judgment and clinical skills. * Must be a graduate of an accredited school of nursing * Must have a minimum of two (2) years of related nursing experience inclusive of one (1) year of home health experience * Must have a current Registered Nurse license in the state of Louisiana or in accordance with the Board of Nurse Examiners rules for Nurse Licensure Compact (NLC) * CPR certified * Must have a current Louisiana driver's license and current automobile insuranceEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse- Home Health PRN Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA 71101",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Home-Health-PRN-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166627286.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,3652e315f7c18d57bcb33224f20d7a5a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:48:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Water Treatment Specialist in the Army National Guard, you will make sure your fellow Soldiers have clean water and live and work in sanitary conditions.Water Treatment Specialists are part of the Army National Guard's environmental health and safety team, using their acquired knowledge and skills to fulfill several vital needs. These skills include site reconnaissance and preparation for water treatment activity, as well as setup of equipment and facilities; operation and maintenance of water treatment equipment; management of potable water supplies; monitoring the storage, transport, and disposal of waste; water quality analysis and testing; and the inspection of facilities and food supplies for the presence of disease, germs, and other environmentally hazardous conditions.These are skills that are in demand by local, state, and federal government agencies for food and drug inspectors, public health inspectors, health and safety inspectors, and industrial hygienists. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Water Treatment Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! As an Army National Guard Water Treatment Specialist, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After nine weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 10 weeks of Advanced Individual Training that will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn how to identify health hazards and how to inspect food products, food service operations, wastewater, and waste disposal facilities. You may even qualify for a certified apprenticeship in this occupation. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Water Treatment Specialist Job in Lake Wales  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Lake Wales 33859,,http://jobview.monster.com/Water-Treatment-Specialist-Job-LAKE-WALES-166723784.aspx?mescoid=5100986001001&jobPosition=13,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,00203a18756154d61a0a48f25e16beef
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:03:50:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Open Position: Business Analyst www.preferredone.com EEO/AAAt PreferredOne, our name says it all! Everything we do is for one purpose – to make our valued members’ experience the best it can be. For 30 years, we have been loyal to serving Minnesota and the upper Midwest. We are known for our outstanding customer service and prompt claims processing. We offer the health insurance services members need and expect when looking for employer plans or individual coverage. We are committed to providing quality services that make a positive difference in administering health care benefits and helping our valued members reach their health related goals. Conveniently located in Golden Valley, MN. Why consider PreferredOne for employment? We provide a welcoming, casual, and team-oriented culture. We also offer an array of wellness amenities to promote a healthy environment. Our employees can take advantage of our onsite fitness facility, massage therapist and personal trainer. No time to eat breakfast or make a lunch? No problem! We also offer an onsite cafeteria where our chef prepares fresh meals daily. In a recent survey, 97% of employees believe that PreferredOne cares about their wellbeing. Why? Our most valuable assets are our employees; our employees are what makes us unique. Coupled with our high retention rates, our employees receive impeccable benefits at affordable premiums. PreferredOne – a preferred employer. To apply, submit your cover letter and resume along with salary requirement to resumes@preferredone.com or via fax (763)-847-4010.Purpose Develop and enhance administrative systems, set up and configure new business entities and provide end user support.Duties and ResponsibilitiesDevelop business specifications and suggest resolutions for moderate to complex problems.Develop test plans for moderate to complex projects/problems. Test systems enhancements and upgrades.Develop technical and end-user documentation.Recommend business enhancements or new procedures to gain operational efficiencies.Perform systems set-up requirements in multiple applications.Coordinate development and implementation of procedures.Prepare business for system changes.Act as liaison with internal and external customers and external resource.Supervisory ResponsibilitiesNoneRequired Education, Experience and SkillsProject management skills.High level of individual initiative; self-motivated and able to work independently as well as part of a team.  Demonstrated understanding of payment/reimbursement methodologies, HCPCS,CPT, ICD-10 coding structures as it relates to claim submission.Knowledge of payment methodologies for both professional and facility payment.Detailed Facets system knowledge and experience in several applications.Strong understanding of company business and strong positive working relationships with other departments and external resources.Excellent problem solving and critical thinking skills.Excellent attention to detail, prioritization and organization.Ability to work effectively in an environment characterized by high level of activities.1 -3 years experience with retrieval and analysis of data from large databases using various tools including, but not limited to Microsoft SQL, Access, Excel, Crystal.",Business Analyst Job in Golden Valley,Full Time,"Golden Valley, MN 55416",Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Business-Analyst-Job-Golden-Valley-MN-US-166125868.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e3de70bf2db5018f291c3bc3cdd5750b
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:06:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Payroll Technical Specialist. [Additional Description]This job will have the following responsibilities:[ Responsible, in conjunction with the Payroll Manager and Payroll Supervisor, for the ongoing implementation and development of the Kronos and Lawson systems, including testing and setup. · Provides ongoing Kronos assistance/training to timekeeper managers. · Calculates and enters time accrual adjustments when needed on Kronos corrections. · Develops and implements automated solutions for Payroll processes to facilitate data accuracy, integrity and timeliness. · Produces reports quarterly reports for federal agency, state agencies, and other outside entities adhering to their specific deadlines. · Maintains ongoing group of Kronos timekeepers in GroupWise. · Designs and runs audit reports in Kronos and Lawson both before and after payroll processes. · Creates and sends bi-weekly and quarterly tax deposits through ACH automated processing adhering to their specific deadlines. · Prepares budget advisor reports for all departments on a bi-weekly basis. · Related to general ledger month end, produces subsidiary spreadsheets and outside billing spreadsheets. · Responsible for carrying out all duties within Payroll's deadlines.Qualifications & Requirements: High School Diploma/GED equivalent required · Minimum of three years of payroll experience required. · Proficiency in Excel, typing and 10-key with Crystal Reports and Access experience preferred.",Payroll Technical Specialist Job in Kansas City,"Full Time, Employee","Kansas City, KS",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Payroll-Technical-Specialist-Job-Kansas-City-KS-US-166763186.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,0d4f0ba02f0a257814fe74c23876840b
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:06:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce is in search of IT Field Technicians to assist our client with a server installation at their site in Fletcher, OK. Responsibilities: Following a detailed installation guide, the technician will unpack the new server and take an inventory of the equipment The technician will then perform the hardware installation and reconnect all peripheral devices to the server After powering up the server the technician will execute the installation steps and validate the install This is a short term project and is expected to take a few hours to complete The technician chosen for this project will remain on the Kforce virtual bench for all future projects and contracts in this market, should they decide to There will be follow up visits to this site to perform de-installations of older servers after a defined amount of timeREQUIREMENTS: TC2, certifications not required but CCNA Net+ Certifications are preferred, but not required 2+ years of IT Field Service experience or equivalent education is required Successful candidates should have professional experience working with servers in a live environment The candidate must be able to pay strict attention to detail and adept at following precise instructions TC-2 level experience and abilities executing site surveys Capable of mounting switches, labeling cabling, correctly connecting switches, connecting to console port of Cisco switches to download configuration files, executing device connectivity tests to verify Cisco Supplier to provide a laptop with Microsoft Office software (Excel, etc.) Small assortment of hand tools and other tools as required for this work (i.e. a flashlight, small camera, smart phone etc.) Supplier must adhere to the following end user customer fingerprinting and Criminal Record Check policy; this compliance will be at our expense Standard Network Site Survey",Migration Project Job in Fletcher,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Fletcher, OK 73541",,http://jobview.monster.com/Migration-Project-Job-Fletcher-OK-US-166752124.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,18.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),80b377455ad6ff15d3f5e97e12e8a84e
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:06:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.Job Responsibilities    Nursing Process    1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families.  Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members.     a.       Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents.     b.      Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately.     c.      Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain.2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices.  Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures.  Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals.     a.      Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems.     b.      Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs.     c.      Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure.       d.      Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization.     e.      Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements.     f.       Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements.3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments.  Performs timely re-assessment and documentation:    a.      Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed.     b.      Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge.    c.      Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data.Patient Throughput/ Patient Flow Process    1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow.    a.      Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change.    b.      Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed.    c.      Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs.    d.      Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration.    e.       Expedites admission/discharges/transfers.    f.       Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care.    Unit Operations    1. Demonstrates good stewardship in proper use and maintenance of equipment and supplies.    a.       Coordinates the selection of supplies and equipment in a cost effective manner.    b.       Charges for supplies/procedures appropriately.    c.       Ensures availability and organization of supplies and equipment for patient care.    d.       Performs and documents emergency equipment checks as assigned.    e.       Removes and returns discontinued supplies and equipment.    f.        Removes broken equipment from area immediately and initiates a work order.    g.       Ensures and documents that all alarms (patient and equipment) are functional.    Safe Practice/ Quality Care/ Regulations    1. Incorporates patient safety practices/guidelines to promote a safe environment resulting in positive patient outcomes.    a.      Demonstrates accountability for nursing research and quality improvement Activities.    b.      Demonstrates knowledge and skill in administering medications.2. Completes medication reconciliation upon admission, transfer, and discharge.3. Reviews physician's orders for clarity and accuracy, legibility & appropriate authenticity (name, title, date, time, etc.).4. Follows the restrictions on abbreviations and does not use abbreviations on the ""Do Not List"". Uses only approved abbreviations.5. Transcribes telephone orders per policy.6. Administers, documents, and evaluates medications according to policy and procedure.7. Instructs patient on medication including: expected effects, side effects, and possible food or medication interactions and documents instructions.8. Recognizes, reports, and documents medication errors and adverse drug reactions.    a.      Uses patient identifiers as defined by policy.    b.      Communicate patient information effectively across the continuum of care.9. Uses an approved hand-off communication format consistently.10. Follows the universal protocol, e.g. time out.11. Uses SBAR to communicate changes in patient condition.12. Follows the Chain of Command.13. Critical values are reported in a timely manner in accordance with policy.14. Sets clinical alarms according to equipment parameters and responds rapidly to the alarms.    a.       Initiates the Rapid Response team in response to deterioration in patient condition.    b.       Demonstrates safe patient handling practices.    c.       Promotes a safe patient care environment including compliance with restraint policy and rounding.    d.       Implements processes to prevent falls, pressure ulcers, and other hospital-acquired complications.    e.       Assures compliance with core measure implementation and documentation, e.g. SCIP, CHF, AMI, CAP.    f.       Identifies, corrects and/or reports patient safety and/or environmental safety hazards at the time of discovery.    g.       Demonstrates proper infection control and isolation techniques including providing appropriate information concerning isolation precautions and patient status to patient, family, and/or significant others and/or other disciplines.    h.       Adheres to CHRISTUS policies and procedures and the standards of the Joint Commission, OSHA, DHHS, HIPAA, etc.    Leadership    1. Serves as a leader of patient care.    a.       Guides and supervises other nursing staff in the operational activities in assigned area.    b.       Promptly recognizes and attempts to reinforce appropriate behavior and attempts to correct inappropriate behavior in self and co-workers.    c.       Delegates nursing and non-nursing functions according to standards.    d.       Participates in leadership activities including community activities, e.g. charge/team leader, council participation, preceptor/coach, unit education, staff/council meetings.    e.       Assumes responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills including participating in unit-level meetings and all mandatory education activities sponsored by the facility.    f.       Identifies and corrects inconsistencies in nursing procedures/techniques.    g.       Participates in implementing performance improvement and change activities.    h.       Assists in teaching and evaluating other personnel as assigned.    i.       Contributes to the learning experience of students and new employees.    j.       Acts as a resource person.    k.       Communicates the intensity of work load and collaborates with nursing leadership to meet patient care needs and unit activity.#LI-SH1Job Requirements Qualifications    1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.""Working Conditions and Physical Requirements""    1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area.  There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.    Other    1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN- Day Surgery- KidSTOP Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Day-Surgery-KidSTOP-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644045.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,268b8d6417a6b4f3c709213dae747514
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:07:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Organizes and conducts medically prescribed physical therapy programs to restore function, prevent disability following disease, injury or loss of a body part, and helps patients reach maximum performance levels. Plans therapy involving physical exercise, massage, heat, water, etc. Utilizes various mechanical and electrical equipment, and prosthetic and orthotic devices. Evaluates, records and reports on patient progress.Job Requirements A. EDUCATION: Bachelor's, Master's or entry level Doctorate of Physical Therapy degree from anaccredited college or university in the area of Physical Therapy is required. B. EXPERIENCE: No experience required. C. LICENSURE/CERTIFICATION: Licensed as a Physical Therapist by the State Board of PhysicalTherapy Examiners of Texas. CPR certification is required.",Physical Therapist-Physical Therapy O/P Job in New Braunfels,"Full Time, Employee","New Braunfels, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Physical-Therapist-Physical-Therapy-O-P-Job-New-Braunfels-TX-US-166644010.aspx?mescoid=2900488001001&jobPosition=16,,Medical/Health,e1e51745fd8a395b297af33a6cc5c455
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:07:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"* Obtains initial and routine vital signs, height, actual weight, and accurate I&Os. Notifies * appropriate nursing staff of any abnormalities in vital signs or I&Os. * Assists patient with activities of daily living including: total bed baths, assisted baths at * bedside or bathroom, shower, oral hygiene, assist with turning or repositioning at least every two hours, changing bed linen every day and as needed. Assists with simple dressing changes (no complex dressings or wound packing) and assists with Admissions, Discharges, and Transfers of patients. * Performs assigned departmental maintenance duties such as, stripping room after * patient is discharged to prepare them for cleaning. Empty trash in patient's rooms as needed, report low supplies to clerical staff or Manager/Director/Clinical Supervisor in a timely manner. * Assist with equipment maintenance, retrieve and return equipment to Central Supply, report malfunctioning equipment or items needing repair to clerical staff, Team Leader, Clinical Supervisor, or Director in a timely manner. * Monitor and control the environment to maintain patient, and associate safety, by adhering to safety policies of CHRISTUS Schumpert. * Communicates appropriately with physicians, staff members, patients/families. Seeks assistance and clarification of assignments as needed, shares input from patient/family members with appropriate team member, assists other team members without prompting, answer call bell promptly and courteously. * Provide patient care and activities appropriate to age, culture, and religious beliefs, and any barriers to understanding. * Support associate satisfaction initiatives through participation in departmental surveys and hospital or unit programs. * Support departmental goals and objectives. * Document the following care provided in Meditech: hygiene, nutrition intake, pressure ulcer prevention (turning & skin care), fall prevention (toileting program & interventions). * Documents vital signs, intake and output in appropriate places. * Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. * Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. * Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. * Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. * Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position.Education/Skills: H.S. Graduate or equivalent preferred. Experience: Six months patient care experience preferred. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications: Current LA C.N.A. Certification and Heartsaver course, CPI certified.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Certified Nursing Assistant - Inpatient Rehab Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA 71105",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Certified-Nursing-Assistant-Inpatient-Rehab-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166135440.aspx?mescoid=3100548001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,0f93f21363beea603ecaae7ad0e3e632
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:07:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARYEarly Symptom Intervention/Conditioning Specialist coordinates ESI, Work Conditioning and assessment programs for manufacturing employees to increase their ability to perform their job duties and decrease risk of injury.  This position requires employee who will take initiative and be detail oriented.  Excellent presentation, interpersonal, and computer skills are required.    ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESDuties and responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned. Implement wellness initiatives, including incentive-based programming, lunch and learns, health education, and health promotions. Assist Safety Department, Medical Staff, and Production team to assess risks and determine ergonomic solutions.   Provide class instruction for team members for general conditioning, work conditioning, return to work program, and pre-shift stretching. Implement and evaluate programs designed to limit risks to workers, including assessment of at-risk body postures, implementation of self-care techniques, and individual coaching. Partner with Safety, HR, Health Services, and Shops regarding countermeasures, process/element changes, body postures, TM development. Collect data on work environments and injury data for analysis by Safety and Health Services. Supervise exercise floor to ensure safety of participants and proper use of exercise equipment. Coordinate work conditioning calendar and work conditioning follow up appointments with other department managers. Ensure that work environment allows employees to maximize their comfort, safety, and productivity. Initiate and implement the Ramp Up return to work program. Assist with investigating unsafe working conditions, study possible causes, and recommend remedial action. Work with Safety and Health Department to implement and enforce standards. Apply injury prevention techniques including group lecture, individual coaching, and follow up. Comply with established operational policies and procedures.  Fulfill all other duties as assigned by supervisor.  SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIESThis position has no supervisory responsibilities  QUALIFICATIONSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEThis position requires a minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in Kinesiology, Exercise/Sports Science, Health Promotions or related field.  Must have effective organizational and communication skills, and be proficient with computers and programs. PHYSICAL DEMANDSThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, walk, and reach with hands and arms.  The employee is regularly required to communicate audibly to a large group.  The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.   WORK ENVIRONMENT  The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.",Early Symptom Intervention Specialist - San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78264",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Early-Symptom-Intervention-Specialist-San-Antonio-TX-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166104600.aspx?ch=courierpress&mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,808601c42be10a039572b795b8f73824
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:07:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Responsible for effective management of patient care delivery: Completes and documents assessment within period established by policy/procedure. Completes and documents reassessment of patient needs according to department standard. Initiates, updates and communicates an appropriate multi-disciplinary plan of care based in identified problems and/or patient needs Collaborate with patient/family/physician and other disciplines to coordinate the plan of care Evaluates patient response to care, revises plan of care as necessary and documents appropriately Administers and documents medications/treatments safely following Medication Administration Policy and Procedure Recognizes change or urgent situations in patient condition and intervenes appropriately. Provides patient and/or family with information relative to treatment plan, diagnostic/surgical procedures, disease process, and care after discharge. Initiates collaboration and documents appropriate teaching, considering age, cultural and religious beliefs, and barriers to learning. Evaluates effectiveness of teaching and provides appropriate follow-up. Provides leadership and direction in accordance with departmental goals and objectives. Delegates duties based on position and level of competence and the complexity of patient's needs. Performs Point of Care Testing within scope of licensure; accurately performs testing according to the approved procedure and limits testing to only those tests for which competency has been assessed and operator is deemed qualified by designated trainer. Healthstream (HLC) modules completed by assigned date. Complete Associate Self-evaluation and give to Supervisor by assigned date. Attend 2 of the Associate Round Tables per fiscal year. Maintain licensure or certification without lapse, if required for the position. Maintain BCLS/ACLS certification, if required for the position. Job Requirements Education/Skills: Graduate from an Accredited School of Nursing. Experience: As required by Staff RN Level and assigned area. Licenses, Registrations, or Certifications: Current registration with the Louisiana State Board of Registered Nurse Examiners. BLS provider, ACLS provider as required by departmental policy.",Registered Nurse - PCU/Step-down Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-PCU-Step-down-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166643868.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,fda74f34f5135aa7b96eebf255d7891a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:39:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Counselors function as health educators, biometric data screeners, and event managers for worksite wellness programs; health fairs and other corporate and community health education events in cooperation with the Heart Study Department of Wellness Services. They multi-task through the stations of screening events; provide educational in-services for businesses and organizations; work telephonically on follow-ups with clients; and assist in the organization and transportation of Wellness Services activities to the various sites scheduled. Job Requirements Graduate of an accredited school of nursing and Current Texas State RN license or Current Texas RD/LD Dietitian license or Bachelor's Degree in Nutrition. CPR-(American Heart Association). 1-2 years working in a health care environment with patients/clients on health improvement or healthy habits. Work experience with patients in a health care setting environment is preferred. Health education/wellness coaching is preferred. Knowledge of risk factors for cardiovascular disease; coaching/educating/counseling skills; adult education learning strategies; administering immunizations skills (where applicable); performing biometric screening procedures; presentation skills; critical thinking skills.",RN Wellness Counselor - Health Resource Center Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Wellness-Counselor-Health-Resource-Center-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644127.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,8363691a2e71f8bf689430abed111f45
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:54:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join a world leader in IT metrics and productivity! Computer Aid, Inc.  (CAI) is a full service Information Technology outsourcing firm with more than 30 years of experience and a world leader in IT measurement and IT productivity. Computer Aid, Inc. is looking for a Senior Level Project Manager with 5-7 years of experience!   Duration 24 months.This position comes to us from our NY State contract for Hourly Based Information Technology Services and is located in Albany, NY.  Albany is in the beautiful upstate region of NY, which is only a few hours from Boston, New York City, Montreal, and the spectacular mountains of the Adirondacks.  Consider applying today as time is limited on this and other positions like it for the state of NY. Respond with your updated resume to be considered and read all the details listed here as the State contract is very specific concerning experience level and skills. Project Scope- duties of positioneMedNY New York State’s Medicaid claims processing system, eMedNY,processes more than 250 million eligibility and prior authorization transactions, 470 million claims and payments in excess of $52 billion annually for New York Medicaid providers. The system supports statewide eligibility verification, claims processing and the New York Medicaid website. Additionally, the call center handles and receives nearly a million telephone calls a year from Medicaid providers, and the claims processing unit performs digital imaging and data conversion of paper documents. The critical systems, including eligibility verification, service authorization and pharmacy claims processing, are provided on a 24x7 basis. More than five million recipients receive health services through this program, with more than 75,000 participating healthcare providers providing their services, and over 8,400 system users. (As of May 1, 2015, a new MMIS, called NYMMIS, began development as a replacement for eMedNY; eMedNY, however, is expected to remain in operation at least for the duration of this engagement.) Reporting to the Director of the Bureau of eMedNY within the DOH Office of Health Insurance Programs, Division of Systems, the consultant will assist in the oversight of the operation and evolution of the New York State Medicaid Management Information System, eMedNY, encompassing all aspects of the operation and evolution of the eMedNY claims processing and related subsystems, including developing systems requirements for budget initiatives and other projects, as well as the oversight, as needed, of the entire evolution project portfolio of over 100 software development projects, including complex federal mandates and MRT directives. Duties include acting as ongoing liaison with a variety of eMedNY stakeholders, including Project Management and development staff from CSRA (the MMIS vendor), and staff from DOH Policy, Local Districts, OMH, OPWDD, OASAS, HRA, OSC and OMIG. Additional duties include providing organizational coordination and assistance as required to facilitate the implementation of Medicaid initiatives. In addition, the consultant will support the transition of operations from eMedNY to a new MMIS (NYMMIS) now being developed under contract with a different vendor. Crucially, this consultant will carefully assist with coordinating the timing of eMedNY system changes with the timing of the transition from the old system to the new. Daily Tasks will include but are not limited to the following: Work within the eMedNY team organization to support ongoing operational and evolution requirements within eMedNY.Troubleshoot and oversee new modifications to the 834 to interact with NYSoH and eMedNY CSRA (knowledge of WMS proprietary transactions would be helpful to understand how these two system interact).Work collaboratively to interpret Medicaid policy vis-à-vis systems functionality; participate in development of DOH Medicaid initiatives.Establish priorities and timetables for multiple systems initiatives.Work collaboratively with stakeholders, eMedNY and contract staff to troubleshoot, identify and resolve systems problems and issues, and to identify and resolve evolution problems and issues; assure that ongoing eMedNY operations and evolution functions are performing efficiently.Oversee, direct and coordinate work efforts of DOH eMedNY and contractor staff.Provide guidelines and planning assistance to stakeholders for Project Initiation, Project Tracking and Project Control; provide guidelines for metrics reporting and monitoring of project portfolio progress; as needed, monitor and audit projects and portfolio progress; carefully monitor new project request properties in terms of priority, size and duration in order to coordinate the timing of eMedNY system changes vis-à-vis the implementation of the replacement MMIS system, i.e., the transition of system changes from the old system to the new.Review and prepare comments on various project artifacts related to the claims subsystems including functional requirements documents, project design documents, and project assessments; attend testing review meetings and review test results to assure contractor compliance to the project design and overriding business objectives of projects.Report to and provide support to DOH management on Medicaid and eMedNY issues.Make presentations to DOH management and other project stakeholder organizations on eMedNY activities, as directed.Represent the DOH and eMedNY at seminars and training sessions as needed.Participate in the design, development and implementation of activities necessary to maintain DOH support functions with local counties, other state agencies, other federal agencies and the provider community.Senior Level You must be a Senior Project Manager with documented employment experience of 5-7 years (60-84 months).  -  You must have experience overseeing projects comprised of multiple deliverables.  Delegating and coordinating of tasks.  Project status, meetings, scope changes, issues. -  You must be able to work without assistance and can provide leadership for others; may have advanced education. PART B:   Requested Desirable  Qualifications:  The numbered qualifications below are not mandatory, but candidates should meet or exceed in duration and skill set target asked for, at least 4 of numbers 1 through 7. Bachelor’s degree.At least 60 months experience with the Title XIX Medicaid Program.At least 60 months experience with large-scale claims payment systems such as eMedNY, with special emphasis on interfaces with other systems.At least 48 months experience with TPL in a Medicaid environment and the interactions between Medicaid, Medicare and commercial insurance providers, with special emphasis on systems integration.At least 48 months hands-on experience with EDI and SQL, including experience with EDI 834 Benefit Enrollment and Maintenance.At least 36 months experience supervising staff.At least 24 months experience with developing and maintaining working relationships with local districts, and/or the Medicaid provider community, other bureaus within the Office of Health Insurance Programs of the New York State Department of Health, other departments and federal agencies.With the goal of ensuring a safe, productive work environment for bothComputer Aid Associates and our customers, we will require that you submitto pre-employment drug testing and background screening prior to beginning employment. CAI is an Equal Opportunity Employer CAI has one of the industry’s best benefit packages available.  Some of our benefits include:Medical Care and Prescription Drug Program Coverage - CAI’smedical coverage is equivalent to Hospital/Surgical/Major Medical coverage. Flexible SpendingAccounts, Dental Care Coverage - including Orthodontic services, Vision CareCoverage, Short-Term Disability Insurance (STD), Long-Term Disability Insurance, Base LifeInsurance. COMPUTER AID, INC (CAI) headquartered in Pennsylvania, with offices and staff throughout the United States, Canada, Europe, and the Asia Pacific region has over 3000 employees serving 34 major metropolitan areas. CAI offers a variety of delivery options including on-site, off-site, and blended solutions. Our Solution Delivery Centers are successfully leveraged to enable our global staff of technical and managerial professionals to quickly and effectively respond to client requirements. Since our founding in 1981, CAI has specialized in forming long-term multi-project relationships with our client partners. We take pride as we strive to be one of the world leaders in Information Technology process and productivity. CAI solutions include application support, application development, application knowledge capture, business consulting, desktop services, managed staffing services, and staff augmentation. A unique set of metrics based processes and proprietary toolsets enables CAI to deliver support and development solutions with the highest degree of efficiency. Employing more than 2500 associates worldwide, the company has provided services and solutions to more than 600 Fortune 1000 customers as well as federal, state, and local government agencies. CAI has offices throughout the US, and in Canada, Latin America, Europe, the middle East, the Philippines, China and Australia. We invite you to work with us in roles where we help our clients deliver the innovation that is so necessary for an organization to grow. This innovation includes accelerating the time to market of new business functionality, as well as ensuring that the systems we build are robust and reliable. Whether you are working on delivering a business analyses, project management, process improvement, infrastructure support, application maintenance, or system development project, you are part of a team of IT craftspeople who take pride in the work that we do on a daily basis.",Project Manager / Medicaid Claims Processing Systems Job in Menands,Full Time,"Menands, NY 12204",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Manager-Medicaid-Claims-Processing-Systems-Job-Menands-NY-US-166752395.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=15,,,6d45e87bab90ad8ccfb785fd285cf371
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:04:55:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Through a shared vision of unyielding excellence, UCLA Health has earned a position of prominence in health care. If youre passionate about achieving the absolute best outcomes, we invite you to consider a career with UCLA Health. Become one of the esteemed professionals at the UCLA Blood and Platelet Center. We are seeking full-time, experienced staff join our excellent Blood Collections Team.MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES: The Blood and Platelet Center Supervisor is responsible for the operation of the Recruitment area of the Blood and Platelet Center. The supervisor is responsible for determining the staffing matrix according to productivity standards, directing the work of others, hiring or releasing employees or recommending such actions, training, defining positions and determining methods, techniques and systems and materials required. The supervisor will work with Blood and Platelet Center and Transfusion Medicine staff to develop procedures and write, or revise existing procedures and validations. The supervisor is responsible for implementing both short-term and long-range planning and growth, coordinating, organizing, staffing and supervising to meet budget and productivity goals, staff personnel administration, purchasing, expenditure control, space utilization, building and equipment security and maintenance and other services which support the functions of the Blood and Platelet Center. The supervisor is responsible to solve managerial and/or program problems. The supervisor must be trained and competent to assist in the collection areas when staffing dictates. Required Skills: High School Diploma required, BA/BS preferred. Recent supervisory work experience in blood donor recruitment is highly desired. Experience required in hiring, orienting, training, disciplining and off-boarding staff. Qualified candidates must have demonstrated strong communication skills, ability to handle multiple tasks simultaneously, ability to work rapidly and accurately with a strong attention to detail, and ability to work effectively in team-oriented environments. Basic computer navigation skills are required. Must show demonstrated ability to write and review procedures. Must be flexible with ability to work weekends, holidays, and work overtime/change shift as needed. Working knowledge of Medical terminology preferred. As a valued full-time member of our staff, youll enjoy outstanding benefits, including health, dental and vision plans that begin on your first day and a retirement plan that is one of the best in the nation. You will also receive 13 paid holidays and 15 vacation days beginning your first year. Relocation assistance is available for those who qualify.Please be advised that ALL new hires will be required to successfully complete a criminal background investigation and a medical examination, which includes a drug screening, prior to employment at UCLA Health. The receipt of satisfactory responses to reference requests, and the provision of satisfactory proof of an applicant's identity and legal authority to work in the United States are also required. Any misrepresentation, falsification or material omission may result in a candidates failure to receive an offer, or if already hired, an immediate dismissal from employment.In an effort to promote and maintain a healthy environment for our patients, visitors, and employees, UCLA Health is a smoke-free site.For more information, go to www.uclahealthcareers.org or contact Aaron Magpali atamagpali@mednet.ucla.edu EOE",Management Servs Officer III Job in Los Angeles,Full Time,"Los Angeles, CA 94305",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Management-Servs-Officer-III-Job-Los-Angeles-CA-US-166739052.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),52ed403ebc4e982fc963fce80c441e5a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:05:48:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Full-Time; Hours must include weekends and holidays.Brookdale Woodbridge 330 Amity Road Woodbridge, CT 06525 Job #:057943Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities:* Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management* Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus* Two years of relevant nursing experience* Must have basic typing skills and familiar with Microsoft windows.* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior populationIf you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program!Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace.Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Woodbridge,Full Time Employee,"Woodbridge, CT 06525",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Woodbridge-CT-US-166716550.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=3,,Medical/Health,c30515856c2faf639abf5843afe27d15
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:05:49:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Volt has been serving some of the nation's strongest companies for over 60 years. We have a talented and upbeat staffing team focused on the quality of your career. As a Volt employee, you can expect the highest level of on-site support. We have a long-standing tradition of developing lasting and mutually beneficial relationships with our employees. We are a Six Sigma company that also offers many direct hire, full-time positions.Volt is an Equal Opportunity EmployerWe are currently looking to hire an experienced Project Manager (Risk IT) with Capital Markets, Risk Management and Banking experience *MUST HAVE* for our client in Toronto, ON for approximately a 6 months contract to start with a possibility of extension.PURPOSEManage software development projects in the Risk Technology area, supporting Group Risk Management (GRM). Plans, directs and coordinates activities of assigned projects to ensure project goals or objectives are accomplished within approved time frame, scope and budget. Independently and effectively manages assigned projects.All responsibilities carried out in accordance with Code of Conduct, the Company's Values and Guiding Principles ensuring adherence to Privacy principlesPRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIESProject Planning & Execution:"" Initiates projects and manages the definition of high level scope."" Develops integrated baseline project plans adapting estimating models as required, documents estimating assumptions, refines plans and manages performance against them."" Provides schedule and costs forecasts including risk based provisions."" Identifies resources and skills required."" Captures and tracks metrics and performs trend analysis."" Manages project scope/requirements changes, multiple and competing demands and priorities determining and conveying impact on budget, time and risk using appropriate fact-based metrics/assumptions."" Identifies and manages project costs and budgets."" Anticipates operational and tactical risks and tracks them using the appropriate methodology."" Raises and tracks issues and conflicts, removes barriers, resolves issues of medium complexity involving stakeholders and escalates to appropriate level where required."" Identifies and resolves/escalates potential conflicts between long-term architecture direction and project constraints."" Manages project closure initiatives."" Reports on project status using industry standards and the RBC toolset.Relationships & Communication:"" Provides superior client experience and strengthens relationship with business partner."" Collaborates with colleagues across the organization to get things done."" Manages project dependencies."" Manages project communications including status reports to all stakeholders."" Provides senior management with timely updates on project issues."" Manages external vendors and third parties relationships at the project level.Managerial Excellence:"" Sets direction and vision for the project team."" Builds project management capability on the team."" Manages performance, reward and recognition."" Promotes a mindset for sustained success, growth and diversity."" Spearheads and guides people through changes."" Develops self.AUTHORITIES, IMPACT, RISK"" Responsible for Project budgets up to 5 MM CAD"" Multi-year, strategic initiatives"" Teams of up to 15 staff"" Complex business functionality supporting risk managers, including regulatory and management reporting, quantification of risk.KEY RELATIONSHIPS"" Group Risk Management"" Corporate Systems Project and Business Management Office"" Enterprise Decision Support"" Company overall enterprise PMO organization"" 3rd Party Service ProvidersWORKING CONDITIONS"" Located in Toronto, minimal travel required."" Extensive collaboration with teams located in different geographical locations, and time zones"" Engagement with Group Risk Management EDUCATION &/ OR EXPERIENCE Required "" Experience working in a Project Managerial role in the IT Risk department"" Experience in Capital Markets"" Experience with Front End UI, SQL, Java, UI/QC, Hadoop technology"" Experience with Agile and Waterfall methodology"" Demonstrated leadership ability"" Successfully and simultaneously managed a minimum of 3 mid-size projects (budget range 3 - 5 MM CAD) with emphasis on some of the following:•High Impact or Business Risk•Uncertain Business Requirements•New Technology"" PMP Designation (an asset)"" Undergraduate Degree or equivalent experiencePreferred"" Experience in Financial Services, either in consulting or full time capacity."" Experience Managing projects in the Credit Risk space"" Level 3 Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) designation."" Financial Risk Manager (FRM) designation."" Master Business Administration (MBA) graduateCOMPETENCIESBusiness Knowledge"" Proficient knowledge of risk management practices, including market risk (VaR, stress and etc), credit risk (counterparty, settlement, issuer and etc) and liquidity risk."" Knowledge of the trade lifecycle and different financial product characteristics"" Effective communication skills in both written and oral"" Expert knowledge of software development project methodologies."" Expert knowledge of software development lifecycle.Behavioural' Breakthrough Thinking' Business Acumen' Customer Insight' Dealing with Ambiguity' Strategic Influencing' Teamwork and Cooperation' Change Leadership Developing OthersPM Knowledge"" Project plan development and management"" Risk assessment and quantification methodology"" Issues escalation and resolution"" Facilitation skills"" Scope change management"" Budgeting, project cost management"" Quality control"" Communication management and plans",IT Project Manager - Risk - Capital Market Job in Toronto body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Employee,Toronto,,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Project-Manager-Risk-Capital-Market-Job-Toronto-US-166692302.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=18,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,47bd7ce023ee584a77b1c0617d7bd722
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:06:55:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description We need a PM that ideally has some experience in accessibility design. They do not need to be an expert but some experience managing accessibility projects is ideal. The role is to project manage across multiple engineering teams that they are making progress on accessibility commitments and to help coordinate related activities such as accessibility testing underway. Ideally the person would have accessibility knowledge to help answer questions.Work across IPG/Bing engineering teams to manage project deliverables related to company-wide accessibility initiative to ensure our products meet accessibility standards. PM will work across teams to understand progress and report status. He/She will coordinate related testing activities that are underway including site testing that is being done by other vendors and usability testing. He/She will run weekly v-team meetings with engineering teams to identify issues and help manage resulting efforts to unblock or resolve them. Ideally this person would have accessibility knowledge and would also be able to provide accessibility design guidance to the engineers, including explaining our accessibility standards and helping teams understand how to implement them.Best candidate will have Accessibility experience in an Engineering field, will understand the workflow and vocabulary of the industry and familiar with the urgent demands. This candidate will also have experience managing multiple teams. TOP 3 must-have skills 1 - Experience working across multiple teams in a PM role, Engineering experience workflow2 - Accessibility experience, and or Compliance (such as security) experience 3 - Project Management - engineering preferred Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Accessibilty Program Manager Job in Redmond,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Accessibilty Program Manager,"Redmond, WA",http://jobview.monster.com/Accessibilty-Program-Manager-Job-Redmond-WA-US-166752923.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=12,,IT/Software Development,6cf3cfa4d8a51453f3cce7fb383656f6
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:06:56:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time Brookdale Kingsport 2424 N John B Dennis Hwy Kingsport, TN 37660 Job #: 057964Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Kingsport,Part Time Employee,"Kingsport, TN 37660",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Kingsport-TN-US-166734037.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=15,,Medical/Health,17019a867a138bd41d0277da3f198e63
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:07:31:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Malta  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Malta 59538,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-MALTA-166731991.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=19,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,35bdcd61316e04ad6614301fb5c2c0ba
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:07:48:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Megabyte Systems is the market leader in California Property Tax Systems, providing property tax accounting and auditing solutions to county government. We currently have an opportunity for a Programmer Analyst with a minimum of 5 years proven experience in the field. Job Duties: Developing, testing, debugging windows and web applications according to business analyst and user specifications. Modifying and updating existing programs to meet new legislation and user requirements. Communicating with analysts, users and management to coordinate and document application development and testing. Developing software prototypes. Evaluating existing systems to improve customer satisfaction. The individual must have the following skills: In depth knowledge of C#, WinForms, ASP.NET Web Forms/MVC/Web Pages, Web API, WCF, HTML5, JavaScript and SQL Server. Experience in Azure platform and Mobile app development is an advantage. The individual must be detail orientated with problem solving abilities in an analytical fashion. Ability to work in a fast-paced environment.  The successful candidate will also be able to demonstrate the ability to work independently and as part of a team and have effective communication skills, both written and oral. Bachelor’s degree in information systems or a related discipline. Benefits: Megabyte Systems offers an employee health plan, 401(k), paid vacation/sick time.  Pre-employment screening is requiredNot all submissions will result in a response",Programmer Analyst Job in Rocklin,Full Time,"Rocklin, CA 95677",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Programmer-Analyst-Job-Rocklin-CA-US-166175160.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9d475d8603a0ede8c452ad0cea04486b
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:07:49:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Adult Mobile Crisis program is designed to support adults (age 18 and over) in crisis in Rensselaer, Schenectady, Saratoga, Warren, and Washington counties. The outcomes include emergency room/inpatient hospital diversion when clinically appropriate and linkage to community-based services for ongoing treatment. The program will initially target higher risk individuals -- those with Serious and Persistent Mental Illness (SPMI) who have recently discharged from NYS Psychiatric facilities; Forensic Mental Health clients who have recently been released from NYS Correctional facilities; and individuals who are currently receiving Assisted Outpatient Treatment (AOT).  We are searching for a Clinician to join our team that services Saratoga, Warren and Washington Counties in NY State.  This position will be based out of offices in Glens Falls, NY. Under the direction of the Clinical Supervisor, the Clinician will provide crisis assessment, intervention, and stabilization services to adults (18 +) experiencing emotional, behavioral and psychiatric crises.  These interventions, provided by telephone triage and onsite mobile visits, will be implemented using a strength-based, trauma informed, systemic perspective and will include coordination of services with existing treatment providers and linkage to additional community-based therapeutic resources and supports. Essential duties:Provide immediate response to adults  who are experiencing an emotional or behavioral crisis, by phone and on-site within the 5 county service areaInterview caller to determine case formulation, including homicide/suicide risk.Conduct risk assessments and mental status examinationAnalyze information to identify action planConsult with team and supervisorDocument information in accordance with applicable standards.Coordinate with community services for collateral input and follow-up care.Provide crisis intervention to adults.Plan for safety and continuing care.Monitor implementation of action plan.Engage in advocacy for adults, as appropriate.  Required Experience Masters degree in mental health required, MSW or Mental Health Counseling preferredLCSW or LMHC licensure required2 - 5 years post-masters clinical experience required As an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer, Parsons will not discriminate in its employment practices due to an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, national origin, veteran or disability status, or any other protected classification.",Mental Health Social Worker Job in Queensbury,Full Time,"Queensbury, NY 12801",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/Mental-Health-Social-Worker-Job-Queensbury-NY-US-166671874.aspx?mescoid=2100317001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7bb557b4058eef9ea35660b70f033054
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:08:58:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The Physical Therapist Assistant has the responsibility and accountability for implementing care for the patients assigned physical therapy under the guidance and direction of a licensed Physical Therapist.  Physical Therapy is responsible for adhering to all standards of Physical Therapy Practice Act as they apply to providing technical therapy care, supplies, equipment and interventions to a designated patient population.This position requires providing services to Therapy Patients, ages between children/adolescents to geriatrics in a manner that demonstrates an understanding of the functional/developmental age of the individuals served.  This position requires the full understanding and active participation in fulfilling the Mission of CHRISTUS St. Patrick Hospital. It is expected that the associate demonstrate behavior consistent with the Core Values.  The associate shall support the CHRISTUS St. Patrick's strategic plan.  May require push/pull/lifting of 50-100 pounds.  May require partial lift or supporting of weight from 100-150 pounds during transfers or assisting patients in stance. Work requires sitting, bending, stretching, and walking.  May require prolonged standing and walking, lifting and moving patients, equipment and supplies.  Subject to danger of infection from disease-bearing specimens, exposed to odorous chemicals and specimens. Exposed to all patient elements: infectious diseases, chemicals, radiation, sharp tools / instruments, antineoplastic agents, combative patients / visitors, and electric shock. Current degree standards and Louisiana licensure required.  CPR training is required.  Visual acuity and perceptive mental abilities are necessary.  Will supervise Physical Medicine Aides.  Decision making skills are needed to carry out patient treatment and consult with physician and other providers.  Required to work Monday through Friday and weekends as scheduledJob Requirements Education and Training:  Associates degree from an accredited PTA school.  LA licensure.  Must complete all required CEU in order to maintain licensure. Experience:  New graduates accepted. Other: CPR certification, CPI Certification, FIM Certification",Licensed Physical Therapist Assistant Job in Lake Charles,"Full Time, Employee","Lake Charles, LA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Physical-Therapist-Assistant-Job-Lake-Charles-LA-US-166643900.aspx?mescoid=3100552001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,10ba68096e11f2e42610b32b07afdac4
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:08:59:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Caldwell  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Caldwell 83605,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-CALDWELL-166725987.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=2,,General/Other: Medical/Health,44c484783941aa2947ec8b9d64d2ab37
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:09:02:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"The importance of efficient and qualified administrative personnel in the medical field can't be overstated because accurate information is crucial for planning and managing hospital operations. This means that you make it possible for patients to receive the proper care.As a Patient Administration Specialist, you will make sure that hospital and patient information is recorded, stored, and delivered in order to keep everything running smoothly. Your responsibilities will include scheduling office visits and keeping patient records up to date at Army hospitals or other medical facilities.Health care is one of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Patient Administration Specialist experience to prepare for jobs in civilian hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, or rehabilitation centers. You may even qualify for related careers with insurance carriers, public health departments, or Government agencies.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Patient Administration Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and seven weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Patient Administration Specialist Job in Camp Douglas  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Camp Douglas 54618,,http://jobview.monster.com/Patient-Administration-Specialist-Job-CAMP-DOUGLAS-166742531.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=15,,General/Other: Medical/Health,588308ab4ee2789f78d144cf4944b79d
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:09:46:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you a talented System Administrator who is a continuous learner, passionate, and interested in developing Web-based Geo-Spatial capabilities for desktop and mobile applications? Do you want to be a part of a forward-thinking company with awesome culture and benefits?  If so, then we want to speak with you! Thermopylae Sciences and Technology (TST) is seeking experienced Windows Systems Administrators to join our growing team. The position is located at Shaw Air Force Base in South Carolina.Why work with TST:·        TST engineers are passionate and smart. We have a lot of flexibility in how we do our work, and take that responsibility very seriously.·        We care, we mentor and collaborate and give you room to grow professionally.·        We respect your skills and support career growth.Position Description:*Provide support in performing standard system administration which includes installation, configuration, operation, management, troubleshooting, repairing, upgrading, inspecting and maintaining server systems including administration of all core and functional services/systems for all of the organization's networks.*Administer core services, and support core and functional servers for JWICS, Secure Internet Protocol Router, Non-Secure Internet Protocol Router, Computing Services Directorate (CSD) and Combined Enterprise Regional Information Exchange System networks.*Ensure compliance with all security driven tasking orders. Load, configure and install operating systems for all Windows-based servers.*Build/test new Personal Computer client configurations.*Provide support to ensure a secure operating environment by monitoring user access and adherence to established policies and procedures.*Ensure adequate security measures are applied to servers/clients to ensure network protection.*Perform backups, restorations, and recovery of workstations/servers. Support site visits.*Detect, analyze, and resolve problems associated with hardware, operating system, and application software.*Make recommendations for commercial off-the-shelf (COTs) application upgrades and implementation of new applications.*Report all detected or known attempts of unapproved hardware/software installations or changes to a QAE or Government representative.*Support the USAFCENT network monitoring and analysis tools.*Provide support in providing desktop/server and software application integration support.*Provide technical staff assistance of all assigned projects pertaining to server inter-operability and integration requirements.*Support in managing domains to ensure proper collections, advertisements, and packages are properly distributed to keep client and servers properly patched and compliant with directives. The contractor shall provide support in performing account management and work with the ISM.Required:*Must hold ACTIVE TS/SCI clearance*Associates of Science degree in Computer Science or related field; 2 years’ experience being equivalent to 1 year of education*Microsoft Certified Solution Associate (MCSA)* 3+ years of experience in the field or in a related area*DoD 8570 IAT Level II Certification or higher (GSEC, Security+, SSCP, CASP, CISA, CISSP, or GCIH); ITILv3 CertificationWe abide by EEOC regulations. ",Windows System Administrator Job in Shaw Afb,Full Time,"Shaw Afb, SC 29152",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Windows-System-Administrator-Job-Shaw-AFB-SC-US-166657373.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),826a39eaaecb3c0616a50ffa4c634e52
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:09:46:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Hot Springs  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Hot Springs 71913,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-HOT-SPRINGS-166721581.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=4,,General/Other: Medical/Health,c74be1474a9b471056ab6537424d9b60
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:10:54:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Communication is the heartbeat of any Army National Guard unit. By joining the Army National Guard as a Signal Support Systems Specialist, you will keep the information flowing by making sure all communications equipment is in top working order. And while you maintain signal support devices and terminals in the Army National Guard, you will be building skills that will help you in your civilian career. Signal Support Systems Specialists are responsible for integrating signal systems and networks; performing signal support functions and unit-level maintenance on authorized signal equipment; and installing, operating, and maintaining radio and data distribution systems. In this role, you will train and provide technical assistance to users of signal equipment and learn to operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on vehicles and power generators. And as your skills increase, so will your responsibilities. Advanced team members supervise and train other Soldiers; maintain and install signal support systems and terminal devices; provide technical assistance and training for automation and communications equipment; prepare maintenance and supply requests for unit-level signal support; and operate and perform preventative maintenance checks and services on assigned vehicles. Plus, the skills you learn will prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in communications equipment, radio, and teletype repair. These skills are also in demand by the federal government. Civilian positions may require additional study in electronics, where you will have the opportunity to qualify for certification as an Associate Certified Electronics Technician. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend approximately 17 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training. This is where you will learn mechanical, electronic, and electrical principles; line installation; wiring techniques; preventative maintenance procedures; and communication security policies and procedures. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Signal Support Systems Specialist Job in Mustang  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Mustang 73064,,http://jobview.monster.com/Signal-Support-Systems-Specialist-Job-MUSTANG-166735556.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=19,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,b1651252ee0c9d7d42e21ff7a57a21e2
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:10:55:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"FULL-TIMELICENSED CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER (LCSW)    The Knox County HealthDepartment is seeking a full-time Licensed Behavioral HealthCounselor who possess sound clinical knowledge, crisis intervention skills, ability to engage clients as well as the capacity to empathize with the cultural, psychological and practical needs of the clients theDepartment serves. Position requires a current and unrestricted LCSWlicense with a minimum of two years post-master degree experience and sound working knowledge of delivery/billing practices required.    The Knox County Health Department is an EOC.    Interested applicants should email a cover letter and resume to: kcrafton@knoxcountyhealth.org For a full job descriptionvisit our website atwww.knoxcountyhealth.org",Social Worker (LCSW) Job in Galesburg,Full Time,"Galesburg, IL 61401",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Social-Worker-LCSW-Job-Galesburg-IL-US-166612616.aspx?mescoid=2100318001001&jobPosition=4,,,2dbdc5478deb16bd4c781ba396d44882
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:11:48:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Details: Desired Skills and Experience:  Working knowledge of CPM schedule Working knowledge of cost report and labor production report Thorough knowledge of corporate quality program Thorough knowledge of subcontract language Ability to work with and manage multiple people Excellent oral communication skills Basic computer knowledgeIf you hold these minimum qualifications, please send your resume to recruitment at mhopkins@libertyjobs.com along with professional references. Primary Responsibilities: Administer project safety program to maintain a safe and healthy work environment Develop and implement a site specific safety plan for each project assigned Supervise construction effort to ensure project is constructed in accordance with design. Thoroughly understand owner requirements, contract plans, contract specifications, and submittals Work with project team to set project goals Manage the project quality efforts, insure that all work required by the corporate quality plan is complete and accurate Manage project to meet budget and schedule requirements Assist project manager in developing monthly cost to complete Identify changes in the field, authorize field change requests, provide all documentation required to insure compensation for all work performed Approve all subcontractor requisitions Supervise all scheduling efforts Manage the project to meet schedule requirements including tracking progress against important dates, periodic communication of schedule requirements, and weekly subcontractor meetings",Commercial Construction Superintendent Job in Poughkeepsie,"Full Time , Employee","Poughkeepsie , NY",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-Construction-Superintendent-Job-Poughkeepsie-NY-US-166648555.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,IT/Software Development,b45e108ccceedfb5893170167bd7ff83
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:11:49:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Up to $5,000 Sign On Bonus for experienced Emergency Dept. RNs.   Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients.  Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care.  Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development.1. Incorporates the following values into the work environment:a.       Dignity:  demonstrates respect for the worth of every person, recognition and commitment to the value of diverse individuals and perspectives, and special concern for the poor and underserved.b.       Integrity:  demonstrates honesty, justice and consistency in all relationships.c.       Excellence:  demonstrates high standards of service and performance.d.       Compassion:  demonstrates service in a spirit of empathy, love and concern.e.       Stewardship: demonstrates wise and just use of talents and resources in a collaborative manner.As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment.   We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so.  Please click on the link below to get started.    https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx Job Requirements As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment.   We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so.  Please click on the link below to get started.   https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. 3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area.  There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliancewith all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Emergency-Room-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644030.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,86a9fc0a14328f1b29999b3245cb1663
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:12:08:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Jobs are in New Jersey and Phoenix ArizonaSome Third Party Vendor Candidates eligible, Green Cards Welcome also  Technical Skills:·  Certified LSA or SSA with 3-5 years’ experience·  Multiple years of experience leading PEGA teams both on and offshore·  Experience building PRPC based application·  Expert knowledge of the PRPC architecture, security model, and service interfaces·  Experience ensuring that systems are built for change, are reusable, and are maintainable·  Experience with SQL·  Understanding of OOPS and Java concepts Non-Technical Skills:·  Expert PRPC level knowledge based on in-depth experience and successful projects·  Experience Leading complex design projects·  Strong technical leadership and expert consultative skills·  Understands SDLC and AGILE/SCRUM Desired:·  Experience with Healthcare & Financial and PBM Domains",Pega Experts,Full Time,"Somerset, NJ 08873",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Pega-Experts-IMMEDIATE-OPENINGS-Job-Somerset-NJ-US-166755263.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=3,1.00 - 2.00 $ /year5,Experienced (Non-Manager),c16c0e37e5c50be7eb3e4a1608960298
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:12:43:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Substance Abuse CounselorOklahoma Treatment Services is currently seeking Substance Abuse Counselors with a CADC, LADC or under supervision. Qualified applicants will be responsible for providing substance abuse and behavioral health counseling to a culturally diverse population. Using the 12 core functions and SAMSHA evidence-based best practices in treatment and rehabilitation of clients, applicants will counsel and assist patients throughout treatment with the goal of helping them continue recovery and sobriety. Excellent benefits are provided, and salary is commensurate with experience. If you enjoy a fast-paced, recovery friendly environment, then please submit your resume. Work Hours: M-F 5:00am – 1:00pm, with rotating Saturdays, 6-9 a.m.",Substance Abuse Counselor Job in Oklahoma City,Full Time,"Oklahoma City, OK 73101",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Substance-Abuse-Counselor-Job-Oklahoma-City-OK-US-166355587.aspx?mescoid=2100309001001&jobPosition=12,"30,000.00 - 35,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),a8002d8fa0781fe912a4283a3f7e7ec6
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:12:43:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is seeking an IAM Systems Engineer for a contract located in Northbrook, IL. Description: Facilitate interaction with technology peers and architects to create complex technology solutions / estimates and provide guidance across the program Recommend solutions aligned to our architecture standards Collaborate closely with Business Analyst and core technology team to derive and direct alternative technology solution approaches that meet requirements Creation of program artifacts, as needed (i.e. functional design documents, non-functional requirements, operational readiness documents, production support documents, change orders, etc) Provide oversight and approvals for gating artifacts Oversee technical implementation of design Support planning and execution of all integration and product testing Participate in inspections of requirements, design, and code to ensure appropriate functionality implemented Assist in creation or support of entity models when required Assist in production implementation Experience/Skills Required: Experienced in broad and complex project and providing the full-range of systems solution services Able to lead and facilitate other SAs across multiple organizations Strong experience in a service-oriented architecture environment Experience in Identity and Access Management Industry Knowledge / Best Practices Preferred at least 10 years of experience as a Systems Analyst (SA) or architect Strong visual solutions documentation skills Ability to quickly assimilate knowledge of new technologies to the existing environment in order to assess effective overall solution design alternatives Able to organize and manage sub-groups of system analysis work based on priorities, driving multiple bodies of analysis in parallel Thought leadershipExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",IAM Systems Engineer Job in Northbrook,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,IAM Systems Engineer,"Northbrook, IL",http://jobview.monster.com/IAM-Systems-Engineer-Job-Northbrook-IL-US-166660804.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,ec4188f3b11f2a742216794d9084f768
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:12:57:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"LEAD CONFIGURATION & RELEASE ENGINEER – CONTRACT TO PERM – DURHAM, NCResponsible for providing assistance in building and using the development environment infrastructure; including continuous integration, build environments, testing platforms and testing automation frameworks; as well as integrating code, and performing end-to-end system testing.Lead Configuration & Release Engineer Skills & Requirements:• Bachelor’s Degree required; Advanced Degree preferred• 8 – 12 years’ related experience; or a Master’s degree with 6 years’ experience; or a PhD with 3 years’ experience; orequivalent directly related work experience.• Technical proficiency with highly specialized in Web-based technologies.• Release Management and code deployment experience.• Proven experience with the release management process and code deployments.• Excellent presentation and communication skills required.• Strong organization and process analysis skills required.• Complete understanding of the Software Development Life Cycle.• Outstanding verbal and written communication skills.• Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot complex technical issues.Follow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://raleigh.vereduscorp.com /Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Lead Configuration & Release Engineer Job in Raleigh,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Raleigh, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Configuration-Release-Engineer-Job-Raleigh-NC-US-157119005.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=15,43.00 - 46.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,54b47b3ea77fc42d7c1a7d0da9d9a64c
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:12:58:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Nursing - RN Registered Nurse                             White Glove Placement, Inc is seeking RN Registered Nurse for many open positions in Hospitals, Nursing Homes, Clinics, Corrections and Home Health.  Join a team of energetic and compassionate healthcare professionals, and as a RN Registered Nurse earn great salary and benefits!                                                       Additional information for RN Registered Nurse position: Per Diem, Full Time, Contract and Travel Nurse Assignments8, 10 or 12 hour shiftsPositions open in many specialty units including: Med/Surg, Telemetry, ICU, ER, L&D, OR, Cath Lab, NICU, PICU, Peds, Psych, Long Term Care, Clinics, Corrections, Home Health and MORE!  Benefits for RN Registered Nurse include excellent salaries, health and dental coverage, daily pay at participating facilities, direct deposit for your convenience and cash bonus for hours worked.  Requirements for RN Registered Nurse positions include: RN NYS LicenseCurrent or Recent experience as a Registered Nurse (RN) Eligibility to work in United States [Related keywords: rn, registered nurse, cath lab, cardiac cath lab, ep lab, electrophysiology, med/surg, telemetry, icu, er, ed, or, l&d, motherbaby, postpartum, nursery, nicu, picu, peds, psych, ltc, long term care, clinics, corrections, home health, healthcare, health care]  ",Nursing - RN Registered Nurse Job in New York City,Employee,"New York City, NY 10002",,http://jobview.monster.com/Nursing-RN-Registered-Nurse-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-163686031.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=9,,Medical/Health,064c646c271a2c9aa1dc453468ba0b59
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:13:46:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Background The CHEST Experience Team consists of a group of dedicated professionals excited about providing new technologies and excellent service to our staff, members, customers, and guests, ie, the CHEST Community, and improving their own professional skills and knowledge. The team as a whole is responsible for CHEST’s centrally managed support environment, which provides all of our VIPS (Very Individual Persons) an exceptional CHEST experience through support, education, and technology.  Primary Purpose Function as CHEST’s direct line for customers, using excellent support skills to exceed their expectations. Serve as their primary contact, consultant, and solutions provider, using strong communication, troubleshooting, and problem-solving skills.  Essential Functions/Responsibilities Provide friendly and efficient coverage over all incoming channels, eg, phone, e-mail, chat, etc, in support of the CHEST Community. Work with an array of tools to better assist the Community by using technology efficiently and effectively.  Assist with course registrations, product purchases, memberships, etc. Initiate appropriate action to fulfill each inquiry or request; this will include researching questions and preparing and sending relevant correspondence. Resolve product or service problems by clarifying the customer's inquiry; determine the cause of the problem, eg, issues with online access, mobile devices/apps, CHEST course cancellations, etc; select and explain the best solution to solve the problem within CHEST’s policies; expedite correction or adjustment; follow up to ensure appropriate resolution.  Support can be provided through e-mail, chat, or via the phone using remote assistance tools. Handle situations in the best interest of both the customer and CHEST. View support as a way to engage customers, not just solve problems. A willingness to suggest improvements that CHEST can implement to further enhance the customer experience. Maintain clean and accurate data in all of CHEST’s systems by updating records in all databases, including: names, addresses, phone numbers, e-mails, designations, and other vital customer information. Avoid entry of duplicate records. Maintain a style sheet. Develop and retain an excellent working knowledge of CHEST, its member programs, and benefits. Stay up to date with and follow ongoing process, product, and policy changes.  Other Functions/Responsibilities Support your team by answering questions, anticipating needs, and maintaining a positive attitude in the face of challenges. Build a culture of open and honest communication by offering and being open to receiving feedback. Recover effectively from a service failure while strengthening customer relationships. Test new procedures and updates. Document procedures and new processes via SOPs for Help Team staff. Work effectively with others, and perform to the best of personal abilities to successfully accomplish individual, departmental, and organizational goals. Engage staff, and help develop processes to deliver on our quality service commitment; focus on process improvement and delivery excellence. Ensure the privacy and security of confidential customer and host information. Participate in special projects as required. Accommodate occasional travel.  Required Skills You thrive on interactions with customers, as well as with team members. You derive a great amount of satisfaction from helping people. A love of technology; ease in working with and learning different technology systems. Great communication skills - able to provide clear and concise guidance via e-mails, over the phone, or in person. Strong writing skills, with a professional, confident, and empathetic tone. Excellent organizational skills, with an eye for detail and strong recollection of events. Attentive to the minutia that make service stand out. Innate ability to understand how to balance advocacy for CHEST and for the customer. Dependable and prompt; regular attendance essential for success.  Required Experience Combination of education and experience equivalent to a Bachelor’s degree. Minimum of three total years’ experience in the areas of customer support and/or call center environment. Familiarity with both Mac and PC, iOS and Android handheld devices.  Preferred Experience Association work experience. Familiarity with ticketing systems, notably Zendesk or Desk. Previous experience with an AMS/CMS (Association Management System/Content Management System) a plus, notably netFORUM.    ",CHEST Experience Call Specialist Job in Glenview Nas,Full Time,"Glenview Nas, IL 60026",Nonprofit Charitable Organizations,http://jobview.monster.com/CHEST-Experience-Call-Specialist-Job-Glenview-NAS-IL-US-166315642.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),00ddae183e9a086a1247d7172888f13a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:13:47:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce local healthcare client is looking for a Tableau Developer to sit in Seattle, WA. They will be told what to build and just need to execute/ implement. This person's function is to make data accessible to senior leadership by building Tableau Dashboards. Will be part of a BI / DW Group. There are various different people within the group who work on Tableau, Power BI and Business Objects. The company has not used much Tableau so it will be a lot of building new dashboards. Not maintenance work.REQUIREMENTS: Proficient in Tableau Adept at data manipulation, presentation, and analysis Referral dashboard Ancillary dashboardNice to have: SQL Healthcare experience Business Objects Power BI Experience with EPIC",Tableau Developer Job in Seattle,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Seattle, WA 98101",,http://jobview.monster.com/Tableau-Developer-Job-Seattle-WA-US-166667061.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),16002d37b9d3e835db04f25450caad6a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:00:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:No industry is moving faster than health care. And no organization is better positioned to lead health care forward. We need attention to every detail with an eye for the points no one has considered. The rewards for performance are significant. You'll help improve the health of millions. And you'll do your life's best work.(sm) The Senior Consultant - Health Pricing Solutions will primarily work with StepWise implementations, our automated rating & pricing system, and consult with clients on requirements gathering, system design, configuration, and implementation.  In addition to working on StepWise implementations, this role will involve advising clients on underwriting and financial projects, and supporting senior consultants as appropriate.  Primary Responsibilities: Expertise in rating systems is highly desirable - as a consultant, super user, or technical design/implementation subject matter expert Experience with user interface design and/or workflow design automation Hands-on professional experience in using Excel and SQL-based systems to solve business problems/achieve clients' expectations Senior level understanding of industry issues, changes, and potential impacts and opportunities for the StepWise consulting team Able to understand our clients' business and place within the market, and act as a main point of contact both during a project and after implementation is complete Able to clearly and understandably articulate goals and expectations, relating them to the client's business mission and direction Capable of managing a variety of issues while driving momentum of key projects Able to direct segments of work and manage deliverables Consultative and capable of meeting multiple project deadlines with minimal supervision Establishes trust and credibility at all levels of the organization Serves as a subject matter expert for others Experience presenting material to peers and clients Communicates clearly either over the phone or in person Tailor language to the audience, initiates appropriate communications with others, is tactful and listens well Generally work is self-directed and not prescribed Works with less structured, more complex issuesQualifications:Required Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in Finance, Business, Actuarial Science, Math, Economics or a related degree or equivalent experience 5+ years of experience working in a corporate environment 2+ years of experience working in the healthcare industry (commercial and group business lines) Advanced user of Microsoft Excel, including complex formulas, calculations, macros, etc. Basic level of proficiency with MS Word and Access or experience working with other databases Basic level of proficiency with SQLPreferred Qualifications:Experience in an Underwriting and/or Actuarial role highly preferred Experience with user interface design and/or workflow design Experience working with the StepWise Suite Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm)  Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.  Job Keywords: interface design, workflow, actuary, underwriting, Stepwise, Eden Prairie, MN, Englewood, CO, Duluth, GATravel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Data & Research Analytics CnslBusinessSegment: OptumInsight Division: Ops Consulting DeliveryModel: Platinum ContestNumber: 642422 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Exempt",Senior Consultant - Health Pricing Solutions - Multiple Locations Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time,"Eden Prairie, MN",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Consultant-Health-Pricing-Solutions-Multiple-Locations-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-165577764.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),488df874f28f76bd438a99dba575b0a1
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:01:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Overview:Xceed Group is a leading global IT professional services Consultancy Company formed in 2003, bringing together experienced IT professionals who share the vision to build long term client relationships through the consistent and reliable delivery of professional IT services.  Our company has over 10 years of experience delivering IT solutions to Fortune 500 clients within Financial Services, Telecommunications, Media and Energy markets. Our core skills have developed from pure technology through to IT Infrastructure & Application Integration and Business Change, with strong Project and Program Management always at the core.Role: Infrastructure Delivery Manager/Technical Project Manager Requirements and Responsibilities: ·        Perform Infrastructure / Client delivery topology builds ·        Perform data center POP/ Infrastructure builds and ensure successful client delivery ·        Client delivery topology requires Networks, Carrier and Delivery topology build, and implementation ·        Provide full lifecycle project management and governance including creating project plans, reports, stakeholder management, and risk mitigation ·        Experience in Financial Services networks ·        Deep carrier experience required·        Background in Network Engineering Duration:6 month+ contract Location:Creve Couer, MO",Infrastructure Project Manager/Delivery Manager Job in Saint Louis,Full Time,"Saint Louis, MO 63141",,http://jobview.monster.com/Infrastructure-Project-Manager-Delivery-Manager-Job-Saint-Louis-MO-US-166745414.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=12,competitive market rate,Experienced (Non-Manager),28d688eed686a0cbba9fe32d1ad55e7d
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:01:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"You feel like you were born to diagnose software issues. You've been tinkering with computers since you could hold a mouse. You are the person that all your friends and relatives come to when they have trouble using an application. You love it when you can duplicate a bug in a program and call the vendor to report it.  You are a problem solver.Primary DutiesOffice Practicum is already deployed to practices nationwide.  The ideal candidate will help these clients in the following ways:Remotely connect to customer computers to diagnose and solve issues.Work with customers to setup and configure new applications and interfaces that work with Office Practicum.Review and enhance our knowledge base/documentation.Demonstrate problems to development staff, working with them to address newly discovered issues.Minimum QualificationsMay be required to work a modified schedule that includes evening or Saturday hoursProblem solving skills are a must as you work with customers to address their issues.You need a Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university, preferably in a technical or science domain.Proficiency in Windows (XP,Vista,7, Server 2003/08) system administration and security is required. (active directory, file and print services).  Basic knowledge of Linux is a plus.Strong communication, interpersonal and organizational skills are mandatory.  Our customers are doctors helping patients.  They need our help so they can do their job.Must be a team player and willing to take on additional responsibilities as needed.The ideal candidate is a multi-tasking self-starter with analytical, planning and problem solving skills.  ",Technical Support Guru Job in Horsham,Full Time,"Horsham, PA 19044",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/Technical-Support-Guru-Job-Horsham-PA-US-166752297.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=17,bonuses,Experienced (Non-Manager),185f5312761a0c626fdf0689b7723f59
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:01:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time (12 hour shift Sundays)Brookdale Greenwood Village 6450 South Boston Street Greenwood Village, CO 80111 Job #: 055278aBrookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * One to two years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Greenwood Village,Part Time Employee,"Greenwood Village, CO 80111",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Greenwood-Village-CO-US-166744577.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=8,,Medical/Health,a9cf9984b1d15adf8afa97123e277ac6
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:01:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"10947 Sr. Security Systems EngineerFull-time/ PermSan Antonio, TX Please review carefully and let us know if you would like to pursue. When responding, please show complete name and current location as well as phone and email contact information. · No visa sponsorship available and no 3rd party resumes please.· Candidates must be able to interview in person, if requested by client.· Must be willing to work at client site.  Overview:The Senior Security Systems Engineer is responsible for the development and implementation of technical systems and controls necessary to safeguard client’s information and assets. Will work directly with other IT staff for the purpose of protecting the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of proprietary, personal, and privileged data. Team size: 9-12  Education: Preferred bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent combination or experience and education Professional Security certification preferred (e.g. CISSP, CISM, GIAC, CEH)  Experience & Background: ·        Five (5) or more years of experience with a concentration in IT security.·        Experience in Windows and/or Unix/Linux environments.·        Ability to translate customer requirements into advanced technical solutions.·        Expert knowledge in the design and implementation of advanced security solutions. ·        Experience working with packet capture technologies & performing packet analysis. ·        Experience with user and system authentication methodologies, SSO, data-authentication methods, and authorization options (role-based authorization using Active Directory attributes) required. ·        Experience with free and commercial system monitoring and security tools/protocols. ·        Experience with database and reporting tools. ·        Experience applying security technology and techniques to satisfy HIPAA and PCI requirements; Familiar with PCI, SSAE16. ·        Experience with Cisco.·        Experience with various anti malware clients. ·        Websense experience is big plus.     Essential Responsibilities: 1. Develop and communicate strategy related to security tools and capabilities 2. Draft, implement, and maintain enterprise security technical controls and related infrastructure systems for the HVHC enterprise 3. Design, develop and implement security-related systems and/or technologies. 4. Partner with information technology teams in the design and implementation of systems, applications, processes, and/or other related technologies to adhere to security and compliance best practices, regulations, laws, and/or company programs, procedures, policies and guidelines 5. Function as the security technical SME for security related incidents; Perform forensic analysis of security incidents 6. Assess and respond to known and new security threats 7. Support other IT organizations in the diagnosis of potential security incidents 8. Manage Security Information & Event Management systems to include logic and automation functions 9. Coordinate maintenance of security-related systems (Anti-malware, Intrusion Prevention, Logging, Anti-spam, etc.) 10. Develop software and/or configure system automation framework tools to automate repetitive tasks. 11. Function as SME for IPS, DLP, WSG, and other security systems and services. 12. Apply modern security technologies to the design and integration of enterprise application infrastructures. 13. Manage vulnerability and penetration testing services and vulnerability assessments. Implement and assist with gap remediation. 14. Support internal, customer, and independent audits, as necessary 15. Maintain current knowledge of industry trends in security and compliance 16. Conduct internal and external research to gather data and accomplish objectives. ",Sr. Security Systems Engineer Job in San Antonio,Full Time,"San Antonio, TX 78205",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Security-Systems-Engineer-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166669849.aspx?mescoid=1500125001001&jobPosition=19,Compet Mrkt Rate,Experienced (Non-Manager),155589179f54442ad541efbb6a5e2a41
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:03:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Gardena  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Gardena 90249,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-GARDENA-166722361.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,492e4261026e5d164c1205a15d70828c
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:03:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"MEDUSTRIAL HEALTHCARE STAFFING SERVICE (GREER LOCATION) ARE SEARCHING FOR CNA'S,  ACROSS THE UPSTATE FOR FULL TIME, PART TIME, AND PRN EMPLOYEES.WEEK DAY SHIFTS AVAILABLE (MON-FRI): DAYS, EVENINGS, OVERNIGHTSWEEKEND SHIFTS AVAILABLE (SAT-SUN): DAYS, EVENINGS, OVERNIGHTS Positions are available for hospitals, skilled nursing facilities, nursing homes, assisted living, correctional facilities, sitters, and others.Flexible hours available (you tell us the days/hours YOU can work each week) Pay is determined by position and by experience. Referral Bonus program available. Background and drug testing required. All required medical (PPD, flu vac, etc) Proof of license or certification required. CPR/BLS required. Please submit your resume to bwhite@condustrial.com Locations vary across the Upstate, we try to keep you close to the area you live in.Job Purpose:Serves patients by providing educational information; helping with daily living; monitoring vital signs and functions; administering medications.Duties: * Educates patients and their families by assisting in preoperative, postoperative, and relevant health teaching. * Administers medications by preparing medications; administering specified medication orally or by subcutaneous or intermuscular injection; recording dosage and time in patient record; maintaining logs. * Provides ancillary medical care by dressing wounds; giving enemas, douches, alcohol rubs, and massages; applying compresses, ice bags, and hot water bottles. * Maintains patient stability by taking and recording vital signs. * Maintains patient nutrition by examining food trays for prescribed diet; feeding patients; recording food and fluid intake and output. * Helps patients with daily living by bathing, dressing, and assisting patients in walking and turning. * Keeps nursing supervisors informed by observing patients and reporting adverse reactions to medication or treatment. * Maintains equipment and supplies by keeping catheters, tracheotomy tubes, and oxygen supplies available. * Performs routine laboratory tests by collecting samples, such as urine, blood, and sputum. * Prepares cadavers for motuary by washing and dressing deceased persons. * Serves and protects the hospital community by adhering to professional standards, hospital policies and procedures, federal, state, and local requirements, and jcaho standards. * Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations. * Enhances nursing and hospital reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Administering Medication, Pain Management, Nutrition, Informing Others, Hospital Environment, Bedside Manner, Nursing Skills, Listening, Multi-tasking, Medical Teamwork, Acute/Critical Care",Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN) Job in Spartanburg,Part Time Employee,"Spartanburg, SC 29301",Healthcare ServicesStaffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Spartanburg-SC-US-166750459.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=1,20.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,Medical/Health,9e2c060f714020de810d4958910eaf32
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:03:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development. Job Responsibilities Nursing Process 1. Uses critical thinking skills to assess the basic physical, psychological, social, cultural, spiritual, and developmental needs of patients and families. Communicates findings to appropriate healthcare team members. a. Collects data from all applicable resources; organizes assessment data so that it is complete and accessible; and then documents findings (legibly) in the medical record or other appropriate documents. b. Recognizes alterations in health status, anticipates onset of patient care crisis situation and communicates findings appropriately. c. Assesses, reassesses, and manages pain. 2. Develops and uses a specific plan of care and modifies it to meet individual patient needs using evidence-based practices. Implements patient care and therapeutic procedures. Monitors and documents progression of treatment and teaching goals. a. Identifies and prioritizes the patient's present/potential problems. b. Plans appropriate nursing interventions specific to the patient's problems, incorporating the patient's cultural, age-specific, and developmental needs. c. Competently performs nursing interventions and procedures for the patient population (s) served consistent with scientific principles of nursing and policy and procedure. d. Provides education to patients and family concerning diagnosis, treatment, and hospitalization. e. Reviews and updates plan of care according to patient's needs and/or regulatory agency requirements. f. Documents and involves patient, family, and other healthcare workers in plan of care decisions in accordance with HIPAA requirements. 3. Evaluates the care and treatments provided to the patient and the patient response to the care and treatments. Performs timely re-assessment and documentation: a. Evaluates patient's response to treatment/care and modifies plan of care as needed. b. Evaluates patient and/or significant others ability to perform self care and procedures prior to discharge. c. Records patient's response to prescribed treatment and other significant data. Patient Throughput/ Patient Flow Process 1. Anticipates admission/discharge/transfer needs to facilitate patient flow. a. Identifies potential/actual discharge/transfer needs of patients upon admission and as patients' conditions change. b. Identifies need for and/or follows-up on referrals to ensure identified problems are addressed. c. Incorporates other disciplines into plan of care according to patient's needs. d. Evaluates patients and/or significant other's understanding of discharge instructions based on ability to verbalize and/or give return demonstration. e. Expedites admission/discharges/transfers. f. Participates in a process of communication with the multi-disciplinary team to facilitate the progress of the patient through the continuum of care. Unit Operations 1. Demonstrates good stewardship in proper use and maintenance of equipment and supplies. a. Coordinates the selection of supplies and equipment in a cost effective manner. b. Charges for supplies/procedures appropriately. c. Ensures availability and organization of supplies and equipment for patient care. d. Performs and documents emergency equipment checks as assigned. e. Removes and returns discontinued supplies and equipment. f. Removes broken equipment from area immediately and initiates a work order. g. Ensures and documents that all alarms (patient and equipment) are functional. Safe Practice/ Quality Care/ Regulations 1. Incorporates patient safety practices/guidelines to promote a safe environment resulting in positive patient outcomes. a. Demonstrates accountability for nursing research and quality improvement Activities. b. Demonstrates knowledge and skill in administering medications. 2. Completes medication reconciliation upon admission, transfer, and discharge. 3. Reviews physician's orders for clarity and accuracy, legibility & appropriate authenticity (name, title, date, time, etc.). 4. Follows the restrictions on abbreviations and does not use abbreviations on the ""Do Not List"". Uses only approved abbreviations. 5. Transcribes telephone orders per policy. 6. Administers, documents, and evaluates medications according to policy and procedure. 7. Instructs patient on medication including: expected effects, side effects, and possible food or medication interactions and documents instructions. 8. Recognizes, reports, and documents medication errors and adverse drug reactions. a. Uses patient identifiers as defined by policy. b. Communicate patient information effectively across the continuum of care. 9. Uses an approved hand-off communication format consistently. 10. Follows the universal protocol, e.g. time out. 11. Uses SBAR to communicate changes in patient condition. 12. Follows the Chain of Command. 13. Critical values are reported in a timely manner in accordance with policy. 14. Sets clinical alarms according to equipment parameters and responds rapidly to the alarms. a. Initiates the Rapid Response team in response to deterioration in patient condition. b. Demonstrates safe patient handling practices. c. Promotes a safe patient care environment including compliance with restraint policy and rounding. d. Implements processes to prevent falls, pressure ulcers, and other hospital-acquired complications. e. Assures compliance with core measure implementation and documentation, e.g. SCIP, CHF, AMI, CAP. f. Identifies, corrects and/or reports patient safety and/or environmental safety hazards at the time of discovery. g. Demonstrates proper infection control and isolation techniques including providing appropriate information concerning isolation precautions and patient status to patient, family, and/or significant others and/or other disciplines. h. Adheres to CHRISTUS policies and procedures and the standards of the Joint Commission, OSHA, DHHS, HIPAA, etc. Leadership 1. Serves as a leader of patient care. a. Guides and supervises other nursing staff in the operational activities in assigned area. b. Promptly recognizes and attempts to reinforce appropriate behavior and attempts to correct inappropriate behavior in self and co-workers. c. Delegates nursing and non-nursing functions according to standards. d. Participates in leadership activities including community activities, e.g. charge/team leader, council participation, preceptor/coach, unit education, staff/council meetings. e. Assumes responsibility for currency of knowledge and skills including participating in unit-level meetings and all mandatory education activities sponsored by the facility. f. Identifies and corrects inconsistencies in nursing procedures/techniques. g. Participates in implementing performance improvement and change activities. h. Assists in teaching and evaluating other personnel as assigned. i. Contributes to the learning experience of students and new employees. j. Acts as a resource person. k. Communicates the intensity of work load and collaborates with nursing leadership to meet patient care needs and unit activity. Job Requirements Qualifications 1. Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.2. BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required.3. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients.4. Good communication skills, both written and verbal.Bachelor of Science in Nursing (BSN) preferred ""Working Conditionsand Physical Requirements"" 1. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods.2. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly.3. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies.4. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications.5. Required to lift and move patients.6. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists.7. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area. There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.).8. Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone.Other 1. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department.2. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served.3. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities.4. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties.5. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate.6. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa.7. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN Telemetry (Night Shift) Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Telemetry-Night-Shift-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644043.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,7ddb59e42331a25c6717134b744dfa9d
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:04:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Production Coordinator in California, (CA). Duties: Assist with operations, including procurement, tech transfer, research paper submissions, budget tracking, and legal approvals Manage external coordination with vendors, stakeholders, and academic partners towards specific project goals Document processes and facilitate communication between the lab and external partners Report on status, progress, and issues as needed to management and dependent teamsREQUIREMENTS: 3 years of project management on successful, large-scale, cross-functional projects Excellent organization, planning skills, and attention to detail Experience solving problems in a fast-paced, dynamic environment, working with smart people to find solutions Proven ability to operate autonomously with light direction Excellent interpersonal and communication skills Able to maintain a positive attitude, be a source of team morale, and be composed and effective in a fast-paced dynamic environment",Production Coordinator Job in Menlo Park,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Menlo Park, CA 94025",,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Coordinator-Job-Menlo-Park-CA-US-166669293.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),053855a23816eea601377547be0b1452
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:24:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHRISTUS HomeCare of Shreveport is looking for a Licensed Medical Social Worker who will be a member of the Hospice Interdisciplinary Team (IDT). The MSW will provide Social Work Services based on initial and ongoing assessments of the patients and families needs and in accordance with the IDT Plan of Care. Assumes responsibility for a patient/family caseload and on-call. Supports the patient's unique spiritual and cultural beliefs in an effort to maintain the patient's dignity. * Graduate from an accredited school of social work, preferably a Master's degree in Social Work * Minimum one (1) year health care experience in a medical facility (hospital, rehabilitation center, home health, hospice, where team approach is utilized preferred) * Current LMSW/LBSW Certification * Must have a current state driver's license with current automobile insuranceEqual Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",FT Licensed MSW-Hospice &HH Job in Shreveport,"Full Time, Employee","Shreveport, LA 71101",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/FT-Licensed-MSW-Hospice-HH-Job-Shreveport-LA-US-166626808.aspx?mescoid=2100318001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,16c1f84514ba9d8c1fd08dede2832cc1
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:38:38,No,jobs.monster.com,Job Description Lead Level. Works with physicians and multidisciplinary team members to develop a plan of care for each assigned patient from admission through discharge. Ensures patient is progressing towards desired outcomes by continuously monitoring patient care through assessments and/or evaluations. Assesses and responds to patient/family needs by coordinating efforts of other team members. Identifies and resolves barriers that hinder effective patient care.Job Requirements Experience: 5+ years. Education: Minimum of an Associate's Degree and Registered Nurse license required.,Lead Case Manager RN,"Full Time, Employee","Beaumont, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Lead-Case-Manager-RN-Case-Management-Job-Beaumont-TX-US-166643976.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,635a015b636ea9b0a6f16c5561f4810d
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:38:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Diagnose, manage, and treat conditions and diseases of the human eye and visual system. Examine eyes and visual system, diagnose problems or impairments, prescribe corrective lenses, and provide treatment. May prescribe therapeutic drugs to treat specific eye conditions. Essential Duties and Major responsibilities: ·        Examine eyes, using observation, instruments and pharmaceutical agents, to determine visual acuity and perception, focus and coordination and to diagnose diseases and other abnormalities such as glaucoma or color blindness.·        Analyze test results and develop a treatment plan.·        Prescribe, supply, fit and adjust eyeglasses, contact lenses and other vision aids.·        Prescribe medications to treat eye diseases if state laws permit.·        Educate and counsel patients on eye care, contact lens care, visual hygiene, lighting arrangements and safety factors.·        Consult with and refer patients to ophthalmologist or other health care practitioner if additional medical treatment is determined necessary.·        Ability to deal with sensitive information in a highly confidential manner.]·        Effective communication skills, both oral and written, with patients, families, visitors, co-workers, health care professionals, funders, and other regulatory agencies.·        Works as part of team.·        Awareness of resources available within the health center to accommodate the needs of patients.·        Demonstrate understanding and commitment of the health center mission.·        Demonstrate understanding and commitment to the established CHC Values and Standards.·        Performs other duties as assigned. Minimum Qualifications:·        Requires a doctorate in optometry (OD) with a Massachusetts therapeutics level optometry license, and be board certification in optometry.·        Current Massachusetts Controlled Substances required.·        Requires an active commitment to excellence in patient care, a desire to improve wellness of our community, an appreciation for community needs, a culturally competent individual, and someone who is excited about the opportunity to build the eye service.·        Minimum of five years professional experience preferred·        Public Health experience preferred.·        Bilingual Preferred.·        Proficient reading, writing, and speaking in English requiredQualified applicants please submit your resume and cover letter to hr@chcfhc.org or mail to Community Health Connections, Inc., ATTN: HR Dept., 326 Nichols Road, Fitchburg, MA  01420 or fax to 978-878-8459.EOE",Optometrist-Per Diem Job in Fitchburg,Full Time,"Fitchburg, MA 01420",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Optometrist-Per-Diem-Job-Fitchburg-MA-US-165548185.aspx?mescoid=2900461001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),69b992377d9a68c4e54ccb4dc7c80086
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:53:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"We're looking for a Tier 1 Software Support for our friendly, fast-growing client with a collaborative, team-focused culture. We take pride in doing our jobs well and helping our clients make the most of their technology. We look for people who have not just the technical skills but also the communication ability to work well with clients no matter their level of tech-savvy. We strive to offer our customers service that is unparalleled in the technology industry. Our goal is to resolve all issues as fast as possible with minimal interruption to the client. The consultant must be able to present a professional physical appearance, be able to clearly and professionally communicate both orally and in writing. They should be outgoing and people oriented with a strong focus on customer service. Attention to detail with strong follow through and follow up is of paramount importance as well as anticipating and addressing problems before they impact an end user. This is a 12+month contract opportunity. Required Experience: 1-2 years of Tier 1 Software support.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Tier  Software support Job in San Mateo,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Tier 1 Software support,"San Mateo, CA",http://jobview.monster.com/Tier-1-Software-support-Job-San-Mateo-CA-US-166668679.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=7,,IT/Software Development,9edd44914abd92d0fc1f32f5298b2847
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:56:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title:  Development DirectorLocation:  McLean, VAWe are currently seeking a Development Director for a contract to perm position located in McLean, VA.  This role requires someone who has both project experience and application support experience.  Candidates must have experience building data stores and thinking strategically about moving data and accessing data.  In addition, candidates must have experience managing production support.  Must have experience delivering data projects, managing large scale projects, and managing production support teams.  Candidates must also have experience managing people.  Experience with MPP Columnar databases, Big Data Hadoop, or SQL databases is highly desirable.Please send resumes directly to:Cheryl BlackSr. Technical Recruitercblack@inscopeinternational.com",Development Director Job in West Mclean,Full Time,"West Mclean, VA 22102",,http://jobview.monster.com/Development-Director-Job-West-McLean-VA-US-166612428.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=16,"160,000.00 - 170,000.00 $ /year30-35k bonus incentives",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),6118e372dc12a5a60bc3183a172314f9
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:14:57:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Adaptive Solutions Group is a premier provider of information technology personnel. We provide a variety of technical professionals available for contract, contract to hire, or direct placement positions to companies in and around the Kansas City, St. Louis, Denver, and Dallas Areas. We are currently looking for a Customer Support Specialist to join our team. Responsibilities·         Coordinate the processing of external customer security access requests. ·         Develop and maintain an advanced working knowledge of business-related applications, products, services, electronic access platforms, Operating Circulars, Regulations, etc.·         Consider potential exceptions and issue appropriate credentials by accessing multiple web-based tools. ·         Process and examine customer requests timely and accurately while adhering to strict information security controls and procedures.·         Provide high quality, professional and timely customer service to internal and external customers.·         Manage inbound and outbound customer calls to complete customer requests.·         Ensure sensitive information is secured and only authorized contacts are given the information.·         Utilize multiple applications and databases to set-up, maintain, retrieve, and relay accurate, relevant, and comprehensive customer profiles, records, and documentation. ·         Performs other duties as assigned. Required Qualifications·         High school level command of spelling, grammar and math, and/or basic vocational training.·         Knowledge of end-to-end processes and procedures for a fast-paced and changing environment. ·         Must be able to adjust to additional responsibilities and adapt processes to available technologies. ·         Three years of job related experience and/or one to two years of relevant business administration course work. ·         A minimum of two years of general customer service experience is required.·         Advanced typing skills (40 WPM).·         Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work well in a team.·         Demonstrated ability to understand and apply department standard operating policies and procedures and industry specific regulations and laws.·         Strong organizational skills and ability to multi-task and prioritize work/deadlines. Preferred Qualifications·         Previous business knowledge is preferred.·         A minimum of two years of experience with electronic access products and services preferred.  Adaptive Solutions Group offers a competitive compensation and benefits package that includes medical, dental, STD/LTD, life insurance coverage, 401k, paid vacation and holidays.",Customer Support Specialist Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, MO 64198",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Customer-Support-Specialist-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-166745382.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=13,,Entry Level,60b8a54e303d86001e855195c50b610e
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:05:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Registered Nurse NICU Racine, WIUSA Company: Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare- All SaintsLocation: All Saints- St. Luke's Health Pavilion 3821 SpringFTE: 0.75Shift: 3rdShift Start Time: 1900Shift End Time: 0730At Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare - All Saints our nurses: provide and coordinate nursing care to include the collection and analysis of assessment data in determining nursing diagnosis, identification of expected outcomes and development of plan of care. collaborate with the patient/family and other interdisciplinary team members as appropriate. identify interventions to attain expected outcomes. implement interventions identified in the plan of care, evaluate the progress of the patient/family toward attainment of outcomes, and document the process. This care includes sensitivity to age specific and unique needs of the patient/family. ScheduleThis is a night shift role working 12 hour shifts from 7pm-7:30am, 60 hours per two-week pay period, with a weekend rotation. Flexibility to work other shifts as needed. This opportunity is eligible for part-time benefits.Skills/Requirements: Graduate from a state accredited school of nursing, BSN preferred, with an active Wisconsin RN license. Once hired, our Registered Nurses must maintain current Health Care Provider Basic Life Support card and Neonatal Resuscitation Provider card. We are looking for individuals who will be flexible in scheduling to meet the twenty-four hour needs of our patients. Candidates must possess: strong organizational, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills. the ability to utilize effective and confidential communication in patient, interdisciplinary, and staff relationships. the ability to maintain stable performance levels under conditions of pressure and multiple demands.Minimum of 2 years nursing experience required, NICU experience strongly preferred. #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Registered Nurse NICU Job in Racine,"Full Time , Employee","Registered Nurse NICU Racine, WIUSA Company: Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare- All SaintsLocation: All Saints- St. Luke's Health Pavilion 3821 SpringFTE: 0.75Shift: 3rdShift Start Time: 1900Shift End Time: 0730At Wheaton Franciscan Healthcare - All Saints our nurses: provide and coordinate nursing care to include the collection and analysis of assessment data in determining nursing diagnosis, identification of expected outcomes and development of plan of care. collaborate with the patient/family and other interdisciplinary team members as appropriate. identify interventions to attain expected outcomes. implement interventions identified in the plan of care, evaluate the progress of the patient/family toward attainment of outcomes, and document the process. This care includes sensitivity to age specific and unique needs of the patient/family. ScheduleThis is a night shift role working 12 hour shifts from 7pm-7:30am, 60 hours per two-week pay period, with a weekend rotation. Flexibility to work other shifts as needed. This opportunity is eligible for part-time benefits.Skills/Requirements: Graduate from a state accredited school of nursing, BSN preferred, with an active Wisconsin RN license. Once hired, our Registered Nurses must maintain current Health Care Provider Basic Life Support card and Neonatal Resuscitation Provider card. We are looking for individuals who will be flexible in scheduling to meet the twenty-four hour needs of our patients. Candidates must possess: strong organizational, problem-solving, and critical thinking skills. the ability to utilize effective and confidential communication in patient, interdisciplinary, and staff relationships. the ability to maintain stable performance levels under conditions of pressure and multiple demands.Minimum of 2 years nursing experience required, NICU experience strongly preferred. #TrackingJobBody br{line-height:2px;}",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-NICU-Job-Racine-WI-US-166650130.aspx?mescoid=2900501001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),418d08dbeeec3e6e6c02abb7497814a1
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:13:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION:As a Director of Nursing you will plan, implement and administer programs and services in a health care or medical facility, including personnel administration, training, and coordination of healthcare staff.Additional responsibilities of the Director of Nursing include:� Conducting and administering fiscal operations, including accounting, planning budgets, and authorizing expenditures.� Directing, supervising and evaluating work activities of healthcare personnel� Reviewing and analyzing facility activities and data to aid planning and to improve service utilization.� Directing or conducting recruitment, hiring and training of personnel.QUALIFICATIONS:To qualify for the Director of Nursing, you must have effective communication skills and be able to work with individuals of all ages and be able to lead a team of healthcare professionals.Additional requirements of the Director of Nursing include:� Current active and valid Licensure or certification.� Bachelor�s Degree, preferred.� Excellent communication skills.� Ability to organize and prioritize with good interpersonal skills.� CPR Certification or ability to achieve upon employment.� Basic Computer Skills.CONTACT INFORMATION:Good Samaritan SocietyScott Gydesen401 South 22nd StBeatrice, NE 68310If questions call 402-228-8548*gss**If you need assistance to complete this application or during the interview process such as sign language interpreters, readers or other accommodations, please contact the person listed.",Director of Nursing (Healthcare Management / Registered Nurse) Job in Wymore,Full Time Employee,"Wymore, NE",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Director-of-Nursing-Healthcare-Management-Registered-Nurse-Job-Wymore-NE-US-166178075.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=12,,Medical/Health,857fce16b505ec9778f4fb05b29a38e0
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:13:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Center for Animal Referral & Emergency Services (CARES) is currently seeking a personable and dedicated Board Certified or Board Eligible Radiologist to join our team! Our group values a collaborative and collegial approach providing our clients and patients premier medicine in a compassionate environment. Our specialty services consist of anesthesiology, cardiology, clinical pathology, dentistry and oral surgery, diagnostic imaging, emergency and critical care, internal medicine, medical oncology, neurology, ophthalmology, and surgery. We have a large referral base that allows for an interesting variety of cases, and our 24/7 Emergency Services ensures cohesive patient care. Our diagnostic imaging service is equipped with digital radiology, ultrasound, 16 slice GE Lightspeed CT, and on-site GE 1.0T MRI. An IDEXX reference laboratory including an onsite full time clinical pathologist is also located within the building. We are a well-equipped, advanced facility, but we remain an approachable, friendly and collaborative family.  Our internal medicine and surgery departments strive to provide the latest minimally invasive techniques, and we are excited to expand to also include interventional radiology spearheaded by our diagnostic imaging department. CARES is located in beautiful Bucks County, just north of Philadelphia. The area offers easy access to the Philadelphia and New York metro regions, the Jersey shore, and the Pocono Mountains. Opportunities for shopping, fine dining, outdoor activities, and participation in cultural activities are plentiful. We offer a generous benefits package including compensation, production bonus or percentage, health, dental and vision insurance, 401k, vacation and CE allowance. We are excited to hear from those ACVR board certified or board eligible candidates with the capacity and drive to help us continue to provide the best service to our clients and patients. If you’re looking for an opportunity for growth and leadership with a friendly, happy team that values a healthy work life balance, look no further and apply today!Please visit our website at vetcares.com to learn more about our practice",Board Certified or Board Eligible Veterinary Radiologist! Job in Langhorne,Full Time,"Langhorne, PA 19047",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Board-Certified-or-Board-Eligible-Veterinary-Radiologist!-Job-Langhorne-PA-US-166657091.aspx?mescoid=2900480001001&jobPosition=19,,,e0d90fb045c9fa1b940946dfa6b5fb98
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:13:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Fuel. Without it the Army can't move. It's as simple as that. The Army National Guard Petroleum Laboratory Specialist's sole focus is ensuring the quality, purity, and durability of all fuels, oils, and greases used in Army operations.As a Petroleum Laboratory Specialist, you will supervise or conduct laboratory tests on petroleum, oil, and lubricant products. Specific duties may include: obtaining or receiving petroleum product samples; conducting laboratory tests for contaminants, strength, and toxic qualities; evaluating test results against specification requirements; making recommendations regarding product disposition; following fire prevention and safety control procedures; testing on clothing, food, paints, and plastics; and keeping detailed laboratory records and files.Plus, you'll be building a better future. The skills you learn as a Petroleum Laboratory Specialist will help prepare you for a civilian career with petroleum refineries, chemical companies, manufacturing firms, or government agencies. Civilian laboratory technicians often specialize in a particular industry, such as petroleum, food processing, or medical drugs.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for a Petroleum Laboratory Specialist consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and approximately nine weeks of Advanced Individual Training, including practice in testing different products. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Petroleum Laboratory Specialist Job in Grenada  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Grenada 38901,,http://jobview.monster.com/Petroleum-Laboratory-Specialist-Job-GRENADA-166731372.aspx?mescoid=1900305001001&jobPosition=18,,General/Other: R&D/Science,48d8ddfce0fb7b52c820af847423a59f
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:14:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Duties and Responsibilities:· Translate business goals and objectives into concrete project scope, plans and actions.· Support several projects integrating Engineering/R&D components with IT Infrastructure.· Communicate project priority and set project task priority for related teams.· Work with functional area managers to align resources to integration plans.· Define, track and communicate appropriate performance measurements to project teams and stakeholders.· Work with cross functional implementation teams to ensure ?.project requirements, system performance and objectives are met· Own distinct integration and process improvement projects.· Manage cross-functional team activities across Business, IT and Operations· Drive integration decisions report team progress and escalate issues for quick resolution· Coordination of efforts as it pertains to overall project success, maintain schedule, keep senior management aware of overall conflicts and issues· Provide overall control to continue to keep schedules on track, coordination with business and IT to provide updates and directions· Provide updates daily in stand up meetings as tasks are being completed Qualifications Education:· Bachelor's degree or equivalent Experience:· 5+ years of experience in managing projects· 7+ years of IT project management experience, PMP certified · Experience managing enterprise IT projects involving global deployment application technology and cloud-based solutions. Preferred exposure to subscription based software and technology. Skills:· Advanced Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Visio, Project, Word · Experience in delivering large, cross functional projects· Prior work history or strong knowledge of application development and software engineering processes · Strong understanding of ERPs, cloud-based technologies like CRM and subscription software like Zuora or Aria.· Good exposure on two of the Order To Cash processes, Lead to Order processes and Pricing.· Prior experience in managing enterprise deployment projects in a large segment program assisting in coordination, scheduling and implementation activities· Excellent problem solving, project management, facilitation and interpersonal skills· The ability to earn trust and influence others to get things done, dive deep and take on any task, learn quickly, hold other accountable, and be flexible· Strong analytical skills· Strong written and verbal communication skills· Solid team player ? willing to do anything necessary for project success· Self-directed, results-oriented",Sr Project Manager Job in Boca Raton body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time,Boca Raton,Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Sr-Project-Manager-Job-Boca-Raton-US-166732427.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,2521c3a169911b0d55fee9d5ccf0299e
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:14:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"SOCIAL SERVICE POSITION AVAILABLE for Apartment Complex for the Elderly and Persons with DisabilitiesLooking to hire quickly! An individual with knowledge on Community Resources, is Self-Initiative, and has Creativity. Great for an individual looking for independent environment.Applicant must be Compassionate and should possess understanding of ""Aging In Place"" procedures and resources.  Requirements:Bachelor's Degree in Social Work, Gerontology or related fieldand/or Extensive experience in Human/Social Services.Bilingual in Spanish or Russian a plus  Equal Opportunity Employer Drug Free Work PlaceFull Time with Benefits – Salary based on experience ",Service Coordinator/social worker Job in Jacksonville,Full Time,"Jacksonville, FL 32216",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Coordinator-social-worker-Job-Jacksonville-FL-US-166752089.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=14,"36,000.00 - 38,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),4b302665e9ec6c91ece181c280928bf0
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:16:03,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Mortgage Customer Care Rep:Looking to get your foot in the door with a large, growing company with an outstanding benefits package? Wanting a to work for a company that cares about work/life balance? This is the opportunity you don't want to pass up on!Currently seeking qualified INBOUND call center agents with 2-3 years of recent mortgage experience (required)! Regular schedules and perfect attendance incentives!Basic Job Duties:INBOUND- Provide timely, accurate customer service by answering inbound calls from assigned queues, researching issues, clarifying and resolving customer inquiries and recording notes in customer accounts to achieve call quality metrics and meet service level expectations.Apply today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1032348 Job Experience:,",Mortgage Customer Care Rep- GREAT BENEFITS PACKAGE Job in Fort Worth,Full Time,"Fort Worth, TX 76137",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Mortgage-Customer-Care-Rep-GREAT-BENEFITS-PACKAGE-Job-Fort-Worth-TX-US-166608140.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,Up to $30000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),e26e07d4be68023966144c66bc98bb05
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:22:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Graphic Designer.   This graphic designer will be responsible for development and design of sales collateral material (forms, advertising, brochures, marketing sheets, direct mail campaigns, presentations, etc.) for all the client's lines of business. You will work closely with the market coverage team and business units to develop creative solutions for all marketing and promotional activities. Specific responsibilities include:Work with internal stakeholders to understand business objectives and create effective marketing collateral. Produce a variety of marketing collateral using approved brand templates as well as original concepts following CB brand guidelines. Proofreading of materialsCoordinate print production with print purchasing resourceMaintain relationships with external design consultantsQualifications:Bachelor’s degree in design or fine arts preferredMinimum 5 years graphic design experienceExcellent creative skillsExperience creating graphics for digital applicationsStrategic creative thinkerStrong project management experienceStrong interpersonal skillsOrganized with ability to multi-task in a fast paced environmentSelf starter Proficient in:Adobe CC Microsoft Office (Word, Office, PowerPoint, Excel)Mac OS",Graphic Designer Job in Chicago,"Full Time, Employee","Chicago, IL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Graphic-Designer-Job-Chicago-IL-US-166764229.aspx?mescoid=2700410001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,b99040889f35fa55b45d823399168524
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:33:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Provides professional nursing care for the comfort and well-being of patients. Prepares equipment and assists physician during examinations and treatments. Administers prescribed medications, changes dressings, cleans wounds, and monitors patient vital signs. Observes and maintains records on patient care, condition, reaction, and progress. * Graduate of a State Board accredited School of Nursing or equivalent. * Experience: Six (6) months experience preferred. * Licensure: Current license or permit to practice professional nursing in the State of Texas. Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",RN,"Full Time, Employee","Beaumont, TX 77702",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Registered-Nurse-Relief-Nursing-Job-Beaumont-TX-US-166627409.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=5,,Medical/Health,7323aec076ac7251e597f27db7fb2aee
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:36:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is seeking a candidate with the below qualifications:EUS Implementation Tech Lead Engineer or SCCM ENGINEER Implementation of technology deployments such as SCOM should have a good understanding of SCCM (how SCCM can be best utilized for deployment of OS and software distribution for end user devices using automation) Create and maintain operating system builds Primarily windows build Good understanding of Incident management process Manage and run projects for example Windows OS build, or any changes for SCCM setup, etc. Mandatory Skill (we can provide closest match to any of the skills listed below) Microsoft operating systems, Windows 7 or later, engineering and root cause analysis SCCM, OSD and Active Directory Group Policy Operating System Build Engineering, unit testing, release management Large scale application deployments and package customizations PowerShell scripting and/or VBScript Antivirus endpoint security solutions, Symantec Endpoint Protection or equivalent User Acceptance Testing (UAT)If you have at least feel qualified in the above requirements, please apply today! A recruiter will be in contact with you promptly if your skills match our client's needs.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Implementation Tech Lead Engineer Job in Hoboken,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Implementation Tech Lead Engineer,"Hoboken, NJ 07030",http://jobview.monster.com/Implementation-Tech-Lead-Engineer-Job-Hoboken-NJ-US-166734667.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=10,,IT/Software Development,37275ed7c3bc19e9edb8113c420527e1
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:36:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"The EAS Analyst is responsible for the functional design and analysis of benefits and claims systems, including Facets, our claims processing and payment system, Pricing, Clinical Editing, Document Management and Workflow. The Analyst plays a key role in translating our business partners’ strategy and goals into meaningful functional requirements and specifications. The Analyst must have a strong conceptual knowledge of the technical solution and works closely with the development staff, ensuring that the functional requirements are met with the technical solution.QUALIFICATIONS:Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science preferred.A minimum of five (5) years employment experience is required.A minimum of three (3) years experience of developing, implementing and supporting enterprise level solutions is required.Understanding of business process mapping discipline required.   Basic understanding of healthcare terminology is required.Knowledge of healthcare and HMO processes, rules, regulations, and policies is preferred.  Demonstrated ability to analyze, identify, implement and monitor outcomes required.Strong Written and Oral communication skills are required.Good organization and time management skills are required.Demonstrated ability to identify weaknesses in workflow and develop and implement process improvements to continually insure that corporate goals are satisfied is required. Ability to successfully define system implementation, conversion and configuration strategies is required.Must demonstrate strong leadership and analytical skills.Proficiency in query concepts and SQL is required. Please visit www.cdphptalent.com to apply and to learn more about career opportunities with CDPHP.CDPHP offers a competitive compensation and benefits package, including a 401(k) plan, tuition reimbursement, on-site fitness center, community involvement opportunities, along with an environment that promotes growth and professional development. As an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer, CDPHP, inc. will not discriminate in its employment practices due to an applicant’s race, color, creed, religion, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, marital status, citizenship, physical and mental disability, criminal record, genetic information, predisposition or carrier status, status with respect to receiving public assistance, domestic violence victim status, a disabled, special, recently separated, active duty wartime, campaign badge, Armed Forces service medal veteran, or any other characteristics protected under applicable law. ",Analyst (Benefits & Claims) Job in Albany,Full Time,"Albany, NY 12206",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Analyst-Benefits-Claims-Job-Albany-NY-US-166667867.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=11,,,e29dd7bf3d6dba4991f6479a7efd2fa9
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:47:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Senior Consultant, Learning Delivery Description   Life-changers work here At CareFusion, we create innovative ways to help our customers improve patient care. We rely on bold and inspired employees who share our commitment to helping solve some of healthcare's most critical challenges.CareFusion is now part of Becton Dickinson, a global medical technology company focused on addressing many of the world's most pressing and evolving health needs. With our combined technology and expertise, we will become a global leader helping to transform the quality and cost of care for patients and clinicians worldwide. Join us in our mission to improve the future of healthcare and help all people lead healthy lives.Job Title: Senior Consulting, Learning DeliveryJob Family Group (Function): LearningJob Family: Learning DeliveryJob Family SummaryLearning Delivery delivers instructor-led training courses.   What is expected of you for success in your role The SeniorConsultant, Learning Delivery will propose, design, develop, and deliver training sessions and other performance support solutions that produce measureable positive results in a highly technical and fast-paced customer support environment. This requires the ability to function as a business partner to quickly and deeply understand product support needs, performance needs, and organizational constraints/requirements, and then determine, design, develop, and deliver/implement the most effective and efficient  learning solutions.   The SeniorConsultant, Learning Delivery will manage multiple projects in a fast-paced, matrixed, and collaborative work environment and be accountable for improving skills, processes/procedures, providing status, and documenting work/metrics. Relying on a depth of knowledge and experience in technical training and customer service the Senior Consultant, Learning Delivery will be a key contributor to the development and continuous performance improvement of a technical customer service team in the medical device/healthcare industry.   Accountabilities include: Works with subject matter experts (SMEs) to develop and deliver face-to-face or virtual instructor-led sessions using adult learning principles to enhance the learning experience. Designs, coordinates, schedules, and delivers instructor-led sessions using multiple technologies (classroom-based and web-based) for the assigned products or performance support needs Proposes designs, develops, and delivers/implements a wide variety of support materials and performance solutions that range from industry standard to new approaches. Evaluates the effectiveness of training sessions and performance solutions against business needs; provides metrics summarizing effectiveness and making recommendations for improvement to key stakeholders. Manages complex learning-related initiatives as a business partner with internal and external customers focusing on product use, installation, support, and service for multiple product lines.  Also manages initiatives targeting organizational improvement for BD business units and customers.  Creates detailed project plans for each program. Leads, monitors, and reports on the progress of projects, ensuring the accuracy of status reports and data related to team metrics. Assesses learning and performance needs to craft effective and efficient plans for performance solutions and services that address business-specific requirements and constraints. Effectively resolves issues or determines escalation is needed.  Escalates using a solution-oriented approach. Creates and manages learning communications, SharePoint portals, OneNote notebooks, etc. Maintains accurate and up-to-date classroom records including rosters and surveys Maintains classroom product equipment and student workstations Works independently with minimal guidance Demonstrates advanced knowledge of classroom techniques, adult learning theory, individual learning styles, and cultural differences. Establish an environment conducive to learning; develop and structure effective training sessions based on the different learning needs. Model the most appropriate way to use our systems and provide customer opportunities for practice and feedback. Build relationships and credibility by establishing position as a knowledgeable, client-focused partner. Applies in-depth skills and broad knowledge of the business to address complex problems and non-standard situations Balances a heavy workload in a fast-paced environment, while working on multiple projects simultaneously. Sets individual priorities in context with team priorities to meet goals in the face of multiple demands. Flexes with business strategy changes. Acts as a key contributor in a complex environment. May lead teams or projects and share expertise Qualifications   Education: Bachelor’s degree in Education, Adult Learning, Communication, or related field required. Master’s degree in Performance Improvement, Education Technology, Instructional Design, Education, Interactive Media, or Learning Systems preferred. Experience: 5-7 years’ experience in the design, development, and delivery of training sessions and other performance solutions in matrixed, product-focused organizations. Working knowledge and ability to train  of the following: Microsoft SQL Server 2008  and/or Sybase database Networking Active Directory VMware Proven leader of individuals and teams in a technical support center environment Industry experience with customer support organizations and/or medical devices, HIT, product implementation and support in a global environment preferred. Demonstrated successful project management and experience and effective organizational skills. Outstanding communicator; an individual who possesses superior written/verbal communication skills, as well as the ability to present his/her views in a clear and compelling manner. Has depth and breadth of experience in the development and delivery of instruction. Attention to detail while managing several complex deliverables across multiple groups, cultures, and time zones. Ability to collect and analyze data as actionable input to continuous improvement. Knowledge of industry-standard authoring and communication tools (SharePoint, WebEx, Word, PowerPoint, etc.). Adaptability; learns quickly and responds positively to complexity and change. Comfortable working in an environment that is constantly evolving. Team player with superior people skills and a positive attitude. A bold, strategic, creative thinker who can produce standard solutions, as well as propose new approaches. Confident and results-driven; consultative orientation, strong people and process/project management capability. Able to make and communicate the results of tough decisions. Maintains knowledge of and applies the latest relevant research and methodologies in related fields of study. Fast learner: Can quickly learn new products, applications, and systems. Preferred: Fluent in multiple languages Travel: 10- 20% ATD certification preferred   CareFusion is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, disability status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.   *LI-JS1 *MSJA Requisition ID :   160500IV Primary Location :   Texas-San Antonio Travel :   Yes, 20 % of the Time Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Apr 28, 2016, 4:12:15 PM",Senior Consultant,Full Time Employee,"Senior Consultant, Learning Delivery Description   Life-changers work here At CareFusion, we create innovative ways to help our customers improve patient care. We rely on bold and inspired employees who share our commitment to helping solve some of healthcare's most critical challenges.CareFusion is now part of Becton Dickinson, a global medical technology company focused on addressing many of the world's most pressing and evolving health needs. With our combined technology and expertise, we will become a global leader helping to transform the quality and cost of care for patients and clinicians worldwide. Join us in our mission to improve the future of healthcare and help all people lead healthy lives.Job Title: Senior Consulting, Learning DeliveryJob Family Group (Function): LearningJob Family: Learning DeliveryJob Family SummaryLearning Delivery delivers instructor-led training courses.   What is expected of you for success in your role The SeniorConsultant, Learning Delivery will propose, design, develop, and deliver training sessions and other performance support solutions that produce measureable positive results in a highly technical and fast-paced customer support environment. This requires the ability to function as a business partner to quickly and deeply understand product support needs, performance needs, and organizational constraints/requirements, and then determine, design, develop, and deliver/implement the most effective and efficient  learning solutions.   The SeniorConsultant, Learning Delivery will manage multiple projects in a fast-paced, matrixed, and collaborative work environment and be accountable for improving skills, processes/procedures, providing status, and documenting work/metrics. Relying on a depth of knowledge and experience in technical training and customer service the Senior Consultant, Learning Delivery will be a key contributor to the development and continuous performance improvement of a technical customer service team in the medical device/healthcare industry.   Accountabilities include: Works with subject matter experts (SMEs) to develop and deliver face-to-face or virtual instructor-led sessions using adult learning principles to enhance the learning experience. Designs, coordinates, schedules, and delivers instructor-led sessions using multiple technologies (classroom-based and web-based) for the assigned products or performance support needs Proposes designs, develops, and delivers/implements a wide variety of support materials and performance solutions that range from industry standard to new approaches. Evaluates the effectiveness of training sessions and performance solutions against business needs; provides metrics summarizing effectiveness and making recommendations for improvement to key stakeholders. Manages complex learning-related initiatives as a business partner with internal and external customers focusing on product use, installation, support, and service for multiple product lines.  Also manages initiatives targeting organizational improvement for BD business units and customers.  Creates detailed project plans for each program. Leads, monitors, and reports on the progress of projects, ensuring the accuracy of status reports and data related to team metrics. Assesses learning and performance needs to craft effective and efficient plans for performance solutions and services that address business-specific requirements and constraints. Effectively resolves issues or determines escalation is needed.  Escalates using a solution-oriented approach. Creates and manages learning communications, SharePoint portals, OneNote notebooks, etc. Maintains accurate and up-to-date classroom records including rosters and surveys Maintains classroom product equipment and student workstations Works independently with minimal guidance Demonstrates advanced knowledge of classroom techniques, adult learning theory, individual learning styles, and cultural differences. Establish an environment conducive to learning; develop and structure effective training sessions based on the different learning needs. Model the most appropriate way to use our systems and provide customer opportunities for practice and feedback. Build relationships and credibility by establishing position as a knowledgeable, client-focused partner. Applies in-depth skills and broad knowledge of the business to address complex problems and non-standard situations Balances a heavy workload in a fast-paced environment, while working on multiple projects simultaneously. Sets individual priorities in context with team priorities to meet goals in the face of multiple demands. Flexes with business strategy changes. Acts as a key contributor in a complex environment. May lead teams or projects and share expertise Qualifications   Education: Bachelor’s degree in Education, Adult Learning, Communication, or related field required. Master’s degree in Performance Improvement, Education Technology, Instructional Design, Education, Interactive Media, or Learning Systems preferred. Experience: 5-7 years’ experience in the design, development, and delivery of training sessions and other performance solutions in matrixed, product-focused organizations. Working knowledge and ability to train  of the following: Microsoft SQL Server 2008  and/or Sybase database Networking Active Directory VMware Proven leader of individuals and teams in a technical support center environment Industry experience with customer support organizations and/or medical devices, HIT, product implementation and support in a global environment preferred. Demonstrated successful project management and experience and effective organizational skills. Outstanding communicator; an individual who possesses superior written/verbal communication skills, as well as the ability to present his/her views in a clear and compelling manner. Has depth and breadth of experience in the development and delivery of instruction. Attention to detail while managing several complex deliverables across multiple groups, cultures, and time zones. Ability to collect and analyze data as actionable input to continuous improvement. Knowledge of industry-standard authoring and communication tools (SharePoint, WebEx, Word, PowerPoint, etc.). Adaptability; learns quickly and responds positively to complexity and change. Comfortable working in an environment that is constantly evolving. Team player with superior people skills and a positive attitude. A bold, strategic, creative thinker who can produce standard solutions, as well as propose new approaches. Confident and results-driven; consultative orientation, strong people and process/project management capability. Able to make and communicate the results of tough decisions. Maintains knowledge of and applies the latest relevant research and methodologies in related fields of study. Fast learner: Can quickly learn new products, applications, and systems. Preferred: Fluent in multiple languages Travel: 10- 20% ATD certification preferred   CareFusion is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, disability status, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.   *LI-JS1 *MSJA Requisition ID :   160500IV Primary Location :   Texas-San Antonio Travel :   Yes, 20 % of the Time Schedule :   Full-time Job Posting :   Apr 28, 2016, 4:12:15 PM",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Senior-Consultant-Learning-Delivery-Job-san-antonio-TX-US-166757406.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=11,,Medical/Health,054dbde25067994f4cf603aa4833285c
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:15:48:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Number: 2155-847-041516 Open Date: 4/14/2016 Close Date: Open Until Filled Program: Primary Care Clinics Department: Clinics Location: West Palm Beach, FL   To be the Health Care Safety Net for Palm Beach County The Health Care District of Palm Beach County is an integrated public health system established by the voters as a special taxing district.  The safety-net system is an equal opportunity employer of approximately 1,000 employees.  The Health Care District provides challenging and fulfilling employmentopportunities through itshealth coverage programs for uninsured residents, a pharmacy operation, a nationally-recognized Trauma System that includes the Trauma Hawk Aeromedical Program, adult and pediatric services at the C. L. Brumback Primary Care Clinics throughout the county, a School Health program which staffs registered nurses in nearly 170 public schools, short-term or long-term inpatient care at the Edward J. Healey Rehabilitation and Nursing Center, and the county’s only public hospital, Lakeside Medical Center, which serves the rural, western Glades’ communities.  For more information, visit www.hcdpbc.org .   LinkedIn - www.linkedin.com/company/health-care-district-of-palm-beach-county C.L. Brumback LinkedIn - www.linkedin.com/company/c-l-brumback-primary-care-clinics Twitter - www.twitter.com/healthcaredist General Statement of Job This position assists patients in achieving highest physical, mental, and psychosocial level of functioning. Employees in this position participate in care plan development, counseling of patients, discharge planning, psychosocial assessments, and family interaction. Specific Duties and Responsibilities Essential Functions: Participates in care plan development, counseling of patients, psychosocial assessments, and family interaction. Provides referrals to other agencies concerning outside services, social support systems, and behavior systems. Ensures the provision of sufficient social and mental interaction with patients for the purpose of ensuring and promoting mental and emotional health and well-being. Assists patients in decision making concerning health care and preferences for involvement of other entities. Assists patients in processing of correspondence (e.g., reading, interpreting, writing). Assists patients with financial and legal matters for personal planning purposes. Assists with implementation of behavioral treatment plans. Promotes effective relationships between patients and staff, ensuring effective communication and preservation of patients’ dignity. Interacts with family members, provides information concerning health status and progress, and encourages participation and involvement of all interested persons. Assists staff in providing sensitive/critical information to patients concerning health status, ramifications of care choices, etc. Provides or arranges needed counseling services. Attends care plan meetings. Coordinates acquirement of adaptive equipment. Performs special projects and program analysis as directed. Responsible for service delivery and outreach to migrant and/or homeless populations in Palm Beach County at the existing health centers, along with other community sites, as directed by the Clinic Administration. Emergency duty may be required of the incumbent that includes working in Red Cross shelters or to perform other emergency duties including, but not limited to, responses to threats or disasters, man-made or natural. Additionally, incumbents are required to perform emergency response and management duties for Palm Beach County as required. Position Qualifications Education: Bachelor’s degree in social work or in a human services field such as sociology, special education, rehabilitation counseling, or psychology required. Experience: One (1) to three (3) years of supervised social work experience in a health care setting required. Certification: Basic Life Support certification required. Licensure: Current, valid license as a Licensed Clinical Social Worker (LCSW) in the State of Florida required.   (~M)   *CB   The Health Care District is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer and maintains a Drug Free Workplace. Veterans preferred. Qualified individuals with disabilities who require an accommodation to participate in the application process or candidates with other questions should contact Human Resources . #TrackingJobBody p{margin-top:0px !important; min-height:0px !important;}",Licensed Clinical Social Worker Job in West Palm Beach,Full Time,"West Palm Beach, FL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Clinical-Social-Worker-Job-West-Palm-Beach-FL-US-166626104.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e626cf37cd729bc640368f186bab7626
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:16:56:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Chemical Operations Specialist, you'll be there and prepared whenever a community is flooded, an earthquake shakes the foundations of a city, a hurricane makes landfall, or an enemy uses biological or chemical warfare. You will know what to do to evacuate the area, control the situation, and solve the problem.In order to perform these functions, you will be trained to expertly handle nuclear, biological, and chemical (NBC) detection and decontamination equipment so you can assist in the application of NBC defense measures. You will also be asked to maintain disaster plans, operate and perform maintenance on smoke generating equipment, and coordinate with civilian personnel on what to do in an emergency. These are skills that are in demand by federal, state, and local governments, as well as civil defense agencies. So by joining the Army National Guard as a Chemical Operations Specialist, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.After 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you will learn fundamental Soldiering skills, you will attend 19 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which will include a combination of hands-on and classroom training where you will learn defensive procedures for NBC warfare and preparation of emergency plans. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Chemical Operations Specialist Job in Omaha  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Omaha 68142,,http://jobview.monster.com/Chemical-Operations-Specialist-Job-OMAHA-166733578.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=2,,Environmental/Geological Testing & Analysis,16b08a0e51fd5712688f34fc63cc9c64
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:16:57:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Army National Guard Soldiers are under all the stress of everyday citizens, plus bear the additional weight of military service and combat-oriented situations. This stress can understandably wear on the mental well-being of a Soldier.The Mental Health Specialist assists the Guard's health care team with the management and treatment of inpatient and outpatient mental health care. Under the supervision of an Army psychiatrist, social worker, psychiatric nurse, or psychologist, you will assist with the care and treatment of patients with psychiatric, drug, and alcohol problems; collect and record patient data; counsel and treat patients with personal, behavioral, or mental health problems; and provide bedside care in hospitals.You'll be able to use your Mental Health Specialist experience to prepare for a future with civilian hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, or rehabilitation centers. With a Mental Health Specialist background, you may consider a career as a psychiatrist's assistant, a medical assistant, or a physician's aide, or even use your experience as a stepping stone to earn a higher degree.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Mental Health Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 20 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Mental Health Specialist Job in Washington  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Washington 52353,,http://jobview.monster.com/Mental-Health-Specialist-Job-WASHINGTON-166725784.aspx?mescoid=2100312001001&jobPosition=3,,Mental Health,ed2d42613137dda8983779fc67db577f
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:17:15:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"At Wellness Counseling & Residential Detox, we are privileged to help our clients overcome the challenges of drug withdrawal. We offer 24-hour supervised medical care to help our clients make life-altering changes. Our facility in Stuart, FL, provides a peaceful and supportive environment for our clients. We have made it our mission to help our clients detox as comfortably as possible. We believe that encouragement during this early stage of their recovery is crucial to a long-term sobriety. Join our team today and help people change their lives. The psychological rewards can be substantial. In addition to the personal rewards, but we offer a generous compensation and lots of opportunities for growth in our growing organization. Currently, we have an opening for a part time:Bio-Psychosocial AssessorPosition Summary:The Bio Psychosocial Assessor is responsible for performing bio-psychosocial assessments and recovery based group sessions with clients.Responsibilities:Perform Biopsychosocial Assessments in detail, accurate and in line with utilization review purposes.Provide recovery based group therapy sessions as required.Skills/Qualifications:A minimum of 3 years’ experience in licensed health care / recovery field with clinical experience.Experience in addictive disease treatment program therapy.Intermediate computer skills and familiarity with electronic medical record a plusLCSW, LMHC, LMFT is required and must be valid at time of interviewCandidate must be experienced and able to handle individuals suffering from the disease of addiction and mental health.Knowledge of Bio-psychosocial Assessments in detail, accurate and in line with utilization review purposes.Knowledgeable to run recovery based group therapy sessions as required.CPR, AED, and First Aid Certified RequiredKnowledge of DCR Rules and Regulations Knowledge of JCAHO standards.Knowledge of the Principles and Practices of the discipline.Demonstrates Proficiency in Communication & Written skills.Knowledge of State & Federal Statutes Regarding Patient -Confidentiality laws.Knowledge of Drug-Free Workplace Policies.Knowledge of Workplace Violence.Experience working with adults and young adultsKnowledge of 12-step programEducation Level:Master’s degree in psychology or social work or related fieldWork Conditions:Working in a temperature controlled environment; 80%-90% of the time spent indoorsSitting for extended periods of timeDexterity to operate a computer keyboard, mouse, and to handle other computer componentsAbility to work independentlyNormal workplace hazardsWe offer medical, dental, 401k, generous paid time off, and many other benefits.Visit our website at www.wellnessresidentialdetox.com for more information about our offerings.Thanks for considering a career change with us.We are an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer..",Bio-Psychosocial Assessor Job in Stuart,Full Time,"Stuart, FL 34997",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Bio-Psychosocial-Assessor-Job-Stuart-FL-US-166747321.aspx?mescoid=1300104001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),84026a6a2baf37479e6cea368f2f2ded
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:17:48:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Web Developer in Tampa, Florida (FL).Summary:The successful applicant will be designing innovative, user-friendly websites for progressive online activism and community building. The client's Web Designers work closely with their marketing department staff, social media, and online team members to develop specifications and make recommendations on the use of new and emerging technologies and optimization of current technology. Using a LAMP development environment, and database driven applications, the web designer is responsible for layout, design, and quality control of company websites. This involves developing online designs that effectively communicate the key concepts being promoted by the company. The Web Designer takes part in the initial concept planning and creation of new websites, redesigns and other website related projects. This position is also responsible for ensuring brand guidelines are adhered to and proper functioning of the website (QC).Tasks may include, but are not limited to the following: Work in conjunction with the marketing and web team to design and maintain high quality websites using HTML 5, HTML, Sass and CSS3 without a wysiwyg editor Determine appropriate architecture, and other technical solutions, and make relevant recommendations to managers for current and future needs Ongoing development of existing functionality on a wide range of internal web-based applications Optimization of current website backend design and organization Works with internal SEO and PPC teams in designing landing pages and external websites from start to finishREQUIREMENTS: Experience in a LAMP (Linux Apache MySQL PHP) based architecture, subversion and Laravel PHP framework preferred Experience with a variety of WordPress, Drupal or similar open source CMS project platforms and with standardizing deployment practices Experience working in a team environment and managing multiple projects in a fast-paced, deadline-driven environment Strong understanding of back end technologies: Linux, Apache, MySQL, PHP5, SOAP and REST web services, JSON, and YAML Strong understanding of object oriented programming within a LAMP environment in an MVC architecture Experience with version control systems (SVN, GIT) Able to create customs solutions from scratch Strong documentation skills",Web Developer Job in Tampa,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Tampa, FL 33607",,http://jobview.monster.com/Web-Developer-Job-Tampa-FL-US-166671411.aspx?mescoid=1500129001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c0b5e8b67f8226a2d696e3c0e0cb7f02
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:17:49:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title:           Account ManagerJob Location :  Redmond, WAType :                 PermanentCompany:        Wallero Technologies Roles and Responsibilities* Good Communication and written skills in English* Recruiting experience* Client interaction experience* HR experienceThanks & Regards, Peter ManneHR  ExecutiveWallero Technologies2018 156th Ave NE #312, Bellevue, WA 98007, USA.Voice :  206-497-3308 || E mail id : peter@wallero.comWebsite : www.wallero.com",Account Manager Job in Bellevue,Full Time,"Bellevue, WA 98004",,http://jobview.monster.com/Account-Manager-Job-Bellevue-WA-US-160631336.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,,,891d608295c267977f5e9cc5c97afe2e
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:18:24:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryDo you love data?  Do you want to help create world class data wrangling and data cleaning workflows for customers?  Do you love writing simple and clean MATLAB functions for importing, cleaning, and working with data?  If so, then join the MATLAB toolbox team and help scientist and engineers analyze and work with their data more effectively.  We are looking for self-motivated problem solvers to help lead development of MATLAB’s data wrangling and data cleaning features from early design through delivery.  If you are passionate about data, then this is the opportunity for you!Responsibilities Help design, develop and maintain the next generation of data wrangling and cleaning features in MATLAB Work on existing MATLAB data types like table, categorical, and datetime Work on improving the data cleaning features in MATLAB Work on existing MATLAB file import and export functions Develop requirements for features through customer interviews and usability tests Develop MATLAB function designs through prototypes and collaborative design reviews Develop appropriate architecture and implement the designs Participate in all team activities such as agile planning, design discussions and reviews Communicate designs, plans, and ideas throughout the organization Minimum Qualifications A bachelor's degree and 7 years of professional work experience (or a master's degree and 5 years of professional work experience, or a PhD degree) is required.Additional Qualifications Proficiency with a scientific computer language such as MATLAB, Python, or R Experience with C/C++ Experience with data wrangling and data analytics workflows Experience writing file import and export software for text, excel, or other data formats Why MathWorks?It’s the chance to collaborate with bright, passionate people. It’s contributing to software products that make a difference in the world. And it’s being part of a company with an incredible commitment to doing the right thing – for each individual, our customers, and the local community. MathWorks develops MATLAB and Simulink, the leading technical computing software used by engineers and scientists. The company employs 3000 people in 15 countries, with headquarters in Natick, Massachusetts, U.S.A. MathWorks is privately held and has been profitable every year since its founding in 1984. MathWorks, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here.",Data Wrangling/Cleaning - MATLAB Software Engineer Job in Natick,Full Time,"Natick, MA",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Data-Wrangling-Cleaning-MATLAB-Software-Engineer-Job-Natick-MA-US-166661896.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),22e7905e818571472089288ad747a95b
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:18:24:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you love dealing with the people in your current industry but tired of having a job and not a career?MTS Global Marketing Inc. is looking for competitive, sports-minded individuals with experience in the restaurant, retail, and customer service industries. The right person will love the thrill of a challenge, the excitement of working in a team, and the drive of tackling new advertising campaigns.It's our objective to select a core of 6 new entry level candidates to provide support in developing the marketing department. Candidates with the ability to think strategically and proactively, who possess sports experience as well as excel in a fast, high-pressure environment, have the best chance of succeeding in our organization and growing into a management role.~COLLEGE GRADUATES & INTERNS ARE WELCOME TO APPLY~Our edge is the ability to provide measurable results with our marketing efforts directly to our clients. We believe that as a team there is nothing more important than the growth of our employees. The future marketing managers of our company are going to be entry level people today that we cultivate into leaders in the advertising industry.This management growth is needed in response to the acquisition of the National Leader in Satellite Television. Our client base has doubled in size as a result of our human element in marketing and we are at high demand. Our company is therefore seeking the right individuals to cross train into management to facilitate that growth.PLEASE NOTE:We DO NOT participate in any of the following:No Door to DoorNo Network/Multi-Level MarketingNO Business to Business salesNO Telemarketing SalesEverything we do is inside of an assigned major retail location!This is NOT a 100% Commission Job!!! We offer a weekly base +commissions & bonus opportunites!RequirementsOur entry level marketing account executives must clearly demonstrate the following qualities:***Great interpersonal skills***Sports Mentality***Strong work ethic***Ability to work in a high-energy environment***Leadership/ Management experienceVisit us at  http://www.mtsglobalmarketing.com /",Seeking Servers and Bartenders- Entry Level Management Job in Fairfax,Full Time Employee,"Fairfax, VA 22033",Sports and Physical RecreationRestaurant/Food ServicesFood and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Seeking-Servers-Bartenders-Entry-Level-Management-Job-Fairfax-VA-US-166630453.aspx?mescoid=3500610001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,9d619d704a9c50017bfbea1cf07af230
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:18:25:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description We are currently in need of a Full Time Paramedic for our Emergency Department. We are looking for someone who has good energy, enjoys customer service and performs well with minimal supervision. If this is you, we would encourage you to come visit with us.Required Skills Certified with Texas Department of Emergency Mgt. Current certification in CPR Current certification in ACLS  (Required upon Hire) Current certification in PALS  (Required upon Hire) High school graduate or equivalent. Previous clinical experience in Emergency Room or EMT services.Must be able to keep all equipment in good working condition.",Paramedic -PRN Job in Fort Worth,"Full Time, Employee","Fort Worth, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Paramedic-PRN-Job-Fort-Worth-TX-US-166679863.aspx?mescoid=2900522001001&jobPosition=18,,Medical/Health,1e101d76faacdbb6ddd4ab1ae43b812f
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:18:44:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Dataminder AdministratorLocation: Plano, TexasWork Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US, no visa sponsorships available at this time; ability to pass a drug and background Compensation: DOE medical and dental benefits available Responsibilities / Expectations:Coordinate Production Support issue resolution with CATE and the vendor (CA) Assist in design modifications to maximize global system availability Coordinate vendor software upgrades and enhancementsSupport global rollout of CA DLP Develop operational processes and procedures in supporting the environmentPerform pre and post application modification checkoutsProactively support services through continual service improvementEnsure compliance of solutions to regulatory standardsParticipate in team meetings and project meetings as neededInterface with various Support teams to ensure application availability and stability Must Haves:Knowledge of CADLP applicationDB and reporting skills Microsoft SQL or OracleIntermediate Power shell, VB or (dos) bat scriptingtechnical and operational experience in messaging products and servicesExchange 2007 and Exchange 2010 on a large environmentGood understanding of the Hub Transport setup and configuration (Email Routing)Strong knowledge of Microsoft operating systems, SAN, Oracle, Active Directory, monitoring products and backup applicationsExperis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",DLP Adminstrator Job in Coppell,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job Title: Dataminder AdministratorLocation: Plano, TexasWork Requirements: Must be eligible to work in the US, no visa sponsorships available at this time; ability to pass a drug and background Compensation: DOE medical and dental benefits available Responsibilities / Expectations:Coordinate Production Support issue resolution with CATE and the vendor (CA) Assist in design modifications to maximize global system availability Coordinate vendor software upgrades and enhancementsSupport global rollout of CA DLP Develop operational processes and procedures in supporting the environmentPerform pre and post application modification checkoutsProactively support services through continual service improvementEnsure compliance of solutions to regulatory standardsParticipate in team meetings and project meetings as neededInterface with various Support teams to ensure application availability and stability Must Haves:Knowledge of CADLP applicationDB and reporting skills Microsoft SQL or OracleIntermediate Power shell, VB or (dos) bat scriptingtechnical and operational experience in messaging products and servicesExchange 2007 and Exchange 2010 on a large environmentGood understanding of the Hub Transport setup and configuration (Email Routing)Strong knowledge of Microsoft operating systems, SAN, Oracle, Active Directory, monitoring products and backup applicationsExperis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Coppell, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/DLP-Adminstrator-Job-Coppell-TX-US-166612131.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,b481dfc57d48b3b2c892c40a34cfbc72
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:18:45:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionI believe that better care begins at home. Compassionate care, uncompromising service and clinical excellence – that’s what our patients have come to expect from our clinicians. Kindred at Home, a division of Kindred Healthcare Inc., is the nation’s leading provider of comprehensive home health, hospice, and non-medical home care services. Kindred at Home, and its affiliates, including Gentiva, delivers compassionate, high-quality care to patients and clients in their homes or places of residence, including non-medical personal assistance, skilled nursing and rehabilitation and hospice and palliative care. Our caregivers focus on each unique patient to deliver the appropriate care and emotional support to our patients and their families. As a Home Health Speech Language Pathologist, you will:Evaluate, direct and provide speech/language pathology service to patients in the home or facilityParticipate in the development and periodic review of the Plan of Treatment and Plan of Care.Utilize professional skills and judgment in assessing and treating disorders of speech, voice, language, hearing and swallowing to prevent, identify, evaluate and minimize the effects of such disorders and conditions. Administer and interpret diagnostic tests and applications of therapeutic treatments including audio logic screening.Observe, record and report changes in the patient's condition and response to treatment to supervisor and/or the physician.Provide instruction and training to patients in use of alternative communication systems when appropriate.Provide counsel and instruction to patients, families and healthcare staff.Maintain and submit documentation as required by the Company and/or facility.  Prepare and submit timely written reports of evaluations, visits, summaries, care plans, care coordination activities and progress reports as required by Company policy.Participate in care coordination activities and discharge planning.Maintain the highest standards of professional conduct in relation to information that is confidential in nature.  Share information only when the recipient's right to access is clearly established and the sharing of such information is clearly in the best interests of the patient.Attend, participate in and/or conduct internal staff development programs, obtain continuing education as required by Company policy, regulation. Required SkillsQualificationsMeet the education and experience requirements for Certification of Clinical Competence in Speech Language Pathology or Audiology granted by ASHAMinimum of six months experience as a speech therapist / speech language pathologistHome Health experience a plusCurrent and unrestricted licenseCurrent CPR certificationGood organizational and communication skillsRequired Experiencekeywords: ST, S.T., Speech Therapist, Therapist, homecare, home care, healthcare, health care, home health, speech language pathology, speech language pathologist, speech/language pathologist, speech-language pathologist, speech therapy, speech pathologist, SLP, SP, S.L.P. S.P.,Girling, Girling Home Health, Girling Hospice, AmHeart Hospice, Asian American Home Health, Asian American Hospice, Girling Healthcare, Harden Home Health, Harden Hospice, Healthfield, Iowa Hospice, Missouri Home Care of Rolla, Omega Hospice, The Home Option, Girling Community Care, Odyssey, Vista Care, VistaCare, Olsten Kimberley Quality Care~MON~ All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or national origin. To learn more, please contact your local recruiter at (toll free) 1.866.GENTIVAJob LocationBirmingham, Alabama, United StatesPosition TypePRN",Per Diem Speech Language Pathologist Job in Birmingham,,"Birmingham, AL",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Per-Diem-Speech-Language-Pathologist-Job-Birmingham-AL-US-166610160.aspx?mescoid=2900494001001&jobPosition=16,,,f209b119ee695d486005dbf5490cc036
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:18:48:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"RAI / MDS Coordinator, RN - Saint Therese TCU (Robbinsdale, MN)Description: Join our new TCU team!!!Saint Therese is hiring a full-time RAI MDS Coordinator, RN for our new 32-bed Transitional Care Unit, located on the 4th floor of North Memorial Health Care Center in Robbinsdale. http://sttheresemn.iapplicants.com/ HOSPITAL LIKE SETTING. Patients eat in rooms with dining provided by North Memorial. Saint Therese Rehab is located on-site for convenient access and less travel. In room Patient Education via televisionsPassport med machineEMRPOC for NAR charting, All employees benefit from:Free ramp parking with Tunnel AccessOn-site cafeteriasOn-site massageSaint Therese Employee Full Time BenefitsHealthDentalPTO/PDLHolidaysCEU's Tuition reimbursementFlex Spending403b MatchLifePaid Time OffIn-Service EducationFitness CenterSpecial EventsService AwardsWhite Rose Scholarship Program DUTIES: This position is responsible for the completion of the RAI process and the initial care plan. Completes the MDSs per schedule while assuring accuracy of the documentation. Leading, supervising and mentoring the staff nurses and NARs in relation to care planning, case mix and MDS, and other clinical needs. This position also provides support to the DON. This position includes an On Call rotation.Our TCU utilizes: Passport med machine Vital Machines upload to EMRLiko LiftsVideo Conferencing equipment for education and care conferencesNARs use POC to reduce paper charting errors and waste. http://sttheresemn.iapplicants.com/ Qualifications: Minimum Qualifications: Minimum 1-2 years in long term care/TCU. Including experience with PPS, MDS process, case mix, Medicare and care planning. Current licensure as Registered Nurse with the Minnesota Board of Nursing. Flexible with time management and prioritization skills. Demonstrated knowledge of State and Federal Regulations. Good written and verbal communication skills. Ability to work with others in identifying and improving quality of care issues and solutions. Special Knowledge, skills, and abilities:Certified in CPREmotional needs of residents and their families.Leadership Abilities.Proven and creative problem-solving skills.Solid understanding of the spiritual, social and Ability to effectively organize work flow with timely follow-through.Role model of the highest quality of customer service and tact.Ability to embrace our values of respect, imagination and collaboration http://sttheresemn.iapplicants.com/ CHECK OUT OUR WEBSITE FOR OTHER POTENTIAL OPEN POSITIONS! http://sttheresemn.iapplicants.com/ ",RAI / MDS Coordinator,Full Time,"Robbinsdale, MN 55422",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RAI-MDS-Coordinator-RN-TCU-Robbinsdale-MN-Job-Robbinsdale-MN-US-166755771.aspx?mescoid=1100047001001&jobPosition=14,"32,000.00 - 42,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),f1332548d6b4752cb3d44615bd80df7b
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:19:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHRISTUS Dubuis Hospital of Hot Springs (Formerly Advance Care Hospital of Fort Smith) is looking for a Registered Nurse who will be responsible for patient assessment, patient care planning, and the provision of quality nursing care to an assigned group of patients for a defined work period. Provides direction and supervision to LVN/LPNs, nursing assistants, unit secretaries and other clinical/clerical associates. * Graduate of school of nursing licensed by the State Board of Nursing. * BSN preferred. * Two years hospital experience preferred. RN licensure and CPR/ACLS certification required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Registered Nurse PRN Job in Hot Springs,"Full Time, Employee","Hot Springs, AR 71913",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-PRN-Job-Hot-Springs-AR-US-166624504.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,507bb162f4474e074ea023ca1c9527c6
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:19:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"The importance of efficient and qualified administrative personnel in the medical field can't be overstated because accurate information is crucial for planning and managing hospital operations. This means that you make it possible for patients to receive the proper care.As a Patient Administration Specialist, you will make sure that hospital and patient information is recorded, stored, and delivered in order to keep everything running smoothly. Your responsibilities will include scheduling office visits and keeping patient records up to date at Army hospitals or other medical facilities.Health care is one of the most wide open and promising career fields available today. Use your Patient Administration Specialist experience to prepare for jobs in civilian hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, or rehabilitation centers. You may even qualify for related careers with insurance carriers, public health departments, or Government agencies.Earn while you learn Instead of paying to learn these skills, get paid to train. In the Army National Guard, you will learn these valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for Patient Administration Specialists consists of 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and seven weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Training consists of both classroom and field work.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Patient Administration Specialist Job in Riverton  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Riverton 84065,,http://jobview.monster.com/Patient-Administration-Specialist-Job-RIVERTON-166741123.aspx?mescoid=4300716001001&jobPosition=5,,General/Other: Medical/Health,40fbcd23284f08a920a34df618b3e2a8
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:19:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bob Ross 201 790 3866 call Mon-Sat 10-10IT Search Corp Int’lbobross@tristateplacements.comSharePoint Administrator is a person who is solely responsible for configuration and maintenance of a SharePoint Server or a Farm. Promoting user adoption, developing and implementing a governance plan, implementing compliance and discovery, negotiating SLAs, enforcing ownership of applications and sites with stakeholders, collaborating with developers and testing backups is an essential part of a SharePoint Admin's duty.Roles,Responsibilities and Duties of a SharePoint Admin:1. Installing, configuring, maintaining, upgrading and managing a SharePoint Server or a Farm.2. Configuring all service applications like Search, Metadata, UserProfile Synchronization etc.3. Creation of a Content DB and maintaining it. It involves maintenance of various logging databases in SQL Server. Compressing of logging Databases is also done by SharePoint admins since they grow in size considerably.4. Assignment of proper permission levels for all users of the site as well as configuring anonymous access if required .5. Configuring timer jobs depending on business requirements. Timer jobs are very important in SharePoint. One of the timer job is to backup the sites everyday. This is very important as it helps to restore the site to its previous version if any error occurs.6. Knowledge of powershell is very important for a SharePoint Admin. Clients usually prefer a person who can configure the whole system using powershellsince it's much faster than UI. In one of my projects, the whole farm configuration was based on a powershellscript which almost took 45-50 minutes to execute. It would have taken hours if the same thing was done using UI.7. Training and supporting the business users in their day to day involvement in SharePoint sites. For instance uploading a document, starting an approval workflow etc.8. Solid understanding of IIS, Active Directory and Mail Configuration.9. Configuration of Business Connectivity Services for connecting to a SQL database or a WCF service.10. Strong understanding of what can be done using OOB features in SharePoint.",SharePoint Administrator $K-K Brooklyn Hospital..Immediate Job in Brooklyn,Full Time,"Brooklyn, NY 11201",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/SharePoint-Administrator-95K-100K-Brooklyn-Hospital-Immediate-Job-Brooklyn-NY-US-165641502.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=4,"95,000.00 - 100,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),3e1a4e94580573a172580a1c24c2a3be
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:19:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Oral & Maxillofacial Surgery office in Chapel Hill & Durham is currently accepting resumes and cover letters for a surgical assistant or a dental assistant.  Candidates need to possess the required NC Dental Radiography training requirements.  The primary duties of this position include:  chairside assisting during surgery, preparing the patient for surgery, participating in IV sedation preparation and monitoring of the patient throughout the procedure, high quality infection control techniques, minimal cross-contamination techniques, decontamination of treatment room, and decontamination and high level sterilization of surgical instruments.  The ideal candidate will be professional with a strong commitment to the highest of care for our patients.   A generous benefit package is available after the 90 day probation period.  Benefits include: BCBS medical, 401K, uniforms, CE, pension profit sharing, HSA, and more.  The hours are Monday through Thursday, 8am-5pm, Friday 7:30-2pm. Please visit our website, www.omsanc.com.  NO PHONE CALLS PLEASE.",Oral Surgery Dental Assistant Job in Chapel Hill,Full Time,"Chapel Hill, NC 27514",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Oral-Surgery-Dental-Assistant-Job-Chapel-Hill-NC-US-166704289.aspx?mescoid=3100555001001&jobPosition=19,15.00 - 19.00 $ /hourgenerous benefit package,Entry Level,934b7af7a9517f5ba67d6b9e0fabd10e
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:44:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: Solution Architect Location: Cypress Creek, FL Duration: Permanent hireCompensation: $80K to $100K Work Requirements: US Citizen, GC Holders or Authorized to Work in the US Overview: TekPartners has some of the most sought after Information Technology positions available. As a reputable company in the IT staffing industry, you can trust us to place you in the right position. We currently have an opportunity for a Solution Architect in Cypress Creek, FL.   Skillset / Experience: We require an additional Solution Architect to participate in system deliveries and provide post go-live consultancy services to our customers. The application provides a powerful, integrated suite of software products designed to complement and extend GE Digital Energy's Smallworld Network Inventory software. You would be working with ground-breaking new developments in telecoms, and utilities sectors on innovative solutions to many of the worlds leading Telecoms and Cable TV providers supporting: Network planning and engineering for both fixed and mobile networks Automated service assignment Geo Web Client development BSS and OSS integrationYou should have a minimum of 5 years' experience working with Smallworld and a proven track record of designing and implementing solutions plus between 5-10 years relevant experience in telecoms. You will be able to demonstrate experience in carrying out requirements analysis and writing detailed specifications.  Key tasks Assist with requirements analysis and documentation Lead and deliver training sessions Assist in test script development and execution Assist with demo data preparation Assist with data analysis and cleansing activities Assist with running migration activities You should also have experience of some (or preferably all) of the following areas: System configuration / Data migration Development & execution of test specifications System installation and end to end delivery If you are the type of person we are looking for, you probably enjoy the challenge of effecting business change. You also enjoy visiting new countries and working with new cultures. This is a central client-facing role, requiring an ability to guide the customer through the complex process of Billing and network inventory system change, and rewarding you with the satisfaction of providing our clients with a first class service. Education, Qualifications and Special Training Educated to degree level (or equivalent) Minimum of 2:1 in a technical subject. Experience - Competencies/Capabilities Essential: Smallworld GIS or other GIS system experience· Must know or be willing to learn the inventory/engineering side of telecoms · Must be willing to learn how to use all of the GE · Requirements analysis and production of specifications · System configuration (preferably Telecoms) · Project Implementation experience (preferably Telecoms) Desirable: Windows OS knowledge SQL/DMBS Experience  Behavioural Essential:   Excellent written and verbal communication skills Problem solving skills Well organised and self-motivated Willingness and flexibility with travelling   ",Solution Architect - CNI Job in Coral Gables,Full Time,"Coral Gables, FL 33114",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Solution-Architect-CNI-Job-Coral-Gables-FL-US-166732432.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,c4088aee35e91365034f2331134a7983
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:45:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Smyrna  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Smyrna 37167,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-SMYRNA-166739253.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=16,,General/Other: Medical/Health,6a570d80959957fe2905891967ecf4b3
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:19:56:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"SUMMARY:  The Clinical RN’s primary responsibility is taking patient, facility and physician phone calls in regards to the infusion pump. There is no one clinical background that prepares nurses for the clinical support on-call position, but there are qualities that are conducive to success.  Oncology experience, combined with Oncology Certification (OCN), is what InfuSystem uses as benchmark to validate our clinical expertise to our accounts.  CRNI (Certified Registered Nurse Infusionist) certification, in combination with that OCN, would provide the candidate with the necessary background to guarantee success at this position. The major difference in delivering top-notch nursing care in this role must come without the advantage of seeing or touching the patient.  Skills rest on the ability to listen, process information mentally, and communicate effectively with the client. ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITES:  include the following:   Responsible for handling patient/physician/facility calls as needed.Responsible for documenting any calls taken. EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE: Current Licensure as a Registered Nurse in your state of residence with three to five years’ clinical nursing experience, IV specialty training, critical care, emergency room, PICC certification, OCN certification, Bachelor’s Degree with Master’s prepared preferred.   WORK ENVIRONMENT: The employee will work from their home. On Call hours will include rotating shifts (including weekends) for 40 hours/wk.Email resume to HR@infusystem.com",On Call Clinical Support Nurse Job in Telecommute body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time, Employee",Telecommute,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/On-Call-Clinical-Support-Nurse-Job-US-166614667.aspx?mescoid=2900502001001&jobPosition=20,,Medical/Health,c73b73b5d6ddbd1cb3ff4f8d9fec0e17
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:20:57:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Dreaming of a health care career? As a National Guard Health Care Specialist, you will address the health care needs of civilians after natural disasters or civil emergencies. You will also be the first line of defense against injuries and illnesses suffered by our Soldiers through the administration of immediate emergency care and ongoing care and support. After extensive Army medical training, you will be prepared to provide fellow Soldiers with first-rate health care in any setting, from field hospitals to state-of-the-art facilities. Your training will also prepare you for a rewarding civilian career in the health care field.Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn fundamental Soldiering skills, and seven to 52 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in patient care. The duration of your AIT depends on the area of specialization you choose. Part of AIT is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Health Care Specialist Job in Wausau  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Wausau 54401,,http://jobview.monster.com/Health-Care-Specialist-Job-WAUSAU-166742872.aspx?mescoid=3100562001001&jobPosition=12,,General/Other: Medical/Health,c754dc9e30c6826f338f345cb6ddd441
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:20:58:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The RN-staff nurse under the supervision of the nursing director/manager provides patient care and/or support activities appropriate to ages served; primarily adults ages 18-65 or geriatric patient's ages over 65.  May also include care for infant age 0-1 year, child ages 1-12 years or adolescent ages 13-17 years.  Participates as primary nurse, associate nurse, a team member or team leader in the planning and implementing of patient care.  Directs and assists in carrying out safe aseptic technique and procedures.  Offers leadership and direction to all support staff within department.   CHRISTUS Spohn Hospital Corpus Christi-South is a 158-bed full-service hospital and the region's premier facility for women, offering comprehensive services for all stages of a woman's life.  The hospital is also home to a Level III Neonatal Intensive Care Unit, allowing premature newborns with special needs to stay close to their recovering mothers.  The unit is staffed with a neonate transport team. The hospital also offers advanced diagnostic and imaging services, as well as surgical, emergency, orthopedic, and rehabilitative services.  Job Requirements Able to assess, plan, implement and evaluate nursing care. One-year experience in emergency department or critical care nursing preferred. Graduate of an accredited school of nursing.  Current Texas State RN license.  CPR-(American Heart Association).  ACLS within 6 months of hire/transfer date. CPI within 90days of hire/transfer date.  TNCC within 18 months of hire/transfer date. ENPC or PALS within 18 months of hire/transfer date.    *Sign On Bonus and Relocation Assistance Available - *Sign On Bonus amount determined by years of experience    ",Registered Nurse - Emergency Room Job in Corpus Christi,"Full Time, Employee","Corpus Christi, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Registered-Nurse-Emergency-Room-Job-Corpus-Christi-TX-US-166644145.aspx?mescoid=2900499001001&jobPosition=14,,Medical/Health,3ae390c717624f2e52deac93f279ffce
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:21:53:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client located in Sunnyvale is looking for a Web Content Editor.The core responsibility will be assigning 200 part numbers to pre-existing product family pages and creating chromatography-related product page content for any remaining products.There are 100 part numbers that is being enabled for e-commerce, and this person will identify where the numbers belong in existing product families on our websiteIn addition, writing part number content for potential products.You will like to do a lot of investigative work, digging through catalogues, etc.In today’s job market, “who you know” matters more than ever – and that’s why you should get to know Volt. We’re one of the world’s largest recruiting companies, yet our success is built one successful placement at a time. Each of our recruiters has niche industry expertise, committed to connecting top talent with respected companies.Through Volt's Military Heroes Program, Volt secures the talents of American's veterans and encourages their dependents and spouses to contact Volt. Volt is a member of the Military Spouse Employment Partnership and is proud to support the Wounded Warrior Project. http://www.voltmilitary.com/site/8417/commitment.html For more opportunities, connect with us online at volt.com/NorCal.Volt is an equal opportunity employer.*Someone who likes research/digging•Experience/background with any type of writing•Able to organize data•Very detail oriented•Can create written content•English, communications, or science background preferred•High school diploma or GED required•If the person has written product page content before, this would be preferred•Not looking for just a blogger, as product page content is slightly different",Web Content Editor Job in Sunnyvale,Full Time Employee,"Sunnyvale, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Web-Content-Editor-Job-Sunnyvale-CA-US-166692944.aspx?mescoid=1500139001001&jobPosition=3,,General/Other: IT/Software Development,081d0dba2318e0196e7a5560304e0101
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:21:54:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"CHRISTUS VNA of San Antonio is looking for a Licensed Vocational Nurse (LVN)for our Hospice Inpatient department. LVN's work under the general direction of the Inpatient Facility Manager/Charge RN and the attending physician in the provision of skilled nursing services, planning and care in order to maximize the comfort and health of hospice patients and families.Graduate of an approved school of vocational nursing. Three (3) years of varied work experience as a vocation nurse, and preferably two of those three years in an acute care setting. Possession of a current state license to practice as a LVN. CPR certification required.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",LVN (Hospice/IPC) PRN Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX 78228",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/LVN-Hospice-IPC-PRN-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166626866.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=10,,Medical/Health,009497accbc96bb3053faf69cba94b60
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:22:15:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description As part of the application process for a role at CHRISTUS Santa Rosa - Westover Hills you have been invited to complete an assessment. We believe that you will find this to be a challenging and enjoyable experience. You are expected to complete this assessment on your own without the assistance of anyone else. This assessment should take approximately 15-20 minutes to complete and you are not required to have any special computer skills to do so. Please click on the link below to get started. https://christushealth.selectrakonline.com/recruitment/recruit.aspx Registered professional nurse who assesses, implements or delegates, plans, and evaluates total nursing care and functions in accordance with established philosophy, providing and directing patient care for a group of patients. Relates effectively with other shifts/departments for optimal continuity of care. Provides clinical supervision for entry level nurses and assists in their development. Incorporates the following values into the work environment: Dignity: demonstrates respect for the worth of every person, recognition and commitment to the value of diverse individuals and perspectives, and special concern for the poor and underserved. Integrity: demonstrates honesty, justice and consistency in all relationships. Excellence: demonstrates high standards of service and performance. Compassion: demonstrates service in a spirit of empathy, love and concern. Stewardship: demonstrates wise and just use of talents and resources in a collaborative manner.  Job Requirements Registered Nurse with valid Texas license.BLS certification required; ACLS certification highly desired/recommended. Current specialty certification as required. Must have working knowledge of the nursing process as well as in depth knowledge of therapeutic, physical, psychosocial, spiritual, cultural, and developmental needs for a select category of patients. Good communication skills, both written and verbal. Must be able to walk and stand for extended periods. Must be able to walk; climb stairs; lift, carry, push/pull greater than 50 pounds, repeatedly. Good balance is required to facilitate climbing and reaching for supplies. Must be able to bend, twist and crawl to facilitate cleaning equipment and must possess sufficient manual dexterity to handle IVs, specimens, equipment, and medications. Required to lift and move patients. Potential for exposure to body fluids and communicable disease exists. Required to work in an indoor climate controlled environment with occasional deviations in temperature related to location or specialty area. There may be occasions where exposure to external elements may be necessary (i.e. code grays, patient transport, etc.). Must be able to communicate in writing and verbally, both in person and by telephone. Demonstrates competence to perform assigned patient care responsibilities in a manner that meets the age-specific and developmental needs of patients served by the department. Appropriately adapts assigned patient assessment, treatment and/or care methods to accommodate the unique physical, psychosocial, cultural, age-specific and other developmental needs of each patient served. Takes personal responsibility to ensure compliance with all policies, procedures and standards as promulgated by state and federal agencies, the hospital, and other regulatory entities. Performs all duties in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and does not solicit or disclose any confidential information unless it is necessary in the performance of assigned job duties. Must successfully complete the pre-employment/post job offer health screening and the annual screening each year thereafter as an associate. Demonstrates adherence to the CORE values of CHRISTUS Santa Rosa. Performs other duties as assigned.",RN,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/RN-Med-Surg-Full-Time-Night-Weekend-Westover-Hills-San-Antonio-TX-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166644058.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,61480f3f773e785068cc39cd61a1d07a
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:22:15:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Part-Time (1st and 2nd shift available)Brookdale Hixson 4515 Hixson Pike Hixson, TN 37343Job #: 057764Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.Your responsibilities: * Provide direct care to residents, while promoting the highest level of functioning, as directed by management * Monitor residents as needed, including resident responses to treatment and care plans* Supervise and direct nursing assistants as needed* Promote quality services within community standards, state and federal regulations* Document necessary information regarding nursing care, care plans and observation of residents' overall conditionsRequired skills and qualifications: * Current Licensed Practical Nursing (LPN) within the state of practice* Current CPR and first aid certifications a plus * Two to three years of relevant nursing experience* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, weekends and holidays as needed* Must enjoy working with the senior population If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Licensed Practical Nurse LPN Job in Hixson,Part Time Employee,"Hixson, TN 37343",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Licensed-Practical-Nurse-LPN-Job-Hixson-TN-US-166613211.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=6,,Medical/Health,76589b3d86795a69cb69a7b7fbade2b9
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:22:54:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an Army National Guard Cryptologic Linguist, you learn to interpret the words, intent and tenor of foreign communications. In this role, you will perform or supervise the detection, acquisition, geolocation, identification, and exploitation of foreign communications using specialized signals equipment. Specific duties of the Cryptologic Linguist may include: identification of foreign communications; categorizing signals by activity type; foreign communication analysis; recognizing changes in transmission modes and reporting the change; providing translation expertise to analysts; supporting Signals Intelligence tasking, reporting, and coordination; and providing transcriptions or translations of foreign communications. By joining the Army National Guard, you will be preparing yourself for a rewarding civilian career. The skills you learn as a Cryptologic Linguist will help prepare you for a future with government agencies, embassies, universities, and companies that conduct business overseas as a civilian translator or interpreter. There is also potential for you to pursue a career as a government service executive. You'd be involved in determining and formulating policies, providing overall direction of federal, state, local, or international government activities, as well as planning, directing, and coordinating operational activities at higher management levels. Earn while you learn Get paid to learn! In the Army National Guard, you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance. Job training for a Cryptologic Linguist requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and three to 80 weeks of Advanced Individual Training. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field. Soldiers who don't possess foreign language fluency will attend foreign language training at the Defense Language Institute for six to 18 months prior to attending Advanced Individual Training. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change. BenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.",Cryptologic Linguist Job in Johnstown  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,,Johnstown 15904,,http://jobview.monster.com/Cryptologic-Linguist-Job-JOHNSTOWN-166736860.aspx?mescoid=5501110001001&jobPosition=15,,Telecommunications Administration/Management,20763fc204c023d480736772ee612447
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:22:55:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Juvenile Welfare Board of Pinellas CountyJOB OPPORTUNITYApril 26, 2016HIRING RANGE: $51,708.80-$81,475.47 (PG-23)The Juvenile Welfare Board offers a comprehensive benefits package, including medical, vision, dental, and life insurance as well as vacation and sick leave, tuition reimbursement, and participation in the Florida Retirement System among other benefits. Position Title:Database/Applications Administrator     Department: Business, Finance, & Technology Department Reports to:IT Manager    Status:  Exempt  Position Purpose:  Highly technical position that acts as the systems administrator for enterprise level applications taking the lead technical role for providingtechnical support and administration  Key Responsibilities:Performs SQL Database development tasks as needed to support the Data Analytics system. These tasks will include creation of T-SQL queries and stored procedures. The ability to troubleshoot and create SSIS packages and the ability to create queries from and make modifications to an existing SSAS model. Serves as the SharePoint System Administrator, which involves managing and checking the overall health of the JWB SharePoint Environment including: managing permissions, analyzing and reporting on usage and activity, moving and copying sites, regular review and clean-up of accounts and sites, monitoring SharePoint trends, setting up alerts, troubleshooting and solving issues, evaluating and installation of patches and software updates to the SharePoint environment. Serves as the Laserfiche (JWB’s document repository) System Administrator, which includes managing permissions and licenses, creating and maintaining templates; evaluating and installing patches and software updates to the system as necessary.Assists with upgrades of enterprise level software systems as needed including: performing an impact analysis of needs and risks, assessing and implementing software, hardware, and other requirements, documenting, and training end-users, reviewing dependencies, performing the actual upgrade, testing, and training. Install, implement, support and administer various third party software applications. Serve as Project Manager and/or Business Analyst on various technical projects or initiatives to ensure business requirements are being considered and that the project is performed on-time, in-scope, and in-budget.Assist with the development of policies and procedures involving software applications. Create user documentation and train personnel on new application software.  Other duties as assigned.   Specifications:BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or Information Systems preferred.Minimum of 3years’ experience working in a similar capacity.Strong experience administering enterprise level systems as well as demonstrated experience understanding business processes and how they impact enterprise wide systems.Strong overall understanding of IT infrastructure in regards to servers, operating systems, networking, and security.Understanding of software and hardware requirements of varied departmental systems.Knowledge of workflows and process requirements of complex application systems.Demonstrated ability to be the subject matter expert in supporting, maintaining, and administering complex applications.Excellent problem solving/analytical skills and knowledge of analytical tools.Display and execute logical and complex troubleshooting methods.Excellent verbal, written communication, and negotiation skills.Ability to effectively interface with technical and nontechnical staff at all organizational levels.Ability to manage multiple projects at the same time in a fast-paced environment and learn new content areas or acquire skills quickly when required.  Display a professional attitude and work habits while working in teams and collaborating with others. Additional Requirements:   Successfully pass a Level II background screening as required by Ch. 435 Florida Statutes.   Possess a valid driver’s license and access to reliable transportation.Submit Resumes by Monday, May 30, 2016 to:Juvenile Welfare Board of Pinellas County, Attn:  Human Resources Dept.14155 58th Street N. Clearwater, FL  33760email: hr@jwbpinellas.org or fax: 727-453-5610    Website: www.jwbpinellas.orgThe Juvenile Welfare Board is an equal opportunity employer.The Juvenile Welfare Board is an E-Verify Employer.Certain service members and veterans, and the spouses and family members of the service members and veterans, receive preference and priority in employment by the state and are encouraged to apply for the positions being filled.  Applicants interested in claiming Veterans’ Preference please apply at:www.jwbpinellas.orgAll applicants are advised that applications in Florida become a matter of public record upon receipt. ",Database/Applications Administrator Job in Clearwater,Full Time,"Clearwater, FL 33760",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/Database-Applications-Administrator-Job-Clearwater-FL-US-166653674.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=19,"51,708.80 - 81,475.47 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),0d680a8f658643529e5f9a28318770a0
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:23:49:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Ascendum Solutions is looking for two Big Data Architects for long term consulting roles in Cincinnati, OHPosition Summary:The Big Data Architect / Collaborative Analyst serves as the focal point and technical leader of complex analytic projects in a Big Data environment. The work requires clear communication with a wide range of technical and non-technical team members as well as hands-on technical work using a variety of languages and tools.The Big Data Architect / Collaborative Analyst will serve as the technical leader of an agile team tasked with the conceptualization, design, documentation and delivery of a Big Data analytics effort. Key tasks include working with data scientists, analysts and the business customer to understand the goals of the analytic project, sourcing the data for the project from across the enterprise, determining data quality and metadata needs for the effort, and building the solution atop the existing Big Data and ELT environment. The position requires outstanding communication and leadership skills as well as a mastery of SQL and a deep understanding of enterprise data, data modeling, Business Intelligence tools and Information Architecture.Candidates absolutely must be comfortable working with SQL and the Linux command line on a daily basis. Candidates must be comfortable with using a variety of open source tools and languages to perform exploratory data analysis on raw data sets, build various data transformations in SQL or via ELT and ensure that these efforts comply with a data model that will meet the customer’s needs. Additionally, candidates must be capable of understanding limitations in the data and data quality, dealing with data granularity or misalignment issues and communicating these issues and tradeoffs to non-technical business customers to manage customer expectations and ensure delivery of a “best-possible” solution.Essential Job Functions:Works closely with the technical and non-technical members of the business team to understand requirements and translate those requirements into workable technical objectivesWorks with data owners to obtain access to source data, obtain sample data and to perform detailed analysis of source data to build a deep understanding of data quality and how the data can or cannot be usedWorks with other Big Data Architect / Collaborative Analysts to resolve complex data management issues or issues that affect the entire Big Data ecosystem.Works with other members of an agile project team to iteratively and collaboratively deliver a solution that meets the customer’s goalsBuilds data models, diagrams, documentation, metadata and other information that communicates the design intent of the proposed solutionUtilizes SQL, Linux shell scripting, and other tools to examine raw data, build exploratory data models, construct views from widely differing data sources and otherwise produce useful information from the raw data with the proper level of granularity and flexibility to meet customer’s needsWorks iteratively with the customer’s BI team to ensure suitability of the solution from a data quality, dimensionality and performance standpointMay direct or oversee the daily work of ELT developers, BI developers and junior technical staff.Minimum Position Qualifications:Must possess the following:BS or BA degree in a related field OR significant relevant work experience10+ years in information technology5+ years as a Technical Lead responsible for application database design and architectureProficient in data integration design and patterns, logical and physical data architecture and data modeling for enterprise applications, ODSs (Operational Data Stores), transactional data systems, data marts, data warehouses and business intelligence systemsProficient in enterprise data modeling standards and toolsProficient in full lifecycle development on multiple platforms / solution typesExperience in creating and implementing data architecture standards for master data management, data quality, data dictionary, meta data and data securityExperience with large data volumes and large databases and with data of varying degrees of quality and completenessAbility to synthesize natural keys and create table JOINS from significantly different data setsExcellent SQL skillsProficient in Linux shell scripting including SED, AWK and use of regular expressionsFamiliarity with very large datasetsFamiliarity with XML, JSON and other structured data found in NOSQL databasesAbility to translate ambiguous business needs into technical requirements and refine those requirements over time to develop a solution acceptable to all stakeholdersAbility to train customers, technical staff and BI developers on the data, its quality and its useComfortable working in ambiguous and/or stressful situationsSelf-motivated and know when to seek guidanceAbility to change priorities quickly, and capacity to handle multiple tasksAbility to learn new tools and technologiesAbility to work independently and in a teamAbility to delegate tasks and review the work of othersExcellent hands-on technical skills are a MUSTExcellent verbal and written communication skills are a MUSTAdditional desirable skillsProficient in Perl, Python, Java, Scala or other third-generation structured programming languagesExperience with HDFS, Hadoop, Hive, Impala, Sqoop, Kafka, Hue or SparkExperience with Tableau, Alteryx, or RExperience with Informatica, IIB, MQFTE, Kafka, TWS, ETL tools, pub/sub messaging solutions, or Spring XDAbout Ascendum:We are a global IT services company leveraging technology to solve business problems. Our clients include small, medium, and large firms with small, medium, and large problems. Ascendum’s approach is built on the success of using the right combination of strategy, people, processes, technology, and infrastructure for each client situation, to meet specific business needs/challenges and deliver expected results.High levels of technical expertise, commitment to exceeding customer expectations, a dedicated and highly motivated global workforce, coupled with a seamless onsite/offshore delivery model and a state-of-the-art worldwide infrastructure, gives us the competitive edge to provide comprehensive, end-to-end IT solutions to our diverse clientele.Headquartered in the heartland of America (Cincinnati, OH) Ascendum has delivery, sales, and support offices worldwide including its offshore development center in the heart of India’s “Silicon Valley,” Bangalore, and a BPO Center in Ahmedabad, India. Ascendum provides: Health and Dental benefits to all consultants. 401(k) Retirement plan with employer contribution. Paid vacation and sick days. ",Big Data Architect ( positions) Job in Cincinnati,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Cincinnati, OH 45242",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Big-Data-Architect-2-positions-Job-Cincinnati-OH-US-166737973.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,38643fd7cce7eaa45b5e0bc6806b0201
United States of America,US,02/May/2016:23:50:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job SummaryThe Employee Communications Client Supervisor assists with developing effective, measurable communications strategies to support companywide projects and initiatives while managing projects and schedules associated with UPS’s senior leadership. He/She is responsible for concept development of multimedia deliverables in the areas of leadership messaging and education, face to face employee recognition (travel and district visit opportunities and topics), and Management Conference. These initiatives will support the Employee Communications Department’s yearly communications priorities and to ensure that the projects align with overall company objectives.The Employee Communications Client Supervisor coordinates efforts of team members to ensure successful project completion by assigning tasks, monitoring work flow, providing constructive feedback, and measuring results. He/she communicates with key stakeholders regularly to provide project status updates. This position performs editorial reviews to ensure deliverables meet UPS style guidelines.Other DutiesCreates surveys that measure message retention and medium effectiveness to evaluate project success.Writes and edits communications deliverables to inform employees of corporate initiatives.Updates communications plan calendar to schedule content in support of current business initiatives.Collaborates with team members on special projects to outline a project budget and identify a cost effective approach to message delivery that aligns with corporate strategies.Presents options (e.g., methods to communicate message) to client stakeholders to obtain approvals for project budgets and deliverables.Meets with clients to determine project timelines and identify key messages.Budgets department costs to ensure that budgetary concerns are met.Preferred CompetenciesCommunication Design and Management: Identifies the main message in documents; explains the importance of timely and relevant communication; demonstrates a basic understanding of the different channels available for communication.Detail Orientation: Captures/documents specific and accurate information; learns subjects thoroughly and in detail; completes work with thoroughness; supplies appropriate details when requested; maintains organized files.Negotiation: Demonstrates an understanding of negotiation techniques; identifies stakeholders/participants that should be involved in negotiations; demonstrates an understanding of each party’s objectives.Project Management: Demonstrates understanding of implementation objectives, project plan, and one's role within a project; participates in the implementation of a project; provides timely, thorough and concise updates for area of responsibility; identifies areas of risk and properly communicates them to the project manager.Vendor/Supplier Management: Identifies internal customers’ needs and vendors to meet those needs; determines costs and benefits to UPS for vendors’ products, commodities or services; creates bid proposals for vendor solicitation; analyzes vendor responses and develops recommendations for award.Minimum QualificationsBachelor’s Degree (or internationally comparable degree)  - PreferredExperience using Microsoft Office products or equivalent software – PreferredExperience using Photoshop or another photo/video-editing software - Preferred",UPS Employee Communications Client Supervisor-Network Job in Miami,,"Miami, FL 33122",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/UPS-Employee-Communications-Client-Supervisor-Network-Job-MIAMI-FL-US-166124289.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=13,,IT/Software Development,611bbfb02adbdebc60d97a5286efccfc
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:23:59:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Is It Time to Consider Something New?If you feel like you are moving too slowly along your career path and are inspired by the thought of helping people protect and enrich their lives, we can help you find your passion.With an average of 10,000 baby boomers reaching retirement age each day1, there has never been a better time to enter the financial services industry. Prudential is seeking professionals from a variety of backgrounds who are ambitious, people-oriented individuals with a desire to make a difference and own their own future. Overall Duties and Responsibilities ·Develop and implement sales and marketing plans·Prospect potential clients and discuss insurance and financial services·Build and execute strategies to help clients accumulate, preserve, and transfer their assets TrainingAt Prudential, you will receive coaching and mentoring from experienced managers to help you build a client network during a paid training program.Prudential provides individualized classroom training, as well as web-based learning resources that begin at the time of hire and provide continued development as you build your career. You will have the opportunity to work with dynamic teams to develop innovative solutions that address the diverse needs of clients.Compensation and BenefitsWe offer competitive compensation and generous work performance-based bonuses. This is an opportunity for you to potentially achieve a six-figure incomeNext StepsIf you are looking for a career with high earning potential – and are up for a new challenge – click “Apply” to connect with our management team. 1 Source: The Baby Boom Cohort  in the US:2012-2060,  accessed 2/27/2015,  *Candidates cannot be currently registered with another broker-dealer.  Securities products and services are offered through Pruco Securities, LLC.  Each is a Prudential Financial company located in Newark, NJ and is solely responsible for its own financial condition and contractual obligations. ©2015  Prudential Financial, Inc. and its related entities. Prudential, the Prudential logo, the Rock symbol and Bring Your Challenges are service marks of Prudential Financial, Inc., and its related entities, registered in many jurisdictions worldwide. Prudential is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. EEO IS THE LAW. The Prudential Insurance Company of America, Newark, NJ and its affiliates. Prudential is an Employer that participates in E-Verify.0272810-00002-00 Expires 10/10/2016                                                                      Version 1 – Revised 3/16/2015",Financial Professional Associate Job in Englewood,Full Time Employee,"Englewood, CO 80112",,http://jobview.monster.com/financial-professional-associate-job-englewood-co-us-168806860.aspx?mescoid=1300117001001&jobPosition=17,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,4367718a8da3c60ff34ad8ed34a0dd58
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:23:57:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Netpique is hiring bilingual sales executives,. As a bilingual sales executive with Netpique you will use your two languages and two cultures to contact prospective companies and grow your territory. We work with Reliant Energy, an NRG company, one of the leading Energy suppliers throughout Texas.   We need to continue to meet the already established goals we have, so we are looking for the right individual to integrate into our sales team.This is more than a sales position; it's a career that provides work-life balance and achievable financial security. Best of all, it does not matter what kind of background you have; your success only depends on you! We have had successful sales associates who come from various industries and job types such as: Customer service, Retail Sales, Inside Sales, Call Center,  Insurance, Healthcare, Business Development, Real Estate or even previous stay at home moms/dads.  Requirements:Excellent English and Spanish language skillsCollege degree preferred, but not requiredPrior sales experience not necessary.Entry level ok  Benefits:Be your own boss: Pasa tiempo con tu familia.Competitive earnings: Unlimited income potential with a permanent Base SalaryTraining, tools and a strong support system.Exciting incentives and company-sponsored trips.Opportunities for Advancement – Career GrowthHealth, Dental, Vision, Fully Vested 401K…and more! What to do:     If you are a career-minded individual seeking to grown and learn, looking to begin your career, or even change careers altogether, do not wait to apply.  We are NOW interviewing candidates for open territories.  Must have a valid driver’s license (not suspended or expired) & transportation.  Criminal background & DMV screen is conducted to determine eligibility for employment.  Netpique, LLC is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer.",Bilingual Sales Executive Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",All,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-sales-executive-job-dallas-tx-us-164796217.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=3,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,cefbbb37cf02ad28cbfb01017bf2f43c
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:22:55:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Motion Designer  Contract to Hire opp.  Responsibilities: • Apply expert-level proficiency in a broad range of design, code and presentation tools, including Cinema 4D (or equivalent), AfterEffects, Photoshop, Illustrator, Flash, HTML and CSS• Strong knowledge of animation and video production principles and techniques• Strong creative concepting experience for both video and digital environments• Create clear storyboards from both detailed scripts and broad outlines that can be used for client review or direction for other animators• Strong attention to detail and awareness of project scope and delivery dates• Excellent communication skills in sharing design thinking through all stages of production• Ensure compliance with company guidelines and design standards Qualifications:• Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in related area• 5+ years’ experience designing motion for web and/or mobile applications• Ability to create detailed design specifications and mockups to communicate design intent• Expert in Cinema 4D (or equivalent), After Effects, Photoshop, Illustrator, Flash• Ability to understand and edit HTML, JavaScript and CSS  ",Motion Designer Job in San Francisco,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","San Francisco, CA 94105",,http://jobview.monster.com/motion-designer-job-san-francisco-ca-us-168961370.aspx?mescoid=2700414001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,f373bbaf80690fa72295b649c38c5637
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:22:54:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network. Provisioning Technician 2 is a mid level position within the Provisioning organization. This is a customer facing position that requires ability to effectively handle customer interactions and ability to be customer centric. This role is responsible for managing the orders required to deliver the services ordered. This includes the ordering of carrier access, task management and ordering of TN porting services. Qualified candidates must have a good understanding of telecommunication services and various VOIP and network products.   Major Responsibilities of the Position:Perform as a team player with ability to think creatively, identify areas for improvement and provide feedback to leadershipProvide excellent customer service to both internal and external customersWork well with others to achieve common goals and to foster a cooperative climateComplete designated amount of work in a specified timeframe with a high degree of qualityCoordinates with other departments and vendors to ensure on-time delivery of service to customersProvide resolution of service issues through troubleshooting and escalatingProvide timely escalation of issues to leadership and other responsible partiesPerform other duties and assist where needed as identified by leadershipManages the task fulfillment of a customer orderManages the order to 3rd party vendors to complete the delivery of servicesPerform other duties and assist where needed as identified by leadershipProvides informal training to peersWork Environment:May work with little supervisionPrimarily performs work duties sitting, or standing at a workstation utilizing a computer for extended periods of timeTraining Required in Title:On-the-Job TrainingBasic Qualifications:Associates Degree, or equivalent education and releevant experience. 5-7 Years experience in Telecommunications, or related experience in specific area, or equivalent. Have ability to adapt in a fast pace and changing environmentHave strong problem solving skills and ability to trouble shoot issues preventing the delivery of servicesHave excellent verbal and written communication skillsHave ability to work independently with minimal supervision in a production environmentHave ability to work varying shifts and hours including possible mandatory overtime and holidaysHave ability to adjust priorities or schedules to meet changing or work related demandsHave ability to efficiently and accurately work with multiple types of informationHave ability to be primary central point of contact for orders within the service delivery organizationHave ability to perform multiple tasks simultaneouslyHave ability to be very detail orientedDesired Qualifications:Experience working in an enterprise call queue environmentExperience placing orders with other telecommunication companiesExperience with implementation of circuits: DS1, DS3, Optical and EthernetExperience with managing the porting of customer telephone numbers through trading partnersExperience with the manual submission of ASRsExperience working with VOIP equipment or solutionsExperience working with  telephone number portingExperience working with internet and private network solutionsExperience with Access Service Request to Local Exchange CarriersReq#60614  Alternate Location: [[Monroe, LA]]Requisition #: [[60614]] EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Provisioning Technician  Job in Dublin,Full Time Employee,"Dublin, OH 43016",,http://jobview.monster.com/provisioning-technician-2-job-dublin-oh-us-168951012.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=16,,,e4bc1613b8d2f19a1a5aa1adc64ac059
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:22:17:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network. Job Responsibilities:The incumbent applies leadership and technical expertise to multiple complex projects, or multiple project teams within a business support area, to develop cost effective and timely products as well as apply technical analysis, assess business needs and provide new and creative solutions to complex business and technical problems under minimal supervision.The incumbent will direct the implementation or provide technical expertise to projects.Lead in the team effort to design, develop, code, test and debug new complex software or significant enhancements to existing complex software.Lead review of input for documentation of new or existing software.Apply existing or introduce new and approved technologies to develop solutions.Lead others in the application of principles, theories and concepts and use of methodologies, tools, documentation processes and test procedures to complete projects.May lead team to select and manage vendor.Demonstrates in depth knowledge of development principles, theories, and concepts in applicable discipline.Must adhere to all development processes (CMMI Level 3 or otherwise deemed best practices) to ensure appropriate flow of work with onsite, off-shore, and contract resources.Upon direction, be able to independently perform design of moderately complex enhancements to an existing system. Ability to perform this task and provide direction in this area would be preferred.Recommend alternative approaches considering application requirements and coordinating standards setting with programmers and analysts.Able to define resources required to complete assignment including analyzing requirements to produce a design, systems specifications and estimating the time and cost.Able to effectively manage multiple projects.Provide functional and technical guidance to project team members.Provide technical application and functional consulting to the IT organization & supported business team(s). Minimum Qualifications:Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related field or the equivalent in training and experience.Minimum 5-7 years progressively responsible professional level data processing experience to include professional level experience as Senior Programmer Analyst or the equivalent in training and experience.Additional or concurrent experience analyzing, designing, refining, and maintaining information processing systems in a large or multiple applications environment.Additional or concurrent experience which demonstrates familiarity with development life cycles and project management techniques or the equivalent in training and experience.Familiarity with project leadership techniques.Experience using structured specification coding and documentation techniques.Work experience with at least one major computer application.Ability to work independently with minimal supervision to plan, organize and coordinate multiple project tasks to meet established deadline and accommodate rapidly changing priorities.Effective communications, interpersonal, and analysis skills.Project leadership knowledge and experience. Preferred:Project leadership experience.Effective communication, interpersonal and analytical skills, ability to coach junior level programmers.Experience with production support and development in a distributed UNIX environmentThe individual should possess very strong background with J2EE technologies, PL/SQL, TCL/Expect and generic scripting.Experience and knowledge of BPMS software would be preferred.Comparatively strong understanding of the telecom domain.The individual should have background in working on teams that have global presence and must have experience with leading junior developers of various competencies.For HSI support needs:Strong skills in Javascript, SQL, Java development without IDE or debugger, UNIX, CPE knowledge and TR69 understanding.Job ID 62127 Alternate Location: US-Louisiana-MonroeRequisition #: 62127 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",Lead Software Developer Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-software-developer-job-monroe-la-us-168950943.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,,02067b3922ad3fac431a811f3a53f827
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:21:46:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Senior Business Analyst in Juno Beach, Florida (FL).Summary:The client looking for an individual to analyze their business process and practices in an effort to focus the design and implementation of information technology solutions that meet customer needs and business initiatives. This person will collaborate on an on-going basis with the Programmer/Analysts. The candidate will apply advanced analytical skills within the functional area.REQUIREMENTS:The ideal candidate will have similar skills and abilities to perform the job listed above. Any relevant education and/or training will be considered a plus.",Senior Business Analyst Job in Juno Beach,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Juno Beach, FL 33408",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-business-analyst-job-juno-beach-fl-us-168926948.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bc581013726748a87fc881043546c1f2
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:21:45:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Retail Sales Merchandiser FULL TIME   Retail Sales Merchandiser candidates are organized, self-motivated and friendly. As a member of our Top Performing Sales Team, you will work in full time Retail Sales with oversight and responsibility for increasing sales of our client’s products for leading brands in chocolate, candy/confections, sports drinks, soda products, and snacks. This Retail Sales position services and sells to retail accounts within an assigned territory, ensuring Client standards are met and sales volumes are increased. The ideal candidate for this Retail Sales position is independent, ambitious and driven to succeed with strong sales skills and the confidence to influence key decision makers at the store level. This is a great opportunity to work with Advantage Solutions, the largest sales and marketing agency in North America.   Responsibilities:   Meet and exceed sales goals, by maintaining proper product inventory Engage with store management using the latest technology to drive sales and enhance client satisfaction  Maintain client objectives  Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers, building rapport with clients and customers Perform merchandising duties QUALIFICATIONS: High School Diploma or higher education or equivalent job-related experience Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills   Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.   Position Summary   The Retail Sales Merchandiser (RSM) is responsible for servicing and selling to retail accounts within an assigned territory to ensure Client standards are met and volume is increased.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities   Sales and Merchandising Maintain Client objectives by ensuring secondary placements of product(s) are fully stocked, correctly signed, properly faced, and set to schematics Shelf Standards and Conditions: authorization of items to meet Client shelf schematic standards Meet Client and Company objectives by maintaining full distribution on existing SKUs. Take direction regarding tagging, rotating, and placing POS materials for products on shelf Prepare for and respond to audits Manage time and prioritize for store call coverage Complete accurate and timely paperwork and reports, recaps, itineraries, timesheets, expense reports, etc. May provide feedback for Client audit objectives  Customer Relations Communicate effectively both internally with Advantage Solutions management and externally with all customers Build rapport with Clients and Customers Field questions and proactively develop action plans to resolve issues Additional Responsibilities: Demonstrates high degree of professionalism in communication, attitude and teamwork with customers, peers and management Demonstrates high level of quality work, attendance and appearance Adheres to all Company Policies & Procedures and Safety Regulations Adheres to local, state and federal laws Performs the job safely utilizing proper equipment and safety techniques Additional responsibilities as assigned by supervisor related to the position/department Supervisory Responsibilities   Direct Reports   This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports   This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are essential duties and function of this job  Travel up to   20%         Must maintain current and valid driver’s license and valid proof of current insurance Minimum Qualifications Minimum Qualifications   The following are the minimum job-related qualifications which an individual needs in order to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities of the job   Education Level: (Required): High School Diploma or GED or equivalent experience   Field of Study/Area of Experience:  Basic knowledge of retail merchandising and/or selling   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Aggressive self-starter with a strong bias for action and results orientation High sense of urgency; strong drive and passion to win Keen attention to detail Excellent customer service, interpersonal and communication skills; position requires daily discussions with customers at all personnel levels. Demonstrated time management skills with the ability to manage multiple tasks Ability to work independently, but also successful team building skills Demonstrate good judgment and show respect for others Works cooperatively with others toward common group objectives, demonstrates respect for the ideas and contributions of other team members, cultivates positive relationships with other associates, and provides assistance and support to others Ability to communicate with email and basic internet skills Adaptability to changing demands, priorities, circumstances and directions Demonstrate commitment to meet or exceed customers’ expectations Environmental & Physical Requirements   Field / Administrative Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work may be performed in an office, field, retail store, or warehouse environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 50 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). Also required to travel and drive.  The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.      Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).      ",Retail Sales Merchandiser Full Time Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/retail-sales-merchandiser-full-time-job-dallas-tx-us-168801867.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=8,,Retail,325b6d17e3c6760022788f883f626e2b
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:20:58:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manages activities of various IT personnel. Makes decisions on personnel actions (promotions, hiring, terminations, etc.) Develops talent, Addresses resource management, cultivates capabilities of staff, planning and coordination of work, and managing performance. Responsible for the oversight of the daily operations. Controls expenses within the operating unit and is responsible for meeting budget goals. Actively involved in the coordination, implementation, problem solving, communication, and training of new technologies and processes, as they are developed and moved into the environment. Essential Job Functions: * Provides subject-matter direction and guidance to lower-level staff. * Trains, develops, and mentors staff. * Assigns, monitors, and reviews progress and accuracy of work. * Provides technical leadership in first-line resolution of complex technical problems. * Provides Staff Management oversight . * Hires, promotes, separates or makes recommendations regarding same. * Conducts performance reviews and assesses, manages performance. * Engages in skills assessments and promotes professional development of staff. * Assigns tasks, schedules work and establishes priorities. * Adheres to Departmental budgeting and fiscal responsibilities. * Oversees process for recording hours. * Schedules work and assignments to maximize appropriate use of resources. * Optimizes the utilization of resources by applying appropriate concepts, technologies and workflows. * Provides deep expertise in assigning and overseeing work of staff. * Visualizes, articulates, and solves moderately complex problems/issues. * Communicates effectively with all levels of the organization. * Connects strategy to employee's job responsibility. * Participates, as necessary, in training and development to remain current in field(s) of expertise. * Actively participates in project teams. * Manages and tracks project details. * Promotes continuous improvement of processes and delivery of results within assigned unit/area. Ensure compliance with corporate [and industry] standards, policies and regulations (SOX, SSP, DIACAP, PHPLC, etc.) * Provides leadership during periods of transition as the organization changes to respond to business opportunities/challenges, new technologies, legislation and other environmental factors. * Other duties as assigned or requested. Minimum Qualifications: * Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Science or comparable major and eight or more (8+) years of experience OR; * Master's Degree and two or more (2+) years of experience. * Working knowledge of reporting software. * Proficient knowledge of end-user personal computing skills. * Proficient PC skills and knowledge on files and folders. * Proficient analytical skills and problem solving abilities. * Strong interpersonal skills to manage employees and interact appropriately with senior management, internal clients, and external customers. * Ability to adapt to change, multi-task, meet multiple deadlines, collaborate, lead others, work on a regular and timely basis and work irregular hours, holidays and weekends. Preferred Qualifications: * Master's Degree. * Release management experience. Highmark Health and its affiliates prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their status as protected veterans or individuals with disabilities, and prohibit discrimination against all individuals based on their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation or any other category protected by applicable federal, state or local law. Highmark Health and its affiliates take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, protected veteran status or disability.",Team Manager,Full Time,"Pittsburgh, PA 15222",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/team-manager-it-job-pittsburgh-pa-us-168932038.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),54d148af50cc5a4cb18acedf5255b21a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:20:56:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Location: Irving TX Job Title: Now Hiring Appointment SettersThis Appointment Setting Position Features: ? Fun casual work environment ? Flexible Work Schedule Monday - Friday between 7am and 7pm ? Great Pay up to $11.23/ hr If you are looking for a rewarding career as an Appointment Setter then AppleOne has the job for you. This is a Great opportunity to work as a Appointment Setter at one of our fastest growing clients in the Irving area. This position features a fun and casual work environment, flexible work schedules, competitive pay, comprehensive benefits package and 11 paid holidays. Responsibilities: ? Obtain client information via telephone; interact with veterans' using scripts; verify information? Determine eligibility/ answer questions related to appointments and doctors visits? Able to meet and maintain Customer Service key performance indicators Experience: ? Minimum 6 months to 1 year call center experience ? Able to type 30 wpm? Exceptional customer service skills ? Excellent dependability ? Great communication skills ? The ability to multi task Requirements: ? Clear drug screen ? Clear background screening ? High school diploma, GED, or equivalent required We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1048801 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Now Hiring Appointment Setter- Job in Irving,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job Description:Location: Irving TX Job Title: Now Hiring Appointment SettersThis Appointment Setting Position Features: ? Fun casual work environment ? Flexible Work Schedule Monday - Friday between 7am and 7pm ? Great Pay up to $11.23/ hr If you are looking for a rewarding career as an Appointment Setter then AppleOne has the job for you. This is a Great opportunity to work as a Appointment Setter at one of our fastest growing clients in the Irving area. This position features a fun and casual work environment, flexible work schedules, competitive pay, comprehensive benefits package and 11 paid holidays. Responsibilities: ? Obtain client information via telephone; interact with veterans' using scripts; verify information? Determine eligibility/ answer questions related to appointments and doctors visits? Able to meet and maintain Customer Service key performance indicators Experience: ? Minimum 6 months to 1 year call center experience ? Able to type 30 wpm? Exceptional customer service skills ? Excellent dependability ? Great communication skills ? The ability to multi task Requirements: ? Clear drug screen ? Clear background screening ? High school diploma, GED, or equivalent required We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1048801 Job Experience:,Years of Experience Required:",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/now-hiring-appointment-setter-job-irving-tx-us-168930623.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=13,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7164726e28123c08931ae2b68b1ccdd6
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:20:35:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5248554-7Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. Normal work schedules typically fall between 7AM - 6PM. The schedule(s) for this position is 40 hours and may change based on business need. Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Other Desired Qualifications• Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168799368.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8843a3ac74585fbf3fd841b50e4d2d23
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:19:46:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Paralegal Job #:  664723Looking for a Paralegal / Law Clerk in Raleigh, NC!   An experienced corporate paralegal to oversee ongoing corporate secretarial and statutory compliance activities. This person will, in accordance with established processes:- Prepare, review and organize corporate documents such as board of director and shareholder resolutions and annual corporate filings;- Track compliance deadlines and oversee completion of required corporate filings;- Ensure that corporate documents, including global reports and filings, comply with internal policies and U.S. compliance requirements;- Interface with both external service providers (law firms, accounting firms) and internal clients; and- Maintain corporate subsidiary records- Experience managing corporate governance for international subsidiaries of a US multinational is preferred -International experience is a plus **Interested applicants please email Tyler Suite at tsuite@apexsystemsinc.com!**        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Paralegal Job in Raleigh,Full Time Employee,"Raleigh, NC",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/paralegal-job-raleigh-nc-us-168998362.aspx?mescoid=2300332001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),52dbb01b8c88c226c21648a9a187829c
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:19:46:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"HIRING - PART TIME ALTERATIONS SPECIALISTA Career That’s Meant to BeAt David’s Bridal, we empower our customers and our employees to stay true to their dreams and find the one, whether that means the wedding dress that matches her personal style—or the career that’s a perfect fit.We’re looking for people with diverse backgrounds and fresh ideas to help create a uniquely personal retail experience.Now Accepting Applications for our busy Season in March for Part TimeAlterations SpecialistThe Alteration’s Specialist is responsible for completing all alteration fittings and sewing services necessary to meet our customers’ needs. The Alterations Specialist suggests product options to our customers to help each one complete the overall look of her event.Our most successful Alterations Specialist are self-motivated individuals with outgoing personalities, and excellent technical sewing and fitting skills. They love special occasion fashion and have expertise on how to tailor a garment to ensure the best fit possible. Through the Alterations Specialist skills, vision, and informed recommendations, they will give our customers the confidence they need to choose the “one”, her dress.If you would like to be part of a dynamic team, help our customers dress for the most important days of their lives, and earn a competitive income, we would love to discuss your future at David’s Bridal.Our store will host interviews over the next two weeks.Alterations SpecialistResponsibilities:Perform all necessary customer garment fittings to David’s Bridal standardsPerform all types of alterations on bridal gowns, bridesmaid dresses, flower girl dresses, special occasion dressesPress, steam, and spot clean garments/merchandise as necessaryFollow quality control guidelines and inspect all garments to verify pristine condition before final delivery to customerSchedule alterations appointments in person or by telephone as neededFill out alterations tickets accurately and completely, ensuring correct fees and pricingResolve alterations customer service issues or complaints and refer any unresolved matter to floor managerAssist in closing sales by partnering with stylists to validate garment fit and suggest product additionsCommunicate supply needs to the Alterations Manager to ensure all supplies are available at all timesEnsure preventative maintenance of equipment and report any damage or broken equipment immediatelyFlexibility to work retail schedules such as weekends, evenings, and holidaysManual dexterity to perform non-selling responsibilities, such as use of POS (Point of Sale) terminals, counting money, accessing computers and initiating and receiving telephone callsManual dexterity to sew and perform fittingsAbility to move throughout the store, lift up to 10 pounds, stoop, kneel, crouch, twist, stand, and reach with armsPart Time AvailableProfessional EnvironmentGenerous Employee Discount After First Pay PeriodIf you are interested in working in our stores, please note that the online application process will take approximately 30 minutes.Now that we’ve popped the question, please say “I do”.<br />#CJT_jobBodyContent p {<br /> margin: 10px !important;<br /> min-height: 13px !important;<br />}<br />",Alterations Specialist [Part-Time] Job in Lewisville,Full Time Employee,"Lewisville, TX 75067",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/alterations-specialist-part-time-job-lewisville-tx-us-168272364.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=11,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,716116f4d382a8d6a1362a6dbd93ae10
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:19:45:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Fiber Splicer Job #:  657774Looking for Fiber Splicers for local project- 6-18 month project. Please email resume to hrebello@apexsystemsinc.com if interested.Fiber splicer must have the ability to splice fiber optic cable in both indoor and outdoor settings, have knowledge of construction practices for Outside Plant cable placement, ability to read, interpret, and update splicing schematics and diagrams. This candidate must have telecommunications experience and have the ability to travel as needed.Candidate must be able to splice fiber optic cables including both loose tube and ribbon cables, and build proper splice cases and fiber termination panels. Candidate must have ability to fusion splice and terminate various types of fiber optic connectorsCandidate must have experience and knowledge using OTDR and Fusion splicing machines in additional to other commonly used tools and test equipment. Splicer must be able to interpret buried underground and aerial as-builts and splice schedules.Candidate must have knowledge of Installation and dressing of fiber optic cabling. Candidate must be able to train and support team growth and be able to develop training material to build additional splicing team.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Fiber Splicer Job in San Jose,Full Time Employee,"San Jose, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/fiber-splicer-job-san-jose-ca-us-168998311.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1451bffad944eaffb3fb82e9d751ceee
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:58:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description:#16-14983 â€œStrategic Account Executiveâ€ Location: Remote, San Francisco/Los Angeles Western TerritoryWolters Kluwer GRC division is looking for a Strategic Account Executive to work remote covering the Western Territory.GRC is a division of Wolters Kluwer that provides a broad spectrum of software solutions, consulting services and industry specific expertise to customers across the globe. Our products and services are targeted to assist in the management myriad governance, risk and compliance needs in todayâ€™s dynamic markets and regulatory environments. GRCS serves 350,000+ customers in over 150 countries, including 70% of Fortune 500 companies. Our global footprint includes a workforce in 28 countries, with over $1.1 Billion in revenue. Our clients include Corporate Legal Departments, Insurers, Small Business, Financial Services, Brand Pros, Underwriting, Governments and Compliance & Risk Professionals.The Strategic Account Executive ( SAE) is responsible for new business development in a targeted group of financial companies within the Western Region. The SAE will also be responsible for growth within existing customer base by selling additional services and acquiring new divisions and groups with the targeted accounts. The SAE will provide account leadership and direction for CTLS staff members involved in the pre and post sales process as well as accept responsibility for customer satisfaction levels as measured by the minimum requirements set by the company. Essential Duties and Responsibilitiesâ€¢ Achieving annual quota targetsâ€¢ Protection of installed revenue baseâ€¢ Design, implement and publish a strategic direction for each of the SAE accountsâ€¢ Work closely with Strategic Business Consultants, Professional Services and Product Support Groups to ensure clear strategic direction is communicatedâ€¢ Achieve an average of 6 new contracts per month on a quarterly basesâ€¢ Achieve an average of 8-10 on site meetings per week over a monthly basis measured quarterly â€¢ Update all activity within Salesforce.com as outlined by VP of Salesâ€¢ Manage and report all pipeline and forecast activity through Salesforce.comâ€¢ Maintain knowledge of company product lines through self-training planQualifications:Minimum Qualifications: â€¢ 0-2 years customer service experience, including:â€¢ Familiarity with Microsoft Office Suite.â€¢ Integrating information from multiple sources quickly and accurately.â€¢ Working cross-functionally to resolve issues.â€¢ Utilizing communication skills, including both excellent verbal and accurate written skills.â€¢ Working independently with a minimum amount of oversight.â€¢ Functioning as an integral part of a team.Preferred Qualifications:â€¢ Working in a high volume customer service environment.â€¢ Working in a fast paced, changing environment.â€¢ Demonstrated ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.â€¢ Able to scan, open certified and regular mail, sort and batch incoming process.â€¢ Functional knowledge of legal industry.Apply to: https://www.wolterskluwer.apply2jobs.com/ProfExt/index.cfm?fuseaction=mExternal.showJob&RID=14996&CurrentPage=1 ABOUT WOLTERS KLUWER Wolters Kluwer N.V. (AEX: WKL) is a global leader in information services and solutions for professionals in the health, tax and accounting, risk and compliance, finance and legal sectors. We help our customers make critical decisions every day by providing expert solutions that combine deep domain knowledge with specialized technology and services. Wolters Kluwer reported 2015 annual revenues of â‚¬4.2 billion. The company, headquartered in Alphen aan den Rijn, the Netherlands, serves customers in over 180 countries, maintains operations in over 40 countries and employs 19,000 people worldwide.Wolters Kluwer shares are listed on Euronext Amsterdam (WKL) and are included in the AEX and Euronext 100 indices. Wolters Kluwer has a sponsored Level 1 American Depositary Receipt program. The ADRs are traded on the over-the-counter market in the U.S. (WTKWY).For more information about our solutions and organization, visit www.wolterskluwer.com, follow us on Twitter, Facebook, LinkedIn, and YouTube.EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITYWolters Kluwer U. S. Corporation and all of its subsidiaries, divisions, and customer/business units is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.INFORMATIONFor any assistance with your application for this job opening, please call the HR Source at (888) 495-4772 or email HRSource@WoltersKluwer.com TTY is also available at 888 (495) 4771.",Strategic Account Executive / - Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO 80237",Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/strategic-account-executive-16-14983-job-denver-co-us-167871797.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d4d28bc3aff5ef77d527db9598cbaf80
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:57:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"PC and Mac Field TechniciansOur nationwide company is currently looking for field technicians to service our residential and small business customers.This is a 1099 independent contractor position- tech is responsible for tools, having their own vehicle, gas, and other expenses.  Techs are compensated for time on-site and parts purchased for customers.Software/Technical Skills: • 3 years minimum full-time experience providing tech support • Office suite; Word, Excel, & Outlook, etc • Configuring email accounts using Outlook and Outlook Express • In depth knowledge and usage of Windows operating systems • PC imaging and configuration• TCP/IP • Routers, WAPs, Wireless, and other networking devices • Spyware / adware removal tools as well as antivirus programs• Savvy with search engine techniques • Tech must be comfortable with all facets of PC and laptop hardware setup and maintenance; including installation and configuration of hard drives, NIC's, printers, and other PC accessories.  • Experience with Mac is preferred, but not requiredDuties: • Technician will apply skills described above in resolving clients’ issues • Troubleshoot software                -Reinstallation of OS                -Removal of viruses/malware- Software upgrades and installation• Troubleshoot hardware• Troubleshoot network issues• PC Imaging and configuration• Troubleshoot and set up peripherals• Helping end users understand software• Call client’s vendors for warranty and troubleshooting issues Compensation:$25 to $35/hr for time spent at client sites; 1 hour minimum for each job, and commission ",PC and Mac Field Technicians Job in Akron,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Akron, OH 44310",Computer HardwareComputer SoftwareComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pc-mac-field-technicians-job-akron-oh-us-168963683.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=12,25.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,26512fdea3e6a1707f019e36f4994d0c
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:05:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Construction Project AdministratorTake command of your success as you deliver the future!CenturyLink is a leading provider of high-quality voice, broadband and video services over its advanced communications networks to consumers and businesses in 33 states. CenturyLink, headquartered in Monroe, La., is an S&P 500 Company and expects to be listed in the Fortune 500 list of America's largest corporations. For more information on CenturyLink, visit www.centurylink.comSupervise contractors engaged in Installation, Repair, Prefield, Cable Maintenance functions for Prism, HSI, and POTS.Design and implement quality assurance program.Manage day to day workload across a metropolitan area.Interface with local management to insure completion daily workload.Customer service focused. Interface with customer to solve their issues.Implement strategies and plans as required achieving established Region objectives.Prepare plans and specifications to provide high quality service within established time frames and to meet defined financial criteria.Supervise construction and installation activities to provide efficient operations and quality service in a timely manner.Participate in the process of negotiating and or bidding of projects with vendors and contractors for the construction and/or installation of plant facilities.Provide supervision to technicians on designs and plans to evaluate and implement new services, technologies, and products within established standards.Provide recommendations for necessary training for contractor.Ensure CenturyLink System Practices are communicated and adhered to.Stay abreast of industry issues and technologies through continuing education and actively participate in state and local industry committees/forums.Supervise staff by appraising performance, training, and communicating department objectives. Assist in the preparation of the FEV and operating budgets for the Division Plant Facilities department.Prepare written and oral reports regarding contractor performance and associated objectives.   Job Requirements Basic Qualifications:Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Business/Project Management or related field or the equivalent in training and experience.Minimum 2-3 years experience in human resources, management, project management, or customer service.Possess leadership and communications skills to direct and coach employees towards departmental goals.Incumbent must be self-motivated.Must be a team player and work well across departments.Superior organizational skills and the ability to multitask.Strong verbal, written and inter-personal communication skills with demonstrated ability to positively interact with company personnel from all levels of the organization, as well as, external contacts.Strong analytical skillsAlternate Location: US-Colorado-LittletonRequisition #: 61214 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",CONSTRUCTION PROJECT ADMINISTRATOR Job in Littleton,Full Time Employee,"Littleton, CO 80112",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-project-administrator-job-littleton-co-us-168950997.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=14,,,bc02ff83cfac6d0420e0b2bfbb803e51
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:04:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a Director of ERP Solutions in Brick, New Jersey (NJ).Duties Include: Provide overall direction, and leadership for IT at the client's facilities Accountable for leading a team of IT professionals in the design and implementation of ERP business solutions to enable critical initiativesREQUIREMENTS: Bachelor's degree 10+ years of experience is required 7 years' experience leading management level professionals Experience with ERP/LN preferred Strong experience with ERP implementations required Familiarity with cGMP industry experience",Director of Information Technology (ERP) Job in Brick,"Full Time, Employee","Brick, NJ 08723",,http://jobview.monster.com/director-of-information-technology-erp-job-brick-nj-us-168973931.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=3,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",f83dee9f5145b4e47fa3b2957980a38d
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:04:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Job Overview:The Network Technician will repair and maintain central office, private line, special circuits, pair gains and associated equipment. He or she will work with TDM and IP networks, DSO, DS1, DS3, Sonet (OC3 - OC192), Ethernet, routers, and all associated test equipment.Posting Date: 6/22/2016Closing Date: 7/01/2016Minimum Qualifications:Five (5) years experience working with central office switching equipment, TDM and IP networks, DSO, DS1, DS3, Sonet (OC3-OC192), Ethernet, Routers. Working knowledge of wiring, testing, turnup, and troubleshooting special circuits (DS1, DS3, ISDN, PRI, & Ethernet) using test equipment (TPI, T-Berd, Acterna), mux optioning, Channel Banks, and CMTs.Working knowledge of Tellabs 532 DACS, Alcatel 1631 DACS, Cisco routers, Redback networks, Adtran 2800 & 2820 Mux,Working knowledge of ALL associated test equipment.Training or equivalent work experience in basic electricity, basic electronics, and data transmission.·Ability to maneuver and climb ladders, work aloft and lift a minimum of 75 lbs.Ability to work below ground in close quarters in a controlled environmental vault (CEV)·Possession of a valid State driver’s license and an acceptable driving record·Proficient PC skills to include use of Microsoft products, electronic mail, keyboard commands and ability to navigate the Internet·Ability to visually identify all colors used in telephone cable·Demonstrated analytical problem solving skills· Proven ability to successfully communicate with customers ·Ability to work alone on critical problems; often occurs during night hours·Able to work flexible shifts, weekends, overtime, call-outs and stand-by·Preferred Qualifications:Working knowledge of DMS and/or 5ESS switchesWorking knowledge of company legacy systems (Access Care, CIRAS, ARBS, TTI, CLAS, Procomm Plus & NOSA, Ciena, AFC, Calix, Marconi DISC*S & ALU7750)Working knowledge of fiber equipment (Alcatel, Nortel, Adtran)Working knowledge turning up and troubleshooting T1s, HDSL, Mux Optioning, channel banks and CMTsAlternate Location: US-Florida-Naples Requisition #: 63907 This position is part of a bargaining unit and represented by a union.  Depending upon the applicable collective bargaining agreement under which you may be hired, you may be: (a) required to join the union and pay union dues as a condition of employment; or, (b)  required to pay union dues, but not join the union as a condition of employment; or (c) free to chose whether or not to join the union, but if you do join the union you would be obligated to pay union dues.EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.  ",NETWORK TECHNICIAN Job in Naples,Full Time Employee,"Naples, FL 34108",,http://jobview.monster.com/network-technician-job-naples-fl-us-168950703.aspx?mescoid=1500135001001&jobPosition=6,,,b0c1659d910cb6bc31bd956137499f26
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:04:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Account Executive   Who We Are:  Kibo. We provide industry leading eCommerce, distributed order management, and mobile point-of-sale solutions to retailers and branded manufacturers. Our cloud-based commerce suite enables customers to meet consumer demands anywhere, any time, and on any device.  We have US offices in Texas and California and international offices in London.   Who You Are: The racecar driver of the sales world.  You know how to get the absolute best out of your sales team.  You know what makes them tick and how to push the limits of your team to succeed.  You are a Leader, working with many disciplines to move the business forward rapidly.  You are passionate about growing the organization and selling world class products.   Why You Should Apply: This position offers you the opportunity to work with a newly formed organization on their industry leading eCommerce solutions. This role offers amazing growth potential for individuals looking to take their career to the next level.   Job Summary: The Account Executive will develop and close new business opportunities within an assigned territory.  This role will grow territory revenue by effectively managing and continuously feeding a sales pipeline/funnel of potential customers, identifying target customers for new sales, cross selling and upselling with acquired customers, and engaging customer retention and contract renewal efforts within a defined geographic area.  This role will be assigned an annual sales plan which will be measured on an ongoing basis to evaluate performance.     Key Responsibilities: Manage territory assignment and pipeline activity; participate in sales forecasting Heavy prospecting of customers (phone, email, marketing campaigns, referrals, LinkedIn, etc.); coordinate with marketing department to qualify and identify leads Establish and maintain long-term relationships to maximize future revenue opportunities Meet with and present to key clients and senior-level executives to negotiate and close deals Aggressively work the pipeline to consistently meet or exceed monthly, quarterly, and annual revenue quotas Develop and implement strategic sales plans to accommodate corporate goals Coordination and qualification of “Proof of Concept” studies for prospects Overachievement of quarterly sales quotas through selling Kibo products to well qualified prospects and customers Manage account and contact information through the entire sales lifecycle process using Salesforce.com Remains highly knowledgeable of Kibo products and target industries to facilitate sales efforts Interact with cross-functional business leadership teams including Finance, Contracts, Product Management, Customer Service, and Engineering  Remain up-to-date understanding of competitors' activities and competitive offerings Remain up-to-date understanding of industry trends and technical developments that effect target markets The role requires travel within the assigned territory    Qualifications: EDUCATION:  Bachelor’s degree in Business or Marketing or equivalent combination of education and experience. EXPERIENCE:  Minimum of 3-5 years’ of sales experience, preferably in software sales   Skills & Requirements: Experience in the Retail, Branded Manufacturers and Cataloguers preferred Proven track record of increasing sales, revenue and profitability within a sales organization Knowledge and experience of Salesforce.com Knowledge of effective networking, relationship building and new customer sourcing activities Excellent interpersonal and communication skills Strong Microsoft Office skills – Outlook, Word, Excel and Powerpoint Excellent organizational and time management skills Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, ambitious environment Ability to effectively inform and persuade Ability to self-motivate and produce high-level results with minimal supervision and direction Ability to present to C-level and senior-level executives, as well as communicate well to internal and inter-departmental associates   This Job Description indicates the general nature and level of work expected of the incumbent(s). It is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities required of the incumbent. Incumbent(s) may be asked to perform other duties in addition to those described above.   Kibo Software Inc., is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not unlawfully discriminate on the basis of any status or condition protected by applicable federal, state, or local municipalities.",Account Executive Job in West,Full Time,"West, CO 80202",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/account-executive-job-west-co-us-168668136.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,,,8e40c3d76fbfb7828aafead9eeaa174d
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:04:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More DBA - AM03 Job #:  668982Apex Systems has a need for a Quickbase Administrator for a large client in the Dallas, TX area. If you are interested, please apply or email Ellen Furby at efurby@apexsystemsinc.com  Description: Quickbase expert to oversee development, maintain backlog and prioritization, release planning/execution/documentation, and general tool administration for the EPMO project data repository and reporting tool.Design, model, configure, test, and install databases. Document database backup, recovery, capacity, and security plans. Administer, maintain, and implement changes to existing databases to meet Customer requirements. Respond to test and production database problems and implement immediate resolution efforts across technology areas.Customer / Business Orientation:? Focus on internal and external Customer requirements.? Interact with business Customers to define, analyze, and deliver Customer requirements.? Demonstrates proficient understanding of business processes being supported by assigned system(s).? Develop business process understanding across multiple business Customers.Project Management:? Serve as a communications liaison between the business Customer and the technology development and support groups.? Document and communicate assigned work progress to immediate project team, and management.? Communicate problems or issues in a timely manner.? Manage resolution of problems and escalate as required.Problem Solving:? Employ productivity aids in all aspects of assignments.? Analyze and resolve problems of medium complexity.? Research and recommend alternative actions for problem resolution, with minimal supervision.Systems Development Engineering:? Design, create, implement, and support databases to meet project and system design requirements.? Implement moderately complex changes to existing databases.? Install and configure new database engines and upgrades to new product releases.? Implement physical data models at a project level.? Create, document, and administer, and document database backup and recovery plans, capacity plans and security plans to meet project requirements.Testing / Deliverable Quality:? Assist less senior DBA?s when testing new product and database engine releases to ensure features and functions are acceptable.? Ensure integration across systems software and platforms.Production Support:? Analyze and resolve highly problems of medium to high complexity.? Use database / system mgmt. Tools proficiently.? Monitor and tune existing databases of medium complexity and moderate business exposure.? Investigate, troubleshoot, and resolve database problems.? Provide general technical support to Services and Development groups.Financial Accountability:? Develop volume and cost estimates.Qualifications& RequirementsEducation:? BS, Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering, and / or equivalent formal training or work experience.Experience:? work experience in Engineering and / or Information Technology ? Database, or Applications environment.? Demonstrates experience with computer / network systems / hardware and software development methodology / processes obtained through formal training, education and / or work experience.? Experience with design and development of at least one database engine.Maturity:? Doing, participates, assists, and recommends.? Completes tasks with minimal direction.? Consequences of error carry a moderate risk to the organization.Core Knowledge:? Proficient knowledge of physical database design, capacity planning, security planning, backup and recovery systems, operating systems, data modeling, query language, at least one database engine, performance and testing, and software development concepts and technology.? Proficient knowledge of computer / network systems / hardware and software development methodology and process.? Proficient knowledge of technical / business environmentsCritical Skills:? Excellent partnering, communication, and negotiation skills, so as to gather and communicate business Customer requirements to technology development and support groups.? Ability, within a specific technology area to independently complete root-cause analysis, design solutions, write code, perform testing, provide documentation, and implement medium-size development projects or major components of large projects.? Ability to review the technical work of / coach less senior DBA?s.? Ability to analyze and resolve problems of medium complexity.? Ability to manage projects using the organization?s project management methodology.? Ability to work effectively in a strong Customer service / team oriented environment.   EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",DBA - AM Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/dba-am03-job-dallas-tx-us-168779979.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fefdfda1717e3dac234f7c629a76655a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:03:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Account Executive-Employee Benefits at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/1/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: Not Specified Date Posted: 6/1/2016 Job Title: Account Executive-Employee Benefits Location: Dallas, TX The CompanyWillis Towers Watson (NASDAQ: WLTW ) is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson. The Business Human capital and benefitsHigh-performing institutions cultivate and grow talent, carefully balancing costs and rewards. From employee benefits to executive compensation, we take a rounded perspective, based on leading-edge thinking, data, analytics and software, unearthing new ways to motivate people, foster wellbeing and implement solutions that work. The RoleWillis Towers Watson' Human Capital Practice (HCP) designs and deploys cutting-edge employee benefit and reward programs for today's leading employers. Our clients range from 100 to 10,000 employees and include tech companies, public entities, Native American gaming, name brand retailers, manufacturing, attorney firms, and more. The Account Executive is the most senior team member. This role and responsibility encompasses maintaining client satisfaction and service, brokerage and consulting as well as leading the team in delivery of all client related activity/initiates. This individual is responsible in continued client satisfaction and client retention with the Client Advocate/Producer. The continued growth and development will enable this person to advance into a Senior Account Executive as they advance their career at Willis Towers Watson. General Responsibilities: Owns the client relationship Aligns client needs and goals with expanding business opportunities and solidifying client relationship Lead the management and development of benefits and total rewards program design Ownership for completion of the daily support for customers including employee benefits brokerage, consulting, and general account management Manage basic and complex service issues, employee enrollment meetings and research for team members on client related issues Prepare executive level reports for stewardship, pre-renewal strategies, renewals presentations, placement activity along with analysis Final review and presentation of annual client deliverables and reports Manage and mentor associates as a function of performing client management activities and executing on client strategic initiatives Execution of capitalizing on internal subject matter experts and external compliance, 5500 reporting, legislative adherence, Willis Towers Watson internal compliance protocols Be able to work and negotiate with the external market to provide best of value deliverables within specified timelines Lead team to provide best in class client deliverables Accounts include: fully insured and self-insured clients as well as Multi-state and large clients Communications: Ensure that all members of the Willis Towers Watson client team is engaged and participating in supporting the client Support and ensure the clients receive accurate and effective employee communications, establish and execute on communication strategies and initiatives (Employee Brochures, newsletters, websites for client communications) Establish with client partners the strategies around employee communication, education or strategic initiatives Ensure that Open Enrollment is executed and all team members are invested with the success of Health Fairs, vendor attendance, and providing Willis Towers Watson representation at meetings HCP Team Engagement: Coach and mentor other team members Refine and manage activity with team to meet deadline and deliverables to be the Best in Class Provide executive review for reports inclusive of market analyses and benchmarking studies, basic data analysis and financial modeling Consultative resource for the client on administrative support and education incorporating Willis Towers Watson subject matter experts or technology i.e. Online Communication Portals (Willis Towers Watson Online, Willis Towers Watson Essentials, HR Connect) Ensure that the team is adhering to WEM compliance and EPIC population Demonstrate and support Willis Towers Watson Values Travel Requirements:Occasional travel outside CA may be required.",Account Executive-Employee Benefits at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/account-executive-employee-benefits-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838118.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c55225bd9cb7a579413b44937aca51e2
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:01:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsibilities Ensuring a safe, clean and environmentally compliant work environment and building a culture where safety is a first priority. Training and developing employees to safely perform their jobs. Leading and supporting safety initiatives and processes to drive towards zero recordable injuries. Effectively communicating companys stand on safety throughout the Maintenance Department to ensure front line leaders and employees believe in and behave in a manner that supports our stand that all accidents are preventable, safety is everyones responsibility, and that working safely is a condition of employment. Understanding and communicating customer expectations throughout the Maintenance Department where appropriate. Ensuring the reliability of plant machinery and equipment in order to meet production schedules and customer orders. Determining organizational objectives and priorities in support of the Plants strategy and vision, and for developing teams to deliver results in support of these objectives and priorities. The successful operation of activities of major significance to the organization including leadership of major capital projects. Making operational decisions or recommendations that could affect the financial, employee, or public relations posture of the organization. Improving plant efficiency measures through execution of the Reliability Work Process. Living the values and vision of the Company; establish an engaged workforce characterized by mutual trust, open communications, teamwork, and recognition. Assigning and coordinating the work in the maintenance department to include supervising first line leaders and analyzing productivity reports Preparing budgets relative to capital expenditures, manpower, repairs, etc. Facilitating process improvements through people deployment, productivity enhancements, high performance work teams and being a model for change. Creating and sustaining a culture where talent is developed through effective performance management and talent evaluation Effectively staffing the organization, providing competent people and the appropriate mix of internal and external talent to satisfy both near-term and long-term succession needs Investing in the growth and development of individuals identified as high potential talent. Establishing clear and measurable expectations of performance and review commitments to ensure goals are achieved; completing first line leader performance appraisals and coaching employees to develop and execute growth and development plans. Monitoring and enforcing plant policies in a consistent manner to ensure a positive labor environment. Maintaining documentation, tracking, counseling and executing coaching and corrective action when performance issues occur. Actively leading and building effective work teams and committees to increase plant performance and drive continuous improvement initiatives. Job Requirements Experience: Progressive leadership experience in a manufacturing facility with a degree in Engineering. Experience in leading, assessing, and developing talent to deliver results. Experience with CMMS. Demonstrated capability in change management Ability to effectively communicate to all levels of management and all hourly.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Maintenance Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,Maintenance Manager,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168700554.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=20,,Engineering,4d64f007f88b454bcc20e65903d903b1
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:01:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Panera Bread is hiring Managers!Come grow with us! Join one of America’s fastest growing concepts! We are proud to develop and promote great leaders.  Advancement is available and encouraged.   Our upscale, friendly cafes feature freshly baked breads and pastries. We serve made to order soups, salads and sandwiches as well as specialty espresso beverages.  The ideal MANAGER candidate must have: ·         A minimum of 2 years of RECENT management experience. ·         A true ownership mentality with strong training and coaching skills.·         Strong organizational skills, exceptional customer service skills, and the ability to drive sales and achieve profit objectives.·         The passion to lead and coach associates to ensure an extraordinary guest experience.   Join a warm and inviting culture that gives back to the community.  When you are a part of our team, you are a part of our community involvement.  Panera Bread’s local 2015 donations include: ·       Every café in Colorado donates the end of day product to local food banks and soup kitchens.·       185 frozen turkeys donated by our customers to Care and Share’s Thanksgiving drive.·       Our annual Pink Ribbon Bagel promotion generated over $13,500 to Rocky Mountain Cancer Assistance.  PANERA BREAD knows that happy Managers produce better results.  WE CARE ABOUT YOU! Competitive Salary with bonus potential401k with Company MatchUpscale, Fun Work EnvironmentAffordable benefits for the employee and familyPaid VacationWork/life balanceProduct discounts   Visit our Panera Bread website at: http://www.panera-colorado.com to find out more about the Panera concept. ",RESTAURANT MANAGER Job in Englewood,Full Time Employee,"Englewood, CO 80112",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/restaurant-manager-job-englewood-co-us-142748411.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=18,,Food Services/Hospitality,ab359b8e57ef0fb45e91af177f9cd7a2
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:18:00:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"CompanyLillibridge is a Chicago-based healthcare real estate firm. Our parent company is Ventas Inc., a Fortune 500 REIT (www.ventasreit.com). As an industry leader, Lillibridge has decades of experience in healthcare real estate and specializes in advisory services, acquisition and development, and property management and leasing of medical office and ambulatory healthcare properties nationwide. One of the largest firms in this sector, we own / manage 24M sf across 450 healthcare properties in 32 states, 200+ markets and 160+ cities. More than 10M people a year visit our buildings to maintain their good health and get well.ResponsibilitiesRetrieves and routes incoming calls in a professional manner and provides customer service assistance as appropriateDispatches and tracks routine work orders to maintenance and janitorial staffCoordinates vendor/contractor services as appropriateMaintain service agreements and assure tenant and vendor certificates of insurance meet all requirementsMaintains and monitors key control and vendor/contractor accessEstablishes and maintains all files, records and databases (e.g., tenants/leases, vendor contract files, maintenance records, certificates of insurance, management reports, etc.)Composes routine professional correspondence using accurate spelling and word usageAssists with lease administration: lease preparation and review, collections, move-in/move out procedures, tenant improvement coordination, tenant relations, event coordination, etc.Assists with financial operations: reviews and codes invoices for payment, prepares time-sheets for approval,  monitors rental deposits, prepares and monitors purchase orders and contract documents, compiles data for annual budgets, etc.Assists with property inspections as assignedResponds to emergency situations in accordance with appropriate policies & proceduresAdheres to all safety standards, policies & procedures, and codes of conductReports all pertinent events and activities to ManagementAssists with the implementation of ongoing quality improvement programsPerforms all general office duties and special projects as requiredOther duties and special projects as assignedRequirementsHigh school graduate, some college preferred2 - 3 years’ experience as an administrative assistantAdvanced computer skills using MS Office applications (Word & Excel a must)Typing speed of 60 – 65 WPMDemonstrated proficient knowledge of and experience with accounting principles & practicesProperty management software experience a plusStrong communication and customer service skills (oral & written) to promote positive client/ tenant relationsAbility to exercise prudent judgment in the absence of supervisory personnel.Ability to organize and prioritize tasks to ensure accuracy and timely completion Lillibridge offers a competitive compensation and benefits package to the successful candidate.Lillibridge is an Equal Opportunity Employer.Lillibridge does not accept unsolicited resumes from staffing agencies, search firms or any third parties.",Administrative Assistant,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/administrative-assistant-lhs-job-denver-co-us-168879218.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=9,,Administrative/Clerical,a681ac18cad4be66baf46acd361d6570
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:59:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"IMMEDIATE POSITIONS:Class-A Shuttle Driver - Salt Lake City to Denver2 shuttles and 1 delivery route per weekSalt Lake City Class-A Resident Delivery DriverMainly local routesBoth positions pay $1,100 per week avg. + benefitsPlus a $4,000 Sign-On Bonus for a limited timeOur Generous Benefits Package Includes:Health, Dental, Vision, and Life Insurance begin your 1st day of hire!!and additional benefits at 90-days.Call Manuel at: 909.912.3725",Shuttle Driver - Class A CDL Job in Aurora,Full Time,"Aurora, CO 80010",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/shuttle-driver-class-a-cdl-job-aurora-co-us-168268023.aspx?mescoid=5301047001001&jobPosition=15,"$1,100.00+ /week",Experienced (Non-Manager),3650fa1e3d9d124e3045f1b57ad46eaf
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:58:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England has been hiring and training drivers since 1920, and has never laid anyone off for lack of freight. We are also the oldest and largest refrigerated trucking company in the nation. The majority of the freight you haul for us is no-touch – our clients will do all of the loading and unloading. You can choose to drive solo (OTR, regional, dedicated or intermodal) or as part of a team (OTR and regional). Experienced drivers also have the opportunity to earn extra income by becoming a truck driver trainer for the C.R. England team. There are many dedicated routes available for experienced C.R. England company truck drivers. Dedicated runs provide a stable income and predictable home time. Over the last few years, the Dedicated division has grown swiftly and will continue to grow in years to home.Benefits:Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for SafeLiberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company ParticipationHome Time-C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. ul> C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C.R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today!",Truck Driver – CDL ( Class A ) Transportation – Full Time / Training Provided Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-%E2%80%93-cdl-class-a-transportation-%E2%80%93-full-time-training-provided-job-dallas-tx-us-159860292.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,489ce5a636a653e7b5db5a2b4fd020e5
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:57:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Baylor Medical Center at Uptown is a new state of the art surgical hospital in the Dallas’ Uptown area. Specialties and services will include Orthopedic, Spine, Pain Management, General Plastic, and Ear, Nose and Throat surgery. Our mission is to provide first-class services for the local community in a safe, comfortable, and welcoming environment; one in which we would be happy to treat our own families.   Baylor Medical Center at Uptown is a part of United Surgical Partners International (USPI). USPI owns and operates multiple surgical hospitals and ambulatory surgical care centers throughout the United States and London; with headquarter located in Addison, TX.   Baylor Medical Center at Uptown is currently seeking a Radiology Technologist-PRN for day/night position opportunities. The Radiology department provides direct and indirect patient care. Performs multiple c-arm and x-ray procedures under the direction of radiologists and specialized physicians, including operation of special imaging and radiology equipment. Skilled at sterile field assistance during operating room and pain management procedures. Maintains a professional relationship with physicians and staff.   Benefits Include: Baylor Medical Center at Uptown offers competitive salary, medical and dental, 401(k) with Company Contribution and annual profit sharing bonus. Shift diff’s – evening/night/weekend Work Schedule – PRN, as neededRequired Skills Position required skills for the Radiology Technologist include: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.   High School Diploma/GED Associate Degree in Radiologic Sciences Specific Training in Magnetic Resonance Technology Two to five years’ experience specific to MRI Graduate of an AMA-approved school of Radiologic Technology. Registered with the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists. Licensed by the Texas Department of Health as a Medical Radiologic Technologist - General License. ARRT and/or NMCRT certification in MRI. Current BLS/CPR certification. Tech must have 3-5 years’ experience, experience using both GE and Siemens C-arms. Ability to do CT a plus Required Experience Position qualifications and requirements for the Radiology Technologist include: Perform the described duties in the primary work area and demonstrate competency in the following: IV and contrast administration, orthopedic radiology, pediatric radiology, operating room Radiology, trauma Radiology, GI Radiology, outpatient and inpatient diagnostic Radiology, myelography and arthrography. Perform a variety of technical tasks involved in operating x ray equipment to make radiographs of designated portions of the body as specified by physician; adjust equipment for proper exposure, voltage and current in accordance with prescribed radiation safety procedures. Determine, prepare and set up medical supplies, instruments and equipment; explain x ray procedures to patients; position patients for each anatomical view specified using immobilization and protective devices as required; report any changes in patient condition to attending medical staff. Monitor accessory equipment and assist attending physician with fluoroscopic examinations and special radiographic studies. Record amount and type of images exposed; label film with identifying information; sort as required. Consult with lead x-ray tech and radiologist to ensure compliance with established standards of quality. Processimages in accordance with standardized procedures and maintain assigned work area in clean and orderly condition.",Radiology Technologist,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/radiology-technologist-prn-job-dallas-tx-us-168883125.aspx?mescoid=2900538001001&jobPosition=19,,Medical/Health,a5699112eee17edad23a1d84ddff4572
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:55:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:No industry is moving faster than health care. And no organization is better positioned to lead health care forward. We need attention to every detail with an eye for the points no one has considered. The rewards for performance are significant. You'll help improve the health of millions. And you'll do your life's best work.(sm) Revenue Cycle Senior Analysts / Managers serve as industry experts while they implement best practices in Optum360 client/partner locations.  Senior Analysts / Managers combine their leadership, experience and understanding of Optum360 solutions to bring world class results in Revenue Cycle Projects and end-to-end partnerships.   Revenue Cycle Senior Analysts/ Managers will effectively communicate and build relationships with client management to assess their needs, and design and implement solutions based on Optum360’s methodology that meet or exceed specified engagement results. You will have demonstrated experience and political savvy working with client executives to maintain the appropriate level of client support and momentum throughout the relationship.  Typical projects include, but are not limited to:Revenue cycle assessments Revenue cycle process improvement Alignment and implementation of client/partner processes and Optum360 technology Revenue cycle improvement / redesign Reimbursement and managed care Interim management (as applicable) Principal Responsibilities: Provide revenue cycle management services to client/partners in all areas of revenue cycle which includes: Patient access (scheduling, preregistration, insurance verification/financial counseling) Registration/Admission (ED, inpatient, outpatient, ambulatory) Health Information Management (transcription, coding, clinical documentation improvement) Patient financial services (charge capture, pre-billing, billing, follow-up, cash posting, account resolution) Decision support and analytics Presentation development and   Productivity and quality managementIdentify client/partner accomplishments barriers in achieving operational excellence Understand client/partner business metrics and results Evaluate and analyze client/partner data to understand trends in all areas of the operation Develop options and recommendations for client/partner improvement Understand and represent Optum360 technology and services and how they will improve client/partner operations Collaborate with client/partner revenue cycle team and other departments in order to facilitate resolution of process issues and implement world-class solutions Communicate effectively (written and verbal) and appropriately influence various audiences and levels of client management including risks and recommendations to project management Plan, organize and prioritize project activities using work plans and other project management tools Provide informed feedback to Optum360 and client/partner executives including assessments of processes, standards, suggestions and improvements Assist in the sales process as requested Develop work plans, project tasks and manage projects in accordance with budget Provide interim staffing services as required Must meet minimum performance standards Willingness to learn new skills and desire to advance upward in the consulting organization Accountable for all decisions, actions, and directives with respect to job responsibilities Provide feedback to management concerning possible problems or areas of improvement Perform other duties as assigned by managementQualifications:Required Qualifications:Bachelor's Degree required Minimum 3 years’ experience in the Healthcare revenue cycle In-depth knowledge of the complete healthcare revenue cycle Experience and comfort working at all levels of a health care organization.  Ability to probe, analyze, synthesize and articulate complex subject matter so it can be easily understood Expert in MS Word and Excel and Visio required Expert in Outlook and PowerPoint preferred A high degree of self-motivation, versatility and flexibility Working knowledge of hospital based IT systems Excellent interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills Excellent presentation skills Ability to lead, direct and motivate others Ability to build effective team in order to accomplish goals Ability to maintain the highest level of confidentiality Ability to adapt to a flexible schedule Ability to travel 70-80% Careers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make health care work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.(sm) Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.  Job Keywords: Travel, Consultant, Healthcare Consultant, Project Manager, Big 5, Program Management, Health care, Provider, Payer, Eden Prairie, MN, telecommute, telecommuter, telecommuting, remote, work from homeTravel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Bus Advisory & Tech CnsltngBusinessSegment: OptumInsight Division: Optum360 Rev Cycle Ops DeliveryModel: Platinum ContestNumber: 643925 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Exempt",Front-End Revenue Cycle Manager - Telecommute Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/front-end-revenue-cycle-manager-telecommute-job-dallas-tx-us-168983541.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),303f9a63023aaa7615bc46e51c8ce606
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:54:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client Manager-Property & Casualty at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 5/28/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: 3 to 5 years Date Posted: 5/28/2016 Job Title: Client Manager - Property & Casualty The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson. The Business Corporate risk and brokingWe know how companies can unlock potential through effective risk management. Our clients rely on us to craft strategies to quantify, mitigate, and transfer risk, taking advantage of our specialist industry experience and unparalleled market know-how. The result is a new way of embracing risk that drives superior results. The Role Client Service SpecialistResponsible for maintaining day-to-day servicing relationship with client decision-makers. This position requires an organized, self-starter to effectively provide insurance brokerage and risk management services to new and existing commercial accounts. Participate in presentations with clients and prospects working within a collaborative brokerage service team. Drive insurance renewal process from gathering client exposure information through delivering final negotiated coverage terms. Answer client policy and coverage questions. Consult with clients on policy changes. Coordinate loss control and claim review meetings for selected accounts. Visit client site to identify potential exposures and needs: review loss analysis, complete risk management analysis. Research exposure and technical coverage issues to answer client questions. Assist in gathering and researching risk management/insurance information from prospects. Coordinate financial transactions including general insurance accounting, invoicing, insurance plan cost benefit analysis and loss analysis. Responsibilities: Maintain existing commercial property and casualty accounts by providing continuous client service and risk management advice Prepare written correspondence, reports and analysis as needed Communicate effectively with client decision makers and other team members Perform complex client risk management analysis by researching exposure and coverage issues Review quotes, proposals, contract insurance requirements, rating worksheets, audits for accuracy, compliance or other insurance objectives. Review non-standard certificate requests Conduct pre-renewal internal and external meetings Prepare new and renewal business submissions Arrange and facilitate underwriting meetings Negotiate new and renewal property and casualty insurance terms and conditions with underwriters Present renewal terms to client Facilitate the ordering of loss control and claim reports Make necessary fee arrangements Gather information from clients for marketing purposes Assist with resolution of client/carrier accounting issues Maintain client confidentiality",Client Manager-Property & Casualty at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/client-manager-property-casualty-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838801.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7a305e9111400c1c37c391ea040e204a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:54:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More C Developer Job #:  671593Location: Irving, TX Required:Extensive experience in the Software Development Life Cycle with technical emphasis in requirement analysis, design and development of software solutions using AGILE methodology.Extensive knowledge and qualified skill sets in analysis, design, development and testing.Experience in developing and designing application in C/C/XMotif over UNIX/LINUX platformExperience in developing user interfaces using X-Motif.Familiarity with Java and building integration services using web services(SOAP/REST), JMS protocols.Good understanding and working knowledge in the TCP/IP, IPC Protocols.Experience in Unix Shell Scripting with a good understanding of LINUX.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Confident, articulate, and professional speaking abilities.Team player who is highly proactive and seeks out best solutions by working with Tech Leads/Architects.Empathic listener and persuasive speaker.  Familiarity with the skills highlighted below in BOLD is required.Required Technical Skills:Operating System:LINUX , SUN/SOLARIS, HP-UX, AIX, WINDOWS XP/7/NT, MS-DOS.Hardware:REDHAT, SUN, HP, DEC ALPHA, PCLanguages/Technologies:JAVA, JEE, JAVASCRIPT, C, C,  X/MOTIF, C#, PL/SQL, PERL, HTML, DHTML, SERVLETS, UML, JSP, XML, TOMCAT, JUNIT, JRULES, STL, ROGUE WAVE, MQ SERIES, CORBA, RMI, SOA, MULE ESB 2.2, SOAP, JAXBFrameworksHIBERNATE, SPRING, SPRING MVC, AJAXDatabases:ORACLE 10G/11G/12c, SYBASE, ODBC, JDBC, MS SQL SERVER, DB2, MS ACCESSTools:INTELLIJ, ECLIPSE, RAD, CLEARCASE, CVS, VISUAL SOURCESAFE, PURIFY, VALGRIND, QUANTIFY, VISUAL SLICK, LOAD RUNNER, CODE COLLABORATOR, CHECKSTYLE, PMD, FINDBUGS, RATIONAL ROSE, XML SPY, UML, EMACS, VI, SQL*PLUS, X-WINDOWS, MAVEN, GIT, STASH, SVN, BUILDFORGE, NEXUSNetworking:TCP/UDP/IP, IPC, Socket Programming, HTTP, SMTP, DNS/BIND, X Window protocolMethodologies:Scrum, FUSION, UML, OMT, XPMiddleware:JMS/Tibco EMS, Tibco SmartSockets, CORBACompilers:GCC, GNUDEBUGGERS:GDB, DBX        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",C Developer Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More C Developer Job #:  671593Location: Irving, TX Required:Extensive experience in the Software Development Life Cycle with technical emphasis in requirement analysis, design and development of software solutions using AGILE methodology.Extensive knowledge and qualified skill sets in analysis, design, development and testing.Experience in developing and designing application in C/C/XMotif over UNIX/LINUX platformExperience in developing user interfaces using X-Motif.Familiarity with Java and building integration services using web services(SOAP/REST), JMS protocols.Good understanding and working knowledge in the TCP/IP, IPC Protocols.Experience in Unix Shell Scripting with a good understanding of LINUX.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Confident, articulate, and professional speaking abilities.Team player who is highly proactive and seeks out best solutions by working with Tech Leads/Architects.Empathic listener and persuasive speaker.  Familiarity with the skills highlighted below in BOLD is required.Required Technical Skills:Operating System:LINUX , SUN/SOLARIS, HP-UX, AIX, WINDOWS XP/7/NT, MS-DOS.Hardware:REDHAT, SUN, HP, DEC ALPHA, PCLanguages/Technologies:JAVA, JEE, JAVASCRIPT, C, C,  X/MOTIF, C#, PL/SQL, PERL, HTML, DHTML, SERVLETS, UML, JSP, XML, TOMCAT, JUNIT, JRULES, STL, ROGUE WAVE, MQ SERIES, CORBA, RMI, SOA, MULE ESB 2.2, SOAP, JAXBFrameworksHIBERNATE, SPRING, SPRING MVC, AJAXDatabases:ORACLE 10G/11G/12c, SYBASE, ODBC, JDBC, MS SQL SERVER, DB2, MS ACCESSTools:INTELLIJ, ECLIPSE, RAD, CLEARCASE, CVS, VISUAL SOURCESAFE, PURIFY, VALGRIND, QUANTIFY, VISUAL SLICK, LOAD RUNNER, CODE COLLABORATOR, CHECKSTYLE, PMD, FINDBUGS, RATIONAL ROSE, XML SPY, UML, EMACS, VI, SQL*PLUS, X-WINDOWS, MAVEN, GIT, STASH, SVN, BUILDFORGE, NEXUSNetworking:TCP/UDP/IP, IPC, Socket Programming, HTTP, SMTP, DNS/BIND, X Window protocolMethodologies:Scrum, FUSION, UML, OMT, XPMiddleware:JMS/Tibco EMS, Tibco SmartSockets, CORBACompilers:GCC, GNUDEBUGGERS:GDB, DBX        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.Learn More $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/c-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168902808.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cdc5a024c87fe81a8e88715f84aeb0fd
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:53:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary Provides guidance and direction to the store team in the areas of guest satisfaction, team/associate development, merchandising, inventory, cash control, human resources, safety, loss prevention and expense control, so that the store will operate effectively and profitably.  Accountable for financial results, guest service, operations and human resource management for that location. Serves as a role model and as a coach. Builds a strong team by helping associates understand policy and strategy to ensure consistent and standard execution of Company initiatives.  Provides leadership and develops and maintains a highly efficient profit center, appropriately balanced between business objectives and effective human relations. Ensures the continued fiscal success of the Company, as well as the satisfaction of its guests and associates.  Responsible for creating a supportive culture where there is a partnership commitment among the team, which includes: Assuming positive intent when working with partnersListening actively and demonstrating mutual respectCommunicating proactively to those who need to know - no surprisesWorking collaboratively to facilitate agreement and resolve conflictExchanging feedback on behaviors to seek closurePublicly and privately supporting decisions once they have been made. Maintains open lines of communication with all Regional Store Support Center Departments and Store Staff to ensure a steady flow of information, as well as ensure that required tasks are completed on time and accurately.  Key Tasks and Responsibilities  Coaches and develops Assistant Managers, other staff members and associates.  Holds staff meetings, daily meetings and ""all attend"" meetings with associates following the communication SOP.  Clearly communicates Company vision, goals and strategies.  Energizes and encourages selling skills and guest delight. Develops these skills through coaching, following-up and interacting with guests on the floor.  Manages the financial performance of the business unit including sales, profitability and key metrics through proper and ethical in-store operations.  Ensures all initiatives are rolled out and completed in a timely manner in accordance with all Company (SOP) policies, standards and procedures.  Drives sales through proper standards in guest service, merchandising, promotional activity and well-trained associates.  Responsible for the quality of store associates. Actively participates in the recruiting, selection and orientation of all new team members. Actively recruits quality candidates for the company.  Networks and works effectively with other store, district and regional teams to seek information, resolves problems and communicate issues.  Maintains awareness of retail trends and competition and provides feedback to DM and/or regional leadership.  Ensures that store standards and conditions are, at all times, consistent with the ""Store Standards of Excellence"" guidelines.  Actively develops and maintains the Talent Management process using the company succession planning guidelines involving the store and regional management teams. Requirements 5 years Retail management experience. Familiar with a variety of the field's concepts, practices, and procedures. Relies on extensive experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Leads and directs the work of others.",Store Manager - Englewood,Full Time ,Location:,,http://jobview.monster.com/store-manager-englewood-co-job-englewood-co-us-168622834.aspx?mescoid=1101116002005&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,f9d8d88c1ea24d7b570cf354ea4f4afd
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:53:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for organized, positive, and energetic Jr. Field Managers!  As a Jr. Field Manager you will work in a professional fun environment.  Jr. Field manager will report directly to Sr. Field Managers and will assist in the day to day management of Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertop Crews on new home construction job sites.  Core Functions:  Ensure job site readiness for IRG Independent Contractors.Assist in Management of Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertop independent contractors on construction sites.Assist in management of installations and materials.Communicate schedule changes to internal and external customers.Any other field duties as assigned.Required Qualifications:  Must be able to pass a 5 Year criminal back ground checkAbility to use technology at a high level (Smartphones, tablets, etc.)Bilingual (Spanish) a plusReliable transportationSelf-Starter and positive attitudeExperience in construction; Including Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertops a plusMust be able to work in fast paced environmentsOrganized and process orientedAttention to detailStrong oral and written communication skillsMust be proficient with Microsoft Office Products and Apple Applications  Our benefit package includes paid vacation, paid holidays, paid sick time, health, vision, dental, & 401k.    ",Jr. Field Manager Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80238",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/jr-field-manager-job-denver-co-us-168822503.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,13.00 - 15.00 $ /year,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,0a46bf6ab4ec3e5e6be1c9814fa05296
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:52:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Optical and IP Customer Support Engineer will be part of the Optical Technology refresh with new IP+Optical platforms, below are some examples: - New Optical platforms such as NCS4K, is launching in April 2015. Verizon, ATT and US Signal are some key customers. This platform actually bring Optical + IP customers on one single platforms and introduces Optical SDN controller -NCS1K(ROSCO) solution is already launch and many of our Data Centers are buying this solutions to provide Datacenter Transport Interconnect. The Team US Optical TAC/HTTS team is a single team which covers both the TAC role and Premium/HTTS customers. With TS Advantage in play this team has a potential of growing because we do not have any Optical HTEs. This team also helps US AS Optical talent pool. Role & Responsibilities We are looking for Optical and IP Customer Support Engineer and the following responsibilities include: Provide second/third level technical support for Optical and Data/IP technologies to Cisco customers, partners, account teams, and other TAC engineers Apply analytical skills and technical knowledge to solve product and network problems of moderate to high complexity Act as a technical expert and provide support on a world-wide basis Work on problems of diverse scope where analysis requires evaluation of identifiable factors Provide technology/product/troubleshooting training and intellectual property material as required Act as focal point for large account network problem resolution Effectively utilize moderate to complex lab setups to recreate and solve problems Submit complete and correct defect reports in area of expertise Interact across TAC teams and development teams at peer level Receive minimal supervision, no instruction on routine work, and general instruction on new assignments Report to Manager, Technical Support Typically interface with lower level CSE's, VARs, OEMs, Service Providers, end-users & internal engineering departments Minimum Qualifications 2+ years with one or more Optical skills (SONET, DWDM, OC, SDH, ML, MSTP, etc) 2+ years working knowledge of Networking industry, products and protocols Strong analytical and troubleshooting skills Education BS in CS or EE or equivalent, or 4-7 years experience related to the position Desired Skills Ability to communicate effectively both verbally and in writing Ability to determine problems and deliver known solutions Ability to determine root cause and resolution for previously unknown problems Ability to work effectively with and provide guidance to other members of the workgroup Experience with handling critical customer issues/problems Working with cross-functional teams Presentation skills Previous Customer Support experience Database experience (Oracle, SQL, Sybase) Unix experience CCOS certification (either SONET or SDH) CCNA, CCNP or higher networking certification Physical work site address: Richardson, TXExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Systems/Network Architect II(NA) Job in Richardson,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Systems/Network Architect II(NA),"Richardson, TX 75082",http://jobview.monster.com/systems-network-architect-ii-na-job-richardson-tx-us-168567712.aspx?mescoid=1500132001001&jobPosition=6,,IT/Software Development,183e894dc3ea094141c04400fd1ef555
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:49:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Powered by Zip Team at Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage is looking for experienced, enthusiastic, career-minded, motivated real estate sales agents to work with home buyers.  We are a unique full-service, client-focused, residential real estate sales brokerage, but we're different; we have a better way. Our award-winning lead/customer management tool streamlines the real estate sales process. Consumers are embracing our approach, and our website, cbzhomes.com, is one of the most-visited real estate sales brokerage websites in the world! Qualifications:·         Active real estate sales agent license·         Vibrant personality and professional presence·         Drive and determination ·         Demonstrated skills in customer service, sales, and customer negotiation·         Entrepreneurial spirit Advantages:·         ZAP (Zip Agent Platform): our industry-leading online real estate sales agent platform and client management system·         Dozens of new client leads every single month·         Your own real estate sales page/portal on cbzhomes.com·         Top-notch education and business coaching is available We can provide you with everything you need to build and grow your real estate sales business. Apply now and learn more about the advantages of being an independent real estate sales agent affiliated with Coldwell Banker Residential Brokerage on the Powered by Zip Team.",Real Estate Sales - Licensed - Leads provided - Greater Dallas Area Job in Plano,,"Plano, TX 75074",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/real-estate-sales-licensed-leads-provided-greater-dallas-area-job-plano-tx-us-168703869.aspx?mescoid=4100687001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,e3faaf306bbed344c3a6506b91b83e7f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:49:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sr. SAP Procurement AnalystESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:Business AnalysisCollaborate with the Product Owner, Functional BA and other business stakeholders to elicit and define assigned requirementsElicit detailed requirements in form of user stories with acceptance criteriaCaptures non-functional system requirements (e.g., supported browsers, security, system performance expectations, etc.)Produce deliverables as needed: (e.g., software requirements documents, use cases, use case diagrams, wireframes, workflow diagrams, process diagrams, and detailed user stories)Coordinate with Quality Assurance (QA) and the development team to ensure assigned requirements are understoodAttend demos and review developed requirements for accuracyParticipate in required testing/validation of system fixes, which may include creating the actual test cases or reviewing test cases created by QASupport User Acceptance TestingSystems Analysis / Production SupportPlan, design and implement information systems. Perform encoding, testing, debugging and installation activities as necessary.Work with organizational end users to clarify current operating proceduresProvide functional and technical support for assigned applications, including integration, configuration, maintenance, enhancements, report development, quality assurance, system upgrades, and other activities as requiredLog and track defect and development requests including message handling and dispatching, resolution tracking, and problem escalationAnalyze defects and triage accordinglyWork with the BA, QA and development teams as necessary to facilitate defect resolutionAssist other teams and business units in supporting ongoing data archival, disaster recovery, and business continuity planning and testingMaintain update-to-date functional and configuration knowledgeQuality AssuranceEnsure that testing activities allow applications to meet business requirements and identify existing or potential issuesCreate and maintain testing deliverables based on user requirements and technical specificationsTests software in accordance with established quality standards prior to implementation to ensure proper operation and freedom from critical and high defectsAnalyze test results in order to report any defects, bugs, errors or configuration issuesPlan and execute integration, user acceptance and regression testingCommunicate testing progress, test results, and other relevant information to project stakeholdersAssist in process improvementsCultivate and disseminate knowledge of QA best practicesProvide significant input to system specifications and designDevelop detailed knowledge/expertise in applications assigned.  Will analyze system integration impacts and define integration requirementsCollaborate with developers to establish the technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance needsRelies on knowledge and professional discretion to achieve goals. May guide day to day activities of others. Significant ingenuity and flexibility is expected.Looks for opportunities to improve processes and implementsEstimates level of effort, develops analysis work plans, and ensures deliverables are of quality and timelinessDevelop partnerships with stakeholders and is viewed as an advocate and trusted advisorProvide leadership and mentoring to team membersPerform other duties as assigned. QUALIFICATIONS - EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE:Bachelor’s Degree preferred from an accredited college or university in a related field, or equivalent combination of education and experienceFive (5) or more years of experience in the related field in a large corporation or consulting environment; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Five (5) or more years working knowledge, production support, and configuration experience with SAP P2P modules, including:Materials Management, Purchase Reqs and Purchase Orders, Vendor & Plant maintenance, and Accounts Payable required.SAP workflow and ABAP training, experience, or certification desired.Experience in advanced SAP technologies like Fiori, Personas, HANA and Ariba a plus.2+ years experience providing leadership and mentoring to team members2+ years of experience participating on cross-functional, major project initiativesExperience with a minimum of two (2) business domainsExperience with supporting different types of implementations including:  enhancement/support projects, new development projects and third party package softwareMust have strong PC skills and working knowledge with Microsoft Office products, SharePoint and tracking software.Experience with techniques facilitating meetingsTo apply, please forward resume to ITCadDAL@addisongroup.com",Sr. SAP Procurement Analyst Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-sap-procurement-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-168829482.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=3,"$120,000.00+ /year",IT/Software Development,924a707ac0d922ec873faaf776cbe098
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:48:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details To pro To proTo provide prompt, efficient service to the guest by acting as an attendant and information source in the Concieconcierge lounge. EssentEssential Job Functions: 1. Warmly greet and welcome guests in the concierge lounge within 2 minutes of guest arrival. 2. Maintain an information file on hotel and local services and attractions and recommend them to the guest. Suggestively sell hotel amenities and services. 3.Act as a liaison between guests and hotel department by making reservations and following up with special requests. 4.C lean lounge throughout your shift by picking up dirty dishes and glasses and maintaining the kitchenette. 5. Mop the concierge lounge floor. 6.E nsure food quality and present concierge food in an appealing manner. 7. Mix drinks for concierge guests. Comply with applicable laws and responsible alcohol service. 8. Know how to use the fax machine, and process fax information for concierge guests. 9. Respond to guests’ requests within 3 minutes. Marginal Functions: 1. Assist other departments if help is needed. Job KnKnowledge, Skills and other Responsibilities: 1. Able to communicate accurately and effectively in verbal and written form with guests and associates so as to respond accurately and completely to people to give directions, instructions, information, answer questions and provide service as required. 2. Read brochures and travel guides efficiently to give clear directions. 3. Know how to use the fax machine and process fax information for concierge guests, sending faxes out and delivering incoming faxes to guest within 15 minutes of receipt. 4. Knowledge of basic mixology. 5. Lift and use mop weighing up to five (5) pounds. 6. Operate telephone properly with required phone etiquette, answering all calls within 3 rings. 7. Have knowledge of hotel services and area attractions. 8. Lift food chafers weighing up to approximately twenty (20) pounds. 9. Operate food and beverage equipment. 10. Operate cash register, if required. 11. Accurately process guest checks. Please email resumes to: dallas.marriott@yahoo.com or apply in person 2493 N Stemmons Freeway Dallas, TX 75207 We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V",PM Concierge Attendants / Dallas Marriott Suites Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/pm-concierge-attendants-dallas-marriott-suites-job-dallas-tx-us-168702263.aspx?mescoid=3900655001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ac47a1ceeee7eb9b4e7a18b23df774d3
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:48:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:No industry is moving faster than health care. And no organization is better positioned to lead health care forward. We need attention to every detail with an eye for the points no one has considered. The rewards for performance are significant. You'll help improve the health of millions. And you'll do your life's best work.(sm) Catamaran’s URAC and ACHC accredited Specialty Pharmacy, Briova, serves the needs of patients with complex chronic diseases. The Director, Regional Specialty Sales, is responsible for the strategic direction of the Regional Account Management team and achievement of sales goals and key objectives. Leads and motivates team to increase specialty pharmacy revenue / margin and ensures the achievement of sales goals:  analyzes and interprets sales data, evaluates current business, identifies new sales opportunities, develops strategy, develops target/prescriber reports, develops business plans and executes the plan.  Recruits, interviews, hires, trains and coaches Regional Account Managers.  Evaluates goals and conducts performance reviews.  Collaborates with Catamaran pharmacy personnel to efficiently and effectively provide best-in-class service to customers. Coordinates with Catamaran’s Managed Care Team to maximize impact of contracts.  Acts as Briova account lead in key accounts in the Region where there are multiple therapeutic opportunities. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.  The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.  Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. ***This position will be focused on the Southwest Region (AZ/CO)*** Primary Responsibilities:Leads, motivates and coaches Regional Account Managers to achieve sales goals. Drives accountability at territory levelDevelops regional strategy and plan of action for the following therapeutic areas:  Oncology, Hepatitis C, Growth Disorders, Autoimmune, Infusion TherapiesRecruits, interviews and hires top talentTrains and develops talent. Leads team through changeDemonstrates technical selling skills and Catamaran / Briova service model expertiseCollaborates with pharmacy operations team to ensure superior customer serviceAnalyzes and summarizes data and trendsRoutinely communicates with centralized marketing team regarding resources, competitive activity, etcInterfaces with pharmaceutical manufacturers to highlight Briova’s service excellenceBuilds business relationships with health care professionalsEffectively manages budgetUpdates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizationsMaintains accurate records of all sales activities including salesforce.comProtects organization's value by keeping information confidentialDemonstrates ability to effectively interact and cooperate with all company employeesBuilds trust, values others, communicates effectively, drives execution, fosters innovation, focuses on the customer, collaborates with others, solves problems creatively and demonstrates high integrityComplies with all company and government policies, regulations and business ethics codes and ensures they are communicated and implemented within the team     Qualifications:Required Qualifications: BS Degree 10+ years’ experience in healthcare related sales  10+ years in sales leadershipProven history of driving sales results and achieving goals Experience in effectively collaborating with internal and external stakeholdersProven success in a dynamic, fast paced environment Willingness to travel a minimum of 60%Preferred Qualifications: MBA or professional health care degreeExperience selling a complex service highly Careers with OptumRx. Were one of the largest and most innovative pharmacy benefits managers in the US, serving more than 12 million people nationwide. Here you'll fill far more than prescriptions. As a member of one of our pharmacy teams, you're empowered to be your best and do whatever it takes to help each customer. You'll find unrivaled support and training as well as a wealth of growth and development opportunities driven by your performance and limited only by your imagination. Join us. There’s no better place to help people live healthier lives while doing your life’s best work.(sm) Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment　Job Keywords: Director, Regional Specialty Sales, Catamaran, Specialty Pharmacy, Pharmacy, sales leadership, Pharmacy Sales, Phoenix, AZ, Arizona Travel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: OptumHealth SalesBusinessSegment: OptumRx Division: OptumRx Specialty Pharmacy DeliveryModel: Platinum ContestNumber: 637051 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Exempt",Regional Sales Director - Phoenix,Full Time,"Denver, CO",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-sales-director-phoenix-az-or-denver-co-job-denver-co-us-168353021.aspx?mescoid=1100008001001&jobPosition=8,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),865f04678f339c166f96fe8d1e561c21
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:48:09,No,jobs.monster.com," Peak Incorporated is now offering positions at the entry level for sales and marketing. We are a sales, marketing, and management firm specializing in business development for our clients. Our firm has a very high success rate of developing sports minded individuals into top performers in the sales and marketing industry.  We are seeking entry level professionals that are looking to take their winning mindset and apply it to lucrative business career in marketing, sales, and business management. What You’ll LearnHow our dynamic team creates business solutions unmatched by competitorsHow Sales & Marketing fits into the big picture of what drives every great companyMarketing yourself to others inside and outside of your professional lifeHow fun at work actually create progressive more successful company cultureDeveloping & Managing a relationship with a growing clientBenefitsFast track career growthStrong team environmentNational company travel opportunitiesTeam building work environmentPersonal and professional coaching by the industry’s finestLeadership developmentJob RequirementsIdeal candidates have an uncommon combination of attributes. They are self-motivated, entrepreneurial individuals who are ready to leave behind the constraints of the traditional corporate job model and build a secure future of their own.Degree preferred, but not requiredExcellent communication skillsAmbition, strong work ethic, and open to new ideasCompetitive personalityHighly coachable team playerSelf-Driven and problem solving skillsMotivation to have promotion based on performanceProfessional image is a must",Ex-Athlete? Start your Sales & Marketing Career! Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80215",Advertising and PR ServicesManagement Consulting ServicesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/ex-athlete-start-your-sales-marketing-career!-job-denver-co-us-168669314.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=4,,Marketing/Product,a4108d6e519c7e28c8a2c9ae82905f02
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:41:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:HR CoordinatorYou are passionate about HR, you LOVE compliance and when it comes to I9s and W4s, you know exactly what needs to be filled out and why it matters that it is done correctly! Maybe you have been a Human Resources clerk, or an admin, or an intern, and you want?more. You want to work downtown, right in the hustle and bustle of it all. You want an opportunity with one of the most prestigious firms in town and begin your career path into HR.Well, if this sounds like you, read on! Our client is seeking an HR Coordinator to partner with their Generalist and help with all things Human Resources. E-verifies, new-hire documentation, drug screens, you name it, you will take ownership of it!This is a polished, professional environment, and someone looking for career growth and stability will do well here. Glowing references from previous positions or internships are required! If you have less than a year of professional experience, a related degree and passion for HR is required!This entry level role is a great way to jump start your career with one of the best companies in town! Excellent MS Office knowledge is required and pivot tables and v-lookups are ideal too (most tracking is done through excel, and someone comfortable jumping from one program to the next, in seconds, will really EXCEL ? pun intended!)Think you are fit ? then apply today! Pay up to $42K We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1049488 Job Experience:,, HR, Human Resources, I9, E-verify, Compliance, Administration, MS Office, Excel, Pivot TablesYears of Experience Required:",HR Coordinator - Downtown Denver - Great Company! Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80204",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/hr-coordinator-downtown-denver-great-company!-job-denver-co-us-169021109.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),4e7245297518a11fb5912f9b9def1938
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:39:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Reps and Team Leaders Needed ASAP! $400 FAST START BONUS AVAILABLE TO ALL APPLICANTS!!Reps Avg Wkly Pay: $600 to $1,200+ PD WKLY + BONUSLeaders Avg Wkly Pay: $1,000 to $2,500+ PD WKLY + BONUSRepresentatives will be responsible for contributing to the expansion of the customer base for Reliant, an NRG Company, through client acquisitions, account activation, and customer enrollments in the Residential sector. This is an ideal position for someone who is looking to build a foundation for a career in marketing and/or the energy industry.Key Responsibilities:Present Reliant Energy offers directly to prospective customers.Utilize lead sheets, pre-qualified customers, to maximize customer acquisition daily.Initiate account activation process for new customers with Reliant Energy.Confidence in ability to answer questions and explain our services clearly to potential customers.Previous marketing/sales experience is not required as we will provide full training, to all selected candidates, necessary to satisfy the requirements of the Public Utility Commission of Texas (PUCT).Team Leader will be responsible for contributing to the expansion of the customer base for Reliant Energy, an NRG Company, through leading a team of 6 to 12 representatives. Qualified team leaders must have industry specific experience and knowledge of account representative position and duties. Our ideal candidate has industry experience and preferably some management or supervisory experience in marketing, customer service, professional sales, or is a strong communicator with excellent people skills.Key Responsibilities:Responsible for the production and on-going training of their team.Organizing daily sales meetings and clinics for all agents and account representatives.Present Reliant Energy offers directly to prospective customers.Utilize lead sheets, pre-qualified customers, to maximize customer acquisition dailyPersonal Production is recommended but not requiredInitiate account activation process for new customers with Reliant Energy and be able to troubleshoot any issues members of their team may have during the enrollment process.Confidence in ability to answer questions and explain our services clearly to potential customers and ability to teach these skills to other members of their team.These positions will be filled as soon as possible. Please submit your resume today or call us at 469-277-8646 to speak with a recruiter about scheduling an interview.",Sales Reps & Team Leaders Needed ASAP - PD WKLY + BONUS! Job in Plano,"Full Time, Employee","Plano, TX 75074",Energy and UtilitiesBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-reps-team-leaders-needed-asap-pd-wkly-bonus!-job-plano-tx-us-168657544.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=14,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,b007288d4fc7d519b6a13437c5098e5a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:38:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO   The fun and exciting world of event sales is calling for you! Will you answer? Our part time Event Specialist jobs give you the opportunity to represent the best brands on the market today! You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and retail sales. As a part time Event Specialist, you will work in one of the following locations: Albertsons, Albertsons Market, ACME Markets, Amigos, Carrs, Jewel-Osco, Market Street, Pavilions, Randalls, Safeway, Shaws, Star Market, Super Saver by Albertsons, Tom Thumb, United Supermarket, and Vons. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.        Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products. Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines. Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery preferred. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Access to reliable transportation. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods.  Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers.  We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales and Marketing LLC, dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO Job in Dallas,Part Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-aco-job-dallas-tx-us-168801448.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=11,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,4946a7f63be7c56eb023f9602eefd598
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:37:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall Purpose: Responsible for all aspects of the analysis and evaluation of complex internal business problems and the development of solutions. Key Roles and Responsibilities: Retrieve and analyze data evaluating and comparing information to identify actionable spend for strategic sourcing efforts. Collect information such as financial or operational data from numerous sources in various formats and translate it into a standard format in order to identify trends or improve cost. Develop a master category mapping and spend tree to simplify category analysis. Apply quantitative finance and accounting principles in clean sheet models to accurately understand true vendor pricing for services and products rendered to AT&T. Design and/or create reports/summaries, reporting tools, and database requirements to help operational effectiveness and decision making. Construct and apply statistical and/or financial models and/or analysis to support strategic initiatives. Apply advanced economic principles to qualitative business problems as part of advanced clean sheet methodology and analysis, including but not limited to quantitatively modeling economies or diseconomies of scale and understanding implications of information asymmetries. Analyze production, implementation and/or manufacturing expenses/process to determine most cost effective solutions. Identify root cause cost drivers for the current state and develop sourcing recommendations to achieve savings. Analyze internal or supplier information to ensure data is correctly defined in order to ensure accuracy of analysis. Provide recommendations for improvement and written documentation that relates to the analysis of the data. Lead efforts based on analysis output to drive savings. Work with contract and sourcing managers to model various solutions to national procurement processes by applying advanced negotiating principles to understand incentives produced by potential procurement strategies. In order to support the operational success of the business, this role develops metrics, tools and process for large complex projects or large customers. Supports contract management solution to ensure all Procurement contracts are loaded in the contract system. Assignments are very complex, cross functional and require seasoned analytical skills with high level of proficiency. Education: Bachelor degree required. Bachelor degree in Business, Finance, Applied Mathematics, Economics, Engineering, Computer Science, or Supply Chain preferred. Experience: Typically 3-8 years of related experience. Advanced data modeling experience and effective communication skills. Supervisory: No.",Sr Procurement Consultant Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-procurement-consultant-job-dallas-tx-us-168958087.aspx?mescoid=1300085001001&jobPosition=20,,,37d96f436835e1555089959333f4e01f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:37:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Technology – Sr. Analyst Job #:  655499Technology – Sr. Analyst 15640Duration 18 months (Possibility of extending up to 3 years)***If you are interested and meet these requirements, please email Ellen Furby at efurby@apexsystemsinc.com***Required Skills (include education, proficiency level and/or minimum # of years of experience, tools, software applications, etc. Please list in order of most to least importance):• Experience in developing, engineering and improving IT Service Management processes. 4-5 years• Experience in creating, managing and maintaining process diagrams and process definition documents. 4-5 years• Experience in gathering and analyzing requirements to improve existing processes. 3-4 years• Experience in defining, measuring and trending KPIs and process metrics. 3-5 years• Ability to analyze performance data to demonstrate the effectiveness of the ITIL processes. 2-3 years • Use of a Service Management Platform. (BMC/Remedy, ServiceNow, UniCenter, IBM etc. ) 4-6 years• Experience in developing, managing, and maintaining the CSI process and associated procedures. 1-2 years• Demonstrated handling pressure and Customer engagement in critical/difficult circumstances.• ITIL Foundation Certification (or Higher)• Strong business background (working in a company of similar scale)• Ability to work in dynamic environment with changing priorities• High energy, innovative individual who is motivated by challenging assignments• Excellent communication skills, interpersonal, oral, and written• Effective at managing multiple requests with conflicting priorities under tight deadlines• Ability to coordinate and participate in operational reviews• High attention to detail, quality and accuracy• Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills• Strong customer communication skills with the ability to communicate technical issues to non-technical customers• Ability to work well within a team to learn and share knowledge• Customer focused with a passion and drive for customer satisfaction and delivering business value• Experience organizing and assembling resources required to develop a solution/proposal/deliverable.• Effective at developing and maintaining strong customer and team relationships.Preferred Skills (skills that would be beneficial but are not required):• Experience in leading the transformation of business processes • IT Service Management Process Ownership• IT Service Management Platform Implementation• IT Service Management Platform Development• Basic Project Management skills• Advanced knowledge and understanding of IT concepts• Advanced ITIL Certification (Service Operations and/or Continual Service Improvement)• Experience with Kaizen and Six Sigma tools• 5S, Value Stream Mapping, SMED, Poke-yoke, or Kanban experience • Experience conducting attainment / sustainment auditsJob Responsibilities & Expectations of Employee (i.e., on-call/pager, shift work, extended hours, travel expectations):The Business Analyst for CSI Governance will focus on measuring, and improving all aspects of IT services. They will focus on effectiveness, efficiency, cost, and quality throughout the Service Lifecycle. The CSI Governance role will define and control measurements (KPIs) in close partnership with ITIL Governance teams and Technology Leadership. Ultimately the CSI team will drive the CSI process, own the CSI registry and will support transparency in all ITSM disciplines. They will conduct Continuous Service Improvement activities, prepare reporting and operational reviews (including analysis of SLAs) and provide full instrumentation of vital processes to drive transparency and accountability. A successful candidate needs to have outstanding Service Management experience and present themselves as a thought leader in the area of Continuous Improvement. They must possess hands-on experience delivering additional business value through the implement of continuous improvement strategies. In short, a thinker and a doer.Core Responsibilities• Will provide leadership, guidance & support to the Continuous Improvement functions of Service Management.• Will liaison with multiple groups (including technology and non-technology) to ensure service level targets are met, customer satisfaction remains high, and escalations occur in a timely manner. • Will participate in measuring numerous ITIL processes, and construct reports and relevant dashboards.• Will develop, manage and maintain Continuous Improvement Plans and associated materials.• Will conduct and/or participate in weekly/monthly Operational reviews with Technology leadership and process teams.• Will assist other IT Service management teams as necessary with statistics, suggestions, and enhancement opportunities. • Will collaborate with other suppliers on issues/tasks spanning multiple areas.• Will publish trend analysis, sharing periodical reports to internal customers.• Will support and share continuous improvement plans with effective communication across operational groups. • Will facilitate and manage innovation and organizational learning.• Will leverage the expertise of people across the organization.Team information (i.e., size of Team, Team make-up, future projects, Team strengths/weaknesses):This individual will be part of a larger Service Management organization (approximately ~25 people) which supports various ITIL Processes. This individual will be part of a multi-year technology transformation restructuring technology to better support our business. This individual needs to have outstanding Service Management experience and present themselves as a thought leader as well as have hands-on experience to implement continuous improvement after go-live of new processes and technologies. A thinker and a doer.Similar Industry Titles:Continuous Improvement Implementation Analyst          EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Technology – Sr. Analyst Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technology-%E2%80%93-sr-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-169021946.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3ead9dc830121ef9fde78084e4b0f40e
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:37:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:The Route Manager is accountable to the Service Manager for: day-to-day supervision of all Route Sales Representatives (RSRs); training, coaching and motivating existing RSRs; facilitating an effective training program for all new RSRs; management of Route Specialists; day-to-day check-ins; maintenance of Service Standards; and management communication with RSRs and other key personnel.ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:- BUSINESS MANAGEMENT FUNCTIONS: a) Assists the Service Manager in developing a short-term (1 year) account retention / revenue growth strategy, b) provides day-to-day supervision of RSRs (e.g., check-ins, route rides, etc).Schedules and manages Route Specialists, to include route coverage, new account installs, measuring of major accounts, etc., c) holds RSRs accountable for following Service Standards and other standard operating guidelines, d) supports the functions of all other service personnel (Account Manager, Service Coordinator, etc.), e) partners with Account Managers and RSRs to achieve growth, retention, penetration and profitability of all existing accounts, f) follows all financial procedures as it relates to service, e.g., route audits, check-ins, account receivables (NCND), etc., g) coordinates the completion of all actions items on all Performance Reviews and Customer Progress Reports, and h) handles escalated customer service issues including pricing discrepancies and Contract Enforcement and Service Agreement Renewals.- PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT FUNCTIONS: a) Implements the corporate and regional training processes for new and existing RSRs, b) conducts route rides with new and existing RSRs, on a weekly basis, c) evaluates RSR performance, skills and performance of Service Standards.Assists the Service Manager in the selection process of new RSRs, d) provides feedback to the Service Manager on individual performance of RSRs, and e) acts as liaison between Customer Service (Service Coordinators) and the RSRs to ensure that customers are getting immediate response to all inquiries.- DIRECT OUTPUT: a) Develops quarterly plans for the training and coaching of new and existing RSRs., b) implements the corporate and regional RSR training processes according to schedule, c) completes quarterly performance and skill evaluations on all assigned RSRs.Reviews delivery standard trend reports for each RSR and territory with action plans to resolve variances to goal, and d) holds self and direct reports accountable to following standard operating guidelines to ensure consistently complete deliveries to the customer base.- KEY PERFORMANCE MEASURES: a) Customer Satisfaction Scores, b) Employee Satisfactions Scores, c) Service Standards, d) Exposure-Service Agreement Renewals, e) RSR Turnover, f) Customer Retention, g) Route Growth, h) Merchandise Management - Garment and Bulk Items, i) Late Service Calls and/or To-do items, and j) Completion of training schedule.EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS:- Bachelor's degree in business, sales, customer service or management preferred, or equivalent combination of education and experience.WORK EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:- 1 year route-based sales experience (RSR preferred).- 2-3 years experience providing excellent customer service, with demonstrated success: retaining and growing accounts; identifying and resolving problems in ways that were satisfactory to the customer and the Company; leading and training peers or work group.- Previous supervisory or management experience preferred.SKILLS AND COMPETENCIES:- Customer Focus, WorkStandards, and Leading Through Visions and Values.- Coaching, Follow-up, and Planning and Organizing.- Continuous Learning, Building Positive Working Relationships, and Aligning Performance for Success.- Managing Conflict and Decision-Making.- Initiates Action.SPECIALIZED KNOWLEDGE, LICENSES etc.:- Valid driving license, applicable federal and state DOT certification.- Industry knowledge preferred.",Route Manager Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80123",Rental ServicesBusiness Services - OtherOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/route-manager-job-denver-co-us-168863112.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=17,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ad200bf62b2c16a71c170b0bfc0ec528
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:37:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hiring NOW!  à Journeymen and Electricians**Journeyman Electricians needed to join a rapidly expanding staffing facility.  We cover Contract/Temporary, Direct-hire/Permanent and Contract-to-hire positions.Our Englewood, CO office hires all areas of Colorado and our division hires across the United States. We have immediate start dates and are seeking qualified individuals with a good work ethic.We offer access to Health, Dental, Vision and Vacation to our employees. You'll be working for a reputable contractor that offers an excellent work environment.Requirements:ü   Must have commercial/industrial install serviceü  Must be available to work a minimum of 40 hours a week ü  Proven reliability with recent work history ü  MUST have Journeymen’s Licenseü   Able to pass drug test and e-verifyü  Reliable transportationü  Hand tools   **Skilled Electricians: Now hiring for 1st year apprentice to licensed journeymen. We are looking for individuals who have experience working on sites that include industrial plants- compressor stations and racking facilities.Applicants should have experience running GRC Conduit and some oil and gas. Must be comfortable working with heights and proficient with running processing pipe.We offer access to Health, Dental, Vision and Vacation to our employees. You'll be working for a reputable contractor that offers and excellent environment and a good opportunityRequirements:ü  Must be available to work a minimum of 40 hours a week ü  Proven reliability with recent work history ü  Able to pass drug test and e-verifyü  Reliable transportationü  Hand tools  ***Contact us today at # 303-937-5382***WE LOOK FORWARD TO WORKING WITH YOU! My contact information: Krista Zahn | Skilled Trades Recruiter | Elwood Tradesmen Tel: 303-937-5382 | Fax: 303-937-9033 2269 W. Yale Ave. | Englewood, CO | 80110Email @: krista.zahn@elwoodtradesmen.comVisit us:   www.elwoodtradesmen.com",NOW Hiring! **Journeymen and Electricians** Job in Englewood,Full Time Employee,"Englewood, CO 80110",,http://jobview.monster.com/now-hiring!-journeymen-electricians-job-englewood-co-us-168963012.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=7,,Building Construction/Skilled Trades,f10c48a794ada257441001c2fd93e146
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:17:37:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionIf your goal is to begin a fantastic part time career working up to 25 hours per week where your talents will be valued and respected; Murphy USA is an outstanding employer of choice. To be successful as a cashier, you need energy, excellent work ethic, a great attitude, and a smile. You will be the face of our company and deliver the legendary customer service that Murphy USA and our associates are known for providing. RESPONSIBILITIES: Providing a prompt, efficient, and courteous customer experience. Responding and resolving customer’s requests and concerns. Assisting customers with purchases and fuel transactions. Operating cash register. Restocking merchandise. Performing job related duties as assigned. REQUIREMENTS: Must be 18+ Years of age, 19 in Alabama and 21 in Illinois. Excellent customer service skills, communication skills, and a happy attitude are essential. Cash Handling Skills. Must be able to perform repeated bending, standing, and reaching. Must be able to occasionally lift up to 50 pounds. HIGHLIGHTS: A job is more than just a job when it’s a career at Murphy USA. We do our best to provide the most supportive and enjoyable atmosphere possible for our employees. When you know that you are making a difference in the lives of those around you. When you go to work every day looking forward to the day ahead of you. When the decisions you make on the job really matter to those whom you serve. Murphy USA offers a fast paced environment where bright, talented individuals who are willing to work hard are valued and can make a difference. Murphy USA can help you schedule your work around your busy life. Murphy USA operates over 1,200 locations in 23 states and is adding new locations every year. The growth provides career advancement opportunities for top performing team members. ""Murphy USA Inc is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants are considered for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, disability, veteran status, age, or any other class or category protected by federal, state, or local law.""",CASHIER Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/cashier-job-dallas-tx-us-168939338.aspx?mescoid=4100667001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),25f9e3f9e5ae19bfe8676edc6320043e
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:16:57:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Regional Sales Director - Pressure ProductsLocation:Dallas, TX - (TX Main Office - Peerless Mfg. Co.)Business Units:Peerless Mfg. Co.Department:SalesKC Job Code:173DescriptionCECO is diversified global provider of leading engineered technologies to the environmental, energy, and fluid handling and filtration industrial segments, targeting specific niche-focused end markets through an attractive asset-light business model, strategically balanced across the world. CECO targets its $5 billion+ of installed base, specifically to expand and grow a higher recurring revenue of aftermarket products and services. CECO’s well respected brands, technologies and solutions have been evolving for well over 50 years to become leading-edge technologies in specific niche global end markets, including natural gas turbine power, refinery & petrochemical engineered cyclones and mid-stream energy pipeline gas transmission. CECO is listed on Nasdaq under the ticker symbol “CECE.” For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com .  Within CECO Environmental’s mix of products, services, and solutions, the complementary Peerless brands and groups exemplify global engineered solutions with state-of-the-art technology to maximize safe and clean process performance within the power, natural gas pipeline, petrochemical, refinery, and marine industries. The Peerless Pressure Products group delivers specialized separation and filtration solutions, including the cleaning of gases or liquids in piping systems, the removal of solid or liquid contaminants from natural gas, and the removal of water from saturated steam at nuclear power plants. The Peerless-Aarding group delivers gas power plant exhaust system solutions and emissions mitigation, through selective catalytic and non-catalytic reduction (SCR and SNCR). The Burgess-Aarding group delivers tailored silencer and acoustics technology solutions to meet the noise requirements at customer sites.  For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com .    Regional Sales Director, North America – Peerless Mfg. Co. - Position DescriptionResponsible for the sale of company products / services in a specified region or set of accounts, primarily in North America.  This position may include direct supervision over other sales staff, including Regional Sales Managers and Applications Engineers.Responsible for direct interaction with customers, engineering contractors and end users in order to meet company sales objectives, providing strategic guidance and a senior presence to support Regional Sales Managers as well as in support of his/her own sales efforts.Manages the sales effort for the region through direct selling and collaboration with both in-house (Dallas, TX) applications engineers and multiple independent sales representativesEstablishes & maintains relationships with major accounts within jurisdiction, understands customer needs, negotiates terms and conditions and effectively closes dealsConfers with immediate supervisor & sales team members in the development of sales and pricing strategiesAssists sales support / marketing staff members in activities such as sales promotion or training; commercial negotiations; market research; personnel planning and executing special projects or strategic accountsDirects preparation & maintenance of sales forecasts and participates in the determination of market potential and market expansion opportunities for the region to align the company’s efforts with changing market conditionsDevelops independent sales representatives and other sales channelsMaintains excellent customer service RequirementsTechnical knowledge of the Oil & Gas Energy market and the companies involved in designing North American facilities for the production, transmission and utilization of hydrocarbon resources; preferred7 or more years of related technical sales experience; preferredBachelor's degree; requiredBachelor's degree in Engineering or Business; preferred CECO Environmental offers a competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package including life, medical, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, 401k and more.CECO Environmental is an EEO and E-Verify Employer.  We sincerely appreciate your interest and will carefully evaluate your qualifications for employment.  Be assured your opportunity for employment with our company will be based only on your merit without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, mental or physical disability, or any other factor unrelated to job requirements.  ",Regional Sales Director - Pressure Products Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Regional Sales Director - Pressure ProductsLocation:Dallas, TX - (TX Main Office - Peerless Mfg. Co.)Business Units:Peerless Mfg. Co.Department:SalesKC Job Code:173DescriptionCECO is diversified global provider of leading engineered technologies to the environmental, energy, and fluid handling and filtration industrial segments, targeting specific niche-focused end markets through an attractive asset-light business model, strategically balanced across the world. CECO targets its $5 billion+ of installed base, specifically to expand and grow a higher recurring revenue of aftermarket products and services. CECO’s well respected brands, technologies and solutions have been evolving for well over 50 years to become leading-edge technologies in specific niche global end markets, including natural gas turbine power, refinery & petrochemical engineered cyclones and mid-stream energy pipeline gas transmission. CECO is listed on Nasdaq under the ticker symbol “CECE.” For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com .  Within CECO Environmental’s mix of products, services, and solutions, the complementary Peerless brands and groups exemplify global engineered solutions with state-of-the-art technology to maximize safe and clean process performance within the power, natural gas pipeline, petrochemical, refinery, and marine industries. The Peerless Pressure Products group delivers specialized separation and filtration solutions, including the cleaning of gases or liquids in piping systems, the removal of solid or liquid contaminants from natural gas, and the removal of water from saturated steam at nuclear power plants. The Peerless-Aarding group delivers gas power plant exhaust system solutions and emissions mitigation, through selective catalytic and non-catalytic reduction (SCR and SNCR). The Burgess-Aarding group delivers tailored silencer and acoustics technology solutions to meet the noise requirements at customer sites.  For more information, please visit www.cecoenviro.com .    Regional Sales Director, North America – Peerless Mfg. Co. - Position DescriptionResponsible for the sale of company products / services in a specified region or set of accounts, primarily in North America.  This position may include direct supervision over other sales staff, including Regional Sales Managers and Applications Engineers.Responsible for direct interaction with customers, engineering contractors and end users in order to meet company sales objectives, providing strategic guidance and a senior presence to support Regional Sales Managers as well as in support of his/her own sales efforts.Manages the sales effort for the region through direct selling and collaboration with both in-house (Dallas, TX) applications engineers and multiple independent sales representativesEstablishes & maintains relationships with major accounts within jurisdiction, understands customer needs, negotiates terms and conditions and effectively closes dealsConfers with immediate supervisor & sales team members in the development of sales and pricing strategiesAssists sales support / marketing staff members in activities such as sales promotion or training; commercial negotiations; market research; personnel planning and executing special projects or strategic accountsDirects preparation & maintenance of sales forecasts and participates in the determination of market potential and market expansion opportunities for the region to align the company’s efforts with changing market conditionsDevelops independent sales representatives and other sales channelsMaintains excellent customer service RequirementsTechnical knowledge of the Oil & Gas Energy market and the companies involved in designing North American facilities for the production, transmission and utilization of hydrocarbon resources; preferred7 or more years of related technical sales experience; preferredBachelor's degree; requiredBachelor's degree in Engineering or Business; preferred CECO Environmental offers a competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package including life, medical, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, 401k and more.CECO Environmental is an EEO and E-Verify Employer.  We sincerely appreciate your interest and will carefully evaluate your qualifications for employment.  Be assured your opportunity for employment with our company will be based only on your merit without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, mental or physical disability, or any other factor unrelated to job requirements.  ",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-sales-director-pressure-products-job-dallas-tx-us-168762351.aspx?mescoid=1100008001001&jobPosition=8,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,cd3d34c60e3b5b09383bb41f09495e7c
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:16:56:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"There are retail jobs, and there are retail careers. If you’re passionate about helping people get the most out of the technology they love, you could be a great fit for our retail team. Our motivated employees work directly with our cutting-edge line of products and services. We’re passionate about innovation - and even more passionate about connecting our customers to the future. As a Retail Sales Consultant, you’ll belong to a supportive team in a fast-paced environment. Together, you can connect people to the latest technology - all while meeting sales goals. If you love working with people, then this may be the job for you. From the initial greeting to closing the sale, you will play a big role in shaping the retail experience. Bottom line? You are the go-to customer service expert. Sharing your knowledge with our growing customer base comes with many rewards. Start with the paycheck: Base plus commission. Our current full-time Retail Sales Consultants earn an average of $49,157 in total compensation in the first year when successfully meeting or exceeding sales goals. Our top sellers earn an average of $56,860 per year. With this position you need the flexibility to potentially work one of the stores within 15 miles as the needs of the business dictate. These store location include: 9100 N Central Expressway, Dallas TX 5616 Lemmon Avenue, Dallas TX 1152 N Buckner, Dallas TX 3329 Oak Lawn Ave, Dallas TX You’ll also gain an amazing benefits package, including: Ongoing paid training Exciting career paths Supportive team environment Employer-provided mobile device Medical/dental coverage 401(k) plan Tuition reimbursement Paid time off Not to mention some pretty cool perks, like: One of our latest devices and a service plan. Using our technology, gain first-hand expertise to share with our customers. Discounts on accessories and additional AT&T products and services. That means you always have access to the coolest gadgets around. A spring and fall fund to spend on a wide range of Team Color apparel. You’ll even receive a welcome kit of fun gear to get you started (including two shirts). To qualify, we’d like you to have 1 to 3 years of retail or customer-facing sales experience. Study Guides for pre-employment screening (click the links below to open the various study guides) Retail Sales Consultant Test Reid Report Apply now! Our employees say it best! Watch now.",Bilingual Spanish Retail Sales Consultant Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-spanish-retail-sales-consultant-job-dallas-tx-us-168958236.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=18,,,bb8f366c9a466a757f4f468aad7c6709
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:16:28:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Summary:The Claims Team Manager will report into our Dallas, TX office. This is not a remote opportunity. You will need to have the ability to work the hours of 10:00 am - 7:00 pm CST.As a Casualty Team Manager you will oversee and have direct management of an Alliance United/Kemper team of Casualty Claim Adjusters. You will be responsible for the direct management of claims for the state of California. The Claims Team Manager will provide technical expertise, staff development and guidance on California claims handling practices/procedures and provide training as appropriate and necessary.Position Qualifications:• 5 or more years experience handling casualty claims.• College degree or equivalent work experience.• 2-3 years supervisory experience required.• Non-standard auto experience preferred.• CPCU/AIC is desirable, but not required.• Must have claim related computer systems experience; Guidewire experience is a plus.• Fluent in English/Spanish a plus.• Must possess knowledge of the principles of casualty insurance and auto casualty claims adjustment process.Apply here for a job where you can be appreciated: http://bit.ly/CasualtyTeamManager3677 Our employees enjoy great benefits:• Qualify for your choice of health and dental plans within your first month.• Save for your future with robust 401(k) match, Health Spending Accounts and various retirement plans.• Learn and Grow with our Tuition Assistance Program, paid certifications and continuing education programs.• Contribute to your community through United Way and volunteer programs.• Balance your life with generous paid time off and business casual dress.• Protect what you love with discounts on home and auto insurance products.• Get employee discounts for shopping, dining and travel through Kemper Perks.Kemper at a glanceWith $8 billion in assets, Kemper is one of the nation's leading insurers. The Kemper family of companies specializes in home, auto, life, health and valuables insurance products for individuals, families and businesses.Kemper’s underwriting companies* are rated A- (Excellent) by A.M. Best Company, the leading insurance industry rating authority. Kemper services six million policies and ranks among the top 25 personal lines property and casualty writers.*Alliance United Insurance Company is not rated. ~CB~ ~M~We value diversity and strive to be an employer of choice. An Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V",Team Manager - Casualty Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/team-manager-casualty-job-dallas-tx-us-169022598.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=12,,Business/Strategic Management,353ed6aa9ca03e06b51fde9b6873ed21
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:16:26:36,No,jobs.monster.com," Our client is looking for Middleware Administrator If interested and available; kindly send me your updated resume in word format along with desired rate to work on the project.    Title: Middleware AdministratorLocation: Dallas, TX (Required only Locals)Contract : 12 Months  Webmethod experience is a MUST  Qualifications:• BS in Computer Science / Computer Information Systems / or IT Major• Demonstrated knowledge and working experience in Linux environment. Windows experience also a plus.• Experience with Software AG webMethods.• At least 8 years of working experience of various middleware and ESB software such as WebLogic, Websphere, JBoss and Tomcat Application Server in an enterprise environment.• Experience maintaining JMS compliant message brokers, experience with Software AG Universal Messaging or other middleware such as MQ Series, ActiveMQ, etc.• Working knowledge of SSL/TLS protocols for secure web services and communications.• Knowledge of ITIL best practices, ServiceNow desired.• Scripting and automation experience a big plus.   Thanks and Best Regards, Gopinath Grandhi National Systems America, L.P. 5945 Dallas ParkwayPlano, TX 75093972-212-8728 Office972-212-7434 eFax 972-212-8762 Cellgopinath@nsiamerica.comVisit us at www.nsiamerica.com",Monster,," Our client is looking for Middleware Administrator If interested and available; kindly send me your updated resume in word format along with desired rate to work on the project.    Title: Middleware AdministratorLocation: Dallas, TX (Required only Locals)Contract : 12 Months  Webmethod experience is a MUST  Qualifications:• BS in Computer Science / Computer Information Systems / or IT Major• Demonstrated knowledge and working experience in Linux environment. Windows experience also a plus.• Experience with Software AG webMethods.• At least 8 years of working experience of various middleware and ESB software such as WebLogic, Websphere, JBoss and Tomcat Application Server in an enterprise environment.• Experience maintaining JMS compliant message brokers, experience with Software AG Universal Messaging or other middleware such as MQ Series, ActiveMQ, etc.• Working knowledge of SSL/TLS protocols for secure web services and communications.• Knowledge of ITIL best practices, ServiceNow desired.• Scripting and automation experience a big plus.   Thanks and Best Regards, Gopinath Grandhi National Systems America, L.P. 5945 Dallas ParkwayPlano, TX 75093972-212-8728 Office972-212-7434 eFax 972-212-8762 Cellgopinath@nsiamerica.comVisit us at www.nsiamerica.com",,http://jobview.monster.com/middleware-administrator-job-dallas-tx-us-168973853.aspx?mescoid=1500131001001&jobPosition=2,,,75e94e490f0afe11fe2c06982869de58
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:15:58:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Milgard Manufacturing Service Technician - Denver 26404BR Aurora Colorado Description SUMMARY OF POSITION:A Service Technician performs warranty and non-warranty service repairs at customer's homes throughout a specific geographic region. Must be able to diagnose customer issues and determine if a situation is a warranty item or not, and appropriately explain the circumstances to the customer.KEY DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:• Creates and executes MPS plans; meets MPS commitments and works within the guidelines of MPS; reflects Milgard's business values and the Milgard philosophy in all business interactions.• Incorporates Milgard's vision and values into day-to-day activities and behaviors; guides and motivates others to remain committed to the Milgard philosophy.• Adheres to all facets of safety policies and procedures.• Proper usage of personal protective equipment.60% Performing and Documenting Field Service Work.Responsible for assisting the Service Tech III in making adjustments, replacing parts and pieces, performing water tests, taking measurements, and documenting all work performed or needing to be performed both written and through imaging. Potentially will have days where work is performed on their own.25% Driving.Responsible for driving to locations as dictated by pre-set appointments according to territory assigned. Responsible for maintaining safe driving habits and clean drivers license in accordance with company policy. Responsible for Service Truck inspections and reporting truck condition.5% Requisition Parts.Responsible for requisitioning parts from internal supplier necessary to perform field service work.5% Documentation Review.Responsible for reviewing service work orders generated for accuracy of shipper information for parts ordered by customer care coordinator, parts to be requisitioned from internal supply, special tools that may be required to complete service call, routing information (Thomas Guide Page and Section No.).5% Team Building and Support.Responsible for participating in team/department meetings.The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees in this position. This is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities.EXPERIENCE REQUIRED:• A minimum of three years prior customer service experience required.• Valid Class C drivers license with a clean DMV record.• Prior glass or window experience is desirable but not required; however, technical/mechanical ability or background is preferred.EDUCATION/LICENSES/CERTIFICATION/FORMAL TRAINING:• A high school diploma or GED.ESSENTIAL ABILITIES:• In depth knowledge of product lines in order to repair products in the field.• Attention to detail with strong organizational skills.• Excellent written and oral communication skills and customer service skills.• Proficient use of hand tools to include: tape measure, level, saws, drills, etc.• Able to compute basic math problems.• Problem solving ability and ability to handle stressful situations.• Good hand eye coordination and the ability to discern colors.• Sense of direction with ability to use Thomas Guide, self-motivated, and mechanically inclined.• Must be physically capable to climb ladders up to 40 feet, work off scaffolding, lift and carry up to 50 lbs., and work days frequently in excess of 10 hours.• Ability to work in, and promote a team environment.• Proper usage of personal protective equipment.• Adheres to all facets of safety policies and procedures.PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:• Prolonged standing and repetitive motions, bending, stooping, pushing, and pulling.• May be required to frequently lift up to 50 lbs.• Hand dexterity and strength.• Overtime may be required, including some weekends.WORK ENVIRONMENT:• Forty (40%) percent of all work activities are performed inside the cab of the service vehicle. The remainders of work activities are performed outdoors.Milgard does not tolerate discrimination of any type, and offers equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons without regard to race, color, religion, sex, natural origin, age, disability or medical condition, marital status, veteran status or any other considerations made unlawful by Federal, State or local laws. We believe in providing eligible and qualified employees with opportunities to advance. Milgard is an at-will employer. Category Manufacturing Country United States EEO Commitment Milgard does not tolerate discrimination of any type, and offers equal employment opportunity to all qualified persons without regard to race, color, religion, sex, natural origin, age, disability or medical condition, sexual orientation, marital status, veteran status or any other considerations made unlawful by Federal, State or local laws. We believe in providing eligible and qualified employees with opportunities to advance. Milgard is an at-will employer. Milgard is an Equal Opportunity Employer. E-Verify Milgard is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity EmployerMilgard is an E-Verify employer. E-Verify is an Internet based system operated by the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) in partnership with the Social Security Administration (SSA) that allows participating employers to electronically verify the employment eligibility of their newly hired employees in the United States. Please click on the following links for more information.E-Verify Participation Poster: English, SpanishE-verify Right to Work Poster: English, Spanish Posting Partner #CB, #MONS-MILGD",Service Technician - Denver Job in Aurora,Full Time,"Aurora, CO",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/service-technician-denver-job-aurora-co-us-168942217.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),26894dcf326d905822e93743b3727ef3
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:15:56:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Truck Driver - CDL - A Company Truck Driver AssociateClass A Company Driver Benefits:Join the carrier that puts truck drivers first. Since the beginning, Knight has known that Class A CDL truck drivers are the foundation of the business. That’s why we make sure truck driving associates like you receive the respect you deserve.EXCELLENT PAYPAY CHOICES (DAILY OR WEEKLY)FLEXIBLE HOMETIMEPTO AFTER 90 DAYSCONSISTENT MILESLATE MODEL EQUIPMENTMEDICAL, DENTAL, VISION, AND LIFE INSURANCECOMPANY MATCH PREMIUM 401KREQUIREMENTS21 YEARS OF AGE OR ABOVEMINIMUM 3 MONTHS CURRENT OTR EXPERIENCEDOT PHYSICAL AND FUNCTIONAL CAPACITY TESTINGIT'S NOT A JOB, IT'S A CALLINGCall a Recruiter TODAY! 888-449-0430Company Truck Drivers Needed Near You!Rooted in the humble, yet strong beginnings of a working American family, Knight Transportation has stayed true to one common value – our truck driving associates come first and foremost.TOGETHER WE ARE KNIGHTKnight was founded on the principle of providing a better quality of life for drivers by providing innovative route solutions and better benefits than our competitors. Now that Knight has grown to over 4,500 trucks, we are still here for you. As the elite carrier in the nation, Knight Transportation offers truck driving associates a chance to thrive in their career.We believe in continuously supporting our drivers. That’s why we’ve increased driver pay consistently year-over-year resulting in a 14% pay increase over the last 18 months.Call a Recruiter TODAY! 888-449-0430",Truck Driver - CDL - A Regional Company Truck Driver Associate Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/truck-driver-cdl-a-regional-company-truck-driver-associate-job-denver-co-us-162099043.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=11,Bonus Opportunities,,fa97e30ed63bc10dab9eb57a74f045a4
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:14:57:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Customer Service RepresentativeOur client located in the North Dallas area is looking to add on Customer Service Representatives on a contract to possible hire basis. Company Profile:Buys and sells used heavy equipment, trucks, trailers, marine and mining/quarry equipment all over the world. Features and Benefits while On Contract:Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseFeatures and Benefits of Client:Team EnvironmentFamily AtmosphereOpportunity to growCustomer Service Representative Role:The Customer Service Representatives will contact vendors in our database to inquire about their interest in selling heavy equipment, trucks, trailers, marine, and mining equipment within the construction industry. YOU WILL NOT BE SELLING ANYTHING! Outbound calls to people from all over the United StatesCustomer Service skills are a large and critical part of this positionWork directly with our sales team in developing relationships nationwide and assisting in the purchasing aspect of our businessCustomer Service Representative Background Profile:High School Diploma or Equivalent RequiredSome College preferred but not a mustMust have ""Customer Service"" experience Must have desire to interact and develop relationships with others over the phoneMust have excellent verbal and written communication skillsMust have desire to learn the industry, be hard working and dependableMust be computer literate, ability to multi-task with excellent organizational skillsPlease visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/dallas.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/customer-service.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC).",Customer Service Representative Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-representative-job-dallas-tx-us-168503757.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,13.00 - 15.00 /hour,Customer Support/Client Care,0a521f270980b8558c42e7be1f6a13c0
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:14:56:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO   The fun and exciting world of event sales is calling for you! Will you answer? Our part time Event Specialist jobs give you the opportunity to represent the best brands on the market today! You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and retail sales. As a part time Event Specialist, you will work in one of the following locations: Albertsons, Albertsons Market, ACME Markets, Amigos, Carrs, Jewel-Osco, Market Street, Pavilions, Randalls, Safeway, Shaws, Star Market, Super Saver by Albertsons, Tom Thumb, United Supermarket, and Vons. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.        Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products. Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines. Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery preferred. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Access to reliable transportation. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods.  Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers.  We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales and Marketing LLC, dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO Job in Dallas,Part Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-aco-job-dallas-tx-us-168801434.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=12,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,8882239d773f954201cbbafb88592133
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:14:50:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESTAURANT CAREERS IN DALLAS, FORT WORTH, MESQUITE, ARLINGTON, AND ALLEN!$54K-$64K RESTAURANT MANAGERS DALLAS, FORT WORTH, MESQUITE, ARLINGTON AND ALLENKITCHEN MANAGERS AND SOUS CHEFS FOR ARLINGTON AND FORT WORTH $62K-$66K BASE PLUS   HIGH VOLUME CASUAL AND UPSCALE CONCEPTS ARE READY TO HIRE YOU!NEW STORE OPENINGS! DON'T HESITATE, APPLY TODAY!   ABOUT US......BUCHANAN & ASSOCIATES “CAREER SOLUTIONS FOR RESTAURANT PROFESSIONALS”WE CARRY SEVERAL DECADES OF RESTAURANT OPERATIONS AND STAFFING EXPERIENCENOW REPRESENTING OVER SIXTY EXTREMELY SUCCESSFUL COMPANIES AND CONCEPTS!OUR SUITE OF SERVICES IS OFFERED AT NO EXPENSE TO CANDIDATES!                          ***Qualified Applicants Will be Contacted Immediately, Confidentially***                              ""REQUIREMENTS""A Positive, Outgoing, Professional ""Can Do"" Attitude.Self Motivation, Pride in Accomplishment.Strong Coaching, Mentoring, and Employee Development Skills.Good Business Sense Geared toward Meeting or Exceeding Goals.Two plus Years Salaried Restaurant Management Experience.High School Diploma or Equivalent""DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES""Maintains Guest Satisfaction Objectives by Training, Scheduling, and Communicating Job Expectations.Helps Achieve Restaurant Financial Goals by Contributing  Information and Recommendations.Controls Costs by Portion Control and Quantities of Preparation; Minimizing Waste.Maintains Safe and Healthy Environments by Following and Enforcing Sanitation Standards.Enhances Profitability by Accomplishing Assignments and Meeting or Exceeding Company Objectives.“SALARY AND BENEFITS”Highly Competitive Base Salary plus Outstanding Bonus Potential.Health Benefit Package PLUS 401K and Paid Vacation.Performance Based Promotions!*EASY APPLY FROM PHONE, TABLET OR PC!*USE THE ""APPLY"" BUTTON BELOW OR EMAIL RESUME' DIRECTLY TO:buchananjames@gmail.com  ",$K-$K RESTAURANT MANAGER DALLAS! $K-$K KITCHEN MANAGER ARLINGTON! NEW STORES ACROSS DFW! Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",All,http://jobview.monster.com/54k-64k-restaurant-manager-dallas!-62k-66k-kitchen-manager-arlington!-new-stores-across-dfw!-job-dallas-tx-us-169007818.aspx?mescoid=1100043001001&jobPosition=3,"54,000.00 - 66,000.00 $ /yearHighly Competitive Base Salary Plus Lucrative Bonus Plan, Benefit Package, in a Highly Diverse, Very Successful Company! Performance Based Upward Mobility Assured.​ Do Not Hesitate, Apply Today.​ Grow with this Nationally Present, Dynamic Restaurant Group",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),71d984d776e55151dad7f9c647573feb
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:14:36:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client Manager - Personal Lines at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 5/25/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: Not Specified Date Posted: 5/25/2016 Job Title: Client Manager – Personal Lines Location: Dallas, TX The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson. The Business Corporate risk and brokingWe know how companies can unlock potential through effective risk management. Our clients rely on us to craft strategies to quantify, mitigate, and transfer risk, taking advantage of our specialist industry experience and unparalleled market know-how. The result is a new way of embracing risk that drives superior results. The RoleThe Client Manager manages the placement and service of clients for the Personal Lines Department. This mid-level position is client facing and leverages established competencies related to Personal Lines services and clients. Responsible for providing timely, professional account service to clients in order to achieve quality sales and service standards using our automated (electronic) work environment. Manage all aspects of the placement and service of Personal Lines for Willis Towers Watson Clients in an automated and electronic work environment Maintain client relationships with assigned accounts and support retention ratio at or above the Personal Lines average Manage and assist in the sales process (RFP and proposal development, presentation, etc.) Provides risk management analysis utilizing new business, renewal and claim reviews Make recommendations to prospects and current clients to update and enhance policy contracts Perform all phases of new business, renewal and remarket processing including preparation of applications, negotiation with underwriters, obtaining quotes, creating proposals, monitoring status, and follows up to delivery of policy documents to client Consistently prepares policy change requests, and submits requests to carriers Monitors status of change requests, reviews policy documents for accuracy and follows up to delivery of change documents to clients Maintains insurance records for accounts including hard copy files, data management, coding and calculating information into Agency management system Identifies and processes coverage enhancement and cross- sales opportunities Independently resolves client, carrier and/or vendor accounting issues, including coverage questions, collections, discrepancies, fee arrangements, billing controversies Ensure compliance with all Willis Towers Watson and regulatory procedures; such as WEM (Willis Towers Watson Excellence Model) & AOD (assurance of discontinuance) Skills and Qualifications Five (5) years’ experience in the Personal Insurance/Private Client industry, preferred High school diploma required, bachelor’s degree preferred Property and Casualty license required The appropriate broker’s license is required when required by law Industry designations such as CIC or CISR Intermediate knowledge of (1) PC & PL insurance products, (2) proposal, preparation and analysis, (3) claim management Technical knowledge of Insurance and/or Brokerage business Ability to provide consultation and expert advice to management on risk management issues Knowledge of principles and methods involved in promoting and selling services Interpersonal skills, including relationship-building skills with clients and co-workers Ability to work independently as well as in a team setting Strong verbal and written communication skills Presentation, organization and critical thinking skills Multi-state and medium clients Specialty line clients What can we offer you?Competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package including life, medical, dental, vision, flexible spending accounts, disability coverage, 401k and an employee stock purchase plan as well as many other options to full time employees.Willis Towers Watson is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to, among other things, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, status as a protected veteran, or disability. We are committed to equal employment opportunities at Willis Towers Watson.#LI-FL1",Client Manager - Personal Lines at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/client-manager-personal-lines-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838253.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),919addb1430bacdcd99828c737d44e28
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:14:36:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"LOCATION: Coppell, TX 75019LENGTH: 12 Month Contract to Hire (Will look to convert full time after 12 months based on performance)DESCRIPTION: Help DeskThis company offers an opportunity to convert full time with an excellent benefits package. Once converted full time there is room for career growth and the opportunity to change verticals and take your career to the next level!This will be a Help Desk environment for multiple end clients so candidates must have a diverse skill set.  Must be fluent in French. Education:High School Diploma Technical Skills: Active Directory and VPN are a mustTroubleshooting skills-Need to know what questions to ask to get to the root of the problem quicklyWindows/Outlook software supportDesktop SupportRemedy ticketing system preferred, but other ticketing systems will be consideredA+ certification is preferred  Soft Skills: Flexibility since the processes may change on a day-to-day basis depending on the client they are working with and what the client’s needs areMoldableAble to take directionMultitaskingGood attendance (there is a point system)Ability to thrive in an up-tempo high stress environment.  Main Responsibilities: Provides technical support to users for basic computer related technical problems.Enters tickets into the call tracking tool; ensures information is accurate, prioritized and assigned to a queue.Answers help desk telephones and responds to basic customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met.Assists customers in resolving basic technical problems by providing scripted guidance regarding software and hardware problems.Resolves and/or refers more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process.Logs and tracks inquiries using a problem management database and maintains history records and related problem documentation.Identifies, evaluates, and prioritizes customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately.Experience with solving computer related problems.Experience with company products, operation systems and escalation policy.Good communication, interpersonal and organizational skills.",Bilingual Help Desk Technician (French) Job in Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-help-desk-technician-french-job-coppell-tx-us-168128035.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,256b69686601052063ae810002d049df
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:14:16:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"DescriptionRF Engineer role is responsible for contributing to the RF Design of the regional cellular network.Required experience: must have previous experience managing a geographic area with responsibilities for all RF design functions including new site builds, carrier additions, and optimization projects.New Builds: issuing search rings, running RF propagation, attending site walks, site selection, filing regulatory submissions(EME, TVWs, e911), review construction drawings, and creating RF designs(antenna selection, centerline, azimuths, downtilts).Site modifications: initiate RF design for Carrier add projects and site optimization projects. Work closely with counterparts in Real Estate, project management, system performance and RF design.Candidate should feel comfortable presenting and articulating the site selection and design to landlords and city planning meetings as needed.BS in Engineering or Computer Science or equivalent work experience required 4+ years of experience in the cellular or telecommunications industry. Strong understanding of engineering concepts, RF fundamentals, RF design and working with LTE networks and must show aptitude and desire to learn and advance in a technical field.Prior experience with Atoll or Geoplan, Exel and Visio are required. Prior experience with Siterra, Roofmaster or any VZW proprietary tools are a plus.Good analytical, interpersonal, and communication skills are required. Will need to excel working in a team and working on a large number of projects. Candidate will need strong time management skills.Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",RF Engineer Job in Denver,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,RF Engineer,"Denver, CO",http://jobview.monster.com/rf-engineer-job-denver-co-us-168905282.aspx?mescoid=1700170001001&jobPosition=4,,Engineering,33d3965062b9cd7833b031e209fbd2bc
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:13:46:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Lead of ServiceDepartment: Remote – Store OperationsReports to: Co-ManagerDirect Reports: YesFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Lead of Service will support the ongoing success of all operational functions within the store which includes all aspects of the customer service experience, cash handling, markdown compliance, product pricing, and signage. By overseeing each of these functions, the Lead of Service will drive sales and productivity by promoting our products and producing the highest quality shopping experience for our customers.  Deliverables: Actively participate in-store walkthroughs with Store Manager and District Manager to ensure the consistency and quality of service, operational, and visual executionEducate and provide feedback to Associates on increasing sales through service standards, product knowledge, store presentation, and replenishmentLead the overall store earnings by driving top line sales while managing controllable contributionDrive results through creating short-term plans and long-term strategies, processes, and events that ensure a positive in-store experience for both our store team and customersEnsure service, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processesExecute the store’s markdowns, signage, marketing, and damage or defective processesUnderstand and utilize reports to direct markdowns, signage, and marketing tasksWork in partnership with the Co-Manager, and/or Store Manager, to ensure merchandise moves meet company visual presentation guidelines and pricing accuracyMaximize gross margin by partnering with the merchandising team to ensure proper flexing and maintenance of clearance merchandiseAssist with the development and training of the store’s pricing team, which  includes providing feedback to store leadership, quarterly check-ins, individual development plans, and annual performance reviews for the teamKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent.  College degree and/or relevant retail work experience preferred.Must have  at least 1 year of retail experience.  Prior supervisory or management experience preferred.Must be skilled in coaching and training, sales generation, strategic, planning, and customer serviceMust have superior communication, organizational and time management skillsMust be able to develop and train others, including delegating tasks and following-upMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shiftsAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 21799 Division : Field - Region : Northwest Location : 0176 - F21 - Park Meadows Mall, Littleton CO US 80124 Job Type : Part Time",Lead of Service - Park Meadows Mall # Job in Littleton,"Full Time , Employee","Job Description : Want more than just a job? Join Forever 21’s Retail Operations Team and showcase your fashion retail skills while working with our exceptional retail staff!Position: Lead of ServiceDepartment: Remote – Store OperationsReports to: Co-ManagerDirect Reports: YesFLSA Status: Non-ExemptLocation: U.S. Stores Department Summary:  Forever 21 is seeking an analytical, energetic, and passionate team leader to add to our dynamic Retail Operations team!Job Purpose: The Lead of Service will support the ongoing success of all operational functions within the store which includes all aspects of the customer service experience, cash handling, markdown compliance, product pricing, and signage. By overseeing each of these functions, the Lead of Service will drive sales and productivity by promoting our products and producing the highest quality shopping experience for our customers.  Deliverables: Actively participate in-store walkthroughs with Store Manager and District Manager to ensure the consistency and quality of service, operational, and visual executionEducate and provide feedback to Associates on increasing sales through service standards, product knowledge, store presentation, and replenishmentLead the overall store earnings by driving top line sales while managing controllable contributionDrive results through creating short-term plans and long-term strategies, processes, and events that ensure a positive in-store experience for both our store team and customersEnsure service, merchandising, and operational standards are met through company-defined practices and processesExecute the store’s markdowns, signage, marketing, and damage or defective processesUnderstand and utilize reports to direct markdowns, signage, and marketing tasksWork in partnership with the Co-Manager, and/or Store Manager, to ensure merchandise moves meet company visual presentation guidelines and pricing accuracyMaximize gross margin by partnering with the merchandising team to ensure proper flexing and maintenance of clearance merchandiseAssist with the development and training of the store’s pricing team, which  includes providing feedback to store leadership, quarterly check-ins, individual development plans, and annual performance reviews for the teamKnowledge, Skills, and Qualifications: Must be at least 18 years old with a high school diploma or equivalent.  College degree and/or relevant retail work experience preferred.Must have  at least 1 year of retail experience.  Prior supervisory or management experience preferred.Must be skilled in coaching and training, sales generation, strategic, planning, and customer serviceMust have superior communication, organizational and time management skillsMust be able to develop and train others, including delegating tasks and following-upMust be able to lift and carry up to 50 lbs., perform frequent standing, walking, repetitive finger, hand and wrist motions, as well as bending, stooping, reaching, squatting, kneeling, pushing, pulling, climbing ladders, and work with cleaning chemicalsMust be available to work a flexible schedule to meet the needs of the business, which may include closing and weekend shiftsAt Forever 21, style isn’t dictated…It’s inspired. Forever 21 is the leading fashion retailer of the latest trends and the season’s hottest styles at can’t-resist-prices. U.S. and international locations stay true to the fast-fashion destination’s iconic store aesthetic giving fashion fans all over the globe the unforgettable shopping experience that is the one and only Forever 21. Joining the Forever 21 family means joining an incredible team of talented, passionate and innovative people who work together to bring fashion to everyone, everywhere.  We’re always on the lookout for talented individuals eager to thrive in our fast-paced, dynamic environment filled with vast opportunities for career growth and development. This is a place where your ideas become actualized, creativity is encouraged and the possibilities are endless.Be part of something epic. Be part of Forever 21. Apply today!  Job Code : 21799 Division : Field - Region : Northwest Location : 0176 - F21 - Park Meadows Mall, Littleton CO US 80124 Job Type : Part Time",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-of-service-park-meadows-mall-176-job-littleton-co-us-168618735.aspx?mescoid=4300692001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fddee81dd546c92b935d2f2565529b96
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:13:45:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:1. Support our core CRM/Publishing/Billing/Sales backend systems leveraging Amdocs technology and Cobol/Java and SOA/ESB. Prior knowledge/experience with Amdocs technology a mandatory.  2. Knowledge of SOA and the demonstrated ability to expose and leverage Amdocs systems across other enterprise systems key to your success and growth.  3. Designs, develops and maintains our core systems and leverages/extends them into our growth areas/systems. Utilizes DexMedia s technology stack and related software development technologies to implement highly scalable and reliable enterprise n-tier distributed applications. Provides technical leadership and/or solutions. Identifies efficiency improvement opportunities.  4. Performs product design, bug verification and remediation, as well as production support. Modifies, repairs, or enhances existing software to correct errors, increase efficiency, upgrade interfaces, or improve performance.  5. Works closely with junior developers to maintain high-level of coding standards. Mentors junior developers. Collaborates and performs code reviews with onshore and off-shore team members  6. Writes and contributes to technical documentation. Creates test scripts and performs detailed unit testing and analysis on software and systems. Works with operations staff to troubleshoot and maintain production systems.  7. Participates in software design meetings and analyzes user needs to determine technical requirements. Analyzes project requirements and makes recommendations as appropriate.  8. Zero prejudices about legacy technologies; drives to solve business needs with tools at hand and finds creative ways to extend/improve new technologies/solutions.  Requirements:  1. Deep expertise with Oracle 7 and SQL development/debugging/performance tuning at the query level.  2. Experience using Unix/Linux shell scripting  3. Deep experience with Java and Cobol. Service Oriented Architecture and working in a Tibco/ESB environment preferred.  4. Experience and comfort working in Agile/Scrum as well as Waterfall SDLC.  5. Experience with Continuous Integration and related tools.  6. Fluency and comfort in Batch as well as Online development/operations.  7. Amdocs experience mandatory. 8. Enjoy working with as a team member fully engage in verbal and written communication methods. 9. Bachelor s Degree or equivalent Experience in required. 10. Must have at least 5-8 years progressive software development/delivery experience. Dex Media is an equal opportunity employer.  ",Sr Software Engineer-Amdocs Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-software-engineer-amdocs-job-dallas-tx-us-169015671.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=15,,IT/Software Development,e5161cc80f72457f399230fcc29e6859
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:13:00:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Now Hiring Class-A Route Delivery Drivers in Aurora, CO! Benefits Begin Your 1st Day!$4000 Sign-On Bonus – limited timeHome Weekly!  Benefits:BCBS Health Insurance – Dental & Vision and Company Paid Life Insurance begin your 1st day of hire!$2,500 Referral Bonus for each Driver that we hire! (Driver and Referred Driver must both be hired to qualify)Tuition Reimbursement & Boot ReimbursementCompany Matched 401K & Additional Benefits at 90-days! Applications accepted online only!  Click HERE to apply today! REQUIREMENTS MBM services national chain restaurants; Drivers make multi-stops on their routes REQUIRED TO UNLOAD FREIGHT at each customer stop Lift gate/electric pallet jackCurrent Class-A CDL; At least 21 years of ageAt least 9 months verifiable tractor trailer driving experienceMust meet MBM's MVR requirementsMust pass DOT physical, drug screen and background check Delivering excellence one customer at a time.Equal Opportunity Employer ",Route Delivery Driver - Class A CDL Job in Aurora,Full Time,"Aurora, CO",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/route-delivery-driver-class-a-cdl-job-aurora-co-us-168395059.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=5,"$4,000 Sign-On Bonus",Experienced (Non-Manager),a0f38ff09d3624d61ebe81872b68c111
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:12:58:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"BUSINESS ANALYST (UI / UX) – CONTRACT TO PERM – IRVING, TXResponsible for producing project definition documents, business requirements, and helping their IT department define the solution based upon their business requirements. Business Analyst Skills & Requirements:- BA or BS in a design-related field- Project Management experience- General knowledge of UI design/wireframing- Understand of SQL/ability to understand reports- Experience documenting business rules, processes, and data models- Experience developing business cases- Experience with report definition- Experience with wireframe tools such as: Axure - Experience with Microsoft ProjectFollow us on our BLOG to see more jobs like this: http://dallas.vereduscorp.com / Why Veredus?Candidates work with a professional Recruiter whose average experience is eight years in the industry. That means they have intimate knowledge of the Information Technology industry and market trends - who is in demand now and who will be next. Your Veredus Recruiter will lead you through a thorough screening process in order to understand your skills, experience, needs, and desires. They also counsel their candidates in resume writing, interviewing, and career planning so when there’s a position you really want, you’re fully prepared to get it. . Additionally, if the position is a consulting opportunity Veredus provides full benefits starting Day 1, and at virtually no cost to you. • Medical • Dental • Vision • 401K • Life Insurance ($20,000 benefit)• ATOP - Accrued Time Off Program• Consultant Lunches and Outings • Consultant Web-Site• Name Plates• Care packages/Survival packs• Dedicated Consulting Services RepresentativeVeredus has been recognized as one of the “Best Staffing Firms to Work For” by Staffing Industry Analysts the last 3 years in a row. Nervous about an upcoming interview? Want to be as prepared as possible?Click on the link below and you will have access to the Veredus Interview Prep Video - culled from hundreds of years of collective experience in preparing candidates for that all important job interview: http://vereduscorp.com/career-center / Veredus Corporation is an EEO/Affirmative Action Employer M/F/D/V.Drug testing may be required; please contact Recruiter for more information.",Business Analyst (UI/UX),Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/business-analyst-ui-ux-job-dallas-tx-us-168964102.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=7,35.00 - 50.00 $ /hour,IT/Software Development,877bf957fdc9153fea0d587ad410715f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:11:49:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client Account Manager Position Type:               Full Time Location:                      Greenwood Village, CO  Description:                  Payroll Solutions company  is a rapidly growing Colorado based company providing outsourced payroll and human resource solutions to small and mid-sized businesses.  The company currently has an opening for the position of Client Account Specialist II.  The Client Account Specialist II is expected to:                                    ·         Service customers with integrity and quality ·         Ensure accurate and timely processing of client payrolls·         Interact with clients to research and resolve payroll and tax concerns ·         Provide software support and training to clients·         Input all payroll data necessary to process and meet client payroll schedules·         Contribute to the continual improvement of operational processes and policies·         Insuring adherence to payroll policies and procedures, including applicable Federal and State payroll laws·         Conduct and participate in periodic product training sessions ·         Keep current with payroll knowledge through continuing education and certification programs Qualifications:               Candidates for the Client Account Manager position should possess the following background and experience:                                    ·         Prior multi-state payroll experience (1 year +)·         CPP certification preferred·         Proven record of successful customer service experience·         Strong written and verbal communication skills·         Intermediate to advanced Microsoft Office skills·         Mathematical aptitude·         Ability to work in a high volume, deadline driven environment Schedule:                     Full time.  Overtime as required",Monster,,"Client Account Manager Position Type:               Full Time Location:                      Greenwood Village, CO  Description:                  Payroll Solutions company  is a rapidly growing Colorado based company providing outsourced payroll and human resource solutions to small and mid-sized businesses.  The company currently has an opening for the position of Client Account Specialist II.  The Client Account Specialist II is expected to:                                    ·         Service customers with integrity and quality ·         Ensure accurate and timely processing of client payrolls·         Interact with clients to research and resolve payroll and tax concerns ·         Provide software support and training to clients·         Input all payroll data necessary to process and meet client payroll schedules·         Contribute to the continual improvement of operational processes and policies·         Insuring adherence to payroll policies and procedures, including applicable Federal and State payroll laws·         Conduct and participate in periodic product training sessions ·         Keep current with payroll knowledge through continuing education and certification programs Qualifications:               Candidates for the Client Account Manager position should possess the following background and experience:                                    ·         Prior multi-state payroll experience (1 year +)·         CPP certification preferred·         Proven record of successful customer service experience·         Strong written and verbal communication skills·         Intermediate to advanced Microsoft Office skills·         Mathematical aptitude·         Ability to work in a high volume, deadline driven environment Schedule:                     Full time.  Overtime as required",,http://jobview.monster.com/client-account-manager-payroll-assistant-job-denver-co-us-168861664.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=18,,,a69a442b671c4717767c6c43d8469df2
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:11:48:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"                    INDUSTRIAL/COMMERCIAL Sales REPRESENTATIVETerritories Available: Dallas / Surrounding Areas We are seeking an ambitious, driven, entrepreneurial, independent, organized, business-oriented, sales-minded professional who is capable of selling and arranging installation of our products.Company Description: Southwestern Petroleum Corporation is a Texas-based oil company established in 1933.  Our ISO 9001 Certified Coating Technology Division features a full line of high performance protective coatings and waterproofing systems for maintenance of industrial, commercial and institutional properties.  These include products and systems for protection, maintenance and waterproofing of roofs, walls, floors, pavement, concrete and metal surfaces. We have manufacturing facilities in the US, Canada and Belgiumand currently market our products in more than 75 countries around the world. Highest commissions in the industryProven, world-class products & systemsVast, diversified, recession-resistant market with steady demandComprehensive, professional training programResponsive, ongoing sales & technical supportFinancially stable, 83-year old international manufacturerFuture growth opportunitiesWhy Our Company Is Unique:Our company was started by sales professionalsWe are committed to the growth of our representativesWe pay the highest commissions in our industryOur sales program offers true independence and freedom from sales quotas, reports and collectionsWe treat our associates with respect and integrity and don’t downsize their territories when they start earning too muchMany of our representatives have been with us for 20, 30, 40 years and moreOur associates represent the best protective coatings and waterproofing systems in the world, used by Customers like Siemens, Honeywell, General Electric, Nestle, Intercontinental Hotels, British Petroleum, Bosch, Du Pont, Toyota, Hewlett Packard, Sara Lee and thousands of smaller businesses who demand the bestOur associates enjoy the security and sales potential of a vast, diversified market … virtually every commercial, industrial or institutional building has a need for our products … hotels, office buildings, manufacturing plants, apartment buildings, government buildings, airports, universities, food stores, shopping centers, hospitals, warehouses, garages, barns, stadiums, storage facilities, distribution centers and terminals and every other type of building you can think ofOur product line offers property owners more options and more cost-effective solutions to maintenance of their propertyYou Will Be a Perfect Fit for Our Company If:You feel you are capable of running your own showYou are experienced in sales and enjoy helping business people save moneyYou prefer to sell a quality product you can be proud of instead of the cheapest one availableYou know how important high activity levels are to sales successYou don’t really need a boss to tell you what to doYou are super competitive, hate losing at anything and prefer setting your own goals instead of dealing with company quotasYou are a problem solver, good at overcoming obstaclesYou are confident in your abilities and have a passion for what you doYou are organized and manage time well enough to set your own scheduleYou can be demanding at times because you insist on excellent service from the company you representYou don’t mind getting your hands dirty, if it translates into incomeYou want more control over your own future and incomeYou know you are capable of earning much more if given the right training, support and freedom to do it your wayQualifications:Minimum one year of successful business to business sales experienceBackground in construction materials, construction trades, engineering, architecture or contracting a plusIf this sounds interesting to you, please provide us with your contact information by clicking the SEND ME MORE INFORMATION button below. SEND ME MORE INFORMATION We will provide details by return email.  You can also click on the button to apply but you will not be asked to apply until you receive more information. Keyword Terms: Sales, B2B, Outside, Door to door, Outside Sales Rep, B2B Sales Rep, Sales, Outside, B2B, Sales Rep, Sales Representative, Outside Sales Rep, B2B Sales Rep, Commercial, door to door, business to business, account rep, business-to-business, Business to business, Sales Rep, Outside Sales Representative,  Door to door, Direct Sales, Entry level, outside sales jobs, sales reps, food industry sales rep, b2b sales rep, outside sales rep jobs, sales rep wanted, commission, manufacturer’s rep, industrial sales rep, industrial sales, manufacturer sales, retired, independent, commission, straight commission, business development, roofing, paving, painting, contractor, contracting, wall, floor, pavement",INDUSTRIAL/COMMERCIAL SALES REPRESENTATIVE Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/industrial-commercial-sales-representative-job-dallas-tx-us-168494176.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=5,Uncapped commissions,,b6b62f571db7ad8e7987e674b62710ca
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:49:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Big Data Architect - Contract-To-Hire. WILL GO PERMResponsibilities The big data architect will be responsible for defining the architecture for the next generation of connected data solutions. The data architect will create data solution architecture on the Azure cloud and legacy assets in the program. The big data architect also serve as technical principal engineer on Azure cloud technologies. They must have sense of ownership to drive technical prototypes and proofs of concepts. They will solve technical problems by understanding business use cases and potential technical restrictions. They must have hands-on experience with reference lambda architecture and reference cloud implementations. They must possess innate ability break down complex problems into a reference technical design. Requirements Extensive Data harnessing knowledge and experience Hadoop /Spark Distribution, Data Ingestion, Lambda Architecture NoSQL at least one of either MongoDB, Cassandra A minimum of 2 Full Lifecycle Implementation experience on a Medium sized cluster (either Hadoop or NoSQL) Experience with Solr/Lucene Possess a deep understanding of Data Harvesting/Data Science - Scala/Python/ Lexalytics - Natural Language Processing, which is in use at employer Experienced in hands-on development using Java (5 years +) or C# (5 years +) Scala (2 Years +) is nice to have skill Must have experience in cloud big data - Amazon Web Services and Azure Experienced in Azure HDInsights: Kafka, Storm, Spark, HBase, Hive, Oozie & ZooKeeper BS degree with a focus on Information Systems or Information Technology Masters degree preferred RDBMS SQL Server Preferred NoSQL preferred Redis / DocumentDBExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Big Data Architect Job in Plano,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Big Data Architect,"Plano, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/big-data-architect-job-plano-tx-us-168715510.aspx?mescoid=1500142001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,b910dee2cf40c1b617666a9271d9cd8c
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:48:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details The Highland is the first hotel in Hilton’s Curio Collection, a selection of one-of-a-kind properties that celebrate individual personalities, while ensuring the quality and consistency that comes with a world-class brand. It’s an honor that we take seriously – although always with our signature sense of fun. Originally opened in the 1960’s as the Hilton Inn Dallas, our newly reimagined lifestyle hotel is as distinctive and exhilarating as the city it calls home, offering relaxed style surrounded by the best shops, restaurants and nightlife Dallas has to offer. Discover a rich abundance of contrasts: Historic mid-century architecture infused with modern energy and décor. Upscale, yet thoroughly unstuffy ambiance and service. Sophisticated luxury with a casual, live-in-the-moment spirit; all created to delight passionate travelers seeking a unique adventure with every stay. Think of us as “high end without a trace of highbrow” Nestled inside thehotel, you’ll find Knife – a Modern steakhouse by Celebrity ChefJohn Tesar. Two-time James Beard “Best Southwest Chef” semifinalist and “Top Chef” contestant Chef John Tesar is known for his stylish, modern American cuisine prepared with classic Europeantechniques. Committed to using the finest quality ingredients with true Texas roots, Knife has garnered numerous accolades including: Hottest New Restaurants 2014 – Zagat Restaurant of the Year 2014 – Eater Dallas Best New Restaurants in America 2014 – Esquire Best Steakhouse 2015 – D Magazine Gayot’s 2015 Top Ten Best Steakhouses in the US One of America’s Top Five Best Steakhouses - FOX Knife’s menu features American classics with a distinctively modern twist. At the Highland Dallas, we understand that there are no second chances to make a first impression. This is why we’ve designed our 13,490 square feet of meeting space and services to ensure successful signature events from the very first moment; whether you are hosting a business breakfast for four, a training seminar for 100 or a company-wide banquet for 500. The Highland Dallas – Hilton Curio Collection is an Interstate Hotel. We offer competitive benefits that include: Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits. Coverage is available for Domestic Partners, including Same Sex Couples. Life/AD amp; D insurance, Long amp; Short-term Disability, Wellness Program, 401k Voluntary Retirement Savings, Vacation, Sick and Holiday Pay, as well as Travel Benefits with both Interstate Hotels amp; Resorts and Hilton Worldwide. The Highland Dallas is managed by Interstate Hotels and Resorts. We are sharing our job link with you to apply on-line: http://careers.interstatehotels.com/jobs/840570-houskeeping-supervisor",Housekeeping Supervisor-- The Highland Dallas Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/housekeeping-supervisor-the-highland-dallas-job-dallas-tx-us-168702234.aspx?mescoid=3700620001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fb9d5ba5179ec28ce4c80eb81bc89d43
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:02:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO   The fun and exciting world of event sales is calling for you! Will you answer? Our part time Event Specialist jobs give you the opportunity to represent the best brands on the market today! You can be the brand ambassador who excels in captivating an audience during in-store events, with an emphasis on brand awareness, product demonstration and retail sales. As a part time Event Specialist, you will work in one of the following locations: Albertsons, Albertsons Market, ACME Markets, Amigos, Carrs, Jewel-Osco, Market Street, Pavilions, Randalls, Safeway, Shaws, Star Market, Super Saver by Albertsons, Tom Thumb, United Supermarket, and Vons. Take this chance to join the largest sales and marketing agency in North America, Advantage Solutions, where you will receive top-notch training and competitive pay rates.        Responsibilities:   Set up, break down, product preparation and sampling during in-store demonstrations. Generate brand awareness and positive product impressions to increase sales. Assess customers individual usage needs and interests in order to best recommend products. Timely complete of all call reports, paperwork, and on-going personal training by required deadlines. Qualifications:   High School Diploma preferred or equivalent job-related experience. Experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales, brand promotion or retail/grocery preferred. Interact in a friendly, enthusiastic, energetic and outgoing manner with management, clients, and consumers in any setting. Stand comfortably for up to 6 hours a day. Able to work independently and as a motivated team player. Ability to work a part-time retail schedule, Monday through Sunday. Access to reliable transportation. Daily access to a PC computer with internet/email access.  Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods.  Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers.  We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.    Advantage Sales and Marketing LLC, dba Advantage Solutions is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. Responsibilities Advantage Sales and Marketing, LLC dba Advantage Solutions is one of North America’s leading sales and marketing agencies specializing in outsourced sales, merchandising, category management and marketing services to manufacturers, suppliers and producers of food products and consumer packaged goods. Advantage Solutions services a variety of trade channels including grocery, mass merchandise, specialty, convenience, drug, dollar, club, hardware, consumer electronics and home centers. We bridge the gap between manufacturers and retailers, providing consumers access to the best products available in the marketplace today.     Position Summary The Event Specialist generates excitement, customer engagement, brand awareness, and increased product sales through conducting event demonstrations.  The Event Specialist is responsible for physically preparing, maintaining, and cleaning the demonstration area (including physically assembling and otherwise setting up and later breaking down the demonstration cart); actively marketing the product being demonstrated by physically approaching nearby shoppers to gain their attention and interest; preparing (e.g., cooking) and providing food or beverage samples or otherwise demonstrating the product to those shoppers who are successfully drawn in; and reading program materials as assigned to be able to conduct informed product-related discussions with consumers.   Essential Job Duties and Responsibilities Conduct demo event for approximately 5 ¾ hours Get out in front of and move around cart area to approach customers within 10 feet of cart Engage customers in a professional and memorable manner which generates enthusiasm for the product and the event and helps create a positive shopper experience Educate the consumer about the products, create brand awareness, and drive product sales Prepare product samples using demo equipment such as sharp knives, cooking appliances, and other food preparation tools Offer product samples to consumers Keep cart adequately stocked with samples, ingredients, and products for purchase, obtaining items from locations throughout the store as needed Maintain the area surrounding the demo in a safe and clean condition   Set up event within approximately 15 minute period Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from storage area to event execution area Carry appliances/equipment weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Retrieves product and supplies (requires lifting up to 20 lbs., reaching overhead; and carrying up to 20 lbs. for a distance of 5 feet) Assemble cart and construct/set-up/display Point of Purchase materials, insert price signs, display product information, and lift signs up to 5 lbs. Set up and display product/materials on cart Break down and clean up event within approximately 15 minute period Clean-up and sanitize cart Disassemble cart Push cart weighing up to 52-74 lbs. a distance of 150-300 feet from event execution area to storage area Return appliances/equipment by carrying items weighing up to 20 lbs. a distance of 5-10 feet Wash utensils and cookware   Perform administrative work Study product materials to develop product knowledge Review event schedule Complete call reports Attend trainings Check voice mails and emails Participate in scheduled calls with Supervisor/others as needed   Supervisory Responsibilities Direct Reports This position does not have supervisory responsibilities for direct reports   Indirect Reports This position does not have guidance or mentoring responsibilities for indirect reports   Travel and/or Driving Requirements Travel and Driving are not essential duties or functions of this job    Minimum Qualifications Education Level: (Required):     High School Diploma or GED    or equivalent experience   Significant experience in event marketing, demonstrations, sales or retail/grocery is highly desirable   Skills, Knowledge and Abilities Strong verbal communication skills Reading comprehension Active listening Ability to understand and apply new information, procedures or principles to perform job duties Ability to understand and follow specific instructions and procedures Ability to complete multiple duties with accuracy shifting form one to another with frequent interruptions Time management Detail orientation Basic computer skills to enter and locate information, including familiarity with Word, Excel and Internet usage Teamwork Excellent customer service orientation Dependability Drive/Initiative Positive demeanor Sales orientation Flexible and adaptable, able to change and alter according to changes in projects or business environment Willingness to uphold ethical standards, laws and company policies and procedures Knowledge of ASM demo guidelines related to selling, preparing samples, and safety Ability to use demo preparation and cooking equipment such as small countertop appliances, utensils and thermometers Knowledge of food safety policies and procedures Ability to stand for extended periods of time Ability to move throughout demo area to engage the customer Ability to move to locate products and supplies Ability to visually locate merchandise and other objects Other Requirements Execute demonstrations on scheduled date and time (subject to any schedule adjustments necessary to properly complete set up and break down or as otherwise modified by ASM management) Stand for up to 6 hours (other than legally required breaks/meal periods) and actively move around store up to a distance of about ½ mile to obtain, set up, and clean up demonstration cart and related equipment/materials; obtain product from shelves; conduct demonstration event May need to pass online Food Safety certification (all training hours will be paid for by the Company) Certain product demonstrations may require specialized talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties in order to be eligible to conduct a particular event.  If an associate does not satisfy the particular requirements for the specialized event, he/she would remain eligible for the standard, non-specialized events otherwise available to all associates in the position (to the extent such positions are available).  Examples of the talent, experience, expertise, skills, knowledge, certification, or duties which may be required to conduct a specialized event include (without limitation):  ability to satisfy requirements necessary to conduct product demonstrations involving alcoholic beverages; Food Safety Certification; Responsible Alcohol Server Certification; video game /other consumer electronics knowledge, skills, and experience Reliable access to a computer and a phone on a daily basis Satisfactory completion of background check/drug testing subject to applicable law Must perform the job safely and utilize proper safety techniques and use of equipment when appropriate. Ability to be flexible and willing to work extended hours when necessary   Environmental & Physical Requirements   Incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of the job. Work is performed in a retail in-store environment. Typically requires the ability to spend 66%+ hours each work day doing the following activities:  engage in considerable physical activity, ability to lift and/or push up to 74 pounds, stand on feet for long periods of time, use products or cook food as appropriate for the demonstration, and may be required to work in extremely cold conditions (i.e. refrigerated and freezer sections). The use of proper safety practices when handling the products and/or cooking is essential. A detailed Environmental and Physical Requirements document is available in the Total Rewards department.    Additional Information Regarding Advantage Solutions Job Duties and Job Descriptions   Job duties include additional responsibilities as assigned by one’s supervisor or other manager related to the position/department. This job description is meant to describe the general nature and level of work being performed; it is not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required for the position. Advantage Solutions reserves the right at any time with or without notice to alter or change job responsibilities, reassign or transfer job position or assign additional job responsibilities, subject to applicable law.  Advantage Solutions shall provide reasonable accommodations of known disabilities to enable a qualified applicant or employee to apply for employment, perform the essential functions of the job, or enjoy the benefits and privileges of employment as required by the law.   Any estimate, schedule, or guideline provided to associates in this job description or elsewhere in connection with their jobs is only intended to help describe job duties and for planning purposes.  Regardless of any such estimate, schedule, or guideline, associates must always record all time worked for our company (which includes but is not limited to on-site work time in an assigned store, office, or other work location; required waiting time; administrative time; and work-related travel time).",Event Specialist Part Time Sales ACO Job in Dallas,Part Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/event-specialist-part-time-sales-aco-job-dallas-tx-us-168801513.aspx?mescoid=1300088001001&jobPosition=9,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,743d1ba7ee3c4d39b7069475bc67abf4
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:02:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Position Description:Energize your career with one of Healthcare’s fastest growing companies.    You dream of a great career with a great company – where you can make an impact and help people.  We dream of giving you the opportunity to do just this.  And with the incredible growth of our business, it’s a dream that definitely can come true. Already one of the world’s leading Healthcare companies, UnitedHealth Group is restlessly pursuing new ways to operate our service centers, improve our service levels and help people lead healthier lives.  We live for the opportunity to make a difference and right now, we are living it up. This opportunity is with one of our most exciting business areas: Optum –a growing part of our family of companies that make UnitedHealth Group a Fortune 17 leader.  Optum helps nearly 60 million Americans live their lives to the fullest by educating them about their symptoms, conditions and treatments; helping them to navigate the system, finance their healthcare needs and stay on track with their health goals. No other business touches so many lives in such a positive way. And we do it all with every action focused on our shared values of Integrity, Compassion, Relationships, Innovation & Performance.Welcome to one of the toughest and most fulfilling ways to help people, including yourself. We offer the latest tools, most intensive training program in the industry and nearly limitless opportunities for advancement. Join us and start doing your life's best work.The Optum SIU PrePay Clinical Investigator will work with a team on researching issues to determine feasibility of reducing medical costs through prospective solutions of claim system processes and claim business rules.Primary Responsibilities:Examine, assess, and document business operations and procedures to ensure data integrity, data security and process optimizationInvestigate, recover, and resolve all types of claims as well as recovery and resolution for health plans, commercial customers, and government entitiesInvestigate and pursue recoveries and payables on subrogation claims and file managementInitiate phone calls to members, providers, and other insurance companies to gather coordination of benefits informationProcess recovery on claimsEnsure adherence to state and federal compliance policies, reimbursement policies, and contract complianceUse pertinent data and facts to identify and solve a range of problems within area of expertiseGenerally work is self-directed and not prescribedWorks with less structured, more complex issuesServes as a resource to othersQualifications: Required Qualifications: Licensed registered nurse (RN), Licensed practical nurse (LPN), OR a Certified Coder with 3+ years nursing/coding experience (surgical, hospital, clinic settings), OR have a  High School Diploma/GED with 5+ years of experience working in a FWA / SIU or Fraud investigations role for New Jersey/New York location)Experience working with Windows PC software - Microsoft Office: Excel - (Creating/Managing spreadsheets, formulas, pivot tables), Word – (Creating/Managing documents)CPT & ICD coding experiencePreferred Qualifications:Bachelor’s Degree Experience with health insurance billing/codingSoft Skills:Ability to prioritize and manage multiple tasks.   Proven ability to work in a team settingExcellent oral and written communication skills and presentation skills.  Critical thinking, problem solving and analytical skills Physical Requirements and Work Environment:Frequent speaking, listening using a headset, sitting, use of hands/fingers across keyboard or mouse, handling other objects, long periods working at a computerService center environment with moderate noise level due to Representatives talking, computers, printers, and floor activityCareers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SMDiversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment.Travel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Claim Recovery/Resol/COB/SubroBusinessSegment: Optum Operations Division: Optum Ops-Payment Integrity DeliveryModel: Gold ContestNumber: 649705 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Non-exempt",Optum SIU PrePay Clinical Investigator- Eden Prairie,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/optum-siu-prepay-clinical-investigator-eden-prairie-mn-franklin-tn-dallas-tx-duluth-mn-job-dallas-tx-us-168794870.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),645b37a50a5af28d57b68975fb778dda
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:02:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details The Magnolia Career Experience The Magnolia career experience is a partnership of your talents, skills and personality with our resources, service success and professional standards. Our facilities exhibit the beauty of historic preservation furnished with modern styling. We are not a collection of workers in a mass of square footage. We are entrepreneurs in a unique environment of our own creation. We are committed to service to our guests, employees and community Every employee in the Hotel will touch success We are diverse in opinion, culture and life experience Duties amp; Functions of the Sous Chef Assisting with the Hotel’s culinary operations, applying thorough knowledge of culinary arts, portion controls, staff training, food sanitation and safety are the over-arching objectives of the Sous Chef. Other highlighted duties and functions of the Sous Chef position include: Assist in the on-going comprehensive training of all kitchen personnel. Provide input to menu development for the Lounge, Special Events and In-Room Dining. Communicate to Executive Chef any issues related to suppliers and vendors regarding deliveries, product quality, invoices, etc. Conduct shift walkthrough inspections of kitchen/culinary areas. Assist with scheduled month end food inventories as directed Enforce ServeSafe food sanitation program for the Hotel kitchen, and train staff in ServeSafe food sanitation. Assume overall management of kitchen/culinary operations in absence of Executive Chef; communicate shift issues to Executive Chef. Help maintain Hotel kitchen loss control and risk management programs. Ensure that assigned staff is adhering to risk management procedures, including wearing personal protective equipment, MSDS location and comprehension, ergonomics, knife safety and slip and fall. Responsible for securing kitchen area particularly food storage areas, and maintain key control of kitchen area during assigned shifts. Magnolia’s Desired Qualifications for the Sous Chef Hotel culinary operations have many moving parts. The Sous chef must have the experience to understand what the parts are make sure they all function together to produce the quality product and guest satisfaction the Hotel seeks. General desired qualifications for the Sous Chef may include: Three years Sous Chef (or higher) or Lead Cook experience in a full service restaurant and/or high volume banquet, production, or catering operation. Ability to train kitchen positions in all areas of operation. Proven written and verbal communication skills particularly in regards to training employees. Possess certification or be able to pass ServeSafe food sanitation course and train staff on the program. Ability to quickly assess productivity levels of the cook line, dish area and pantry personnel during any given preparation/plating/serving period. Experience using inventory or menu costing software. The Magnolia Offerings We believe our career experience offers opportunities for professional success. We like to couple the professional success by offering benefits for personal enrichment such as: Medical, dental and vision health plans Short-term, long-term and life insurance plans 401k profit sharing plan Paid vacation time Paid holidays Educational assistance program Complimentary shift meal Discounted parking or public transportation pass Success Incentive bonus program How to apply: Please email resumes to Bi Ramirez (Director of Human Resources) at bramirez@magnoliahotels.com and Steve Elsea (Director of Operations) at selsea@magnoliahotels.com Please also submit an online application at the following link: http://www.stoutstreethospitality.com/job-description.php?careerId=61 Magnolia Hotels. It feels good here.",Sous Chef-- Magnolia Hotel Dallas Downtown Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/sous-chef-magnolia-hotel-dallas-downtown-job-dallas-tx-us-168702237.aspx?mescoid=3500601001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),89b866594dd2d62cca900cdb6a224a38
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:02:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is accepting applications for temporary, seasonal full-time Package Delivery Drivers. This is a physical, fast-paced, outdoor position that involves continual lifting, lowering and carrying packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. A DOT physical exam is required. Package Delivery Drivers must have excellent customer contact and driving skills. Some UPS facilities may require the ability to drive a delivery vehicle with a standard (manual) transmission. Qualified applicants must have a valid driver’s license issued in the state that they live. Package Delivery Drivers are expected to comply with UPS appearance guidelines and wear the company-provided uniform.Full-time UPS employees work eight or more hours each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",UPS Package Delivery Driver Job in Commerce City,,"Commerce City, CO 80022",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/ups-package-delivery-driver-job-commerce-city-co-us-168265798.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=2,,Logistics/Transportation,6cec826a0b5c371e224e33e1d484e24a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:01:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Technology – Sr. Analyst Job #:  655510Position: Business AnalystIndustry: Airline/TransportationLocation: Dallas,TexasType: 18 month w/ extension **If you're interested in this position and meet the required qualifications please contact Elisa ferrantino at  eferrantino@apexsystemsinc.com**The Business Analyst for Service Requests will be involved in the planning and establishment of core Request Management processes. This individual will be responsible for the complete request lifecycle from definition through Customer satisfaction. Included in the lifecycle are the definition, classification, approval, tracking and fulfillment of requests. This individual will participate in Continuous Service Improvement activities to improve KPIs and OLAs. This individual will provide instrumentation of the Request Process to drive transparency and accountability.Primary Responsibilities:• Will liaison with various groups throughout the Company to ensure service level targets are met, Customer satisfaction remains high, and escalations occur in a timely manner. • Will lead request requirement gathering sessions.• Will participate in documenting requests, workflow, and reports. • Will develop, manage and maintain request fulfillment process and associated procedures/tasks.• Will conduct and/or participate in recurring Request Management meetings with Customer/Teams. • Will assist other IT Service Management Teams as necessary providing statistics, suggestions, and enhancement opportunities. • Will collaborate with other suppliers on issues/tasks spanning multiple areas.• Will ensure collaboration between requestor, supply chain, and delivery teams. • Will assist in Service Catalog definition as well as Sample Request creation.• Will publish trend analysis, sharing periodical reports to internal and external consumers. • Will be responsible for Customer Satisfaction throughout the process.• Will guide all Customers to follow the Service Request Management process.• Will Coordinate and participate in Service Request Management system enhancement testing.• Will follow standard Change Management processes when promoting new services to Production• Will organize and assemble needed resources required to develop a solution/proposal/deliverableEducation, Knowledge and/or Experience: • Extensive experience in developing, engineering and improving IT Service Management processes. • Experience in creating, managing and maintaining process diagrams and process definition documents. • Experience in gathering and analyzing requirements to improve existing processes. • Experience in defining process metrics and KPIs. • Request analysis and trending experience. • Experience in analyzing performance data to demonstrate the effectiveness of the Request Fulfillment process. • Experience with user acceptance testing (UAT), including test script creation, execution and signoffs• Service Management Reporting experience. • Creation of Live Dashboards and associated analytics. • Use of Service Management Platform (ServiceNow, BMC/Remedy, UniCenter, HP, IBM etc. ) • Experience in developing, managing, and maintaining the Service Request Management process and associated procedures. Preferred Skills (skills or experience that would be beneficial but are not required):• ITIL Foundation/Advanced ITIL Certification (Service Operations and/or Continual Service Improvement)• Large business background (working in a company of similar scale)• Experience managing a Service Catalog• Experience in leading the transformation of business processes • Basic Project management skillsBehaviors• Ability to work well within a team to learn and share knowledge• Ability to work in dynamic environment with changing priorities• Ability to develop and maintain strong Customer and team relationships. • Ability to influence and collaborate with the Customer to gain approval of the requirements and design.• Customer focused with a passion and drive for Customer satisfaction and delivering business value.• High energy, innovative individual who is motivated by challenging assignments• Self-motivated, looks for and seizes opportunities to do more or to do things better.• Effective at managing multiple requests with conflicting priorities under tight deadlines• Strong communication skills with the ability to communicate technical issues to non-technical Customers• Ensures that regular and consistent communications take place.• Uses excellent communication skills, interpersonal, oral, and written• Expresses ideas clearly and concisely in both business and technical requirements.• Practices attentive and active listening.• Appropriately shares ideas and information with others.• High attention to detail and accuracy• Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Technology – Sr. Analyst Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"« back Learn More Technology – Sr. Analyst Job #:  655510Position: Business AnalystIndustry: Airline/TransportationLocation: Dallas,TexasType: 18 month w/ extension **If you're interested in this position and meet the required qualifications please contact Elisa ferrantino at  eferrantino@apexsystemsinc.com**The Business Analyst for Service Requests will be involved in the planning and establishment of core Request Management processes. This individual will be responsible for the complete request lifecycle from definition through Customer satisfaction. Included in the lifecycle are the definition, classification, approval, tracking and fulfillment of requests. This individual will participate in Continuous Service Improvement activities to improve KPIs and OLAs. This individual will provide instrumentation of the Request Process to drive transparency and accountability.Primary Responsibilities:• Will liaison with various groups throughout the Company to ensure service level targets are met, Customer satisfaction remains high, and escalations occur in a timely manner. • Will lead request requirement gathering sessions.• Will participate in documenting requests, workflow, and reports. • Will develop, manage and maintain request fulfillment process and associated procedures/tasks.• Will conduct and/or participate in recurring Request Management meetings with Customer/Teams. • Will assist other IT Service Management Teams as necessary providing statistics, suggestions, and enhancement opportunities. • Will collaborate with other suppliers on issues/tasks spanning multiple areas.• Will ensure collaboration between requestor, supply chain, and delivery teams. • Will assist in Service Catalog definition as well as Sample Request creation.• Will publish trend analysis, sharing periodical reports to internal and external consumers. • Will be responsible for Customer Satisfaction throughout the process.• Will guide all Customers to follow the Service Request Management process.• Will Coordinate and participate in Service Request Management system enhancement testing.• Will follow standard Change Management processes when promoting new services to Production• Will organize and assemble needed resources required to develop a solution/proposal/deliverableEducation, Knowledge and/or Experience: • Extensive experience in developing, engineering and improving IT Service Management processes. • Experience in creating, managing and maintaining process diagrams and process definition documents. • Experience in gathering and analyzing requirements to improve existing processes. • Experience in defining process metrics and KPIs. • Request analysis and trending experience. • Experience in analyzing performance data to demonstrate the effectiveness of the Request Fulfillment process. • Experience with user acceptance testing (UAT), including test script creation, execution and signoffs• Service Management Reporting experience. • Creation of Live Dashboards and associated analytics. • Use of Service Management Platform (ServiceNow, BMC/Remedy, UniCenter, HP, IBM etc. ) • Experience in developing, managing, and maintaining the Service Request Management process and associated procedures. Preferred Skills (skills or experience that would be beneficial but are not required):• ITIL Foundation/Advanced ITIL Certification (Service Operations and/or Continual Service Improvement)• Large business background (working in a company of similar scale)• Experience managing a Service Catalog• Experience in leading the transformation of business processes • Basic Project management skillsBehaviors• Ability to work well within a team to learn and share knowledge• Ability to work in dynamic environment with changing priorities• Ability to develop and maintain strong Customer and team relationships. • Ability to influence and collaborate with the Customer to gain approval of the requirements and design.• Customer focused with a passion and drive for Customer satisfaction and delivering business value.• High energy, innovative individual who is motivated by challenging assignments• Self-motivated, looks for and seizes opportunities to do more or to do things better.• Effective at managing multiple requests with conflicting priorities under tight deadlines• Strong communication skills with the ability to communicate technical issues to non-technical Customers• Ensures that regular and consistent communications take place.• Uses excellent communication skills, interpersonal, oral, and written• Expresses ideas clearly and concisely in both business and technical requirements.• Practices attentive and active listening.• Appropriately shares ideas and information with others.• High attention to detail and accuracy• Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC, a division of On Assignment, is an IT staffing and services firm specializing in providing IT professionals for contract, contract-to-hire, and direct placements. Apex also offers recruitment solutions for other select professional skills and workforce needs. On Assignment divisions include: Oxford Global Resources (IT and Engineering), CyberCoders, Valesta Clinical Research Solutions, and Lab Support US, UK, The Netherlands and Belgium.Apex Systems LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/technology-%E2%80%93-sr-analyst-job-dallas-tx-us-168780321.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),29475de7d77277b8cb4c532e200630d5
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:10:01:36,No,jobs.monster.com," Entry Level Sales Position Are you a motivated individual in search of a fulfilling long-term career opportunity? Bisco Industries is a company excited to invest in your professional development and reward your performance. At Bisco Industries, our most valued asset is people! Bisco Industries is ranked in the Top 15 Global Distributors of electronic components and hardware. We are looking to add an entry level sales position to our local facility. Can you answer “YES” to these questions: Do you always find yourself leading others?Can you easily persuade people to your way of thinking?Do you build relationships easily with a purpose?Are you naturally energetic, driving to get things done?When you hear “NO” do you think they really just don’t “KNOW” enough?Can you articulate a message in a professional manner verbally or written?Are you competitive by setting goals and achieving success?Are you self-motivated, have an enthusiastic personality with a persistent work ethic?Do you have a philosophy where ""The Customer Is King""? Primary Functions and Responsibilities: Support a team of salespeople that will serve as a foundation to better understand and service customers in our industry. Develop skills to build and maintain current and potential customers.Provide excellent customer service and account management to our customer base.This is an entry level sales position offering the opportunity for a long-term career in sales. Bisco Industries offers a competitive base salary and benefits package including: Monthly bonus programCompetitive vacation packageWellness incentiveAnnual merit increaseComprehensive medical, dental and vision insurance packages401(k)Paid holidaysVoluntary Aflac and Mutual of Omaha benefitsCompany provided life and long-term disability insuranceTuition reimbursement program Who is Bisco Industries?Since our inception in 1973, Bisco Industries has proven to be an invaluable component in our customer's supply chain - providing unmatched customer service, extensive access to a wide array of components and manufacturers and a destination for the industry’s most dedicated and capable sales representatives.  Bisco Industries is a premiere distributor of Electronic Components and Fasteners used in the production of products and equipment in the Aerospace, Communication, Computers, Fabrication, Industrial Equipment, Instrumentation, Marine and Military Industries.  We offer a wide range of value added services that help us to become our customer's most relied upon supplier - and to achieve our goal of becoming a ""One Stop Shop"" for all of our customer's component and fastener needs.  We are passionate about promotion from within.  ",Entry Level Sales Representative Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Bisco Industries,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-sales-representative-job-dallas-tx-us-168859541.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=20,Competitive Base Salary + Commission,Entry Level,0a43f982556c4b13e52dc87a6dd2db98
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:09:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Overview Zones, Inc. provides premier IT solutions from the data center to the desktop. Through Close collaboration with our customers, Zones provides a full range of IT hardware, software, and services to businesses. With more than 25 years of experience, global supply chain capabilities, and a partner ecosystem of more than 2,000 hardware and software companies, Zones helps customers around the world tackle their most pressing IT challenges. If you enjoy working in a dynamic and fast-paced environment, are passionate about technology, and want to work at an organization that is growing and investing in its people, Zones is the right place for you! Whether your career is in sales, technology solutions, engineering, operations, or logistics, you will make an impact at Zones and for our customers each day. Position Overview The Solutions Architect (SA) is a presales resource that leads the consultative discovery of the client’s business goals, objectives, and challenges, and then translates them into effective infrastructure solutions. The primary objective of the SA is to increase the growth of revenue and margin for hardware, software, services and other advanced technologies within Zones’ customer base. The design of your solutions will rely on a combination of joint account planning, partner teaming (internal & external), on-site client interface/visits, engagement/solution development and implementation support/follow-up.  Under minimal supervision, your primary responsibility as an SA- Mobility/EUC would be to sell and architect solutions, as well as acting as an SME. You will be responsible for the leadership and delivery of project-based assignments including proof-of-concept, analysis, design/architecture, deployment and support of Mobility & End User Computing solutions. Key Responsibilities To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Working with Sales Management and Account Executives: Planning and Reporting with the PSG Regional Director and Sales Management to manage pipeline towards goal achievement Joint Account Planning to help identify opportunities in accounts Sales Calls and Presentations to Identify and Close Solutions Opportunities Solutions Development based on the clients/prospects requirements Joint Bid and Proposal Development with Sales Prepare SOWs and Services Estimates Equipping and Training the Sales Organization on Solutions and How to Find Opportunities Pipeline Management and Forecasting of Product and Services Revenue/GM for Defined market Prospecting and Develop Opportunities Independently as time permits Working with Manufacturers, OEMs, and Software Publishers (Partners) Build and Maintain Regional and Local Relationships with Partners Channel and Direct Sales Organizations Go to Market Planning with Partners to Identify the Best Opportunity Areas and Accounts to Target Develop and Deliver with marketing and Partners – Demand Generation Campaigns and Events Maintain Certifications as Necessary to Enable Zones to be able to Resell the Products, and Maintain the Highest Level of Vendor Rebates and Lowest Cost Working with Clients Build and Maintain Relationships, Particularly Technical Relationships in Assigned Accounts as Appropriate to Farm Additional Opportunities Perform Needs Assessments as Appropriate Perform Short Term Billable Engagements to Keep Skill Set Short, Offset Some Cost of Sales. These are generally Assessment, Proof of Concept, or Architectural type of Engagements Strong business acumen and understanding of clients IT related business goals and challenges to ensure proper translation of the client’s needs into technology solutions Ensure Customer Satisfaction Levels with Stated Goal of 100% Working with Team Support other SAs sales Activities as appropriate utilizing your Subject Matter Expertise Support other Geographic Areas and Practices as Needed based on Skillset, Demand, and Availability Keep Pipeline, Forecast, Time and Billing, Project and Activity reporting Current based with Defined Tools and Meeting Submittal Deadlines. Support and Work with Expert Connect in Configuration, Bill of Material and Solution Definitions to ensure Accuracy and Quality of Orders We are seeking candidates with the following: BA/BS in Computer Science, Engineering, Business or related discipline; equivalent years of experience is acceptable 2 years required of experience in a pre-sales technical role 5 years required of experience in an enterprise environment and a minimum of Excellent written, presentation, and verbal communication skills including demonstrated experience presenting technology recommendations from a business perspective Understanding of the industry, market, customers, competitors, suppliers, partners and capabilities of the business  Ability to communicate effectively with clients, colleagues and management Professional, business-focused attitude and courteous manner towards clients, partners, and peers Ability to travel an average of 30% of the time Technology Focus & Requirements Ability to Assess, Architect, Design, and Implement Mobility, MDM, and End User Computing Management Solutions with a variety of tablets, smart phones, desktops and laptops into Customer Environments Ranging from SMB to Enterprise Accounts Experience and Certifications from Key OEM Mobility Partners and Enterprise Solutions from Apple, MobileIron, AirWatch, InTune, MaaS360 & XenMobile desired Experience and Certifications from Microsoft including SCCM and Symantec’s Altiris, LANDesk, Casper Suite product desired Experience in network security including, but not limited to WiFi management, VPN access control, certificate management, proxy services (Cisco, Meraki, Aruba, Aerohive) Core understanding of desktop OS design, virtual application delivery, directory services and migration tools allowing for complete solution integration is required Strategy & technology consulting experience applying mobile technology to strategic business problems around data security, device management and end user computing Experience integrating Mobility Solutions into complex enterprise environments including experience with managing these environments and Life Cycle Support is Highly Desired Experience managing solutions that reduce the total life cycle cost of supporting desktop in complex enterprise environments with patching and imaging, and zero touch deployment solutions highly desired Certifications In Business Intelligence platforms and data analytics as it relates to mobile applications and dataflow logs (SolarWinds, Splunk, Sharepoint, KONY)     At Zones we’re more than just a company, we’re a collection of people like you! We’re driven, hard-working and love to celebrate our wins as a team. We’re growing fast which means unlimited opportunities to do great work, get recognized, and take your career to the next level! As a member of the Zones team, your health and well-being are among our highest priorities. We offer a comprehensive, flexible employee benefits package that includes medical/dental/vision coverage, a 401(k) plan with matching provision, life insurance, supplemental benefits, paid time off, product discounts, and much more. At Zones, we don’t just acknowledge diversity, we make it the foundation of how we conduct business and how we support our employees and communities. Zones is a certified Minority Business Enterprise (MBE) and Corporate Plus member of the Northwest MSDC (Minority Supplier Development Council). We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. Come join our team!  *MSTR  ",Solutions Architect- Mobility/End User Computing Management Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/solutions-architect-mobility-end-user-computing-management-job-dallas-tx-us-168713673.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=8,,IT/Software Development,cf31128ab0a463334d36f204e3818001
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:09:46:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is a high end, national multifamily developer with their own construction arm who have assets in excess of $7 billion. They are known as the trendsetters of leading-edge design and focus on High Density development and construction in key metros across the United States. The company are actively looking for a wood frame Multifamily Superintendent to join their team in Denver.Client DetailsOur client is a high end, national multifamily developer with their own construction arm who have assets in excess of $7 billion. They are known as the trendsetters of leading-edge design and focus on High Density development and construction in key metros across the United States. The company are actively looking for a wood frame Multifamily Superintendent to join their team in Denver.DescriptionKey responsibilities for the Superintendent will include:Establish and develop professional relationships with on-site staff, providing leadership to themDevelop a thorough understanding of each subcontract, drawings and specificationsIdentify constructability issues, design deficiencies, code violations and any other issuesDevelop, refine, and update project schedules to ensure all milestones are identified and trackedCommunicate schedule updates to all subcontractors and vendorsEnsure that subcontractors regularly communicate and enforce their safety programs in order to meet OSHA safety standardsReview the subcontractor's daily progress of work completed and deliver daily reports to the project teamConsistently lead projects through comprehensive completion by establishing aggressive dates and schedulesProfileGround up experience with wood frame multifamily projectsAbility to engage professionally with clients, subcontractors and skilled tradesStrong knowledge of construction terms, reading plans and planning and scheduling conceptsJob OfferBase salary up to $120,000Great bonus program and benefits package",Multifamily Superintendent Job in Denver,"Full Time , Employee","Denver, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/multifamily-superintendent-job-denver-co-us-168902142.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=5,"100,000.00 - 120,000.00 $ /year",,26be7b26b3fceab2ddb4cf3b0e21da5b
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:08:59:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details The core Duties amp; Responsibilities of the Lounge Server - PM include: Set your assigned stations according to the set design for the service period to be set and ready prior to the start of the serving period. Keep serving stations stocked and clean during the service period. This includes china glass and silver and well as food and beverage. Greet arriving guests within designated time frame. Bus tables as guests depart, clear, clean and set for other guest use. Practice suggestive selling for all food and beverage orders taken. Utilize correct timing for placing food orders, delivering food, condiments, etc. Take care of special requests from guests. Correctly enter order in the point of sale system, including correct billing i.e. room charge, cash or credit card. If in doubt, ask for identification from any guest for proof of legal drinking age before serving any alcoholic beverage. Practice TIPS procedures relating to guest alcohol consumption. Keep menus (all types) clean and organized for the proper service period. Complete opening and closing side duties. Maintain cleanliness of Lounge seating and serving areas during the service period. Adhere to Hotel food sanitation policies and procedures when handling food and beverage. Practice proper service recovery techniques and resolve any guest issue to the guest’s satisfaction. Ask for assistance from management if necessary. Inform the manager or supervisor of any problems with food or beverage product. Adhere to Food amp; Beverage department safety standards particularly when in the Kitchen area. Properly handle all chemicals and cleaning agents particularly when around food. Report any injury no matter how minor to your supervisor or manager. Other duties as assigned which may include performing duties other than those listed in this position description in the Food amp; Beverage department or other department in the Hotel. The Desired Qualifications of the Lounge Server include: Previous food and beverage serving experience in a full service restaurant or lounge. Experience with computerized point of sale systems, and cash handling experience. Ability to follow Hotel food and beverage policies regarding sanitation, portion control, serving, storing, food handling and side work. Willingness to interact with guests in a friendly welcoming manner throughout the shift. Willingness to assist in all areas of the Food amp; Beverage department. Physical ability to perform the functions of the position. How to apply: Please submit resumes to Bi Ramirez (Director of Human Resources) at bramirez@magnoliahotels.com and Spencer Kalotek (Food and Beverage Manager) at skalotek@magnoliahotels.com Please also visit our career website using the following link to formally apply online: http://www.stoutstreethospitality.com/job-description.php?careerId=150 The Magnolia Offerings We believe our career experience offers opportunities for professional success. We like to couple the professional success by offering benefits for personal enrichment such as: Magnolia Hotels. It feels good here. Medical, dental and vision health plans Short-term, long-term and life insurance plans 401k profit sharing plan Paid vacation time Paid holidays Educational assistance program Complimentary shift meal",Evening Server--Magnolia Hotel Dallas Downtown Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/evening-server-magnolia-hotel-dallas-downtown-job-dallas-tx-us-168702228.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fcd93b0543441d8d851f965720b4d267
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:08:58:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Entry Level Sales & Marketing: We run an established sales program for a Fortune 500 company in the Dallas market,  and are seeking a driven, team-oriented Sales Executive to integrate into our sales team and help maintain our current sales record as well as grow and expand.  AsSales Executive, you will be in charge of a territory and all the small to mid-size business accounts in that given area.You will be responsible for new client acquisitionand direct sales.Our sales model is face-to-face, so you won’t be stuck inside making phone calls—this is an active position where you can expect to be out in the field, selling directly to decision makers at local businesses. We provide weekly motivational and instructive sales meetings, and handle results reports in the evening. The rest of your time is yours to manage; we provide quality training and ongoing sales support, but we don’t micro-manage.This is a competitive position, and we run monthly sales contests, so on top of a generous commission, you can compete regularly to win electronics, gift cards, and other prizes. Each year we invite our top performing Executives to an all-expenses-paid executive retreat in Palm Coast, Florida for induction into the President’s Club, our most prestigious sales award. If you love to win, whether in sports, sales, or life, this may just be your perfect job.  JOB RESPONSIBILITIES                                Promote and sell services in person to small and mid-size accounts.                              Meet designated sales targets and generate revenue.                              Respond to customer needs and requirements with the appropriate action.                              Develop relationships with new clients by prospecting and responding to business development needs.                              Monitor and review customer sales activity and make adjustments to process and strategies.                              Daily in person prospecting to establish and qualify clients/prospects.                              Generate new accounts and new revenue on an ongoing basis. PAID TRAINING                               Classroom and field training.                              Training will include instruction on our sales model, as well as product and process training.                              Ongoing training consists of weekly training sessions that include role plays and continued product training, as well as in-market field training with your Sales Manager. COMPENSATION                                Competitive BASE SALARY                              Top Dollar Commissions for a realistic first year income potential of $55K+                              Health, Dental, Vision, Fully Vested 401k……AND MORE!                              Paid Holiday and Vacation                              OPPORTUNITIES FOR ADVANCEMENT - CAREER GROWTH   We do not require experience since we train and develop our account executives internally, but previous experience is a plus. We need an individual who is professional, self-motivated, driven to succeed, has the ability to work with little or no management, possesses common sense, and willingness to learn.We promote from within, and there is no seniority; growth is based on individual performance.APPLICATIONWe would like to fill this position as soon as possible. Please apply below.   When it comes to your career potential at Netpique… THE SKY’S THE LIMIT!Visit us at: www.netpique.com   Must have a valid driver's license (not suspended or expired) & transportation. Criminal background & DMV screening is conducted to determine eligibility for employment. Netpique, LLC is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer",Entry Level Sales & Marketing Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-sales-marketing-job-dallas-tx-us-154257590.aspx?mescoid=1300092001001&jobPosition=1,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,715ea76c3153b349137601f1018b86a9
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:07:49:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall Purpose: The selected candidate(s) will be responsible for translating architectural direction into resilient technical solutions, and defining solutions to complex performance and reliability problems through reasoned application of innovative software resiliency patterns. The Software Resiliency Engineering (SRE) Performance Engineer works with AT&T’s architects, engineers, and developers who are constructing the big picture as well as the operating components (virtualized hardware, software, and API’s) to deliver Software Defined Networking (SDN) and highly distributed complex applications. The ideal candidate will have both extensive hands on and theoretical experience with the design and development of highly distributed, complex applications. She/he can understand the big picture both vertically (technology stack) and horizontally (interactions between applications/systems). The SRE Performance Engineer can use both their breadth of knowledge and depth of experience to make intuitive leaps in identifying and proposing resilient and performance solutions to potential problems, at any phase in the development life cycle. The candidate must be articulate, persuasive, diligent and innovative in order to present complex, often untried solutions, to executives and obtain their buy-in. Key Roles and Responsibilities: Reviews and analyzes the overall architecture of complex systems (full stack, Hardware to Software) Designs, develops and communicates software resilient solutions Assesses risk of system failure, security exposure, performance issues and develops an appropriate resilient solution to provide a balanced mitigation to these threats Analyze interfaces and interactions between applications/systems for resiliency and performance Develop performance budgets to ensure applications/systems are meeting their SLAs. Participate in application architecture and code reviews to ensure resilient principles are being incorporated into internal developed as well as vendor developed solutions. Some key skills include: - Linux/Unix System Kernel - Java EE and JVM Tuning - Python - Relational/Traditional Databases - NoSQL Databases - Application/Web Servers and Containers - RESTful APIs, web services and other real time/batch interfaces - Automated deployment/configuration management (SWM, Chef, Puppet, CF Engine etc.) - Virtual Machines, Hypervisors (KVM, VMWare), Containers (Lxc, Docker, Open Container) - Openstack components (Such as Neutron, KeyStone, Nova etc.) - Performance estimation, measurements & basic statistical proficiency - Knowledge of developing/managing applications in an OpenStack cloud - Microservices architecture - Networking concepts (load balancers, firewalls, routers, DNS, GLBs, etc.) - Messaging Concepts & Frameworks (RabbitMQ, ZeroMQ, etc.) - Distributed Systems & Data Concepts (clustering, synchronization, race conditions, etc.) Knowledge: The Ideal candidate will have extensive experience in technologies and environments in the key areas listed above, as well as theoretical and contributory experience - doctoral/master’s level work, Open Source contributions, published in technical publications, etc. This position calls for forward thinking individuals with a “go-getter” attitude, a team player looking for an opportunity to influence a leading edge Software Defined Network (SDN) deployment. Analysis and Problem Solving: Solves unique problems through evaluative judgment/precedent. Independently applies sophisticated analysis in evaluating issues. Develops new concepts/methods/techniques for cross functional initiatives. Recognizes/pursues alternative methods. Independence: Guided by department goals/objectives. Exercises latitude in determining objectives/approaches to projects. Leads multiple small to medium sized projects and technical breadth. Contribution To ATT Technology: Key contributor on complex projects/initiatives. Impacts current and future business opportunities through application of specialized technical/ industry knowledge. Develops methods/techniques based on strategic project objectives. Communication: Mentors and provides technical guidance and explains advanced concepts to others in work area. May mentor others in department. Coordinates across multiple departments. Promotes active listening and open communication. Provides leadership/guidance to others. Supervisory: No. Required Qualifications - Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Telecommunications, Electrical Engineering or related field 8-10 years related technical architect experience Proficient in engineering cost estimates and economic analyses and models Knowledge of wireless technologies standards and protocols (3GPP, Wi-Fi, WiMax, antennas, amplifiers, base stations, propagation, interference, spectrum) Proficient in voice, video, and app technologies/protocols (circuit, VoIP, SIP, IMS, AIN, Camel, etc.) Proficient in network and system architecture (subsystems, interfaces, hw/sw dependencies). Proficient in message and conference systems and networks (multiple media, notification, presence, unified communications, video). Knowledge in Network Management, Tools and Protocols (Configuration, IP network Address Management, Perf, Mgmt). Understands Virtualization, Storage and Content Delivery Networks (Cloud, CDM, Grid, SAN). Proficient in specifying and evaluating architecture requirements for RFXs. Desired Qualifications - Enterprise wide deployment planning and support for mission critical applications for major releases, both business and infrastructure related Develops technical documentation on applications and systems Ability to work with technical and business-oriented teams",Principal System Architect (Software Resiliency Engineer) Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-system-architect-software-resiliency-engineer-job-dallas-tx-us-168747375.aspx?mescoid=1500138001001&jobPosition=20,,,52ae6cc88660baab4159eb6ea6448566
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:07:48:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Combined Insurance is seeking Territory Managers to join our fast-paced, high energy, growing company. We are proud of our tradition of success in the insurance industry of over 90 years. Come join our team of hard-working, talented professionals! JOB SUMMARY: The Territory Manager (TM) is responsible for leading, developing, building and managing a team of 5 or more Agents, generating sales to new customers, sales and service to current Combined Insurance policyholders, recruiting of new agents and delivering annual new sales objectives RESPONSIBILITIES: Developing New Agents Field train a minimum of 4-5 days each week for the first two weeks with all new Agents. Field train a minimum of 3 days each week for the next 5 weeks with all new Agents. Develop in each Agent expertise with all aspects of the sales process New and Established Agents Receive monthly internal leads from Marketing Director (MD) and distribute to Agents (biweekly) Receive externally generated leads, distribute to Agents immediately and report disposition daily Support Agents in assignment planning/appointment setting as needed Field train Agents by accompanying them during sales visits as needed, typically at least one day every 2 weeks per Agent Collect post-sales documentation and process according to documentation type including disposition of internal lead cards weekly Meetings Conduct daily meetings with the team each morning for the purpose of training and development Attend monthly full day market team meetings and deliver training as required Attend bi-weekly full day meeting with MD and other TMs Conduct and attend training and development meetings Core sales process and personal production Meet production standards and guidelines set by management Be able to effectively demonstrate the company's sales process Engage in personal production during Incentive Weeks only (Incentive Week to typically take place twice a  quarter) Execute core sales process as outlined during that week Contact externally generated leads and report dispositions in requested timeframe Plan assignments Conduct sales presentations consistent with new customer approach Complete all post sales administration and data collection documents Service customer service calls or refer to appropriate channel Recruiting/Field Demos Field recruit prospective new Agent candidates while training and selling Establish local networks and sources within territory to find qualified new agent candidates Conduct informational recruiting seminars to prospective new Agents as needed Represent the Company at local job fairs or other hiring events Assist MD’s with interview process of new agent candidates as needed Take all prospective territory Agents that have passed MD interview on field demos Make final hiring decisions together with MD Other Establish local presence for Company Follow company policies and standards COMPETENCIES: Capacity to manage and lead a sales team Strong communication and organizational skills Good coaching and mentorship skills Ability to conduct small group training meetings Maintain high ethical standards Excellent sales and negotiation skills SKILLS/EXPERIENCE: Successful and stable work history Demonstrated leadership skills Minimum of 1 year Insurance sales Minimum of 1 year Insurance Sales Management experience Basic PC skills required Obtaining your Life, Accident, and Health license is required prior to employment EDUCATION: High School Degree or equivalent required College Degree preferred OUR BENEFITS As a Combined corporate employee, you have access to one of the most comprehensive benefit plans in the business, designed to meet your needs and help you reach your financial goals.  We are committed to supporting its employees with a comprehensive compensation package that is appropriate in the market where they work. Below are several of the many benefits we offer our employees: Health insurance Dental insurance Tuition reimbursement A company-match 401(k) plan Disability insurance Life insurance Employee referral bonuses ABOUT COMBINED INSURANCE Combined Insurance is a leading provider of individual supplemental accident, disability, health and life insurance products. With a field sales force and corporate staff in excess of 5,000 people worldwide, Combined Insurance meets the growing coverage needs of policyholders around the globe. We pride ourselves on being customer-centric, people-driven, accountable, performance-minded, and ethical. We invest in our employees and take the time to focus on their development, needs and career aspirations. Connect with us onTWITTER, FACEBOOK, LINKEDIN, INSTAGRAM and GOOGLE+ Read our blog, SUPPLEMENTALLY SPEAKING, for more info on health and wellness topics  ",Territory Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/territory-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168953828.aspx?mescoid=4100666001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ec88a8d1cc9953fef8b969f21e98a423
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:59:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Our client, a Fortune 100 company, seeks a candidate with the below qualifications:Role: IBM Storage Admin Location: Dallas, TX (75207) Duration: 12 month contract Responsibilities: -Assist in defining requirements, designing and building data center technology components and testing efforts. Skill: -IBM DB2""The successful candidate will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States""Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",IBM Storage Admin Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Experis is a global leader in professional resourcing and project-based workforce solutions. We deliver in-demand talent for mission-critical positions, enhancing the competitiveness of the organizations and people we serve. Our goal is to maintain a positive candidate and client experience through fitting the best candidates with the best positions.Our client, a Fortune 100 company, seeks a candidate with the below qualifications:Role: IBM Storage Admin Location: Dallas, TX (75207) Duration: 12 month contract Responsibilities: -Assist in defining requirements, designing and building data center technology components and testing efforts. Skill: -IBM DB2""The successful candidate will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States""Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/ibm-storage-admin-job-dallas-tx-us-168829468.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=4,,IT/Software Development,25de29785843464836767ba329fe5b0d
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:55:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Benefits Administration Outsourcing Sales Leader (West) at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/9/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Denver, CO   Experience: Not Specified Date Posted: 6/9/2016 The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson.The BusinessOur Technology and Administration Solutions business provides benefits administration and outsourcing solutions to many of the world’s leading organizations. Our Purpose is to help our clients’ employees realize the full potential of their benefits; helping them be happier, healthier and more secure. Our Mission is to deliver the highest quality work in the industry, providing an engaging and fulfilling environment for our colleagues, while managing significant and profitable growth. A wards & Recognition: The International Association of Outsourcing Professionals (IAOP) has named Willis Towers Watson a leader on the Global Outsourcing 100 since 2011. Everest Research named Willis Towers Watson a Star Performer in the Leaders category in 2014, and has recognized Willis Towers Watson as an industry leader since 2010. Fortune magazine ranked Willis Towers Watson number one in the diversified outsourcing industry on its annual World’s Most Admired Companies list in 2015. Willis Towers Watson has been listed on Fortune magazine’s World’s Most Admired Companies list since 2012The RoleAs a Benefits Administration Outsourcing Sales Executive you will work closely with Willis Towers Watson leaders to develop new outsourcing business with new and current clients and serve as strategic advisor to clients concerning their outsourcing issues. You’ll also be asked to contribute your thought leadership to the overall development of the outsourcing business. Role may be based out of the following Willis Towers Watson offices: Houston, San Francisco, Denver. Role: Member of Technology and Administration Solutions (TAS) National Sales Team :Participate and collaborate with other TAS sales leaders to best position our services in the market for new business and help retain our clients. Participate on TAS cross functional teams and promote collaboration and teamwork within the office team and region. Member of Office Leadership Team(s) :Work with various local Market Leader/Office Head(s) to identify business development opportunities and develop strategic business plans for the outsourcing line of business (LOB) that supports the practice strategic direction and the local market.Initiate and drive new business development opportunities with clients and prospects. Develop and execute on local-market prospecting and sales plans. People management and development: Participate in the coaching and mentoring of more junior TAS associates in the office, on your sales teams, and on your client delivery teams. Client relationship management and delivery: Collaborate with the Client Relationship Directors and TAS leaders to develop local market client strategies to deepen, broaden and build profitable relationships and enhance delivery of services. Subject matter expertise, thought leadership : Contribute to the development of priority services and consulting processes and demonstrate deepconsulting capability in benefits administration. Performance Objectives: Financial Primary accountability for collaborating with sales and marketing team and colleagues in consulting businesses to identify, develop and close opportunities to: Sell outsourcing services to new clients of the firm Cross-sell outsourcing products and services to current clients Meet or exceed revenue and market penetration goals. Clients Collaborate with colleagues to broaden and deepen relationships with clients as they relate to outsourcing services Establish a trusted advisor role with clients and, as appropriate, provide consistent, superior relationship management concerning outsourcing issues Develop plans for implementation of new outsourcing services. Excellence Serve as senior outsourcing strategist on large client assignments Develop expert knowledge and experience of outsourcing delivery best practice, market trends, and products and services in the marketplace Contribute to the development of new tools, approaches and quality standards related to outsourcing services Raise awareness of Towers Watson’s capabilities in the marketplace through articles and conference speaking. People Build relationships internally with the sales and marketing team and market leaders in other businesses to effectively collaborate on cross-business opportunities Educate other business units of the firm concerning our outsourcing capabilities Develop sales talent, including developing individuals with strong sales capability to ensure growth.",Benefits Administration Outsourcing Sales Leader  (West) at Willis Towers Watson Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-administration-outsourcing-sales-leader-west-at-willis-towers-watson-job-denver-co-us-168838639.aspx?mescoid=1100027001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),8e6a2af10ab63925bcd7e12f47ddc66a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:54:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client seeking a System Center Automation Engineer in Arlington, Texas (TX).Basic Function:The System Center Automation Engineer under general direction from the Database Services Manager and Senior Engineers will assist in the planning, design, implementation, and support of Windows Server and/or desktop platforms. This team member is responsible primarily for the assessment, optimization, and automation of server and/or desktop platforms.Job Duties: Develop, implement, and maintain automated processes using System Center and PowerShell or equivalent scripting language Provide internal and external customers with excellent customer service while striving to provide world-class service Proactively identifies opportunities for improvements to existing processes and for automation of time consuming tasks Plan, prioritize, and provide vision and schedules for assigned software and / or hardware changes Attend meetings and effectively represent current status as appropriate Execute operational support of corporate, branch and service center operations and all associated server hardware and software Ensure that all servers are running at optimal capacity Study and analyze the performance and capacities of the systems and peripheral equipment/systems and prepare plans for future expansion and upgrades Participate in company provided training and perform independent training as appropriate Resolve incident management tickets as they arise and ensure timely resolution Provide technical support for projects as directed Lead the design, implementation and maintain automated processes that support our infrastructure Define and evangelize enterprise policies, standards and position statements for new and existing System Center and Automation related technologies Provide 3rd level support for Microsoft System Center and automated solutionsREQUIREMENTS: Effectively communicates current status of all projects, problems, and issues to the department management team The candidate must be comfortable in addressing critical incidents The candidate must be willing to accommodate weekend, shift or on-call schedules when necessary, and participate in an on-call rotation to provide after-hours support",System Center Automation Engineer Job in Arlington,"Full Time, Employee","Arlington, TX 76014",,http://jobview.monster.com/system-center-automation-engineer-job-arlington-tx-us-168999368.aspx?mescoid=1700195001001&jobPosition=6,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),263670acb615c5665cdb1022bd462ef4
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:49:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details This position is approx 30 hours per week depending on occupancy of hotel.• Assist guests by lifting and carrying guest baggage on and off the shuttle van as needed• Provide information and respond to guest inquiries regarding hotel services, attractions, directions, etc. in order to maximize guest satisfaction• Monitor and address ongoing maintenance needs of the shuttle van, including regular oil changes, etc.• Maintain cleanliness of the shuttle van, including window/windshield washing, vacuuming of the interior, removing garbage, etc.• Maintain cleanliness of the hotel parking lot• Assist in other departments/areas of the hotel (breakfast, laundry, housekeeping, etc.) as needed Qualifications• Must be at least 21 years of age and possess a clean driving record and a valid, current, and non-probationary driver's license from the state in which the hotel is located• Must be flexible in hours and days worked• Must be able to speak, read, write and understand English• Must be able to repetitively lift and carry up to 50 pounds on a regular basis• Must have sound judgment and directional skills and be able to work with little or no supervision• Must display very good organization and time management skills• Must have excellent communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to interact with many types of personalities How to Apply: Email reume to tina.mcdonald@hilton.com or apply in person: 11611 Luna Rd. Dallas Tx 75234",Shuttle Driver/Concierge - doubleTree by Hilton Dallas - Farmers Branch Job in Dallas,Part Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/shuttle-driver-concierge-doubletree-by-hilton-dallas-farmers-branch-job-dallas-tx-us-168702240.aspx?mescoid=5301047001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7da4e83404bf503a05aafae8f6023a76
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:40:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Database Administrator Must be familiar with multiple DBMS platforms including Oracle, DB2, MYSQL, SQLServer, and/or Sybase. Must be able to work indepently in a fast paced environment. Experience with installation, performance tuning, and data migrationsExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",System Database Administrator Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,System Database Administrator,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/system-database-administrator-job-dallas-tx-us-169014344.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=16,,IT/Software Development,95d0609480313b273ce0c02a228a68b2
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:40:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description The Department Director is responsible for all departmental functions in support of the hospital mission, vision, and facility goals. The Executive Chef identifies the cost-effective systems needed to support the business of the department taking into account business trends, resource availability and changes in customers. This position establishes effective working relationships with all constituencies including patients, physicians, employees, volunteers and vendors. The Director identifies and remedies through continuous customer satisfaction data and employee involvement. The Department Director works with Senior Management in meeting Facility goals.   This position is fully trained in all aspects of food preparation and production. Thoroughly trained in culinary skills, with extensive banquet knowledge. This position will prepare food for patients, employees, visitors, and catered functions and will train and direct fellow cooks. Incumbent will follow safety and sanitation guidelines.Required Skills Minimum: Reading, basic math, written language in English. Preferred: High School Education (diploma) or equivalent; banquet and cooking experience and training or education in culinary arts Minimum of 3 years relevant experience in a high volume restaurant, hospital, or institution preferred. Meet all city, county, state and federal certification standards Ability to prepare aesthetically pleasing and appetizing menus. Demonstrate food creativity on a daily basis. Ability to operate and instruct on all kitchen and cafeteria cooking/holding equipment. Computer skills is preferred. Good communication and organizational skills to exercise independent judgment. Experience in all phases of cooking required.",Executive Chef Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-chef-job-dallas-tx-us-169022317.aspx?mescoid=3500601001001&jobPosition=13,,Medical/Health,9cde0ea6fd56c56080ad238cf7a5f84f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:20:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for an experienced, positive, and energetic Project Manager that wants to work in a professional fun environment.  Job will consist of:  Managing Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertop trades on job sites during construction, tracking and managing materials, insuring quality installations, and providing a high level of service to internal and external customers.  Core Functions:  ·         Understand Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertop materials.  In addition, how those materials are measured and installed.·         Manage Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertop independent contractors on construction sites.·         Supervise installations and manage material during installations.·         Quality control of all Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertop installations.·         Coordinate schedules with builder superintendents and subcontractors.·         Assist in warranty resolution in completed homes.·         Any other field duties as assigned. Required Qualifications: ·         Experience in construction; Including Flooring, Cabinet, and Countertops.·         Must be able to work in fast paced environments.·         Strong problem solving skills.·         Organized and process oriented.·         Attention to detail.·         Strong oral and written communication skills.·         Must be proficient with Microsoft Office Products and Apple Applications.  Our benefit package includes paid vacation, paid holidays, paid sick time, health, vision, dental, & 401k.    ",Project Manager - Flooring,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80238",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-flooring-cabinets-countertops-job-denver-co-us-168071312.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,"35,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Building Construction/Skilled Trades,0afb67d9cfc255e9136518977aca3029
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:20:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESTAURANT/ BAR / RETAIL / CUSTOMER SERVICE EXPERIENCE WANTED!Marketing/Advertising/SalesOur Customer Relations and Customer Service Management Training program is recognized as one of the best in the marketing & advertising industry!If you have great people skills and enjoy working with the public, we want to meet you!We have full-time Customer Relations Representative and Customer Relationship Manager Trainee openings available for career minded individuals with unbeatable people skills. This is an entry level opening NOT in a call center environment. If you have restaurant, bar, or retail experience then we want to hear from you!Servicing retail giants with a smile and a handshake is why our company has enjoyed unprecedented growth this year. We pride ourselves on developing and executing unique, and personable advertising campaigns focusing on customer acquisition for our clients.JOB REQUIREMENTSWe have committed to expanding our Denver office to 3 new locations that our clients are expanding to this year; therefore, we must start talent scouting right away for managers, assistant managers, and promotional representatives for those offices. Each opening is Entry Level which means NO EXPERIENCE REQUIRED! Each opening is highly competitive. We look for 4 critical attributes each candidate must possess:· Above average people skills· Excellent student mentality· Winning attitude· Great work ethic and ambitionWe offer personal, hands-on training tailored to each individual’s strengths and weaknesses. We also offer promotions and compensation based on each person's merit and achievements, NOT seniority. If you're tired of rotating shifts, making minimum wage, no growth, or ""Last Call"" hours... Let us be your answer!BENEFITS*High Income Potential*Flexible Schedule*Part-Time and Full Time Hours Available*Exciting Work Environment*Unlimited Growth Potential*Stability and SecurityAPPLY NOW!!For immediate consideration please send resume today!NOTE: This is NOT a position in a restaurant; we are looking forpeople with a high level of customer service experience such as thosewith restaurant experience.    Candidates with interest in the following industries should apply: marketing, sales, entry level marketing, marketing management, director of sales, director of sales promos, director of sales promotions, distribution sales manager, district sales manager, field rep, field representative, field sales engineer, floor supervisor, independent consultant, inside sales, inside sales rep, inside sales representative, international sales account manager, internet sales manager, major, account exec, major account executive, major account manager, major account rep, major, account representative, manufacturers rep, manufacturer’s representative, market research, marketing, medical sales, merchandise manager, national account manager, national sales manager, national sales rep, national sales representative, point of sale supervisor, product sales manager, quote clerk, regional sales manager, sales & marketing, sales & marketing admin, sales & marketing administrator. sales & marketing director, sales & marketing manager, sales account manager, sales administrator, sales analyst, sales and marketing, sales and marketing admin",SERVER / RESTAURANT / MARKETING EXPERIENCE - CUSTOMER RELATIONS REPS Job in Aurora,Full Time Employee,"Aurora, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/server-restaurant-marketing-experience-customer-relations-reps-job-aurora-co-us-168669401.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=3,,Marketing/Product,519ef283b1e0c52e5e5f18212eac41ae
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:19:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"A financial architect needed for international companyThis individual can also work remote (must be near major airport)Client DetailsDigital Service companyDescriptionThis position would combine market pricing analysis and benchmarking responsibilities with the traditional Financial Architect deal finance role -Perform competitive benchmarking analysis in support of external customer requirements in NAO Finance -Expand, develop, maintain market pricing analysis tools and databases for NAO Financial Architect Team -Perform market pricing analysis on customer proposal pricing -Represent Atos in customer meetings related to benchmarking and pricing negotiations -Manage costing, pricing, and financial analysis for all deals assigned-Preparation of pro-forma financial statements and/or business cases-Cash flow analysis-Ensuring compliance of bids to Rainbow, Key Contracting Principles, and Reserved Matters-Negotiation price, scope and terms/conditions with customers or their agents/advisors-Serving as a subject matter expert on matrixed engagement teams on Matters of transactional tax issues (Sales tax, VAT, withholding taxes), transfer pricing, revenue recognition, and proper cost accounting-Reading, drafting and editing contracts, statements of work and other required deal documentation-Preparing presentations for management or customers regarding assigned deals-Training others on Rainbow and financial Architect domain knowledge Profile-BS/BA in accounting or finance-Strong Excel skills required, PowerPoint, and Word Intermediate to expert level-Generally Accepted Accounting Principles/IFRS Knowledge-Sourcing industry expertise: common sourcing processes, RFI, RFP, contracts, service levels, pricing, ARCs/RRCs, termination charges, terms and conditions-Transactional tax expertise: Sales tax, VAT, withholding taxes-Expert financial analysis skills, including P&L and cash flow modeling-Specific experience pricing services contractsTo be trained on --Rainbow expertise-Knowledge of GSSE Financial Architect skill set and mastery of GSSE Financial architect training/knowledge repository-Mastery of applicable Atos financial rules: GRD, accounting rules, revenue recognition, investment process, transfer pricing-Mastery of Key Contracting Principles and Reserved MattersJob Offergrowth, competitive salary plus bonus",Sr Financial manager Job in Dallas,"Full Time , Employee","Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-financial-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168660735.aspx?mescoid=1100014001001&jobPosition=14,,,97ee55c20ee1f1327b3582abaab0809b
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:19:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"I'm currently seeking qualified Help Desk Technician professionals based around the Coppell, TX area!! This opportunity would be with a Fortune 500 enterprise client and holds great potential for those who perform!! If you think you would be a great fit, APPLY TODAY!! Education/Experience: High School Diploma with 3 to 5 years experience.  Main Responsibilities: Provides technical support to users for basic computer related technical problems. Enters tickets into the call tracking tool; ensures information is accurate, prioritized and assigned to a queue. Answers help desk telephones and responds to basic customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met. Assists customers in resolving basic technical problems by providing scripted guidance regarding software and hardware problems. Resolves and/or refers more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process. Logs and tracks inquiries using a problem management database and maintains history records and related problem documentation. Identifies, evaluates, and prioritizes customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. Experience with solving computer related problems. Experience with company products, operation systems and escalation policy. Good communication, interpersonal and organizational skills. Ability to work in a team environment.  APPLY TODAY!!!",Help Desk Technician II Job in Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/help-desk-technician-ii-job-coppell-tx-us-168858411.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=13,,IT/Software Development,de4b012698a35acb545ec615e5d70607
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:19:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Position Description:Energize your career with one of Healthcare’s fastest growing companies.    You dream of a great career with a great company – where you can make an impact and help people.  We dream of giving you the opportunity to do just this.  And with the incredible growth of our business, it’s a dream that definitely can come true. Already one of the world’s leading Healthcare companies, UnitedHealth Group is restlessly pursuing new ways to operate our service centers, improve our service levels and help people lead healthier lives.  We live for the opportunity to make a difference and right now, we are living it up. This opportunity is with one of our most exciting business areas: Optum –a growing part of our family of companies that make UnitedHealth Group a Fortune 14 leader.  Optum helps nearly 60 million Americans live their lives to the fullest by educating them about their symptoms, conditions and treatments; helping them to navigate the system, finance their healthcare needs and stay on track with their health goals. No other business touches so many lives in such a positive way. And we do it all with every action focused on our shared values of Integrity, Compassion, Relationships, Innovation & Performance.Welcome to one of the toughest and most fulfilling ways to help people, including yourself. We offer the latest tools, most intensive training program in the industry and nearly limitless opportunities for advancement. Join us and start doing your life's best work.The Clinical Appeals Investigator will work with a team on researching issues to determine feasibility of reducing medical costs through prospective solutions of claim system processes and claim business rules. Primary Responsibilities:Examine, assess, and document business operations and procedures to ensure data integrity, data security and process optimization.Investigate, recover, and resolve all types of claims as well as recovery and resolution for health plans, commercial customers, and government entities Ensure adherence to state and federal compliance policies, reimbursement policies, and contract compliance Use pertinent data and facts to identify and solve a range of problems within area of expertise Responsible for investigating, recovering and resolving all types of claims as well as recovery and resolution for health plans, commercial customers and government entities. May conduct contestable investigations to review medical history.Generally work is self-directed and not prescribed.Works with less structured, more complex issues.Serves as a resource to others.Qualifications:Requirements: High School Diploma/GEDMust be a current Certified Coder or a current Registered Nurse/Licensed Practical NurseExperience working with medical claimsExperience in HealthcareExperience with Microsoft Excel – Creating/Updating SpreadsheetsAssets: Bachelor's Degree1+ years of experience with claims auditing and researching claims informationKnowledge of claims processing systems and guidelines/processesKnowledge of Medicaid/Medicare Reimbursement methodologies Anti-fraud principle knowledge  Experience with Microsoft Access – Ability to look up and review informationPhysical Requirements and Work Environment:Frequent speaking, listening using a headset, sitting, use of hands/fingers across keyboard or mouse, handling other objects, long periods working at a computer Service center environment with moderate noise level due to Representatives talking, computers, printers, and floor activityCareers with Optum. Here's the idea. We built an entire organization around one giant objective; make the health system work better for everyone. So when it comes to how we use the world's large accumulation of health-related information, or guide health and lifestyle choices or manage pharmacy benefits for millions, our first goal is to leap beyond the status quo and uncover new ways to serve. Optum, part of the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, brings together some of the greatest minds and most advanced ideas on where health care has to go in order to reach its fullest potential. For you, that means working on high performance teams against sophisticated challenges that matter. Optum, incredible ideas in one incredible company and a singular opportunity to do your life's best work.SM Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: UnitedHealth Group is an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or _expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law. UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment. Travel: No CitizenshipStatus: Other Visa Accepted Function: Claim Recovery/Resol/COB/SubroBusinessSegment: Optum Operations Division: Optum Ops-Payment Integrity DeliveryModel: Gold ContestNumber: 662692 Shift: Day Job OvertimeStatus: Non-exempt",Clinical Appeals Investigator - Telecommute US Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/clinical-appeals-investigator-telecommute-us-job-dallas-tx-us-168886865.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=9,,Experienced (Non-Manager),d9f05319eac66e7f8e909a75bf52a990
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:18:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overall Purpose: Responsible for end-to-end project or program management throughout the life cycle of a software/system development project/program (may be internal or external client facing). Directs and leads the efforts of a project/program team to deliver a completed project/program and/or service. Consults directly with internal or external clients on business goals, tools, strategy and best practices of software development. Has full accountability for managing concurrent projects/programs of any complexity including projects/programs that span multiple regions, functions and/or business units. Directs team's activities utilizing the organization's software development life cycle (SDLC). Interacts with other project/program managers and with the Account Management organization to ensure alignment of project goals and progress with client needs and client priorities. Utilizes knowledge of business, industry and technology to incorporate business process improvements into the organization and/or to develop business strategies and function/business/technical architectures. Must have thorough understanding of the software development life cycle (SDLC) processes and tools and must advocate for adherence to standards. Must have working knowledge of business practices in at least one specific business software domain. Key Roles and Responsibilities: Conducts end to end project management of large or multiple large projects. Works as a team member or runs individual projects and is responsible for completing projects within allotted timeline and budget. Defines project scope and objectives, coordinates activities of a project team, and identifies resources. Projects are complex in nature, sometimes follow a repeatable framework, typically span multiple groups, and require analytical skills in defining scope and objectives. Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems. Develops detailed work plans, schedules, project estimates, resource plans, and status reports. Conducts project meetings and is responsible for project tracking and analysis. Ensure adherences to quality standards and reviews project deliverables. Manages the integration of vendor tasks and tracks and reviews vendor deliverables. Provides technical and analytical guidance to project team. Recommends and takes action to direct the analysis and solutions of problems. Communicates to client/vendors. Job Contribution: Intermediate level technical professional. Subject matter technical knowledge within a discipline and sound understanding of ATT technologies. Education: Preferred Bachelor of Business/Information Systems/Engineering/Math/Science degree or equivalent experience. PMP Certification desired. Experience: Typically requires 3-5 years experience. Supervisory: No.",Professional Software Delivery Proj Mgmt Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/professional-software-delivery-proj-mgmt-job-dallas-tx-us-168958222.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=19,,,7eed31408e4f6dae9cd8cbb848fd2d9a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:18:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"PENSKE Logistics class A $21.50/hr w/6 & 12 month increase (Englewood, CO) Penske Logistics is looking for qualified Local Class A truck drivers to join our team of over 3000 truck drivers who haul freight for some of the world's leading brands. This is a great opportunity to continue your truck driving career with one of the nation's largest logistics companies. $21.50/hr to start with 6, 12 and 24 mo increases. OT opportunities, paid weekly. Route/Activity - Truck drivers are responsible for delivering medical supplies to customers using a liftgate, pallet jack & hand truck. Shift - M-F, start times 10:00 pm - 12:00 am. Equipment - 53' Dry Van Trailers You MUST meet the following minimum requirements: * 23 years of age * Good DMV Record based on points and time frame * 2 years recent verifiable experience with tractor trailer within the past 5 years * Able to pass criminal background check along with DOT Drug and Physical YOU CAN APPLY NOW BUY CLICKING THE LINK BELOW: http://penske.jobs/englewood-co/truck-driver-cdl-class-atouch-freight-penske-logistics/4F20BE6D82F2476FA635D416B81CDCFA/job/ or call David at (951)741-4594",PENSKE Logistics class A $./hr w/ &  month increase (Englewood,,"Englewood, CO 80112",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/penske-logistics-class-a-21-50-hr-w-6-12-month-increase-englewood-co-job-englewood-co-us-169015844.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),86aa233525ac9019d769e2bedd95e34a
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:06:18:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"PRNBHS Denver 5600 S Quebec St, Sute 300A Greenwood Village, CO 80111-2207 Job #: prnSLPTdenCO060203A career with Brookdale Healthcare Services has never been so rewarding! Brookdale Home Health is ranked among the Top Ten largest home heath companies in the country. Many of our agencies carry a five-star rating and are recognized by Decision Health as Home Care Elite agencies. We own and operate more than 80+ agencies nationwide, serving approximately 17,000 patients throughout our Brookdale Home Health Division. Brookdale. Bringing new life to senior living.PRN SLP-CCC with Home Healthcare Experience Opportunity in our Roslyn, Denver Tech Center and Greenwood Village Communities.Excellent Compensation! Paid Mileage and Drive Time!Your responsibilities:* Identify and treat residents with speech, language, voice and fluency disorders* Provide and direct speech therapy services to patients, including assessment, treatment, program planning and implementation* Develop treatment plans by identifying a problem list, long and short-term goals, and methods to achieve recovery* Work in accordance with physicians' orders and adhere to applicable principles and practices of speech therapy, Brookdale policies/procedures, and state regulations* Review the quality and match of the total services delivered and individual speech language pathology programs using predetermined criteriaRequired skills and qualifications:* Master's degree in speech therapy from an accredited program* License to practice speech therapy in the state; Vital Stim Certification* ASHA Certification; must have Certificate of Clinical Competence (CCC)* Skilled nursing experience preferred* Flexible schedule, including availability to work evenings, holidays and weekends as needed* Basic computer software skills with Microsoft Word and ExcelPlease contact:Mary Franklinmfranklin@brookdale.com If you're a Brookdale associate, please consider referring someone through the Good People Program! Brookdale is an EOE-(Equal Opportunity Employer) and drug-free workplace. Brookdale offers a number of benefits to full-time associates including, but not limited to: medical, dental, vision, disability, life, paid time off, educational reimbursement. All associates, age 21 and older, are eligible to participate in the 401(k) retirement savings plan.",Speech Language Pathologist / SLP Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver , CO 80210",Healthcare Services Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/speech-language-pathologist-slp-job-denver-co-us-168085686.aspx?mescoid=2900494001001&jobPosition=17,,Medical/Health,bb424ecf9858b295edf5b3913e827fb3
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:05:48:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Client Manager-Property & Casualty at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 5/27/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Dallas, TX   Experience: 3 to 5 years Date Posted: 5/27/2016 Job Title: Client Manager - Property & Casualty The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson. The Business Corporate risk and brokingWe know how companies can unlock potential through effective risk management. Our clients rely on us to craft strategies to quantify, mitigate, and transfer risk, taking advantage of our specialist industry experience and unparalleled market know-how. The result is a new way of embracing risk that drives superior results. The Role Client Service SpecialistResponsible for maintaining day-to-day servicing relationship with client decision-makers. This position requires an organized, self-starter to effectively provide insurance brokerage and risk management services to new and existing commercial accounts. Participate in presentations with clients and prospects working within a collaborative brokerage service team. Drive insurance renewal process from gathering client exposure information through delivering final negotiated coverage terms. Answer client policy and coverage questions. Consult with clients on policy changes. Coordinate loss control and claim review meetings for selected accounts. Visit client site to identify potential exposures and needs: review loss analysis, complete risk management analysis. Research exposure and technical coverage issues to answer client questions. Assist in gathering and researching risk management/insurance information from prospects. Coordinate financial transactions including general insurance accounting, invoicing, insurance plan cost benefit analysis and loss analysis. Responsibilities: Maintain existing commercial property and casualty accounts by providing continuous client service and risk management advice Prepare written correspondence, reports and analysis as needed Communicate effectively with client decision makers and other team members Perform complex client risk management analysis by researching exposure and coverage issues Review quotes, proposals, contract insurance requirements, rating worksheets, audits for accuracy, compliance or other insurance objectives. Review non-standard certificate requests Conduct pre-renewal internal and external meetings Prepare new and renewal business submissions Arrange and facilitate underwriting meetings Negotiate new and renewal property and casualty insurance terms and conditions with underwriters Present renewal terms to client Facilitate the ordering of loss control and claim reports Make necessary fee arrangements Gather information from clients for marketing purposes Assist with resolution of client/carrier accounting issues Maintain client confidentiality",Client Manager-Property & Casualty at Willis Towers Watson Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/client-manager-property-casualty-at-willis-towers-watson-job-dallas-tx-us-168838173.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f617579b0fecab31616ef3f699e6f424
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:05:47:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"« back Learn More Sr Analyst - BA05 Job #:  656722**For immediate consideration, please send an updated resume and best contact information to eferrantino@apexsystemsinc.com **Service Request AnalystDallas, TX18 month contract, possible extension  on:  Description: The Business Analyst for Service Requests will be involved in the planning and establishment of core Request Management processes. This individual will be responsible for the complete request lifecycle from definition through Customer satisfaction. Included in the lifecycle are the definition, classification, approval, tracking and fulfillment of requests. This individual will participate in Continuous Service Improvement activities to improve KPIs and OLAs. This individual will provide instrumentation of the Request Process to drive transparency and accountability.Primary Responsibilities:• Will liaison with various groups throughout the Company to ensure service level targets are met, Customer satisfaction remains high, and escalations occur in a timely manner.• Will lead request requirement gathering sessions.• Will participate in documenting requests, workflow, and reports.• Will develop, manage and maintain request fulfillment process and associated procedures/tasks.• Will conduct and/or participate in recurring Request Management meetings with Customer/Teams.• Will assist other IT Service Management Teams as necessary providing statistics, suggestions, and enhancement opportunities.• Will collaborate with other suppliers on issues/tasks spanning multiple areas.• Will ensure collaboration between requestor, supply chain, and delivery teams.• Will assist in Service Catalog definition as well as Sample Request creation.• Will publish trend analysis, sharing periodical reports to internal and external consumers.• Will be responsible for Customer Satisfaction throughout the process.• Will guide all Customers to follow the Service Request Management process.• Will Coordinate and participate in Service Request Management system enhancement testing.• Will follow standard Change Management processes when promoting new services to Production• Will organize and assemble needed resources required to develop a solution/proposal/deliverableEducation, Knowledge and/or Experience:• Extensive experience in developing, engineering and improving IT Service Management processes.• Experience in creating, managing and maintaining process diagrams and process definition documents.• Experience in gathering and analyzing requirements to improve existing processes.• Experience in defining process metrics and KPIs.• Request analysis and trending experience.• Experience in analyzing performance data to demonstrate the effectiveness of the Request Fulfillment process.• Experience with user acceptance testing (UAT), including test script creation, execution and signoffs• Service Management Reporting experience.• Creation of Live Dashboards and associated analytics.• Use of Service Management Platform (ServiceNow, BMC/Remedy, UniCenter, HP, IBM etc. )• Experience in developing, managing, and maintaining the Service Request Management process and associated procedures.Preferred Skills (skills or experience that would be beneficial but are not required):• ITIL Foundation/Advanced ITIL Certification (Service Operations and/or Continual Service Improvement)• Large business background (working in a company of similar scale)• Experience managing a Service Catalog• Experience in leading the transformation of business processes• Basic Project management skillsBehaviors• Ability to work well within a team to learn and share knowledge• Ability to work in dynamic environment with changing priorities• Ability to develop and maintain strong Customer and team relationships.• Ability to influence and collaborate with the Customer to gain approval of the requirements and design.• Customer focused with a passion and drive for Customer satisfaction and delivering business value.• High energy, innovative individual who is motivated by challenging assignments• Self-motivated, looks for and seizes opportunities to do more or to do things better.• Effective at managing multiple requests with conflicting priorities under tight deadlines• Strong communication skills with the ability to communicate technical issues to non-technical Customers• Ensures that regular and consistent communications take place.• Uses excellent communication skills, interpersonal, oral, and written• Expresses ideas clearly and concisely in both business and technical requirements.• Practices attentive and active listening.• Appropriately shares ideas and information with others.• High attention to detail and accuracy• Strong analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills      EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.        EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at employeeservices@apexsystemsinc.com or 866-612-2739.Learn More",Sr Analyst - BA Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-analyst-ba05-job-dallas-tx-us-168902539.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9e509a74af3f0425f429dc6904c5f32d
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:04:48:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Softworld has a renowned client in the Dallas area in need of a Senior Java Developer. They will be responsible for building a cutting edge, Next-Generation, Rich Internet Applications utilizing cloud based N-tier architecture. The candidate will be heavily involved in the design and development of the application; in addition to also leading and mentoring project team members.Primary Responsibilities Design and development of N-tier, cloud based Lab Management systemAssist developers in utilizing the architecture for the development of user storiesEnsure functional designs integrates across application layersProvide technical leadership for the teamResolve technical issues encountered by the teamEstablish best practices for the development teamDesign and develop major component of the application to be used by other programmersQualifications & Experience:7+ years of experience developing commercial grade, n-tier, Java based applications3+ years knowledge of Cloud base (SaaS) n-tier application development as well as hand on experience with multi-tenant database/architectureDeep expertise with development of all layers of the application, specifically back-end (core) databases (Hibernate and PL/SQL) and mid-tier (Spring Frame work) (very important)Frameworks: Spring Core, Spring MVC, Spring Security, Hibernate (very important)Excellent experienced with the following applications, technologies, frameworks, tools and capabilitiesApplications: Apache, Tomcat, Oracle, EclipseTechnologies: Java, JEE Architectures, RESTful & SOAP Web Services, JSON, SQLTools: Maven, JUnit, JIRA, Selenium, etcCapabilities: Configuration Management, Continuous IntegrationDevelopment experience in Agile / Scrum development methodologyStrong middle-tier WebService development with RESTWorking experience with large Oracle databases and knowledge of standard methodologiesBachelor's degree in Computer Science, or similar field of study",Sr. Java Developer Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",RetailComputer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-java-developer-job-dallas-tx-us-168857271.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=5,,IT/Software Development,7e5f0bd1ceae8a93ed3fc0e3005f040f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:04:47:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Working as a Sr. Product Marketing Manager, you will be responsible for creating local customer demand, local go-to-market marketing and local communication strategies focusing on AT&T new and emerging technologies, products and applications. You will develop local programs to increase attachment rate of voice/data features/accessories including local cross sell / up sell product strategies, and tracking of smart phone and data products to show ROI impact on implemented plans. Additional Responsibilities: Manage local market product information including pricing and market analysis Competitor's offers, market share, advertising, and promotional plans; pricing, distribution mix, sales challenges; unique market advantages, weaknesses, requirements and characteristics Work with local market team to understand emerging customer needs and to develop requests for new products or product enhancements including feature adjustments, major account solutions, pricing changes, etc. Primary field liaison to HQ Product Management for all elements of the product lifecycle Includes ideation, development decisions, business case input, testing and analysis, market launch decisions and on-going local support for product marketing Supplement training efforts to ensure sales teams are fully knowledgeable and able to sell AT&T's wide array of technology products and services Responsible for local CPE testing/trialing and recommendation for acceptance as well as go-to-market plans Serves as interface with local network teams on all aspects of product marketing Ensure sales channel coordination and that all channels are considered appropriately for each promotional program Identifies, monitors and analyzes internal (e.g. financials, movement, revenue, cost, sales) and external (e.g., technology, market share, competitive) performance parameters in order to reposition, modify features and identify new uses for the productRequired Qualifications: Five years experience in product life cycle management required Strong analytic and fact-based decision-making skills Proven ability to translate ideas and vision into product definition and requirements Proven ability to launch and support ideas and vision Proven ability to work on and track multiple projects simultaneously Proven ability to successfully partner with other organizations including technology, go-to-market, and device teams Strong written, verbal and oral presentation skills Strong strategic thinking skills Working knowledge of assigned product(s), company functions, marketing and/or service policies and procedures and excellent communication Proficiency in PowerPoint, Excel, Word and other standard office computer applications Desired Qualifications: Six or more years experience in product lifecycle management Experience in wireless services, data, and / or high tech industry--messaging experience Ability to anticipate risks and devise contingencies to manage them BA in Marketing or Business preferred",Sr Product Marketing Mgr Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-product-marketing-mgr-job-dallas-tx-us-168747311.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=15,,,54f9fc33904283cbb52e46d149ae7d3d
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:04:30:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Join a market leader providing automation solutions in hospitals to increase efficiency and enhance patient experience! Apply today and play an integral part in our automated material handling products and solutions. YOUR TASKSFront/back-end development of customer service applications like Remote System Monitoring, Web Reporting of CS data, NOC notification services, PTS touch screen interface and future strategic opportunities   Day-to-day development and sustaining of existing customer service applications, as well as enhancements and future strategic development of customer-facing applications   Minimal travel, but as necessary to deploy new software and manage the correction of problems for customer satisfactionYOUR PROFILEBachelor's degree in Computer Science, or an Engineering degree with CS Minor 5+ years of hands-on software development experience  Training or education in Web design/development C++, Java and/or C#, XML, and HTML 5, .Net WCF Services, JavaScript, Windows Object Oriented Analysis and Design, Data Structures, Multi-threading, Entity Framework SQL and Relational Databases (PostGreSQL or SQL Server), ISS, CSSPreferred knowledge:SaaS architecture Angular JSWE OFFERSwisslog offers challenging work in a globally networked environment as well as competitive base salary, comprehensive benefits including health/dental and above-market 401K! United efforts of our employees represent the basis for developing and delivering the best solutions for our customers.Relocation assistance is available! Swisslog is an EEO Employer, Gender/Minority/ Veterans/Disabled.Swisslog’s FMLA policy can be found at: http://www.dol.gov/whd/regs/compliance/posters/fmlaen.pdf Federal law requires employers to provide reasonable accommodation to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you require reasonable accommodation to complete the application or to perform your job, please contact Human Resources at:jobs.healthcare.us@swisslog.com.",Software Engineer - CS Applications / Web Development Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO",,http://jobview.monster.com/software-engineer-cs-applications-web-development-job-denver-co-us-168870297.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f0141d8f3c67c395c0ea0dcefd3bfd0
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:03:55:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Accounts Receivable - Reconciliations SpecialistOur client located in Downtown Dallas, TX is seeking an Accounts Receivable – Reconciliations Specialist with heavy reconciliations experience to join their team on a contract to possible hire basis.Company Profile: Publicly traded broadcasting company.Features and Benefits while On Contract: Look beyond your average Staffing Firm and enjoy outstanding benefits from DAY 1!Enroll right away and avoid the ACA Individual Mandate PenaltyOpt in to receive coverage of medical, dental, and vision insurance.Access to short-term disability and life insurance Benefits are open to you the employee, your dependents, and/or your spouseClient Features and Benefits:Comprehensive medical, dental and vision insurance benefits to you and your family including an HSA plan401K with a competitive company matchVacation, Sick Time, Short/Long Term DisabilityFlexible Spending AccountEmployee Discount ProgramsEmployee Mortgage ProgramFMLAActive Duty LeaveScholarship Awards & Matching Gifts ProgramThe Accounts Receivable - Reconciliations Specialist Role: The Accounts Receivable Reconciliations Specialist role is responsible for the accurate and timely completion of Log Reconciliation; utilize a high level of quality customer service to our internal and external clients.  The Accounts Receivable - Reconciliations Specialist Requirements: High school diploma or equivalent a mustAssociate Degree in Accounting preferred but not a must2+ years’ experience in accounts receivables, and customer service experience requiredKnowledge of basic accounting principles, procedures and business mathMicrosoft Office Suite with advanced Excel skillsAbility to multi-task successfully and meet deadlines in fast-paced environmentSolid organizational skillsExcellent oral/written communication skillsPlease visit us at  https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/dallas.html https://www.frontlinesourcegroup.com/accounting-finance.html Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/V/D.  Candidates must have authorization to work in the U.S.  Clients will not sponsor visas.Frontline Source Group specializes in matching top talent with companies for direct hire, contract, contract-to-hire, temporary, and temp to hire placements in Accounting, Finance, Information Technology/ IT, Human Resources, Administrative, Executive Assistant, Customer Service, Healthcare, Engineering, and Oil & Gas. We work with clients and candidates in all areas of the United States and have offices throughout Texas (Arlington, Austin, Dallas, Fort Worth, Frisco, Houston – Downtown, Houston – Galleria, Houston – West, Irving, Katy, Lewisville, Plano, Richardson, San Antonio, Sugar Land, and The Woodlands), Tennessee (Nashville and Brentwood), Arizona (Phoenix and Scottsdale), Oklahoma (Oklahoma City), and Colorado (Denver and Denver DTC). ",Accounts Receivable - Reconciliations Specialist Job in Dallas,"Full Time, Employee","Dallas, TX",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/accounts-receivable-reconciliations-specialist-job-dallas-tx-us-168503794.aspx?mescoid=4300699001001&jobPosition=8,17.00 - 19.00 /hour,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,dd276db61c2de3de56ba6e3c0b06f119
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:03:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Details Purpo $4.50 / + tips To se To serve food and beverages to customers while providing courteous, professional, efficient service and ensuring customer satisfaction. EssentEssential Job Functions: 1.Gr eet and welcome guests warmly at the tables; suggest specials and particular menu items within five (5) minutes of guest’s seating. 2.C heck station assigned to you for cleanliness prior to opening. Handle 5-6 tables with 20-30 guests at one time. 3. Do all necessary set-up sidework as per sidework schedule. 4. Be knowledgeable of all menu items, their garnishes, contents and preparation methods. Be prepared to answer any guest questions about the menu in a direct, concise way. Know the Use Records. 5. Use suggestive selling. 6. Complete knowledge of service standards for beer, liquor wine. 7. Follow procedures in taking guest’s order: write check accurately and legibly, properly pre-ring check, fill-in food dupe completely, attach soft copy to dupe and time-stamp to dupe. 8.C heck food before serving it to guest to ascertain that appearance, temperature and portions are correct. 9. Maintain 20-30 minute ticket time. Check back with the guests periodically to ensure satisfaction. 10. Present guest checks and collect all monies for full payment of check. 11. Be able to operate the electronic cash register (where applicable). No voids or deletes without management’s written approval. 12. As sist Dining Room Attendant/Bus Help with set-up and clearing of tables when necessary. 13. Declare tips according to IRS standards. 14. Respond properly to irritated or angry guests. 15. Immediately clean all spills. Essent16.Clear table during meals. 17. Know and follow all sanitation procedures. Marginal Functions: 1. Assist in other servers when needed. Job, K Knowledge, Skills and other requirements: 1. Able to communicate accurately and effectively in verbal and written form with guests and associates so as to respond accurately and completely to people to give directions, instructions, information, answer questions and provide service as required. 2.M emorize the menu, specials of the day and special promotions; have an accurate short term memory. 3. Stand or walk for varying lengths of time, sometimes for long periods. 4. Lift and carry heavy trays- approximately twenty (20) pounds. 5. Understand and operate MICROS system (or registers). 6. Stoop, twist, bend, reach and lift to serve food and beverages, to clean, restock stations, etc. 7. Use arithmetic to calculate checks and collect payment. HOW TO APPLY: Please email resumes to: dallas.marriott@yahoo.com or apply in person 2493 N Stemmons Freeway Dallas, TX 75207",Restaurant Servers/ Dallas Marriott Suites Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",Hotels and Lodging,http://jobview.monster.com/restaurant-servers-dallas-marriott-suites-job-dallas-tx-us-168816744.aspx?mescoid=3500614001001&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e57754d3f5db850f8088da16fcc4d6c2
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:03:47:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for HARD WORKERS with GREAT PEOPLE SKILLS looking for PERMANENT FULL TIME work.We are bulking up our staff for 2016, as we just opened a NEW location, in addition to, January 2016being the start of our NEW Retail contracts.Positions are PERMANENT FULL TIME DAYS. We have NO Part Time or Night Shifts available.Available Positions:- Customer Service- Event Set Up/ Tear Down/ Maintenance- Event Staff/ Brand Ambassadors- Management Positions also available to candidates with qualifying backgroundsPAID TRAINING is available in all areas if you meet the minimum qualifications. Starting Pay ranges between 400-600 a week (W2) with opportunities to increase with commissions/ bonuses and Promotion Advances.NO DOOR TO DOOR/ NO BUSINESS TO BUSINESS/ NO IN OFFICE WORKWe set up Events at Racing Events/ Car Shows and multiple venues in DFW. Our 2016 contracts open our Retail Division- giving us over 4000 Major Retail Locations in our local area.We are looking for men and women who are outgoing and enthusiastic, that can work well as an individual and in a team atmosphere who can provide the HIGHEST LEVEL of CUSTOMER SERVICE at our Events. We are also in need of candidates who can help set up, run and maintain our various Events. For individuals looking for a bit more than just a job... we have Career Opportunities available through our Management Training Program. Upon completion of program- candidates would eligible for raises and additional promotions.Requirements- Candidates MUST be a minimum of 18 years of age- Candidates MUST be eligible work in the United States (Possess a Social Security Number)- Candidates MUST clear a 7 year criminal background check that includes:--> ANY sexually based offense regardless of the date/ year of conviction--> ANY felony conviction in the last 7 years regardless of its nature--> ANY misdemeanor conviction withing the last 7 years the includes Fraud/ Theft/ Violence/ Assault.--> (ANY active case/ warrant would also interfere with hirability )- Candidates MUST also have reliable transportationWe are doing IMMEDIATE HIRING to satisfy our immediate demand from our current/ upcoming clients.",Monster,,"We are looking for HARD WORKERS with GREAT PEOPLE SKILLS looking for PERMANENT FULL TIME work.We are bulking up our staff for 2016, as we just opened a NEW location, in addition to, January 2016being the start of our NEW Retail contracts.Positions are PERMANENT FULL TIME DAYS. We have NO Part Time or Night Shifts available.Available Positions:- Customer Service- Event Set Up/ Tear Down/ Maintenance- Event Staff/ Brand Ambassadors- Management Positions also available to candidates with qualifying backgroundsPAID TRAINING is available in all areas if you meet the minimum qualifications. Starting Pay ranges between 400-600 a week (W2) with opportunities to increase with commissions/ bonuses and Promotion Advances.NO DOOR TO DOOR/ NO BUSINESS TO BUSINESS/ NO IN OFFICE WORKWe set up Events at Racing Events/ Car Shows and multiple venues in DFW. Our 2016 contracts open our Retail Division- giving us over 4000 Major Retail Locations in our local area.We are looking for men and women who are outgoing and enthusiastic, that can work well as an individual and in a team atmosphere who can provide the HIGHEST LEVEL of CUSTOMER SERVICE at our Events. We are also in need of candidates who can help set up, run and maintain our various Events. For individuals looking for a bit more than just a job... we have Career Opportunities available through our Management Training Program. Upon completion of program- candidates would eligible for raises and additional promotions.Requirements- Candidates MUST be a minimum of 18 years of age- Candidates MUST be eligible work in the United States (Possess a Social Security Number)- Candidates MUST clear a 7 year criminal background check that includes:--> ANY sexually based offense regardless of the date/ year of conviction--> ANY felony conviction in the last 7 years regardless of its nature--> ANY misdemeanor conviction withing the last 7 years the includes Fraud/ Theft/ Violence/ Assault.--> (ANY active case/ warrant would also interfere with hirability )- Candidates MUST also have reliable transportationWe are doing IMMEDIATE HIRING to satisfy our immediate demand from our current/ upcoming clients.",,http://jobview.monster.com/general-labor-event-staff-management-job-dallas-tx-us-167588073.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=2,,,ec693d0d21246aebb56eae6b858eafa0
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:02:59:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Overview We are currently seeking a Telephonic Nurse Case Manager (RN) in the Dallas, TX area.  This is a position that works from a home based office.    Responsible for assessment, planning, coordination, implementation and evaluation of injured/disabled individuals involved in the medical case management process. Working as an intermediary between carriers, attorneys, medical care providers, employers and employees, you will closely monitor the progress of the injured worker and report results back to the employer and insurance carrier. This will ensure appropriate and cost-effective healthcare services leading to a medically rehabilitated individual who is ready to return to an optimal level of work and functioning. Responsibilities Main responsibilities will include but are not limited to: Using clinical/nursing skills to help coordinate the individual’s treatment program while maximizing quality of care and cost containment. Performing three-point contacts: o Contact employee: expressing your and the employer’s concern for the employee’s health; educating the employee in company policies and regulations; supporting employee in complying with prescribed treatment plan; assessing employee motivation and resources (personal and interpersonal) that support return to work; and establishing and maintaining Case Management goals and expectations of return to work in a safe and timely manner with the employee. o Contact provider: identifying yourself and explaining your role; ascertaining treatment plan in order to assist patient compliance; requesting reports if appropriate; and determining return to clinic date, referrals and projected return-to-work date. o Contact employer/adjuster/insurer: providing diagnosis, therapy, providers and projected return-to-work date; providing hard copy follow-up within 72 hours of original contact date; and reviewing with employer the employee and provider’s concerns. Objectively and critically assessing all information related to the current treatment plan to identify barriers, clarifying or determining realistic goals and objectives, and seeking potential alternatives. Maintaining daily records of all contacts. Generating and faxing, if requested, Initial or 72-hour report, including appropriateness of treatment plan and Case Management recommendations. Serving as an intermediary to interpret and educate the individual on his/her disability, and the treatment plan established by the case manager, physicians, and therapists.   Explains physician’s and therapists’ instructions, and answers any other questions the claimant may have in an effort to facilitate his/her return to work. Working with the physicians and therapists to set up medical assessments to develop an overall treatment plan that ensures cost containment while meeting state and other regulator's guidelines. Researching alternative treatment programs such as pain clinics, home health care, and work hardening. Coordinating all aspects of the individual’s enrollment into the programs, and then monitors his/her progress, in an effort to maximize cost containment and minimize time away from work. Working with employers on modifications to job duties based on medical limitations and the employees functional assessment. Helping employer rewrite a job description, when necessary and possible, in an effort to return the client to the workplace. Monitoring/evaluating the employee’s progress. Supplying employer/adjuster/insurer with periodic reports agreed to in original contract, but not less than biweekly. Providing input on the performance of support staff to their supervisor. Tracking client updates by use of daily open listing. Attending scheduled staff meetings and in-service programs. Other duties as assigned. Maintaining the necessary credentials and demonstrating a level of professionalism within the work place and in dealing with injured workers reflects positively on the company as a whole. Maintains professionalism at all times despite the stressful demands of the position. Capable of maintaining close relationships among all parties involved both in person and over the phone. Must be readily available for and responsive to all parties concerned. Acquiring and maintaining knowledge of developments in the medical case management field. Keeping abreast of local workers’ compensation laws and regulations, as well as other issues in the case management field. This is also critically important in keeping licenses and certifications valid. Seeking professional certification and participation in professional associations keeps the case manager informed of events in their field while establishing referral contacts. Qualifications To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions Diploma, A.S. degree or B.S. degree in nursing required. Advanced Degree preferred. Minimum of two (2) years full time equivalent of direct clinical care to consumers/clinical practice. Case Management and Workers’ compensation-related experience preferred. Registered nurse with current, valid state licensure required. In the case of an individual in a state that does not require licensure or certification, the individual must have a baccalaureate or graduate degree in social work, or another health or human services field that promotes the physical, psychosocial, and/or vocational well-being of the persons being served, that requires: 1) A degree from an institution that is fully accredited by a nationally recognized educational accreditation organization; 2) The individual must have completed a supervised field experience, in case management, health, or behavioral health as part of the degree requirements; and 3) URAC-recognized certification in case management within four (4) years of hire as a case manager Pursue URAC-recognized certification in case management (CCM, CDMS, CRC, CRRN or COHN) upon eligibility. Other state licenses/certification as required by law. Prior Case Management experience preferred. Excellent interpersonal skills and phone manners. Excellent organizational skills. Ability to set priorities. Ability to work independently and as part of a team. Computer literacy required.",Remote Telephonic Nurse Case Manager (RN) Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/remote-telephonic-nurse-case-manager-rn-job-dallas-tx-us-168837592.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=16,,"To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions Diploma, A.S. degree or B.S. degree in nursing required. Advanced Degree preferred. Minimum of two (2) years full time equivalent of direct clinical care to consumers/clinical practice. Case Management and Workers’ compensation-related experience preferred. Registered nurse with current, valid state licensure required. In the case of an individual in a state that does not require licensure or certification, the individual must have a baccalaureate or graduate degree in social work, or another health or human services field that promotes the physical, psychosocial, and/or vocational well-being of the persons being served, that requires: 1) A degree from an institution that is fully accredited by a nationally recognized educational accreditation organization; 2) The individual must have completed a supervised field experience, in case management, health, or behavioral health as part of the degree requirements; and 3) URAC-recognized certification in case management within four (4) years of hire as a case manager Pursue URAC-recognized certification in case management (CCM, CDMS, CRC, CRRN or COHN) upon eligibility. Other state licenses/certification as required by law. Prior Case Management experience preferred. Excellent interpersonal skills and phone manners. Excellent organizational skills. Ability to set priorities. Ability to work independently and as part of a team. Computer literacy required.",bb076a4ba1987629f8dd4da16a3c376c
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:02:58:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"At STERIS, WE HELP OUR CUSTOMERS CREATE A HEALTHIER AND SAFER WORLD by providing innovative healthcare and life science product and service solutions around the globe. Our mission is a strong statement of who we are and what we do – JOIN us in our efforts as a Installation Project Manager   Summary         Responsible for the financial performance of major and/or multiple construction and retrofit projects.  Develops and trains employees and subcontractors.  Responsible for the quality of the installation and customer satisfaction.  Represents STERIS Corporation and its interests in jobsite decisions affecting daily operations. Essential Job Functions 1. Plans, organizes, directs and controls all costs of installation and subcontracting for assigned projects.  Coordinates resources to insure timely and cost effective installation and completion of assigned projects.  2. Adheres to safety standards.  High degree of regard to employee and subcontractor safety. 3.  Assists sales in development of project cost estimates.  Develops and administers subcontractor request for proposal packages and evaluates responses.  Performs risk assessment analysis. Based on assessment, develops project execution plan including work breakdown structure and project schedule in accordance with plans and specifications. Verifies with customer that expectations will be met or exceeded through execution of plan. 4. Maintains allocation of costs to financial reporting systems.  Effectively communicates financial and physical project status to management. Manages and provides documentation for the project management file including correspondence, requests for information and timelines.  Produces high quality communications adhering to company standards. 5. Provides detailed scope of work and instructions to installers and subcontractors.  Verifies understanding of project expectations.  Ensures appropriate product training is available / implemented for skill gaps within in-house or subcontractor staff to enable proper installation of STERIS product. 6. Routinely walks job site and attends progress and coordination meetings to ensure quality installation of product.  Proactively evaluates potential problems on the job and initiates action to limit negative outcomes.  Uses negotiation skills to consistently resolve disputes without the need for escalation. 7. Provides estimates or negotiates work outside original scope. Reviews customer’s systems during installation and if needed points out opportunities for improvement resulting in value-added change orders.  Pursues, secures and closes change-orders for equitable adjustments to contracts.  8. Coordinates equipment start-up by Field Service Representative in conjunction with District Service Manager.  Notifies Sales Representative of equipment readiness for customer in-service training.  Ensures job completion documentation is completed and seamless transition to service is achieved. 9. Develops and maintains viable relationships with customers, consultants, prime contractors, subcontractors and trade personnel.  Communicates with architects, equipment planners, and consultants for the purpose of influencing equipment recommendations and specifications relative to installation. 10. Develops close working relationships with Federal, State, and Local code enforcement officials for the purpose of defining installation requirements for all company equipment. Holds licenses as necessary to support installation of equipment. 11. Provide feedback to Sales, Service, Marketing and Manufacturing relative to product and/or process quality issues. 12. Other duties as assigned.  Job Requirements:Education/License Requirements Bachelors degree in Engineering or Construction Management discipline and five years of work experience or Associate degree with ten years of work experience preferred. Experience Requirements Minimum five years experience with exposure to construction industry and trade labor required.  Demonstrated problem solving and negotiation skills required.  Experience dealing with a large and diverse number of problems, often simultaneously, and requiring knowledge of various disciplines.  Ability to effectively represent STERIS and communicate with customers and others at varying technical levels.  Ability to prioritize work activities based upon financial impact to desired business goals.  Innovative and conceptual thinker.  High level of productivity and efficiency.  Proven skills as a timely communicator, focused on providing customer satisfaction and team building.   Must have excellent interpersonal, oral, and written communication skills.  Working knowledge of PC’s and Windows software (Word, Excel, Power Point, Project)  STERIS is a $1.9B+, publicly traded (NYSE) organization of over 8000 employees and is dedicated to providing innovative infection prevention, decontamination, and health science technologies, products and services.     STERIS Corporation complies with all obligations with respect to online application systems under guidelines provided by the US Department of Labor's Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. If you are a disabled person who requires reasonable accommodation to complete an online application, please contact the STERIS Human Resources Department by phone at 440-392-7047 or 800-548-4873, extension 27047 for assistance.  STERIS Corporation is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employer and welcomes all qualified applicants.  Applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status. *LM-JM1",Installation Project Manager Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80002",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/installation-project-manager-job-denver-co-us-168717210.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=9,,Project/Program Management,b50693f4118fe6a3f9087ce95e129f8f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:02:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"French Speaking Tier I Help Desk Technician in Coppell, TX Are you motivated, hardworking, and looking for work in the Coppell, TX area?  If you are, then MODIS wants you!  We are looking for French Speaking PC Support Help Desk Technicians for one of our fortune 500 clients! Specifically Quick Learners, Customer Focused, able to work independently, and have the bandwidth to support hundreds of end users. Some of the tools you will use include:Active DirectoryRemedy Ticketing systemBomgar Remote Software Description:This company offers an opportunity to convert full time with an excellent benefits package. Once converted full time there is room for career growth and the opportunity to change verticals and take your career to the next level!  This will be a Help Desk environment for multiple end clients so candidates must have a diverse skill set. Education:High School Diploma  Technical Skills: Active Directory and VPN are a mustTroubleshooting skills-Need to know what questions to ask to get to the root of the problem quicklyWindows/Outlook software supportDesktop SupportRemedy ticketing system preferred, but other ticketing systems will be consideredA+ certification is preferred  Soft Skills: Flexibility since the processes may change on a day-to-day basis depending on the client they are working with and what the client’s needs areMoldableAble to take directionMultitaskingGood attendance (there is a point system)Ability to thrive in an up-tempo high stress environment.  Main Responsibilities: Provides technical support to users for basic computer related technical problems.  Enters tickets into the call tracking tool; ensures information is accurate, prioritized and assigned to a queue. Answers help desk telephones and responds to basic customer inquiries to ensure customer needs are met. Assists customers in resolving basic technical problems by providing scripted guidance regarding software and hardware problems.  Resolves and/or refers more complex technical problems through a defined escalation process. Logs and tracks inquiries using a problem management database and maintains history records and related problem documentation. Identifies, evaluates, and prioritizes customer problems and complaints to ensure that inquiries are resolved appropriately. Experience with solving computer related problems.  Experience with company products, operation systems and escalation policy.  Good communication, interpersonal and organizational skills.    If you feel that you fit the above description, then please APPLY TODAY!  **Include your most up to date resume with the application**  French Speaking Tier I Help Desk Technician in Coppell, TX ",French Speaking Tier I Help Desk Technician Needed in Coppell,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Coppell, TX 75019",,http://jobview.monster.com/french-speaking-tier-i-help-desk-technician-needed-in-coppell-tx-job-coppell-tx-us-168093938.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=19,,IT/Software Development,3b6d61fe9925c318f130edeec21935c7
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:02:14:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Personal Banker 1Job ID Number: 5249917-8Location: Dallas,TXJob Description: Job DescriptionAt Wells Fargo, our vision is to satisfy our customers’ financial needs and help them succeed financially. In this role, you will help us deliver on our vision and build lifelong relationships with our customers. You also will demonstrate leadership through contributing to a company culture that supports customers in achieving their financial goals, team members in developing their careers, and communities in continuing to thrive. As part of a team that serves one in three American households, you will play a vital role in living our commitment to the highest ethical standards and maintaining the valued trust of our customers and communities. As a Personal Banker, you will devote much of your day to building long term relationships with our customers, in person and by phone. You will deepen the understanding of our customers' financial needs and provide suggestions. While most of the job is performed in the stores, Bankers reach out into the community by placing outbound phone calls to existing clients, visiting businesses, conducting educational seminars, and being active in the community. Our Expectation of our Personal Bankers: Personal Bankers are expected to exceed challenging sales and referral goals by proactively selling products and services to customers and referring customers to other areas of the bank. Personal Bankers sell retail banking products and services to customers and prospects. Manages customer portfolio, services relationships and cross-sells all products and services. Provides broad base of financial and credit services with the goals of acquiring 100% of the customers' business. Develops and maintains relationships with Wells Fargo partners to maximize sales opportunities and achieve minimum sales standards. Uses profiling analysis tools to identify cross sell opportunities and makes outbound sales calls typically by phone to increase product per customer ratio. May handle cash transactions. May spend up to 30% of time completing service-related tasks. Every banker has their own scorecard with daily sales and referral goals. You will be rewarded for your success with bonus incentives beyond base salary. Our best Bankers constantly go the extra mile, finding ways to be helpful while still working quickly and efficiently. Bankers have the ability to resolve difficult customer situations effectively while delivering friendly customer service and ensuring the highest level of customer satisfaction. At Wells Fargo, we have an outstanding diverse team. We want people who pitch in and help others enhance their ability to educate our customers. We'll provide outstanding training, but it's up to you to learn our products and services. Personal Bankers will develop and improve their skills through regular feedback discussions with supervisors and learn skills which will help further their professional experience and improve their chance for even greater roles in the future. Important Note: During the application process, ensure your contact information (email and phone number) is up to date and upload your current resume prior to submitting your application for consideration. If you are a Wells Fargo Team Member, in your Jobs Profile ensure that your email address is valid and updated to an address that can receive external emails outside of the banking network. Initial contact with you will be made via e-mail. Please check your e-mail regularly for updates. • Multilingual speakers are encouraged to apply Required Qualifications 1+ year of experience selling products and services1+ year of experience interacting with people or customers Desired Qualifications Ability to navigate multiple computer systems, applications, and utilize search tools to find informationBasic Microsoft Office skillsExperience interacting positively with unsatisfied customersGood communication skills including speaking clearly, succinctly, and accurately while using a pleasant tone and common conversational courtesiesExperience in retail sales or the financial services industryExperience achieving individual and team goalsAbility to adhere to established attendance policies Job Expectations Ability to work weekends and holidays as needed or scheduledThis position requires SAFE registration at the time of employment. Wells Fargo will initiate the SAFE registration process immediately after your employment start date. The Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System (NMLS) web site (http://fedregistry.nationwidelicensingsystem.org ) provides the MU4R questions and registration required for employment in this position.Individuals in Loan Originator (LO) positions must meet the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau qualification requirements and comply with related Wells Fargo policies. The LO qualification requirements include meeting applicable financial responsibility, character, general financial fitness and criminal background standards. A current credit report will be used to assess your financial responsibility and credit fitness, however, a credit score is not included as part of the evaluation. Successful candidates must also meet ongoing regulatory requirements including additional screening, if necessary. Disclaimer All offers for employment with Wells Fargo are contingent upon the candidate having successfully completed a criminal background check. Wells Fargo will consider qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable local, state and Federal law, including Section 19 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act.Relevant military experience is considered for veterans and transitioning service men and women.Wells Fargo is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer, Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation.",Personal Banker  Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/personal-banker-1-job-dallas-tx-us-168949006.aspx?mescoid=1300109001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),54fad7dc272cd90fb651b9782f1d2309
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:02:14:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Kemper at a glanceWith $8 billion in assets, Kemper is one of the nation's leading insurers. The Kemper family of companies specializes in home, auto, life, health and valuables insurance products for individuals, families and businesses.Kemper’s underwriting companies are rated A- (Excellent) by A.M. Best Company, the leading insurance industry rating authority. Kemper services six million policies and ranks among the top 25 personal lines property and casualty writers.Job Summary:Design and development of e-learning, end-user courseware, instructional materials, and self-paced learning products that enhance the learning experience and engage learners before, during and after the training. Project management of relevant and targeted, competency-based learning programs (integrating communications, documentation, education, training and gaming), including: job aids, job shadowing experiences, coaching tools, web-based e-learning, interactive games, simulations, collaborative learning structures, interactive video, webinars, learning apps, and mobile learning. Utilize and work within a Learning Management System (LMS) and Learning Content Management Systems (LCMS) enabling SCORM/AICC content deployment via LMS and content management system.Primary Functions:•Demonstrates working knowledge of adult learning theories and concepts; instructor led and virtual instructional design theory and methods, various instructional methods and delivery options, various software tools used in instructional design and training•Applies various learning design techniques including e-learning, self-directed modules, instructor led lectures, role plays, and blended learning•Move the bar in innovative learning and development for employees as relates to instructional design incorporating the latest and greatest technologies•Advanced creative design skills able to work within a variety of e-learning design products•Well versed in e-learning design. The position will work extensively with internal stakeholders, subject matter experts, and Corporate Training Director to create high-quality e-Learning courseware, presentations and demonstrations using authoring, graphics, and interactive development tools to support the learning needs of the organization.•Work within LMS to set up tracking and reporting of all e-learning courses or simulations.•Provides knowledge and skills in web-based authoring tools, technology based training solutions and related industry standards in order to evaluate program effectiveness.•Consult with internal clients and peers to help deliver e-learning and development strategies for employees in various disciplines and roles. Strong consulting skills. Consults with process owners on development/training program needsPosition Qualifications:•Bachelor's degree required, Master’s degree in instructional design or a related field preferred (Insurance industry a plus)•3-5 years Instructional Design lead or higher job experience, with 2 years focused on e-learning (and end user) or interactive media including system, process and soft skill•Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within training field.•Experience working within a Learning Management System (LMS) and/or Learning Content Management Systems (LCMS) - experience enabling SCORM/AICC content deployment via LMS and content management systems preferred. Skillsoft Learning Management System a plus.•Client Management experience - having worked with business owners, functional project managers and client Subject Matter Experts to develop training course materials•Comprehensive knowledge of current instructional theories and principles applicable to blended learning and instructor-led instruction•Strong experience with standard e-learning (conceptual) development tools: Captivate (a must) Articulate, Lectora, Contribute, etc. as well as proficient with assessment, test and survey development tools, such as WebEx Training Center, Quiz Maker, etc.Apply online link: http://bit.ly/eLearnInstrdesigner3634 Our employees enjoy great benefits:•Qualify for your choice of health and dental plans within your first month.•Save for the future with robust 401(k) match, Retirement Plans, Health Spending Accounts.•Learn and Grow with our Tuition Assistance, Paid Certifications and Continuing Education programs.•Contribute to your community through United Way and Volunteer programs.•Balance your life with flexible Paid Time Off and Business Casual Dress.•Protect what you love with discounts on home and auto insurance.We value diversity and strive to be an employer of choice.An Equal Opportunity Employer, M/F/D/V ~CB~ ~M~*Alliance United Insurance Company is not rated.",eLearning Instructional Designer Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/elearning-instructional-designer-job-dallas-tx-us-168768683.aspx?mescoid=2500399001001&jobPosition=4,,Customer Support/Client Care,b1f6cdd2e2d5e42193c89a3716d3075f
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:02:11:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"As an increasing number of large enterprises move their critical systems to the cloud, we are in need of high-powered technical talent to help our largest customers navigate the operational challenges of cloud computing. You will work one-on-one with our top-tier customers, supporting both the software development lifecycle for cloud services and management of active services.In this role, you will have the opportunity to help shape and execute a strategy to build mindshare and broad use of Amazon Web Services (including Amazon EC2, Amazon S3, Amazon DynamoDB & RDS databases, Amazon CloudFront CDN, and many more) within organizations ranging from new start-ups to large enterprise customers. You must possess customer facing skills that enable you to represent AWS well within a customer’s environment and drive discussions with senior personnel regarding incidents, trade-offs, best practices, and risk management. You should also have a demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges as you help our customers take advantage of the efficiencies, cost savings and quick innovation available only in the cloud.As a Senior Cloud Technical Account Manager, you will be the primary technical point of contact for one or more customers helping to plan, debug, and oversee ongoing operations of business critical applications. You will get your hands dirty, troubleshooting application, network, database, and architectural challenges using a suite of internal AWS tools as well as your existing knowledge and toolkits. You will work hand-in-hand with senior executives on opportunities to improve your customers’ IT landscape. You will work across customer organizations to ensure customers’ applications are well designed and scale to the needs of the world’s largest events e.g., the Super Bowl, the World Cup and the Olympics. In this role, you will also act as the voice of the customer within AWS to escalate problems and to drive prioritization of business needs for our customers.Every day will bring new and exciting challenges on the job while you:· Engage with Director and C-Level executives to understand business needs· Assist in Design/Architecture of AWS and hybrid cloud solutions· Help Enterprises define IT and business processes that work well with cloud deployments· Work hands-on with customer engineering teams to develop, migrate, and debug application issues· Troubleshoot technical issues and drive issue escalation with AWS Service teams· Leverage knowledge of your customers’ environments to assist support engineers and service teams in better serving your customers· Complete analysis and present periodic reviews of operational performance to customer leadership· Provide detailed reviews of service disruptions, metrics, detailed prelaunch planning· Make recommendations on how new AWS offerings fit in the company architecture· Champion and advocate for customer requirements within AWS (be their voice)· Participate in customer requested meetings (onsite or via phone)· Know and use all key customer resolution tools across all service groups to facilitate rapid resolution of customer concerns· Participate in deep architectural discussions to ensure solutions are designed for successful deployment in the cloud· Work with some of the leading technologists around the world· Work directly with Amazon Web Service engineers to ensure that customer issues are resolved as expediently as possible · 5+ years design/implementation/operations/consulting experience of distributed applications or equivalent experience· 2+ years hands-on systems administration / networking / troubleshooting· Previous customer facing experience as a technical lead· Exceptional customer focus and bias for action· Candidates must have excellent oral and written communication skills· Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Math, or related discipline required or equivalent work experience.· Be mobile and travel to client locations as neededDeep experience in one or more of the following areas:· Software design or development· Content Distribution / CDN· Scripting / Automation· Database Architecture· IP Networking· IT Security· BigData / Hadoop· Systems Administration (Linux and/or Windows)· Operations Management· Service Oriented Architecture · 10+ years IT/Technical Industry experience· Experience with AWS service offerings· Experience working directly with Enterprise customers· MBA or advanced degree· Technical Program or Project Management experience· Ability to manage multiple tasks and projects in a fast-moving environment· Demonstrated ability to adapt to new technologies and learn quickly· Presentation skills; high degree of comfort with both large and small audiences· Strong written communication skills; this role will require the creation of content such as whitepapers and other written deliverables· High level of comfort communicating effectively across internal and external organizationsWorking knowledge of development methodologies in one or more than of the following languages:o .NETo C++o Javao PHPo Perlo Pythono Ruby on RailsAmazon Web Services is hiring. For more information: http://aws.amazon.com/careers/ aws-support-naaws-solarch-na""Amazon is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer – Minority / Female / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation""",Cloud Technical Account Manager Job in Dallas,Full Time Employee,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/cloud-technical-account-manager-job-dallas-tx-us-168777684.aspx?mescoid=4100681001001&jobPosition=1,,Other,6df121e3b1eb90464f65778cd85f3ce5
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:01:46:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Claims Examiner Workers Compensation CLAIM YOUR FUTURE AS A GREAT PERFORMER! Providing both satisfying and challenging work along with a highly professional and friendly work atmosphere, Sedgwick has a strong commitment to its colleagues and its clients. If you are seeking a place where you can do great things for those whose lives you touch while maximizing your own career possibilities, Sedgwick is the place for you. As the largest and most innovative Third Party Administrator in the claims industry and the first and only TPA to receive both recognition as the Best TPA in America and the coveted Employer of Choice designation, we invite you to come be a part of our team and, ""Claim Your Future."" PRIMARY PURPOSE: To analyze complex or technically difficult claims to determine benefits due; to work with high exposure claims involving litigation and rehabilitation; to ensure ongoing adjudication of claims within service expectations, industry best practices and specific client service requirements; and to identify subrogation of claims and negotiate settlements. ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Analyzes and manages complex or technically difficult claims by investigating and gathering information to determine the exposure on the claim; manages claims through well-developed action plans to an appropriate and timely resolution.Assesses liability and resolves claims within evaluation.Negotiates settlement of claims within designated authority.Calculates and assigns timely and appropriate reserves to claims; manages reserve adequacy throughout the life of the claim.Calculates and pays benefits due; approves and makes timely claim payments and adjustments; and settles claims within designated authority level.Prepares necessary state fillings within statutory limits.Manages the litigation process; ensures timely and cost effective claims resolution.Coordinates vendor referrals for additional investigation and/or litigation management.Uses appropriate cost containment techniques including strategic vendor partnerships to reduce overall cost of claims for our clients.Manages claim recoveries, including be not limited to subrogation, Second Injury Fund excess recoveries and Social Security and Medicare offsets.Reports claims to the excess carrier; responds to requests of directions in a professional and timely manner.Communicates claim activity and processing with the claimant and the client; maintains professional client relationships.Ensures claim files are properly documented and claims coding is correct.Refers cases as appropriate to supervisor and management.ADDITIONAL FUNCTIONS and RESPONSIBILITIES Performs other duties as assigned.Supports the organization's quality program(s).Travels as required.QUALIFICATION Education & Licensing Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university preferred. Professional certification as applicable to line of business preferred. Experience Four (4) years of claims management experience or equivalent combination of education and experience required. Licenses as required. Skills & Knowledge In-depth knowledge of appropriate insurance principles and laws for line of business handled, recoveries offsets and deductions, claim and disability duration, cost containment principles including medical management practices and Social Security and Medicare application procedure as applicable to line of businessExcellent oral and written communication, including presentation skillsPC literate, including Microsoft Office productsAnalytical and interpretive skillsStrong organizational skillsGood interpersonal skillsExcellent negotiation skillsAbility to work in a team environmentAbility to meet or exceed Service ExpectationsWORK ENVIRONMENT When applicable and appropriate, consideration will be given to reasonable accommodations. Mental: Clear and conceptual thinking ability; excellent judgment, troubleshooting, problem solving, analysis, and discretion; ability to handle work-related stress; ability to handle multiple priorities simultaneously; and ability to meet deadlines Physical: Computer keyboarding, travel as required Auditory/Visual: Hearing, vision and talkingNOTE: Credit security clearance, confirmed via a background credit check, is required for this position. The statements contained in this document are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by a colleague assigned to this description. They are not intended to constitute a comprehensive list of functions, duties, or local variances. Management retains the discretion to add or to change the duties of the position at any time. Sedgwick is an Equal Opportunity Employer and a Drug-Free Workplace Additional Information:Preferred experience and licensure for the following states:Arizona (AZ) Colorado (CO) Oklahoma (OK) Texas (TX)",Claims Examiner Workers' Compensation Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/claims-examiner-workers'-compensation-job-dallas-tx-us-168828712.aspx?mescoid=1300071001001&jobPosition=7,,,4549135af623d0307f207f64512584ad
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:01:45:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Pharmacy Project Manager at Willis Towers Watson Date Posted: 6/12/2016  Employee Type: Full-Time Location: Denver, CO   Experience: Not Specified Date Posted: 6/12/2016 The CompanyWillis Towers Watson is a leading global advisory, broking and solutions company that helps clients around the world turn risk into a path for growth. With roots dating to 1828, Willis Towers Watson has 39,000 employees in more than 120 territories. We design and deliver solutions that manage risk, optimize benefits, cultivate talent, and expand the power of capital to protect and strengthen institutions and individuals. Our unique perspective allows us to see the critical intersections between talent, assets and ideas — the dynamic formula that drives business performance. Unlock your potential at Willis Towers Watson.The BusinessOur Health and Group Benefits business helps large and mid-size clients control soaring health and welfare plan costs, improve health outcomes and promote employee engagement through broad-based, state-of-the-art interventions. Within that strategy, professionals in the Pharmacy Practice provide focused expertise around the pharmacy benefit of a health and group benefits plan. They bring technical resources and talent in helping clients design and manage their pharmacy benefit. Our unique, cutting-edge solutions have set a new standard in terms of pricing transparency and service accountability among pharmacy benefit managers (PBM) in the marketplace.The RoleAs a Project Manager you will focus on multiple pharmacy consulting engagements in addition to supporting group purchasing client engagements working in conjunction with senior pharmacy consultants and HGB client leads.Responsibilities: Serve as the project manager and main liaison to the pharmacy consultant and local HGB teams which includes the following:• Creating project plans• Monitoring progress to deadlines and budget• Scheduling and managing status calls for active engagements• Ensuring appropriate and effective communication among team members, vendor contacts and the client• For group purchasing clients, providing daily support both directly to clients and their employees to resolve benefit related questions and issues or PBM service issues; maintaining and updating materials related to client enrollment• Assisting with the preparation and presentation of deliverables• Supporting the pharmacy practice on internal marketing or intellectual capital initiatives Performance Objectives: Clients Conduct benchmarking studies and other research; provide value added analyses and summaries Analyze and compare vendor products, services and contracts for internal team members Design, distribute and evaluate responses to surveys and RFPs Communicate and liaise effectively with colleagues, vendor contacts, and clients regarding data collection and project execution Prepare the first draft of deliverables for review by the consultant Financial Meet revenue and billable hour goals as described by manager Contribute to sales and marketing efforts by drafting proposals and responding to RFPs People Build strong relationships internally and collaborate effectively on cross-functional teams Demonstrate natural ease and effectiveness when dealing with clients/colleagues at all levels",Pharmacy Project Manager at Willis Towers Watson Job in Denver,Full Time,"Denver, CO",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/pharmacy-project-manager-at-willis-towers-watson-job-denver-co-us-168838460.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),3d680647c8f875df7f6a2c7db0a72806
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:01:44:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is seeking a PeopleSoft HCM Techno/Functional Consultant, and the ideal candidate would have 10+ years' experience with Peoplesoft development and support. Please see 'must haves' below for more specifics.THIS POSITION is 100% REMOTE! This is a 6+ month CONTRACT - TO - HIRE opportunity. The successful candidate WILL be hired on directly by the client.MUST HAVES:10+ years of PeopleSoft development and support experience.PeopleSoft 9.1 / 9.2, PeopleTools 8.5x, PeopleCode, Component Interface, SQR/SQL, PeopleSoft Application Engine, PS Query, PeopleSoft Process Scheduler, Data Mover, XML Publisher, PeopleSoft Payroll Interface, Unix/Linux shell scriptingDatabases/RDMS: Oracle 10g+, SQL Server Understand various Software Development Lifecycles and apply to area-specific assigned workAbility to design, code, test, and debug in the required environmentBachelor's Degree, Master Degree a plusJob Summary:Understand Business Requirements, Own & Propose Solutions, conduct Functional overview sessions/ Conference Room Pilots, Review Document related to to-be process, Functional Designs and Functional test Cases document, Conduct Functional testing. Strong analysis and problem solving skills This role oversees the implementation planning, fit gap analysis, application configuration, quality assurance testing (creating thorough test scripts and test case scenarios) and production support of enhancements and break/fix activityWork closely with the Customer to understand the existing Enterprise Application requirements including application Setup, Configurations, overall application Landscape/ integrations and able to provide drive solutions; suggest process improvement and optimization options.Debugging, configuration change analysis & functional testing of the PeopleSoft applicationInteracting with business users to understand and define requirements participate in design & development.Independently lead project implementationsESSENTIAL DUTIES Act independently or under very limited supervision from management to assist in research and fact finding to develop or modify information systemsPerform in-depth analysis and research of large or complex systems and inter-system interactionWrite detailed and maintainable program specifications for programs, objects or systems to be used by othersWrite new, highly complex programs, objects or systems from detailed specificationsFacilitate technical and user walk through of information systemsProvide time estimates for projects to be performed by self or othersLead small to medium projects including cross-functional interactionInterface frequently with business partners concerning their needsUse established design patterns in design and development. Help teach out and share these design constructs with fellow team members, recommending new design constructs as needed.Lead code and design reviews for appropriate level of complexityPerform Fit/Gap analysis on the client's business processes and their use of the software or intended use of the software.Work with Technical Team to assist in design configuration, enhancements, conversions and interfaces.Support and coordinate with technical team for documentation and testing.Partner with internal client users to ensure proper knowledge transfer related to the delivered features in the latest PeopleSoft release.Provide post-production support activities to client personnel after go-live dateProvide techno/functional PeopleSoft expertise in any of the PeopleSoft Financials and HCM modules.Experience in designing and developing business solutions based on PeopleSoft technologies.Provide on-call support for moderate to critical system issuesExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",PeopleSoft HCM Techo/Functional Consultant Job in Dallas,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,PeopleSoft HCM Techo/Functional Consultant,"Dallas, TX",http://jobview.monster.com/peoplesoft-hcm-techo-functional-consultant-job-dallas-tx-us-169013368.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=17,,IT/Software Development,2a5d2021d1a8da53b4bbfd8d24fc770d
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:01:25:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Learn more about AT&T's cutting edge opportunities with a wide range of career paths in emerging and ground breaking technologies. As a key member of the AT&T NetBond Technical Alliance and Integration team, the Lead Product Marketing Manager understands the dynamics of the cloud industry and emerging technologies, has a strong background in networking, and ensures the development and launch of joint offerings into the global market driving results and product accountability. Roles and responsibilities of the Lead Product Marketing Manager include but is not limited to the following: · Leading cross functional teams and working jointly with partners to launch integrated solutions across the globe. · Manage and strengthen relationships with alliances'/partners' technical divisions to ensure a consistent, excellent customer experience as both companies add new features and services · Accountable for revenue attainment, profitability, and success of product through execution of integration plans, building upon the integration to additional use cases, and finding additional opportunities through the alliance relationship · Exceptional communication skills, both written and verbal, and the ability to translate across business and technical teams. · Having an executive presence and being comfortable working with and presenting to senior leaders both externally and internally. · Provide continuing product surveillance and management of established product to attain financial objectives. · Act as the foremost expert within the product management discipline and the cloud services industry · Collaborate with other AT&T offer teams to ensure customer experience and business services positions AT&T as the continued leader · Market Analysis: assess market and customer dynamics and incorporate into offer development and lifecycle activities.· · Recommend and implement changes required to be competitive. · Rationalize solution offerings by performing map/gap analysis against current offering and market opportunities. · Motivate others to action and provide leadership qualities as needed. · Foster strong relationships with internal and external resources. Engage with different functional teams and business units (in order to drive business success and optimization. · Acts as team lead as needed to provide leadership to less experienced professionalsRequired Qualifications: Five years product management experience Must be comfortable with conveying the value of new and emerging products, technologies or applications to senior level management and across a diverse product team Product launch and lifecycle management experience Previous experience leading a cross-functional organization in executing projects from ideation to completion Strong analytic and fact-based decision-making skills Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously and operate in a fast-paced, high-growth professional environment Must possess both outstanding written and oral communication skills Must be proficient using Microsoft Office products including Word, Power Point, Excel and Outlook. Ability to clear a criminal background check and drug test. The successful candidate will be able to perform the following with or without reasonable accommodation: Ability to operate a personal computer, wireless equipment, copier and fax Desired Qualifications: Six or more years product management experience, preferably in cloud, cloud networking and security. Product management experience within high tech, software and/or wireless/telecom industry highly",Lead Product Marketing Mgr AT&T NetBond Technical Alliance and Integration Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/lead-product-marketing-mgr-at-t-netbond-technical-alliance-integration-job-dallas-tx-us-168813019.aspx?mescoid=1100007001001&jobPosition=17,,,1f120cb628a26278e978823d630f3b7b
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:00:48:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Responsible for management of day-to-day operations of the Utilization Review department including evaluation of daily data capture, quality assurance, program implementation, training and management of staff to achieve performance improvement, revenue enhancement and meet the managed care objectives of the company. Manage the daily operational activities of the unit from UR referral receipt to closure. Assist in regulatory audit proceedings within the department including Utilization Review Accreditation Commission (URAC) and state agency audits. Conduct internal file audits to ensure quality UR outcomes. RN license required. CCM Preferred.Minimum 5 years prior operational experience in a managed care / healthcare environment and 1 year workers compensation experience. Advanced analytical and problem-solving skills. Advanced customer service skills. Advanced PC, organization and communication skills. Advanced interpersonal and multi-function staff management skills. Proficient knowledge of state jurisdictional and regulatory issues.About AIGAmerican International Group, Inc. (AIG) is a leading international insurance organization serving customers in more than 130 countries and jurisdictions. AIG companies serve commercial, institutional, and individual customers through one of the most extensive worldwide property-casualty networks of any insurer. In addition, AIG companies are leading providers of life insurance and retirement services in the United States.AIG Property Casualty is a global market leader, one of the few truly global property casualty franchises.AIG Life and Retirement is one of the largest life insurance organizations in the U.S., and provides protection, investment and income solutions needed for financial and retirement security.United Guaranty Corporation is the marketplace leader in mortgage insurance in the U.S.Additional information about AIG can be found at www.aig.com | YouTube: www.youtube.com/aig | Twitter: @AIG_LatestNews | LinkedIn: www.linkedin.com/company/aig",Director Operations - Utilization Review Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/director-operations-utilization-review-job-dallas-tx-us-169010829.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=2,,Medical/Health,449b1d0eede8907c4e5d309c894e7755
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:00:48:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Field Service Engineer is accountable for the timeliness and quality of site inspections, installation, programming, repair and preventative maintenance of Medivators’ products in GI, urology, and pulmonary facilities that use flexible endoscopes within his/her assigned territory.Main Responsibilities: Carries out technical assignments to install, modify, and repair Medivators equipment at customer sites.Analyzes and repairs mechanical, electrical, and software failures.Operates and programs reprocessors, understanding all technical aspects and reprocessor parameter functions.Completes in a timely manner standard equipment documentation and reports to include service reports, installation records, etc.Provides customers with timely and accurate technical information in a positive and straightforward manner.Provide assistance/consultations to customers in site preparation for equipment installations.Provide technical support as required during selling processes.Identify sales opportunities and pass the information on to the appropriate sales person.EDUCATION REQUIRED FOR POSITION:Associate degree in Electro-mechanics or equivalent experience is required.  QUALIFICATIONS REQUIRED FOR POSITION:This position requires three or more years of electro-mechanical experience in capital equipment, preferably in the medical device industry. The position requires an ability to work independently to ensure customer needs are met.Minimum Qualifications:IDEAL CANDIDATE PROFILE:A high degree of initiative and creativity is required due to the complex nature of the situations and conditions of the position.Ability to think clearly and positively and stay calm in high-pressure situations.Pro-active.Ability to work with others.Enthusiasm, especially to hardware problem solving.Exhibits care and attention to details.Meets deadlines and commitments.Strong written/oral communication skills.Functional PC and appropriate software skills required.Ability to travel extensively, often on short notice.",Field Service Engineer Job in Dallas,Full Time,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/field-service-engineer-job-dallas-tx-us-168263332.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=7,,,b538f5d0da59cf2be276238618ddbc70
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:00:44:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Come work for AT&T's Technology Development Digital Experience group. Our group is rapidly expanding and we are looking for a Professional User Experience Designer to join our team. If you possess leadership skills and strong visual design skills then read below because we want to hear from you! The selected candidate will be responsible for a growing team of visual and interactive designers and commitment to best in class design. Key Roles and Responsibilities (A day in the life...): Leads the design efforts of an organizations website Manage core elements of the track design team, leveraging experience Contributes to the design groups efforts to enhance the appeal of the organizations online offerings Responsible for innovative thinking and design in service of strategic business initiatives Responsible for the oversight of design web pages, including layout, user interface graphics, navigation and graphics Works without supervision on highly complex projects Extensive latitude for independent judgment Assists less experienced peersDesired Qualifications: Preferred Bachelors degree in Human Computer Interaction, Interactive Media, or Graphic Design or equivalent experience Typically requires 4+ years of experience designing web pages, including layout, user interface graphics, navigation and graphics Strong visual design skills Be able to clearly communicate complicated designs visually and simply A plus if you have your own online portfolio",Professional User Experience Designer UX Designer Job in Dallas,,"Dallas, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/professional-user-experience-designer-ux-designer-job-dallas-tx-us-168563524.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=7,,,99ad446839ccc0a192536d3f27b25c97
United States of America,US,01/May/2016:00:44:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Atkins has been providing infrastructure planning, engineering, construction, environmental consulting, urban planning, architecture, and program management services to public and private clients across the United States for more than 50 years.   Globally, Atkins is the largest UK-based engineering and design consultancy and one of the world's largest design firms with nearly 18,000 employees worldwide. We have the depth and breadth of expertise to respond to the most technically challenging and time-critical infrastructure projects and the urgent transition to a low-carbon economy.   Atkins seeks an energetic and highly motivated self-starter to join our Denver, CO office as a Sr. Civil Project Manager. MAJOR FUNCTION/ROLE: The selected candidate will lead and support large multi-discipline design teams for private infrastructure projects with a strategic focus on privately held client project types. Candidate will serve as project lead for varying types of project delivery methods including P3, D/B, ILPD, other specific client methods and traditional delivery.  The selected candidate will have demonstrated success with and mastery of site civil/ development issues and strong technical and people skills.  Candidate will also have experience serving as a senior consultant, leading, managing and providing guidance of project analyses, preparing plans, navigating the regulatory permit process, and developing innovative solutions to project challenges.   JOB DUTIES: Provide industry-leading knowledge and prominence to ATKINS’ projects and initiatives Support clients to formulate innovative solutions to infrastructure/site development issues Provide QA/QC functions and expert advice for complex projects Identify and support business development activities and proposal development Function as a project lead and mentor to project teams Prepare project work plans, develop project scopes, schedules, and budgets Direct project team compliance with contract terms, schedule, budget and quality objectives Monitor schedules, financial status of projects and quality control on projects Prepare contract documents     EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE: B.S. or M.S. in Civil Engineering. M.S. or graduate level technical coursework preferred. This level may be achieved by Engineers with seven years of experience since B.S. or 6 years since M.S. Typical incumbent has twelve (12) to fifteen (15) years of experience.   ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS: Credentials demonstrating ability to advance the technical prominence of the company and develop technical competence of staff Demonstrated experience in supporting business development activities and defining new markets and services, strong existing client relationships a plus. Experience supervising multidiscipline teams with staff of varying experience Experience interfacing with clients and proposing innovative solutions Competent in analysis and design of large scale complex site plans and mixed use subdivisions. Familiarity with a wide variety of project and client types.   PROFESSIONAL REGISTRATIONS: Civil P.E. license is required. PMP a plus.   General Competencies expected of all Professionals and Managers are as follows: Client Service, Commitment, Communication, Innovation & Continuous Improvement, Professionalism, Quality, and Teamwork.    Ability to process paper/electronic documents and utilize computer equipment; ability to communicate clearly both orally and in writing; ability to visit project sites if necessary. Job also requires ability to assemble and analyze data.    Local candidates preferred. Ideal if local candidate could bring work with them. Atkins offers its employees a robust rewards package which includes: a competitive salary; a broad benefits package including medical/RX, dental, vision, life, disability, legal, hospitalization and other valuable voluntary options; generous time-off programs; flexible work schedules; 401(k) with employer match; professional and career development opportunities through our corporate university, as well as a highly-regarded tuition reimbursement program; and an unmatched culture focused on client-service, quality, and tireless pursuit of excellence in all we do. Atkins is an equal opportunity, drug-free employer committed to diversity in the workplace. EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability.   Please view  Atkins  Equal  Opportunity  Statement  here: http://axis.na.atkinsglobal.com/na/aboutus/CorporateAdministration/Documents/EEO_Statement.pdf",Sr. Civil Project Manager-Land Development Job in Denver,"Full Time, Employee","Denver, CO 80237",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-civil-project-manager-land-development-job-denver-co-us-168915971.aspx?mescoid=1700166001001&jobPosition=12,,Marketing/Product,2ad010e65e95cdf9e52da19d1a2558fe
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:23:51:29,No,jobs.monster.com," Job ID:  99431 Georgia Masonry Supply is a division of the Oldcastle Architectural Products Group (APG). APG is North America’s leading manufacturer and supplier of concrete masonry, dry mix, and hardscape products. With over $2B in sales, APG operates across 33 states and 6 Canadian provinces through a network of over 165 operating locations and more than 5,000 employees. Essential Duties / Responsibilities Install, adjust and repair production equipmentWeld (ARC, MIG) and use cutting torchRepair and replace gears, drives, bearings, belts, chains, shafts, etc.Operate a variety of hand/power tools to repair, grease, weld, cut and change parts as assignedElectrical work including PLC troubleshooting, motor controls and circuit testingRepair/troubleshoot hydraulic cylinders, flow problems, solenoids and pumpsObserve equipment and listen to sounds to determine proper functioning or identify caused of troubleRebuild production moldsPerform general repairs to plant structureKeep work area in a clean and orderly conditionOther duties and responsibilities related to the nature of the job may be assigned on a temporary or permanent basis as needed Requirements / Education / Experience High school diploma / equivalent or equivalent in training, education or experienceExperience with industrial plant maintenance Technical or vocational school certification or equivalent in training or experienceAbility to read and interpret instructions and operations manuals and follow step by step instructionsSkilled in the use of hand and power toolsKnowledge of hydraulics, mechanics, electricity, welding, or related fields Physical Environment Lift tools, machinery parts and other objects weighing up to 100 pounds eachEndure intermittent bending, crouching, pushing, pulling, stooping and reachingStanding for extended period of timeAble to work under extreme conditions such as hot or cold temperatures, noise, dust and dirt What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development, and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Georgia Masonry Supply is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer.EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Georgia Masonry Supply is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network.   ",Maintenance Mechanic - st Shift / nd Shift - Conley,Full Time Employee,"Conley, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/maintenance-mechanic-1st-shift-2nd-shift-conley-ga-job-conley-ga-us-177278822.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,,,20c47c3a9bef54694c68cc3df8d1f41b
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:23:50:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse Distribution SpecialistRequired Minimum Education: High school graduate or GEDRequired Minimum Experience: Experience preferred in warehousing/distribution environment.Required Minimum Skills: Experience preferred in automated warehousing, receiving, and inventory environment. Have basic personal computer skills. Must be able to communicate and understand verbal and written English language and display positive attitudeJob Duties and Responsibilities:-Processing fill stock program. Inputs all requisitions; processes and reviews all pick tickets. Enters credits and returns.-Accurately counts and checks quantity received against number shown on bill of lading. Notes any shortages and only signs for actual pieces received.-Is alert for shipments that are marked refrigerated, rush or have emergency status. Follows established express package procedures.-Carefully and correctly packages shipments to avoid damage.-Unpacks merchandise and checks against the packing slip.-Utilizes Materials Management computer to differentiate stock from non-stock.-Enters supplemental issues log into system for inventory decrement.-Checks condition of shipment. Notes any damages or discrepancies on bill of lading before signing for or accepting the shipment. Informs Warehouse Supervisor of any damages.-Ensures all entrances and exits are secured when not in use and that visitors are not left unattended.-Cleans assigned areas daily.-Handles all bio-hazardous and hazardous substances safely and has read, understands and complies with all system and departmental policies and procedures with reference to “The Right To Know” and “MSDS”.-Strongly versed in receipts inquiry program for history, usage and information for customer support and inventory -Matches shortage reports to pick tickets logging shortages that require a physical count.-Follows established procedures for shipping.-Performs special, cycle, spot and fiscal inventories on a scheduled basis. Researches and verifies shortages and discrepancies. Make necessary inventory adjustments.-Quickly unpacks merchandise and checks against the packing slip.-Monitors back order fill program and makes recommendations for re-orders-Replenishing order request for system -Works from a rotating order group that covers the system.-Accurately pulls stock ordered and sorts by department.-Efficiently delivers orders to requesting departments.-Off-site orders are forwarded to Transportation pick-up area.-Production -Productivity requirements of 450 lines picked per day.-Assures quality control by warehousing dated items “FIFO”. Regularly checks dated items for extended shelf life or expiration.Assures quality control by warehousing dated items “FIFO”. Regularly checks dated items for extended shelf life or expiration.-Demonstrates a strong knowledge of stock items and their locations.-Initiates work request for equipment repairs and area maintenance.-Complete work assignments in full. (Blank lines, shortages, & signing). INDKEN#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Distribution Specialist Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",,http://jobview.monster.com/distribution-specialist-job-marietta-ga-us-178595633.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),55e20717cc29467c4f42b259c4df46c4
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:23:20:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Atkins has been providing infrastructure planning, engineering, construction, environmental consulting, urban planning, architecture, and program management services to public and private clients across the United States for more than 50 years. Globally, Atkins is the largest UK-based engineering and design consultancy and one of the world's largest design firms with nearly 18,000 employees worldwide. We have the depth and breadth of expertise to respond to the most technically challenging and time-critical infrastructure projects and the urgent transition to a low-carbon economy. Atkins seeks an energetic and highly motivated self-starter to work at our Client site in downtown Atlanta, Georgia office as a Senior Utility Coordinator.MAJOR FUNCTION Provide assistance to senior technical professional or technical manager by coordinating or performing a variety of technical duties requiring professional-level technical knowledge and familiarity with engineering or related project work, such as design, permitting, production, reporting and documentation, as required by specific position.JOB DUTIES Under direction, performs several of the following duties, depending on the program/project and in accordance with established standards and applicable regulatory policies.   Assist in production coordination, and/or in the planning, organization and documentation of projects. Oversee and coordinate project work; interpret plans & schedules to anticipate conflicts, coordinate and conduct meetings with affected parties, and oversee inspection and documentation of project work. Assist in the preparation of contracts, fee proposals, scopes of work, and invoices. Prepare specifications for projects. Assist in the preparation of proposals, presentations, and related marketing material and publications. Assist in the coordination and tracking of project submittals. Conduct analyses and prepare technical studies and reports. Review and edit reports and provide technical writing support.   Prepare permit applications, including engineering reports, for regulatory agency review and approval. Assist with project scheduling, utilizing MS Projects and Primavera, or other applicable software.   Coordinate the work of consultants or other employees involved in project development activities.   Coordinate and oversee design production in accordance with specifications and applicable regulatory policies.   Provide supervision and coordination of CAD work. Attend conferences and meetings with clients and regulatory agencies to ascertain requirements and assist in the development of appropriate business development strategies.   Perform such other duties as the supervisor may from time to time deem necessary. EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE Bachelor's degree in a technical field, plus continued education through workshops, seminars, and related courses plus six years of experience in engineering or related technical professional activities, exhibiting familiarity with related computer programs and applicable permitting work. SPECIAL SKILLS Good communication (oral and written) and organizational skills are essential. Proficiency with MS Office software is required and experience with MicroStation and Geopak, or AutoCAD programs is preferred. Experience with survey equipment a plus. Atkins offers its employees a robust rewards package which includes: a competitive salary; a broad benefits package including medical/RX, dental, vision, life, disability, legal, hospitalization and other valuable voluntary options; generous time-off programs; flexible work schedules; 401(k) with employer match; professional and career development opportunities through our corporate university, as well as a highly-regarded tuition reimbursement program; and an unmatched culture focused on client-service, quality, and tireless pursuit of excellence in all we do. Atkins is an equal opportunity, drug-free employer committed to diversity in the workplace. EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability.   Please view Atkins Equal Opportunity Statement by clicking the following link: http://careers.atkinsglobal.com/File.ashx?path=Root/Documents/north-america-welcome-new-employee/Equal_Opp_Stmt.pdf  ",Sr Utility Coordinator Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-utility-coordinator-job-atlanta-ga-us-175555373.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=20,,Marketing/Product,dc0b11da4830ec1b52da088bd8125473
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:22:55:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Want to finally earn what you’re worth? We have a job opportunity for the independent-minded professional. American Income makes a difference by helping protect people financially. We also believe in giving back to the communities around us. Our people make us a great company, and we’re always looking for community-focused individuals to join our team.We are currently interviewing entry level and senior level applicants who are service-minded and want to help people, gain experience and earn the money they deserve. This is a Sales Representative position working one-on-one with families in the community. There is flexibility and room for advancement.5 Reasons To Choose A Job With American IncomeYou will be supporting the needs of people in the community and making an impact.You get hands-on training while you manage relationships with existing and new customers.The compensation is very competitive.You can benefit from performance awards, incentives and advancement opportunities.You only need a high school diploma or equivalent, be independent-minded and a good communicator.American Income Life Insurance Company is one of the largest providers of supplemental insurance coverage to labor unions, credit unions, and associations. American Income Life Insurance is licensed in 49 states, the District of Columbia, Canada and New Zealand. We pride ourselves on our rapid growth and expansion, superior industry ratings and the difference we make in people's lives. Our life insurance protects the lives of hardworking families.Get to know the people who make our organization successful by visiting us at https://agent-jobs.ailcareers.com . Take our people’s word for it, not just ours. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xallinsx/cjt3/slider4.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","American Income Life Job Application for Professional Sales Position | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-5591,All,http://jobview.monster.com/professional-sales-position-job-atlanta-ga-us-178283268.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=3,,,80dcc20223cd921a1cf0bb8e2468a540
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:22:54:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Staffing is seeking dynamic individuals for a unique professional position with our client, a top international HVAC manufacturer. This is not a typical Counter Sales service role. The ideal candidates are creative thinkers who place a high emphasis on customer service and who can effectively and efficiently promote the entire line of products and programs in addition to selling the branch's services in an effort to increase sales as well as increase market penetration. The candidate will play a vital role in maintaining customer relations and must be willing to go the extra mile to assure customer satisfaction. Job requirements:-College degree preferred-High school diploma or equivalent required-Bilingual preferred but not required -Previous HVAC experience a plus-Three (3) years of customer facing experience-Outstanding mechanical aptitude and at least 1-3 years general HVAC knowledge required-Current Forklift certification-Preferred 1-3 years retail sales experience, counter sales, cashier and cash operations experience -Proficient computer skills-Ability to multi-task-Detailed orientedWorking hours: 1st shift: 6am-3:30pmSkills:Job Duties and Functions:-Provide exceptional service to all customers by offering full technical assistance regarding entire product line-Establish and maintain good relations with customers by providing prompt and courteous service for all customers and potential customers of the Branch, including walk-in and telephone calls. -Efficiently respond to all telephone, fax, and e-mail inquiries from customers regarding orders, product information, and account processing-Effectively communicate information to customers regarding open orders, shipping, billing, or products-Provide add on sales when appropriate-Proactively initiate the promotion of products and marketing programs direct to customers-Responsible for ensuring proper stocking of products-Assist in loading, unloading, and moving inventory throughout dock-Effectively communicate features, benefits, and warranty policy information to customers-Help ensure warranty claims are properly taken care of in a timely manner**All candidates must be able to commit to continuing education to learn all warehouse operations**Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Counter Sales - Warehouse Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/counter-sales-warehouse-job-norcross-ga-us-178635234.aspx?mescoid=4100671001001&jobPosition=19,13.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,,a2618d3a82b2d4cf410bf53dc7b70f0e
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:21:47:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO)1. Summary of FunctionsResponsible for the coordination of warehouse activities throughout the facility, facilitation of on-time receipt of the customer’s product while ensuring high data integrity and thorough communication. 2. Essential FunctionsTakes direction from SupervisorUse Office-based application; use New Breed proprietary applicationsCollect and maintain dataReport data to required management and customersEnsure daily/monthly logs are complete and accurateFile and archive daily/monthly reports according to the retention matrixReview, process and organize all shipment information to optimize freight visibilityAssist with timing issues of freight processing to identify process improvements in a team enviromentOther duties as assigned 3. Quality RequirementsDemonstrates an understanding of XPO Logistics – Supply Chain (XPO)  quality policyAdheres to the XPO 7S program and maintains a clean environment at all timesMaintains a safe work environment by adhering to and enforcing safe work practices and following safety practicesDemonstrates a positive attitude and teamwork in meeting goals and objectivesDemonstrates commitment to process excellence by ensuring proper, efficient and accurate use of the processCommunicates well with leadership, team members and other departments 4. Physical RequirementsThe physical requirements are sitting and standing for long periods of time, with one hundred percent (100%) spent in an office or warehouse environment.Regularly required to walk, turning of the head and torso, reaching, grasping, bending and flexing of the arms, legs, wrists, and fingers, climbing, stooping, kneeling or crouching.Regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; talk or hearSpecify vision abilities required by this job include close vision and ability to adjust focus.The senses of sight, speech and hearing are requiredEffectively performs the position through effective communication and exchange of information with all parties that you may come into to contact with while performing the essential functions of the positionAbility to lift 10 to 25 pounds and up to 40 on infrequent basis 5. Education and/or Experience RequirementsHigh school diploma or general education degree (GED) and 3 to 6 months related experience and/or trainingAbility to read and interpret documents such  as safety rules, operating instructions, and procedure documents; understanding of shipping and receiving process documents as they relate to overall company quality objectivesDemonstrated ability to comprehend simple instructions, communicate orally or in written form effectively with co-workers, departments, preferably customers and vendors as wellAbility to apply common sense understanding to carry out instruction furnished in written, oral, or diagram form; ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situationsMust be an independent worker with strong attention to detail and excellent customer skillsMust be familiar with current software packages such as MS Word and Excel, warehouse/inventory and order systems  We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Warehouse Clerk Job in Ellenwood,"Full Time, Employee","Ellenwood, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-clerk-job-ellenwood-ga-us-178652260.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=5,,Administrative/Clerical,1c23ff02c6d9019e5cb63abdba7214ea
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:21:46:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"The production process includes polymer extrusion, CNC-based mechanical processes, casting and coating processes as well as quality control operations. The opening is available immediately for our US headquarter in Atlanta, GA. We are most interested in dynamic and driven individuals with a solid engineering background and excellent interpersonal skills.Areas of Responsibility:• Engineering support for production equipment and the manufacturing process • Analyze and develop solutions to optimize the production process in regard of quantity, quality and safety• Direct and supervise maintenance person• Engineering support to develop new or customized product from the product idea through the complete production process• Retrieve, analyze and report production data• Develop design of experiments to analyze performance changes based on parameter variations• Engineering support to develop customized production equipment• Validation and documentation of process changes• Review and maintain production procedures• Develop product and production documentation to meet requirements for ISO 9001• Develop and maintain FMEA documentation as an important tool to manage the production process• Develop and maintain preventive maintenance processes• Performs other related duties as required and assigned. Job Requirements:• Solid engineering ability to understand and analyze mechanical, electro-mechanical and chemical processes• Demonstrated ability to systematically approach and resolve production and equipment challenges• Demonstrated ability to analyze and evaluate product and process parameters • Familiarity w/ PLC-controlled equipment and automation• Ability to develop and supervise a small technical support team• Excellent communication with professionals and workers are required to be successful in a team oriented environment• Excellent knowledge of MS Outlook, Word and Excel; preferable familiarity w/ database programs e.g. FileMaker Pro• Excellent written and verbal communication skills• Excellent self-organizational skills• Preferable experience working in an ISO 9001 environmentEducation/ work experience:• Bachelor or master degree in mechanical, chemical or industrial engineering• 5+ years of experience successfully working in a production environment in a similar position• preferable experience w/ membrane, fiber or similar production process Please send resumes to tyler.daniel@trcstaffing.com#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Process Engineer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/process-engineer-job-atlanta-ga-us-178595690.aspx?mescoid=1700178001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c64e3d2e7995b7e80a3f09b1ccea4e93
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:21:44:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Need something to fill up your free time and earn a little extra money? Do you enjoy the freedom of the open road? Do you need a more flexible schedule?Would you like to have an opportunity to advance with a company? Want an exciting job for retirement? Can we count on you? Are you safe enough? Want to take on the challenge of keeping people safe? Could you be the driver we are looking for? Perks of working for PTI:Freedom to work outside of a buildingNo heavy lifting/long distance walking involvedHome every day (unless hours are maximized or weather prohibits travel)Supplement retirement incomeRoom for advancement within the companyMedical insurance after probation periodFlexible hours – Full/Part time available, nights and weekendsHoliday Pay after probation period (must have worked)Meet interesting peoplePaid vacation time after 1 year with company401(k) after 1 year with the companySafety recognition, awards, and incentivesDrug free work forceOn the job trainingDiscounted cellphone plans on contracted plansWork out of the elementsPersonal Days – 3 Unpaid DaysIndependenceCompany Provided Vehicles Interested? You will need to meet the following:Have a valid state driver’s license issued by the state of proposed employmentHave at least 7 years of verifiable driving experienceMust live within a 30 minute drive of the location for which they are applyingMust not have a physical impairment preventing him or her driving safely, or from performing the essential functions of the job with or without a reasonable accommodationMust be able to read, write, and converse in EnglishMust be able to use a GPS/Technology System, read and understand roadmapsAbility to lift and pull up to 15 poundsMust be able to climb in and out of the vehicleMust be able to bend to inspect the undercarriage of a vehicle and tiresMust be able to manually open and close all doors and hatches on the vehicleMust be able to pass a pre-employment drug screening, a 3year Motor Vehicle Record (MVR) check, background check, and driving performance test Drivers must meet these requirements and all other requirements as determined by PTI, its customers and/or its insurance company, at all times to remain employed as a PTI driver.  It is the responsibility of the employee to report any and all moving violations to his or her supervisor immediately. What would you be doing?Drivers are responsible for safely transporting railroad crews to their destination on time, while adhering to federal, state and local traffic laws, as well as PTI’s policies and procedures.  Essential Job Duties:Driving vehicles in a safe mannerProvide excellent customer serviceReport to work at the designated need time and locationReport any defects, mechanical problems, or missing items to your Branch ManagerPerform a vehicle inspection    Maintain strict confidentiality regarding PTI’s business secretsAbide by all Company policies and proceduresAll other duties as assigned by supervisorPast professional driving experience are preferred but not required *This job description does not necessarily list all responsibilities, duties, requirements or efforts associated with the job.  While this list is intended to be an accurate reflection of the job, the Company reserves the right to review and modify the functions, duties and requirements of the job or to require that additional or different tasks be performed as circumstances or business needs require. Who we are:Professional Transportation, Inc. (PTI) was founded in 1980 and began its operations serving as a crew transportation service for the railroad. With our main focus on safety, dependability and on-time performance, PTI is responsible for transporting crew members for most of the largest railroad companies in the nation.  PTI’s Field Support Center is located in Evansville, Indiana with managers and regional offices strategically placed throughout the United States. PTI has evolved into a multifaceted transportation organization and is always looking for growth opportunities in other parts of the industry. EEO",Van Drivers Wanted in Atlanta,Part Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30308",,http://jobview.monster.com/van-drivers-wanted-in-atlanta-ga-part-time-job-atlanta-ga-us-178283903.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=5,,Logistics/Transportation,ff2e6e5e9fd5746eabd6e31add37fd0d
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:20:59:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONUnited Rentals, the largest equipment rental company in the world, is offering an excellent opportunity for a Service Technician IV who is ready to grow their career with the leading company in the industry. To continue our tremendous success and unparalleled growth, we are searching for qualified and ambitious individuals to perform maintenance and repairs of complex equipment with limited or no supervision in a highly skilled, safe, and professional manner. Responsibilities will include the maintenance and repair of complex mechanical, electrical, hydraulic, and diesel systems on a variety of rental and customer equipment and tools while using a high degree of independent judgment. You will also be responsible for service documentation, training of lower level technicians, demonstration of equipment for customer use, when necessary be able to accurately order needed parts from vendors, and occasional travel to customer sites. Excellence in this challenging and rewarding position paves the way for advancement into the role of Service Manager.REQUIREMENTSTo be qualified, all applicants must have 5+ years of experience with repairing and maintaining vehicles and equipment. The ideal candidate will have highly developed mechanical background knowledge particularly with various engines, extensive knowledge of construction equipment, an advanced understanding of schematics and diagrams, own the tools applicable to position, and exhibit strong teamwork, verbal, and written skills.Superior customer service remains the backbone of United Rentals, therefore your willingness and ability to provide this to each customer makes you a top-notch candidate. A high school diploma and valid driver's license are required.United Rentals, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer of women, minorities, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.",Heavy Equipment Mechanic Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30318",,http://jobview.monster.com/heavy-equipment-mechanic-job-atlanta-ga-us-178090099.aspx?mescoid=4900873001001&jobPosition=17,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,7796fba15f97c43daebdd09b456520ad
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:20:58:09,No,jobs.monster.com,Job Description:,Welder (Second Shift) Job in Thomasville,Full Time,"Thomasville, GA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/welder-second-shift-job-thomasville-ga-us-178656508.aspx?mescoid=5100949001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cbb2f1c0bb4be893040ec144885702c0
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:19:59:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Marten Transport Ltd, one of the nation’s leading refrigerated motor carries, based in Mondovi, WI is accepting applications for a Regional Coordinator. This position manages driver performance in identified management categories and is the primary communications link to drivers, as well as maintains optimum equipment utilization and driver quality of life and work to achieve optimum driver and customer satisfaction. Marten Transport offers:*Competitive Wage*Personal time off*Excellent Benefit Package and 401K*Tuition Reimbursement *Great Atmosphere *Employee Recognition Please fill out and application online at www.marten.com/careers.html   Report","Marten Recruiting Dept. Job Application for Regional Coordinator | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Phone www.marten.com/careers/ht,Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-coordinator-job-tucker-ga-us-178404731.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=17,,,bc69ef4e29e57cdaa938cac1a2273d20
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:19:58:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production and Warehouse We need high-energy 2nd Shift Warehouse Associates after January 1, 2017!! Come join our professional team at a MAJOR supply chain warehouse in Union City, GA. The Warehouse Associates will focus on receiving, sorting, picking, assembling boxes, and shipping consumer goods. This is a chance to grow with a stable company. If you like to be on the move all day and seek opportunities to learn, then this is the place for you!Working hours: Fri, Sat, Sun: 7:00 p.m. - 7:00 a.m.Skills:Minimum Qualifications:--Motivation and high energy.--Ability to perform work standing up to 10 hours or more.--Push, pull, lift and/or carry repetitively up to 50 pounds.--Demonstrates safe lifting and good work place habits.--Flexibility to work in other departments.--Frequent bending, stooping, reaching, grasping repetitive motion.--Must pass a background and drug test.--Weekend Shift D: Fri, Sat, Sun 7:00 p.m. - 7:00 a.m.--WE ARE ON THE BUS LINE!!!****Positions pay $9.65 an hour****In order to apply, please create a profile on www.randstadstaffing.com and post your application for the openings.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse General Labor - Weekend Shift - Fri,Full Time Employee,"Union City, GA 30291",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-general-labor-weekend-shift-fri-sat-sun-job-union-city-ga-us-178463234.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=14,9.65 - 9.65 $ /hour,,40cec6a78b06be1f5531d9463962fe4f
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:18:58:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Setting up and running press, prepress, mounting and shipping and handling in a fast paced work environment.- Performing basic quality checks, lifting up to 50 lbs repetitively, loading/unloading rolls, and operating overhead crane.- Must be familiar with Lock Out Tag Out process and detail oriented.Working hours: Rotating Shifts 6am-2pm,2pm-10pm,10pm-6amSkills:Must be able to pass background and lab drug screen.Must have recent 6 months experience in manufacturing/production setting-- Must have flexible schedule. Rotating shifts and ability to work OT.- Shifts rotate every 3 monthsMust work well in team environmentFlexographic and clamp truck operator experience is a plusAttendance is critical, tardiness and absenteeism won't be tolerated.Must wear steel toe bootsPay rate is up to $13/hrRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Press Operator Job in Stone Mountain,Full Time Employee,"Stone Mountain, GA 30083",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/press-operator-job-stone-mountain-ga-us-178455049.aspx?mescoid=5100934001001&jobPosition=7,11.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,0535114927583209222dac9b2bcd35aa
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:18:57:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"$3,500.00 SIGN ON BONUS!!!LVN / LPN DescriptionSummaryA licensed practical nurse (LPN) [referred to as LVN - Licensed Vocational Nurse - in some states] provides care and treatment in accordance with physician orders. Works in a team environment and within scope of practice as defined by State. The LPN / LVN works under the direction of physicians and registered nurses (RNs).Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesAssesses patients by physical examination, including pertinent diagnostic testing to determine health status.Administers medications and treatments.Participates in the care planning process.Supervises LPNs and certified nursing assistants.Communicates with physicians regarding changes in resident's conditions, diagnostic test results, etc.Documents assessments and care in compliance with standards of care and company policy.Educates patients and their families on health-related issues.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Performs other duties as assigned. LVN / LPN RequirementsQualificationsGraduate of an accredited school of Nursing.Valid State licensure as an LPN / LVN.Current CPR certification.Physical Demands & EnvironmentShift work may be required. Employee is frequently required to stand, walk, use hands or fingers, reach with hands and arms, feel, talk and hear. Employee is occasionally exposed to blood or other body fluids, fumes or airborne particles and toxic or caustic chemicals. In compliance with applicable law, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the position. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Lvn-Lpn Job in Austell,Full Time Employee,"Austell, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/lvn-lpn-job-austell-ga-us-178637712.aspx?mescoid=2900530001001&jobPosition=4,,,dd5ef4b67523c8ffa11fe6466347fb82
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:17:48:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Under the direction of the OEM Business Development Manager, the OEM Business Development Specialist is responsible for identifying, initiating, and driving sales processes for large, high volume OEM opportunities. The specialist will be responsible for a variety of topics when developing these large opportunities such as strategic account planning, technical solution development, internal resource coordination, commercial requirements, and other aspects as needed. Support national strategy to hunt for and increase business with large, serial OEMsActively hunt, penetrate, and develop new OEM relationships and opportunities in various industry segmentsEngage in Team-selling with area Sales Engineers and Industry Segment Specialists at target OEM accountsDriver of strategy development for selected OEM accountsProactive development of customer relationship, primarily through technical support and interfacingIdentification and research of lesser known industry segments and new OEMs/contacts within these segmentsAct as project manager/liaison/advocate internally at Festo for target OEMsGrow the total turnover amongst large OEMs in the USABachelor’s Degree in Engineering or Business, technical degree preferred3+ years AutomationExperience and knowledge gained from working with large OEMsExperience in changing over series machine production from Competitor products to FestoExperience in position as a specialist or similar in which influencing without authority was a part of the job is preferredExperience in finding and developing brand new customers",OEM Business Development Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/oem-business-development-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-178561522.aspx?mescoid=4100691001001&jobPosition=4,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,07f69367b2ada4b40f82f9b4823ed475
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:17:48:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"For Mindtree, *Welcome to possible* is more than a slogan - it reflects our approach to every engagement. We are among the fastest growing technology firms globally with more than 200 clients and offices in 14 countries. We deliver amazing results: Helping 150 million passengers fly safely. Improving security and performance for one of the world*s largest e-commerce stores. Unifying brand messaging and improving engagement for one billion consumers. Mindtree delivers technology services and accelerates growth for Global 1000 companies by solving complex business challenges with breakthrough technical innovations. Mindtree specializes in e-commerce, mobility, cloud enablement, digital transformation, business intelligence, data analytics, testing, infrastructure, EAI and ERP solutions. Welcome to possible. Location: Atlanta, GA Duration: FulltimeExperience: 5 to 7 years of Web Application developmentMandatory Skills: SF-Visual force,HTML5, CSS, Javascript, jQuery, AJAX, responsive design Secondary Skills: Angular Js/Handlebars, Karma·         Any public cloud experience (preferably Google cloud)·         Understand and Analyze requirements and enhancement to the system·         Design the Front End changes taking into consideration multi-browser compatibility and Performance·         Develop code, Prepare and Perform unit test cases·         Estimate the effort involved for technical activities·         Support production releases and ensure successful implementation of changes·         Troubleshoot front end issues reported in production",Visualforce Developer @ Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"For Mindtree, *Welcome to possible* is more than a slogan - it reflects our approach to every engagement. We are among the fastest growing technology firms globally with more than 200 clients and offices in 14 countries. We deliver amazing results: Helping 150 million passengers fly safely. Improving security and performance for one of the world*s largest e-commerce stores. Unifying brand messaging and improving engagement for one billion consumers. Mindtree delivers technology services and accelerates growth for Global 1000 companies by solving complex business challenges with breakthrough technical innovations. Mindtree specializes in e-commerce, mobility, cloud enablement, digital transformation, business intelligence, data analytics, testing, infrastructure, EAI and ERP solutions. Welcome to possible. Location: Atlanta, GA Duration: FulltimeExperience: 5 to 7 years of Web Application developmentMandatory Skills: SF-Visual force,HTML5, CSS, Javascript, jQuery, AJAX, responsive design Secondary Skills: Angular Js/Handlebars, Karma·         Any public cloud experience (preferably Google cloud)·         Understand and Analyze requirements and enhancement to the system·         Design the Front End changes taking into consideration multi-browser compatibility and Performance·         Develop code, Prepare and Perform unit test cases·         Estimate the effort involved for technical activities·         Support production releases and ensure successful implementation of changes·         Troubleshoot front end issues reported in production",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/visualforce-developer-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177556008.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=17,,Software/Web Development,36722ecc009f77671e4098e8a605df7a
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:16:59:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job This highly specialized group of children's teaching hospitals prides itself on the top-notch care that treats children as children and not just young adults. With 532-beds spread among 3 hospitals features nationally recognized pediatric specialties including centers of excellence in cardiac, cancer, emergency, neonatal, pulmonary, orthopedic and transplant services. Atlanta, Georgia (also known as ""Hotlanta"" and ""ATL"") is one of the country's ""hottest"" spots for music, nightlife, museums and dining of all kinds. You'll love the southern hospitality and the huge amount of festivals and parades. Atlanta also features loads of shopping, amusement parks, theatres and so much more! Report","Randstad Healthcare Job Application for Med Surg Nurse (RN) | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Randstad Healthcare Phone 800-919-9100 Address 30322,Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/med-surg-nurse-rn-job-atlanta-ga-us-178453769.aspx?mescoid=2900498001001&jobPosition=2,,,f50b5f4c88cbb04b7146eda54db13ac9
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:16:58:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is just for testing purpose. Please do not apply for the same.Essential Functions·          Demonstrate advanced use of test tools and is instrumental in increasing the use of automated testing on projects·          Create and maintain test case and test script documentation for complex custom software, which are complete, thorough, and clearly written; document, track, and communicate project testing risks, test results, status, defect analysis and unresolved problems for multiple projects and provide recommendations for improvements to the development team·          Provide high level of functionality, usability and testability expertise during requirements phase·          Test new and legacy custom applications, with or without the use of formal test cases/scripts·          Assist the development team in debugging and replicating issues·          Test for security risks – using such standards as OWASP·          Test Internet and client-server applications against specifications and documentation·          Analyze project data and provides recommendations to project manager on risks and issues that could seriously impact the success of the project – identifies risks introduced by changes to the software·          Serve as subject matter expert on all QA processes·          Gain and maintain familiarity with all operating environments",Project Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30339",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-178447676.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=10,65.00 - 70.00 $ /hour,,67edf957d1d700fd34b17c35d16a0377
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:15:50:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as temporary, seasonal Driver Helpers. This is a physical, fast-paced, outdoor position that involves continual lifting, lowering and carrying packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. It requires excellent customer contact skills and a lot of walking. As a Driver Helper you will not drive the delivery vehicle but assist the driver in the delivery of packages. Driver Helpers usually meet the UPS driver at a mutually agreed upon time and location each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays. Hours vary but usually begin after 8:00 a.m. and end before 8:00 p.m. Driver Helpers must comply with UPS appearance guidelines.Driver Helper seasonal opportunities are typically between the Thanksgiving and Christmas holiday time period.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",Delivery Associate Job in Smyrna,,"Smyrna, GA 30080",,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-associate-job-smyrna-ga-us-176329205.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=13,,Logistics/Transportation,3e9c845d6e363c3b0f7a6d30a3634bd6
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:15:48:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"MIDTOWN is looking for a Boxing/Kickboxing Instructor to add to our first class organization. About Our Company MIDTOWN Corporate Office is a pleasant work environment serving our upscale athletic clubs and club management partners across North America. Our team of associates is committed to exceptional performance, delivering our promise to members, and supporting a workplace where everyone can reach their full career potential. MIDTOWN ATHLETIC CLUBS is an industry leader in upscale fitness and sports resorts. Founded in 1970 as a single tennis club in Chicago, Midtown now has 8 full-service tennis and fitness facilities in the United States and Canada. To learn more, read Our Story. MIDTOWN HEALTH, sister company to Midtown Athletic Clubs, is a leader in fitness center management and employee wellness solutions for medically-integrated and corporate fitness centers throughout the United States. To learn more, click here. Position Summary As an integral part of the fitness team, our Boxing/Kickboxing Instructors inspire members through movement, community, and personal attention. They encourage active, social, and healthier lives by: Demonstrating professionalism, resilience, and optimism Engaging more members in more programs and with more coaches Developing and maintaining group fitness areas to promote an exceptional facility experience Committing to department responsibilities and working effectively within a team environment Strengthening industry knowledge through ongoing professional development Our Boxing/Kickboxing Instructors: Maintain at least one nationally-recognized certification in Group Fitness and one specialized qualification in Boxing or Kickboxing Commit to delivering multiple group fitness formats Have the capacity to grow member participation in group fitness classes Demonstrate effective written and verbal communication skills with the ability to deliver information clearly, concisely, and timely Possess ability to provide multisensory instruction: auditory, visual, tactile, kinesthetic Associate Benefits Full-time Midtown associates are eligible to receive a competitive compensation package and benefits plan including: group health, dental, life, vision, prescription drug program, flexible spending account, short/long term disability, matching 401k, professional development account, and a complimentary club membership. MIDTOWN is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Boxing/Kickboxing Instructor Job in Atlanta,Part Time,"Atlanta, GA 30339",Sports and Physical Recreation,http://jobview.monster.com/boxing-kickboxing-instructor-job-atlanta-ga-us-178131862.aspx?mescoid=2500389001001&jobPosition=12,,,75bbf4164fbb53f6948c12956c424d8c
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:15:47:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position will require--*Standing for duration of shift*Counting, matching, scanning, sorting*Reading slip sheets/order forms and follow written instruction*Previous warehouse and/or manufacturing experience*Knowledge of pallet jacks, machine operation, and/or forklift operation is a plusWorking hours: 1st/2nd/3rd ShiftSkills:Please apply to this posting to be consideredGet to know us. At Randstad, we're always looking for great people. Our customers rely on us to deliver them talented workers for a wide variety of positions. If you're looking for work, or looking to change jobs, come to our office and meet with our team.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Packing Associate Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/packing-associate-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178457873.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,11.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,a441ab2c22aa1cb041df267f9992e257
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:14:59:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Opportunity:A major healthcare provider located in Atlanta, is currently looking to hire friendly, experienced, and eager Cooks.Job Description: -Supports and participates in the continuous assessment and improvement of the quality if care and service provided-Uses standardized recipes to prepare menu items for the patients, the cafeteria, and for special functions-Review the patient/cafeteria/catering menu daily to insure that all required items are available and pulled using proper rotation methods -Uses proper techniques and maintains proper temperature when inspecting, handling, preparing, serving, and storing all items-Covers, label, and date all leftovers and uses proper methods of waste disposal-Keeps accurate records of the amount of each item used and amount left on hand -Demonstrates understanding and supports the family centered care and philosophy-Understands and complies with infection control, safety and OSHA procedures and regulations-Prepares late trays for patients or family members as neededRequirements: -Minimum high school graduate or equivalent. -Progressive culinary/kitchen experience typically obtained by completion of a formal degree / training program or 1 year of experience with institutional and batch cooking or a combination of education/training and experience. -High volume, complex food service operations experience - highly desirable. Catering experience a plus -Comprehensive knowledge of food and catering trends with a focus on quality, production, sanitation, food cost controls, and presentation -ServSafe certified - highly desirable -Previous work experience in a hospital food service setting is preferred-Ability to read, write and understand English-Ability to communicate well with othersAdditional Information:-Must be flexible in regards to days worked-Must be able to work rotating weekends-Must be able to pass screenings #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Cook Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30342",,http://jobview.monster.com/cook-job-atl-ga-us-178595879.aspx?mescoid=3500608001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),bad01b5fa15ce0773f52153ea10644fc
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:14:57:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you an experienced, hardworking and dependable forklift operator looking for a temp (to possibly permanent-depending on your work ethic) opportunity with a high-profile company in the College Park/Union City area?Apply for this job immediately, as these positions will go fast!Responsibilities will include loading and unloading, packing and unpacking, auditing, general housekeeping, kitting, inbound processing, scanning orders, shipping and receiving, put-a-way, data entry into computerized inventory control systems and inventory control. In addition, most positions will require you to operate powered equipment such as a forklift or hydraulic jack lift to perform duties. Will also be involved with solving a variety of potential warehouse issues, such as inventory variances, track and trace issues and to effectively communicate with both internal and external customers as necessary.Working hours: 1st shift and 2nd Shift (8-12 hours)Skills:- General knowledge warehouse terminology and tasks is required.- Applicant must have a minimum of 2 years experience with unloading, unpacking of shipments, pulling orders, performing inventory control, auditing and scanning.- General math knowledge.- Forklift experience and forklift certification is preferred. - Must be able to use computer and scanning equipment.- Must be able to read and speak English.- High School diploma or equivalent certification preferred.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30349",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-atlanta-ga-us-178458363.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=19,10.50 - 12.00 $ /hour,,e17a9239b577f4d86c6112c3d028d47a
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:14:11:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Bilingual Spanish or Bilingual French **$14-$16hr**Major Responsibilities:*Answer inbound calls from Merchants with inquiries regarding transactions processed at point-of-sale*First tier level support for technical problem resolution on point-of-sale activation*Professionally address Merchant issues in order to ensure prompt and satisfactory resolution*Provide timely, accurate and courteous responses verbally and via e-mail to internal DepartmentsQUALIFICATIONS\REQUIREMENTS:*High school degree or equivalent.*Strong verbal and written communication skills are critical. *Basic windows computer, internet and MS Office skills are needed.*Minimum 1 year prior call center experience preferred. We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1104690 Job Experience:,,Years of Experience Required:",Bilingual Customer Service Representative Job in Norcross,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Norcross, GA 30092",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-customer-service-representative-job-norcross-ga-us-178573458.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a082bd32822edd564829a952c7a737ee
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:13:50:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Description: The Production Manager is responsible for ensuring that production plans are executed, must be active in organizing and controlling the blow molding and auxiliary departments. The Production Manager ensures completion of preventative maintenance as outlined by machine specifications and guidelines. Has knowledge of various production orders; and ensures that all products meet customer specifications and is responsible for maintaining clean, safe work environment including planning and maintaining housekeeping procedures.Responsibilities: Works with site schedulers and cell leaders to plans production schedules, establishing priorities and sequences for manufacturing products. Develops plans for efficient use of materials, machines, and associates. Ensures products are in accordance with customer specified requirements, identifies areas in the process for improvements, leads or directs process improvement teams. Reports on the effectiveness and performance of the production activities to the Site Manager and Site Steering Team. Informs Conversion Manager of any changes in production. Meets with Cell Leaders to discuss improvements and work with teams to complete root cause analysis on issues identified in the process. Ensures that the Site Quality and Food Safety Policy, Operational Procedures and High Standards of Workmanship are maintained at all times. Ensures that heldware inventory is managed to ensure that plant targets are achieved. Converses with Blow molding cell leaders to prioritize work to be completed on their lines. Resolves machinery and quality problems in the conversion department. Responsible for maintaining a high level of motivation. Housekeeping and safety. Responsible for maintaining ISO standards in the conversion department. Member of the Site Steering Team. Responsible for reporting food safety issues to personnel with authority to initiate action. Initiate action for food safety issues. All other duties as assigned.Qualifications: A (B.A. or B.S.) in Industrial Technology or related field, with emphasis on plastics and / or related experience. Team oriented. Self - Motivation and flexibility of job assignments. Blend of technical, interpersonal skills. Must possess strong leadership skills. Strong interpersonal and written communication skills. Must be able to build a strong working relationship with employees on shop floor.https://loopapply.com/apply/62/E6BD63034023CFF18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Production Manager Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/production-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-177367888.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,12b215d56ccb70af584392d90f2e97d2
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:13:48:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position will oversee all performance activities within multiple locations, including, but not limited to, training, mentoring/motivating, business development, candidate recruiting, conflict resolution, customer service and retention, intra-business unit synergies, P&L responsibilities. This position is responsible to manage and develop a team as well as lead by example, particularly in the area of production.Develop process, strategy, and skills to improve sales productivity; leader by example particularly in the area of production; manage sale and delivery of products/services to achieve agreed end result; implement business plan; multi-site management; budget/forecast management; foster strategic alliances, business partnerships, and relationships with key clientsCollege degree requiredAdditional education preferredEXPERIENCE3-6 years experience with at least 5 years directly related experience in a management capacity. Industry vertical expertise preferredSKILLS REQUIRED: -Proven track record of quantified sales and service abilities within a similar environment-Ability to develop high performing consultants and teams-Strong customer focus and customer service skills-Excellent communication, interpersonal and organizational skills-Demonstrated experience managing large, complex accounts or projects-Must be detailed oriented with a concern for quality expressed by continually initiating system and process improvements-Strong management skills based on several years of experience, including people development and team building-Superior consulting, leadership, management, interpersonal and mentoring skills-May be responsible for a specific area of specializationEqual Opportunity Employer: Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.hours40+contact informationDavid Findleyemail",Regional Managing Director Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30092",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/regional-managing-director-job-norcross-ga-us-178446830.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=7,,,6fdaf5c4523f6cb7997c48bb541629ba
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:13:47:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theAustell area for same day auto partsdeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology driven to help you bestmanage your business from services provided to reliable invoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Austell area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer.  Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Austell, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25364 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Austell,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theAustell area for same day auto partsdeliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with 20+years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimization business. Partsfleet II is technology driven to help you bestmanage your business from services provided to reliable invoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Austell area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer.  Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Austell, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25364 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-austell-ga-us-178644858.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,6310c2a532025688cd6beeb0ea1bfbd2
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:13:00:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Lithia Springs is seeking quality forklift operators for temp to hire positions in the Lithia Springs/Austell area. Dexterity and strong hand-eye coordination are key in this role. Candidates need to display attention to safety precautions and common sense as well as the ability to maintain concentration over along period of time. Candidates with a strong sense of balance are preferred. The Forklift Operator is responsible for operating a forklift to stack and relocate material. The candidate is accountable for the safe and efficient operation of the vehicle and may also be required to perform other duties as assigned. Typical additional duties may include but are not limited to checking inventory, executing product counts, weighing and tagging products, using a bar code scanner, using a shrink wrapper, loading/unloading trucks, light cleaning of the warehouse and data entry.Working hours: All shiftsSkills:Minimum 6 months Forklift Operating experienceFlexibility to work in different environmentsStrong attention to detail and accuracyFor immediate consideration please send an updated resume and contact information to Tye Brooks via email at tye.brooks@randstadusa.com Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178465114.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=14,11.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,268ceea509843514fc607babbb312687
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:12:59:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Hi,Hope you are doing great today, This is Mohd from Intone Networks – Senior Recruitment Consultant. We are immediately seeking for a Disaster Recovery Project Manager             for one of our client located at Atlanta, GA for a 6 Months Contract. If you are interested or know someone who is looking for projects, Please apply by emailing the resume ASAP to  mohd.ahmed@intonenetworks.comalong with expected annual Salary, contact details with the best time to reach and discuss further about the position or you can reach me at 646-589-0560 Ext. 415.  Job Position: Disaster Recovery Project ManagerLocation: Atlanta, GA (Midtown Area)Duration: 6 Months Contract Note: LOCAL PreferredInterview Process: Phone + F2F Must Have:·         10+ years experience as a Project Manager includingo   On time completion of timelineso   Schedulingo   Trackingo   Reportino   Risk Analysiso   Cost Managemento   Change Managemento   Evaluation & Control of overall project ·         At least 2 recent projects as a PM managing technology Disaster Recovery projects·         Familiar with multiple disciplines of technology including:o   Networkingo   Serverso   Storageo   Applications·         Exceptional written and verbal communication skills Nice To Have:·         Experience managing data center disaster recovery projects.   ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------Thanks & Regards Mohd AhmedSenior Recruitment Consultant-Consulting ServicesInTone Networks Inc - USA | India | Asia Pacific | UAE | SAPh:- US: 646-589-0560 extn 415+1 888 851 8285 (F) E:  mohd.ahmed@intonenetworks.com | Url: www.intonenetworks.comConsulting | Technology | BPO | TrainingGo Green: Save paper, save trees, save the planet - Don’t print unless it is mandatory Report","Intone Networks Job Application for Disaster Recovery Project Manager | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Hi,Hope you are doing great today, This is Mohd from Intone Networks – Senior Recruitment Consultant. We are immediately seeking for a Disaster Recovery Project Manager             for one of our client located at Atlanta, GA for a 6 Months Contract. If you are interested or know someone who is looking for projects, Please apply by emailing the resume ASAP to  mohd.ahmed@intonenetworks.comalong with expected annual Salary, contact details with the best time to reach and discuss further about the position or you can reach me at 646-589-0560 Ext. 415.  Job Position: Disaster Recovery Project ManagerLocation: Atlanta, GA (Midtown Area)Duration: 6 Months Contract Note: LOCAL PreferredInterview Process: Phone + F2F Must Have:·         10+ years experience as a Project Manager includingo   On time completion of timelineso   Schedulingo   Trackingo   Reportino   Risk Analysiso   Cost Managemento   Change Managemento   Evaluation & Control of overall project ·         At least 2 recent projects as a PM managing technology Disaster Recovery projects·         Familiar with multiple disciplines of technology including:o   Networkingo   Serverso   Storageo   Applications·         Exceptional written and verbal communication skills Nice To Have:·         Experience managing data center disaster recovery projects.   ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------Thanks & Regards Mohd AhmedSenior Recruitment Consultant-Consulting ServicesInTone Networks Inc - USA | India | Asia Pacific | UAE | SAPh:- US: 646-589-0560 extn 415+1 888 851 8285 (F) E:  mohd.ahmed@intonenetworks.com | Url: www.intonenetworks.comConsulting | Technology | BPO | TrainingGo Green: Save paper, save trees, save the planet - Don’t print unless it is mandatory",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/disaster-recovery-project-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-177227588.aspx?mescoid=1300097001001&jobPosition=16,,,0da89b9a0c90f7da016e80e44ace2d68
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:12:09:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Opportunity: A company located in the Decatur area is looking for motivated individuals who work well under pressure and are able to multi-task. This company offers cutting edge technology, on-site training, a climate controlled work environment and a professional work culture.We are seeking an Inventory Control to become an integral part of our team! You will help coordinate incoming and outgoing shipment activities.Responsibilities:•Assemble, address, stamp, and ship merchandise or material•Unpack, verify, and record incoming merchandise or material•Arrange appropriate transportation of productsQualifications:•Must be detail oriented, able to sit for long periods of time, able to read and write English, computer literate, and work independently.•Ability to handle physical workload•Ability to multitask and prioritize•Ability to thrive in fast-paced environment•Strong organizational skillsREQUIREMENTS:*MUST be able to pass the following pre screening: Criminal Background, Drug-screen and have a CLEAN CREDIT HISTORY.*Must be flexible to work weekends when needed! #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Inventory Control Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30329",,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-control-job-atl-ga-us-178595789.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),b9ff2cfe0ad9a38c7d53292526426e35
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:12:09:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"#TrackingJobBody table, #TrackingJobBody a {<br /> display: none;<br />}<br />Description The Senior Warehouse Technician will be responsible for ensuring the effective and efficient flow of Supplies, Assets, Inventory and Consumables that flow in and out of the Warehouse. This position is internally known as a Sr. Operations Specialist. Responsibilities:Assist and maintain an effective materials supply department by carrying out all shipping and receiving duties in accordance with company policies and proceduresOrders/Service Requests, monthly inventory countsArrange the warehouse supplies in a productive, logical manner and maintain it in the same mannerAccountable to track all shipments for KPI’s, as identified by ManagementEnsure the purchase of materials and services are performed as required and consistent with policies and approval levelsEnsure all products are managed, arrangement and used in according to first in first out (FIFO) rules and maintain Par Levels to meet business demandsProvide management with real time data and reports when requiredAct as the department lead and site managerProvide assistance to other departments as neededPerforms other duties and tasks as assigned from time to time by management and will be required by the needs of the Clean Harbors business RequirementsHigh school diploma or equivalent required2+ years of warehouse or inventory/ management experience.Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office (Outlook, Excel, Word)Forklift experience would be an assetExcellent organizational and time management skillsExcellent interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills that will promote effective communication between customers and internal management  --- Safety-Kleen Systems, a Clean Harbors Co., has a commitment to excellence deeply rooted in a strong sense of tradition. Our entire business model revolves around keeping North American businesses green. We generate more than $1.2 billion in annual revenue as a world-class environmental service organization and market leader in industrial hazardous waste management, parts-cleaning technology, and oil re-refining. We collect over 200 million gallons of used motor oil each year and we have the largest re-refinery capacity in North America allowing us to re-refine more than 150 million gallons each year. We have more than 4,300 employees across the United States, Puerto Rico, and Canada. Together, we are building on almost half a century of innovation by developing new products and services to serve the changing needs of our thousands of customers across a broad range of industries and markets, from local auto shops to major corporations and government agencies. Every day, we help our customers resolve their waste management needs and reduce their carbon footprint. PROTECTION. CHOICES. PEOPLE. MAKE GREEN WORK. ™*CH Potential Applicants: We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against applicants due to veterans status or on the basis of disability.",Senior Warehouse Technician Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-warehouse-technician-job-tucker-ga-us-177289764.aspx?mescoid=4300743001001&jobPosition=7,,Logistics/Transportation,2110d75c0bcdd2013d6ad286a34943bb
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:12:08:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Environmental Services Technician Responsibilities:Clean building floors by sweeping, mopping, scrubbing, or vacuuming them. Gather and empty trash. Service, clean, and supply restrooms. Clean and polish furniture and fixtures. Clean windows, glass partitions, and mirrors, using soapy water or other cleaners, sponges, and squeegees. Dust furniture, walls, machines, and equipment. Steam-clean or shampoo carpets. Greet patients, visitors, and customers in a kind and professional manner Qualifications:2+ years of cleaning/janitorial experience 2+ years of customer service experience Strong record of attendance and punctuality in previous positions Must be able to pass background check. drug screen and nicotine testing #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",st Shift Environmental Services Tech Job in Atl,Full Time Employee,"Atl, GA 30342",,http://jobview.monster.com/1st-shift-environmental-services-tech-job-atl-ga-us-178596301.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),20accfc6689a785af5daa3de1ae84849
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:12:08:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"TRC Staffing is in current need of General Warehouse Labor to work for one of North America's leading manufacturers of corrugated and consumer packaging Must be able to read a tape measure/ruler. Lift 40-50lbs. Candidates will be working on production floor doing various jobs such as feeding machines, taking off lines, stacking product, cleaning etc.; occasional Saturdays and SundaysMust be comfortable with overtimeContract to Hire Comfortable working in a plant environment Must be 18 years of ageMust be able to pass a Background & Drug Screen Ability to work in an un-air conditioned environment, hot environment RequirementsJob Details#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Laborer Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",,http://jobview.monster.com/laborer-job-norcross-ga-us-178638306.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=18,,Experienced (Non-Manager),9701cb53e63cfffaec2c9091cad6811c
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:12:03:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"Must be willing to work alternate shifts, weekends, and daily overtime as required. Looking for a motivated individual who can function in a flexible, fast paced production environment. Need individuals who understand the needs of the business while maintaining a focus on safety, customer satisfaction, quality, and productivity.Working hours: Monday-Friday 3:00 pm-11:00 pmSkills:-Production Machine Set-up-Able to read factory orders-Able to read stacking product-Accurately completing quality and administrative documents, and following directions-Assist in running corrugating or finishing machines to achieve plant goals, including working safely-Maintaining/improving productivity according to established methods and goals-Secure raw materials-Participate in crew meetings-Reduce waste-Actively participate in team problem solving processes-Maintain quality standardsQualifications:-High School Diploma (or GED) is required-One to two years experience in an industrial or manufacturing environment is required-Experience in the corrugated or converting industry is preferred, but not requiredRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Machine Operator Helper Job in Lithonia,Full Time Employee,"Lithonia, GA 30058",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/machine-operator-helper-job-lithonia-ga-us-178465157.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=1,12.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,fa90e95ef043cad47f765c1a691a0138
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:11:54:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is seeking a Bilingual Accounts Payable Specialist in Atlanta, GA.Essential Functions: Review all invoices for appropriate documentation and approval prior to payment for Puerto Rico location - this includes matching purchase orders (P.O.'s) and receiving paperwork to invoices Apply the proper general ledger (G/L) coding to the invoice Prioritize invoices according to cash discount potential and payment terms Input all payables for scheduled check runs Reconcile vendor statements, research price/quantity discrepancies, and take corrective action to resolve the discrepancy Correspond with vendors and answer inquiries as neededREQUIREMENTS: 2+ years of experience in Accounts Payable and 3-way matching Must be fluent in English and Spanish Professional communication skills, verbally and in email communication in SpanishKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Bilingual Accounts Payable Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Atlanta, GA 30349",,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-accounts-payable-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-177640565.aspx?mescoid=4300700001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,043d56cc10e86ce132d6e33629293828
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:11:54:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"About the Opportunity:Our client, located in the Norcross area, is currently hiring for Forklift Operators on 1st, 2nd and 3rd shift within their distribution center.Our client is ranked among the nation's largest, and most rapidly expanding distributors of electrical supplies.Responsibilities:To perform physical and clerical warehouse duties such as the picking and verifying orders, loading trucks, shipping of materials, receiving, storing and put away.Operation of forklift. Requirements:Prior warehouse experience is a MUST.Must have 2 years of forklift experience. Must be 21 years of age.Must have basic math skills.Must be able to lift 40 lbs. on a frequent basis. A high school diploma or equivalent is required. Must have fairly good experience on computers- data entry, entering orders into a spreadsheet.If this opportunity sounds like something you would be interested in, please apply now by clicking the 'Apply Now' button. The only way to learn more is by stepping forward. #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",FORKLIFT OPERATOR Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-norcross-ga-us-178595453.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c6631282b379cede14e72c37480f6a0f
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:11:54:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Seeking experienced Forklift Operator(s) for temp and temp to hire opportunities in the Lithia Springs area.*at least 6 months recent experience is needed*most immediate need is for Reach or Order Picker operators*inventory and/or shipping/receiving experience is preferredWorking hours: 1st or 2nd ShiftSkills:High school Diploma or GED may be required.Prior experience is a must.Ability to work in different environmentsAdditional screening/testing will be requiredRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Forklift Operator Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/forklift-operator-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178464645.aspx?mescoid=5301079001001&jobPosition=16,10.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,2185f8ce351aa471c059faca03b9fb89
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:11:49:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you draw energy from being part of a team, this might be a good job for you! Beacon Hill Staffing Group (Associates Division; Alpharetta Office) is recruiting for a premier national commercial and consulting real estate services company for a Broker Assistant for their Buckhead office. The Broker Assistant will contribute to a best-in-class boutique sales team by providing direct support to several brokers. If you live for multiple people coming at you all day long with requests, this role's for you!This position's primary responsibility: leverage the marketing collateral (creating advertisements, posting photos and videos of available properties, producing brochures and fliers, planning events, scheduling property tours and answering questions about advertised properties) for business development purposes as well as to support of our clients research/analysis of commercial retail real estate market data. This position will play a large role in gathering and maintaining data for the purposes of marketing commercial properties. This position is supporting, administratively, several commercial sales managers so you will never be sitting watching the clock!Technical skills (currently using):Adobe InDesigncomLinkedIn, Twitter, Blogs, etc.Knowledge or experience:Producing graphical documents, including maps, pictures, floor plans, etcKnowledge of the real estate terminologyResearching and analyzing of propertiesMaintaining various sales databasesExcellent computer skillsStrong organizational skillsPreparation of marketing collateral, and submittal of account related dataHours:8:30a-5:30pExperience Required: College degreeSalesForceAdobe InDesignHourly Pay: $40-50kOffer contingent upon satisfactory completion of the following:If interested in this role, please visit https://www.beaconhillstaffing.com/Job-Seekers/Find-a-Job and apply immediately!!Beacon Hill is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values the strength diversity brings to the workplace. Individuals with Disabilities and Protected Veterans are encouraged to apply.Find Us on Facebook!Follow Us on Twitter!Company Profile:Founded by industry leaders to set a new standard in search, career placement and flexible staffing, we deliver coordinated staffing solutions with unparalleled service, a commitment to project completion and success and a passion for innovation, creativity and continuous improvement.Our niche brands provide direct hire, executive search, temporary staffing, contract consulting and temp/contract-to-hire solutions to emerging growth companies and the Fortune 500 across market sectors, career specialties/disciplines and industries.Â Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.Learn more about Beacon Hill Staffing Group and our specialty divisions, Beacon Hill Associates, Beacon Hill Financial, Beacon Hill HR, Beacon Hill Legal, Beacon Hill Pharma and Beacon Hill Technologies by visitingÂ www.beaconhillstaffing.com.We look forward to working with you.Beacon Hill. Employing the Futureâ„¢",Broker Assistant Job in Buckhead,Full Time Employee,BuckheadGA,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/broker-assistant-job-buckhead-ga-us-177275515.aspx?mescoid=4300706001001&jobPosition=6,,Marketing/Product,94fb0ad9cbf8c8bf0ff00875e4361d14
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:11:48:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Facility located in East Point, Georgia is seeking qualified candidates for the position of Assemblers.This is a food processing facility that prepares and packages food items for retail food chain stores. In this position you will be: Preparing Sandwiches, Snacks, Packaging.This position involves food preparation so you will be in a facility that is at all times 38 degrees or less in temperature. Pay: $ 7.70 hourlyAbility for Advancement: Temp-HireShift: First (5:30am-2:00pm) 2 days off a weekLocation: East Point,Ga 30344BREAKFAST AND LUNCH WILL BE PROVIDED DAILY, FOR FREE!Dress Code: Must have NON-SLIP SHOES***Public Transportation does not run at 530am at this location. YOU MUST HAVE RELIABLE TRANSPORTATION.***MUST HAVE VALID PHOTO IDWorking hours: 5:30 am- 2:00pmSkills:To qualify as a candidate, you must:Be able to stand for at least 8 hours at a timeBe able to endure a constant temperature of 38 degrees or lessMust be reliable and possess a high work ethic.Must pass a Multi-state background check and pass Drug TestMUST POSSESS THE ABILITY TO WORK WITH A TEAM OF EMPLOYEES.TO CHECK THE STATUS OF YOUR APPLICATION, Please send me an Email and be sure to include your First, Last name, and your phone number.Christopher HarrisonChristopher.harrison@randstadusa.com 770-960-0607 1060 Eagles Landing Pkwy, Stockbridge, Ga 30281Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Food Assembler Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30348",RetailOther/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/food-assembler-job-atlanta-ga-us-178688554.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=4,7.70 - 7.70 $ /hour,,bc284f58e681e9639e7e0ec6928ac089
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:56:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Technologies is seeking multiple candidates for multiple openings of applications/customer service specialists.If you wish to apply directly or get additional information, please contact Roger.Duckworth@randstadusa.com JOB DESCRIPTIONSoftware Technical Support with Customer Service experience needed!The Client Technical Support Specialist I will be responsible for tier 1 troubleshooting. The Client Support Specialist I will be responsible for all incoming customer contacts through phone, email, and cases. They will provide quick resolution, timely escalation, and ongoing communication until an issue is resolved. Software knowledge and communication is essential for this role.Major Responsibilities/Activities- Provide front line support including phone and case volume for client issue resolution- Follow specified troubleshooting steps to identify root cause of issue- Communicate with empathy and appropriate sense of urgency- Handles incoming Accounts Receivable Payments & E-Commerce purchases- Ability to follow attendance policy and adhere to set schedule- Create and update case tickets in the CRM (Client Relationship Management) database as required to appropriately route issue tickets or questions, and document resolution.- Provide correct and detailed information to relay back to product owners and technical teams- Gain and demonstrate ongoing industry and product knowledge- Work with the sales team and Success team to create the best customer experience possible- Strive for one contact resolution where possible- Handoff success related items to the appropriate team and with sufficient detail to both internal and external stakeholders- Escalate issues to tier 2 with a clear handoff, and communication to clients, as appropriate- Proactively work to prevent future client issues through attention to detail when working through current issue- Gain and demonstrate ongoing process and product knowledge.- Continuously follow up with client on status of issue within Service Level Agreement- Strive to achieve product specialist status with multiple key products- Forge partnership with technical teams to aid in faster resolution of customer issues- Maintain departmental standards for quality & satisfaction metrics- Strive to achieve quarterly goals- Consistently demonstrate the Customer Care motto of ""Creating a fun and effortless experience to help people find people!""- Ability to defuse escalated clients and create equitable resolutions to issuesJOB REQUIREMENTSBachelor's degree in Business, Computer Science or applicable field of study preferred.- 6 months of relevant business experience.- Affinity for process improvement- Above average communication skills via phone and writing- Above average organizational and time management skills.- Ability to convey technical solutions in everyday language- Ability to receive feedback and make appropriate changes.- Team player- Above average Business Acumen- Above average level of technical expertise- Ability to overcome obstacles and proceed with positive outlook- Above average understanding of the importance of customer experience- Previous experience with SaaS technical support (preferred)- Desire and willingness to learn every day- Above average multitasking skills",Level  Software Application Solutions Support / Customer Service Specialist Job in Norcross,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Norcross, GA 30092",,http://jobview.monster.com/level-1-software-application-solutions-support-customer-service-specialist-job-norcross-ga-us-178643672.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=16,,,593907eb970233d269209fad928aa66c
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:56:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you. (NYSE: XPO)Job Summary:  Responsible for the direct supervision of assigned department or functional group.  Supervises and coordinates activities of workers by determining work procedures, prepares work schedules, and expedites workflow by properly utilizing employees and their hours.  Assigns duties and examines work for conformance to policies and procedure.  Maintains harmony among workers and resolves personnel issues.   Responsible for supervising team or typically non-exempt associates; includes providing training, monitoring work quality, coaching employees on performance and contributing to employee pay decision/changes;  responsible for the quality of results produced by the team. Supervises and coordinates activities of workers by determining work procedures, preparing work schedules, and expediting workflow by properly utilizing employees and their hours. Essential Functions:Work with operations manager to define requirements for operations and ensure that the implementation of new strategies and initiatives to effectively meet or exceed these requirements as well as customer expectations  Assigns duties and monitors work completion for accuracy             Manages performance continually; develops associates by providing training and coaching.Maintains a safe work environment and fosters a positive team dynamic, resolving employee relations issues and administering corrective action as requiredLead start-up activities with cross functional teams                       Responsible for exceeding customer metrics (cost, quality, and responsiveness)Responsible to make recommendations regarding hiring, terminating, performance evaluations, and promotions.                Daily interaction with internal and external customer is requiredPersonnel scheduling to support all shifts and accounts, plan and organize staff workload              Maintain documentation of processes that are followed by the department  Prepare documentation pertaining to account requirements and update as needed to meet changes in customer requirements, and/or changes in processes defined by XPO Worldwide.Train associates so an up to date understanding of processes, policies and procedures are maintained. Scope and Accountability: Responsible for supervising a team of typically non-exempt employees; includes providing training, monitoring work quality, coaching employees on performance and contributing to employee pay decisions/ changes; responsible for the quality of results produced by the team. Evaluates options under circumstances that are not covered by procedures. Qualification Requirements:Knowledge:. BA Degree, Degree in Logistics or related field preferred. (experience may substitute for education). Skills: Understanding of Transportation Operations and Supply Chain ManagementStrong organizational and time management skills; specifically documentation of all issues, communication with customersStrong systems aptitude and must be proficient in MS Office application, with emphasis on Outlook, Word and Excel.  Production and labor planning/optimizationExperience with Warehouse Management Systems (WMS)- Material handling equipment and storage medium.  Distribution & Inventory managementSecurity and Safety: OSHA, EH&S and MSDS regulations/compliance knowledgeSafety programs knowledgePlanning--Strategic and/or TacticalGenerate and Communicate metrics reporting.  Operational executionQuality management system knowledgeLEAN Warehousing ISO Knowledge   *System process / orientationExperience in ERP systems.Personnel ManagementKnowledge of behavioral interviewing & selection processDelegation and review of workGoal settingCommunicationWritten and verbal skills with peers, subordinates, management and customers.  Meeting Facilitation.                   LeadershipExhibits judgment in leading others to objectivesPersonal ownership and accountabilityPositive corporate citizenDevelopment of employees                                     Provide challenging and level-appropriate assignmentConstructive feedback (delivering and receiving)Decision Making and Problem Solving                  Able to use systematic approach in decision-making                   Exhibit judgment and understanding of issues               Team OrientationCommitment to taskVersatility--able to modify personal stylePartnership             Experience: This position requires 2-4 years managerial experience (Education may substitute for years of experience) providing overall direction, implementation, and continuous improvement of logistics solutions in all phases of warehousing and distribution.     Physical Demands and Work Environment:Physical Demands:  While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands or finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk and hear.  Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and the ability to adjust focus. Work Environment:  The duties of this job are performed in both an office environment and a light industrial environment, thereby experiencing some minor to moderate level of noise due to office equipment and industrial equipment.    We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, disability, veteran, or other protected status.",Lithia Springs Sup Ops Job in Lithia Springs,"Full Time, Employee","Lithia Springs, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/lithia-springs-sup-ops-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178652850.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=18,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,af845fcd316caf8d93a6ca1f2e4034ef
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:55:37,No,jobs.monster.com,"Broadcasting company in Midtown, Atlanta is seeking a Spanish and English speaking candidate to assist their Public Relations team! Please apply if you are a Spanish and English speaking Public Relations candidate. Update digital monthly PR websites for movies and series networks Handle preparation of specific digital press kits Prepare mailchimp format press kits for special promotions Provide all material/information requested by agencies/media/offices, such as photos and videos (PR Agencies)Translations of documents/articles (Colombia office and Caribbean outlets)Communication with vendorsTravel arrangements Administrative tasks, such as reserving meeting rooms, hiring catering, hiring transportation, etcCreate Clipping reports on Power Point or similar softwareCreate a monthly mini report of news on the industry.Working hours: 9-6Skills:Efficiency in:CMS for content administration in webpages (wordpress)Mailchimp platformPower PointWordExcelGoogle Analytics (plus)Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Bilingual Public Relations Assistant Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30309",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-public-relations-assistant-job-atlanta-ga-us-178638551.aspx?mescoid=2700438001001&jobPosition=19,20.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,,19776b937805bcbbe98038f900b2c286
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:42:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Senior SQL Server Database Administrator ·             Minimum 10 years’ experience ·        SQL Server certifications – MCSE 2005, 2008, 2012 (all preferred, 2008 required)·        Install and configure MS Windows O/S for SQL Server in VMware environment·        Install and configure MS-SQL Server 2008 & 2012 software·        Create, maintain, backup/restore, tune databases for development, test, and production·        Use MS-SQL Server Management Studio (SSMS) to automated processes to implement database changes·        Create shell scripts to automate various DBA tasks·        Communicate with application vendors to install, configure necessary SQL Server components to support purchased applications·        Work closely with Systems Administrator to plan, configure, and tune servers for optimal SQL Server performance.        Must be available 24/7 for emergencies Report","RapidIT Job Application for Senior SQL Server DBA | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Contact name Vijaya Rao Phone 678-256-3389,,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-sql-server-dba-job-atlanta-ga-us-178684144.aspx?mescoid=1500130001001&jobPosition=3,,,03e7cc951a40d2331de47db26cf74020
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:42:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking for Great people to work in a Manufacturing Facility in Union CityWe are looking for people to package the salad dressings as the come off the linesIn this position you will be required to make the boxes as wellThe Facility is climate controlled They do rotate your position throughout the dayWorking hours: all shifts openSkills:Must have a High Diploma Must be willing to work weekends as neededMust be available for OTRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Picker/Packer Job in Fairburn,Full Time Employee,"Fairburn, GA 30213",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/picker-packer-job-fairburn-ga-us-178468149.aspx?mescoid=4300744001001&jobPosition=13,8.00 - 8.00 $ /hour,,45f04aae46e66b62822f0a7f391bd07e
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:42:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Hawthorn Retirement Group is growing.  No, I mean really growing!  It’s the sort of growth you’d be crazy not to want to be a part of... We are a senior housing company, managing independent living and assisted living retirement communities throughout the U.S. and Canada.  Currently in the Atlanta area we have three open communities (Alpharetta, Johns Creek, and Roswell). We hire great people that want to make a positive difference in our residents’ lives.  Our employees understand hospitality, integrity and compassion.   Right now we are looking for Live-In Management Couples that have a passion for serving older adults with proven customer service and strong marketing and management/supervisory skills to assist in the management of the day-to-day operations of our retirement community.  We offer competitive salary, vacation, insurance benefits, housing, meals, and utilities.  If you are interested in this position, please send a cover letter with resumes for both of you to Jeff Roderick at Hawthorn.Hiring@HawthornRet.com. If you have any questions about these management team opportunities, please call Jeff at 844-842-0591.  HAWTHORN RETIREMENT GROUP IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER Report","Hawthorn Retirement Group Job Application for Live-In Management Couple – Senior Housing Management Team Opportunities | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Contact name Jeff Roderick Phone 844-842-0591 Fax 360-213-1540 Address 9310 NE Vancouver Mall Drive, Suite 200Vancouver, WA 98662",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/live-in-management-couple-%E2%80%93-senior-housing-management-team-opportunities-job-atlanta-ga-us-178645394.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,,,a39cbc9b8dae26a1faa111ea0307b63b
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:31:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently seeking ambitious and personable candidates to serve as Pest Control Technicians. You will make service calls to residential customers and apply anti-pest treatments as outlined in job orders. In addition, you will identify opportunities to up-sell additional products and services – and receive additional commission income for doing so. This is a fantastic opportunity for you to start a career right out of high school with comprehensive paid training and plenty of room for advancement. We’ll even help you to get your licensure / certification! Come and see why so many of our employees have made Terminix their career home. We’re looking forward to hearing from you! This position is within our Terminix brand. ServiceMaster is a leading provider of essential residential and commercial services, operating through an extensive service network of more than 8,000 company-owned locations and franchise and license agreements. The company’s portfolio of well-recognized brands includes American Home Shield (home warranties), AmeriSpec (home inspections), Furniture Medic (furniture repair), Merry Maids (residential cleaning), ServiceMaster Clean (janitorial), ServiceMaster Restore (disaster restoration) and Terminix (termite and pest control). The company is headquartered in Memphis, Tenn. Go to www.servicemaster.com for more information about ServiceMaster or follow the company at twitter.com/ServiceMaster or Facebook.com/ServiceMaster. Applies company pesticide products to residential locations according to schedule and as needed based on service requests; calls customers to confirm scheduled services; completes required production forms; assists in sales to current customers. Responsibilities 1. Applies company pesticide products to residential locations according to schedule, safety procedures, label instructions, and as needed based on service requests. 2. Drives company vehicle to customers’ houses or places of business. 3. Calls customers to confirm scheduled services. 4. Responds on a timely basis to customers’ requests for telephone and in-person service calls. 5. Completes required production forms at end of daily route. 6. Maintains vehicle and equipment in clean and proper operating condition. 7. Assists in sales to current customers through contact on route. Education and Experience Requirements • High school diploma or general education degree (GED); or one to three months related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities • Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence, and memos. • Ability to write simple correspondence. • Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one and small group situations to customers, clients, and other employees of the organization. • Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. • Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs. • Maintains licenses/certificates as required by federal, state, or local regulations. • Maintains valid driver’s license. Disclaimer The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by associates assigned to this classification. They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified. All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed. ServiceMaster is committed to Diversity and Inclusion. We encourage diverse candidates to apply to this position. An Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer – of Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability",Pest Control Technician – Field Service Rep (Entry Level) Job in College Park,"Full Time, Employee","College Park, GA",Accounting and Auditing Services,http://jobview.monster.com/pest-control-technician-%E2%80%93-field-service-rep-entry-level-job-college-park-ga-us-178006779.aspx?mescoid=3700625001001&jobPosition=20,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c642ad3aef62cd2321acb2a6f69748e8
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:31:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Worldwide Leader in Material Handling Automation has immediately openings for experience Maintenance Technicians.BENEFITS INCLUDE:Benefits - competitive wage and excellent benefit package including health, dental, vision, life, STD, LTD, 401(k) with matching contribution and profit sharingBalance - generous PTO (paid time off) policy, paid holidays and special leave daysGrowth Potential - individual developmental opportunities through comprehensive on the job training and tuition reimbursement programWorking Environment - characterized by an open door policy, trust and appreciation shown to all colleaguesCORE RESPONSIBILITIES:Supporting the operation of an automated material handling systemControl and supervision of technical equipment and systemsMaintenance and repair of mechanical and electrical systems, while standing for extended periods of timeMust adhere to standard safety regulationsWork at heights of up to 90 feetContinuous walking, climbing and standingWorking hours: Flexible ShiftsSkills:MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:Candidate must possess electrical knowledge of up to 480 V. Frequency drive and PLC troubleshooting is a plusMust be flexible to work all shifts including weekendsGreat opportunity for a driven, self-starting individual with rapidly growing company across north americaCandidate must be able to pass drug screen and background testMinimum 1-2 years of relevant experienceTO APPLY YOU MUST HAVE RELATIVE EXPERIENCE AND UPLOAD YOUR MOST RECENT RESUME.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Experienced Maintenance Technician Job in Forest Park,Full Time Employee,"Forest Park, GA 30297",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/experienced-maintenance-technician-job-forest-park-ga-us-178461350.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=1,"41,600.00 - 52,000.00 $ /year",,2af65c0b14b21d339eb7f293936402cb
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:00:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production and Warehouse We need high-energy 2nd Shift Warehouse Associates after January 1, 2017!! Come join our professional team at a MAJOR supply chain warehouse in Union City, GA. The Warehouse Associates will focus on receiving, sorting, picking, assembling boxes, and shipping consumer goods. This is a chance to grow with a stable company. If you like to be on the move all day and seek opportunities to learn, then this is the place for you!Working hours: 5:30 p.m. - 3:30 a.m.Skills:Minimum Qualifications:--Motivation and high energy.--Ability to perform work standing up to 10 hours or more.--Push, pull, lift and/or carry repetitively up to 50 pounds.--Demonstrates safe lifting and work place habits.--Flexibility to work in other departments.--Frequent bending, stooping, reaching, grasping repetitive motion.--Must pass a background and drug test.--WE ARE ON THE BUS LINE!!!****Positions pay $9.65 an hour****In order to apply, please create a profile on www.randstadstaffing.com and post your application for the openings.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse General Labor nd Shift Job in Union City,Full Time Employee,"Union City, GA 30291",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-general-labor-2nd-shift-job-union-city-ga-us-178462276.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=16,9.65 - 9.65 $ /hour,,266cf053e65abdfb3d6d0f5c5966e9d6
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:10:00:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as temporary, seasonal Driver Helpers. This is a physical, fast-paced, outdoor position that involves continual lifting, lowering and carrying packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. It requires excellent customer contact skills and a lot of walking. As a Driver Helper you will not drive the delivery vehicle but assist the driver in the delivery of packages. Driver Helpers usually meet the UPS driver at a mutually agreed upon time and location each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays. Hours vary but usually begin after 8:00 a.m. and end before 8:00 p.m. Driver Helpers must comply with UPS appearance guidelines.Driver Helper seasonal opportunities are typically between the Thanksgiving and Christmas holiday time period.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",Delivery Associate Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA 30310",,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-associate-job-atlanta-ga-us-176328201.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=15,,Logistics/Transportation,da625b31e683b4aa640c81bc42c51d19
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:55:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionAs an Automated Logistical Specialist in the Army National Guard, you will learn the ins and outs of supply chain management, from storage and distribution to warehouse management and record keeping. Major duties include:Establishing and maintaining records, such as stock lists, inventory, material control, accounting, and supply reportsReviewing and verifying quantities received against bills of lading, contracts, purchase requests, and shipping documentsUnloading and storing incoming supplies and equipmentMaintaining stock locator system and administering document control proceduresProcessing requests and turn-in documents at direct support level through warehousing sectionPerforming prescribed load list and shop stock list duties in manual and automated supply applicationsPreparing, annotating, and distributing shipping documentsOperating material-handling equipmentYou will join a team that makes sure Guard units are equipped to respond to any challenges put before them. This vital position ensures the Guard's overall state of readiness while giving you the experience you need to begin or further a career in supply chain or warehouse management.Earn while you learnGet paid to learn! Join the Guard and you will learn valuable job skills while earning a regular paycheck and qualifying for tuition assistance.Automated Logistical Specialist job training requires 10 weeks of Basic Training, where you'll learn basic Soldiering skills, and 12 weeks of Advanced Individual Training (AIT), which includes practice in handling and storing stock. Part of this time is spent in the classroom and part in the field.Requires military enlistment. Applicants must meet minimum qualifications. Actual MOS assignment may depend on MOS availability. Benefits subject to change.Benefits/RequirementsBenefitsPaid trainingA monthly paycheckMontgomery GI BillRetirement benefits for part-time serviceLow-cost life insurance (up to $400,000 in coverage)401(k)-type savings planStudent Loan Repayment Program (up to $50,000, for existing loans)Healthcare Benefits AvailableRequirementsHigh School Diploma or GEDMust be between the ages of 17 and 35Must be able to pass a physical exam and meet legal and moral standardsMust meet citizenship requirements (see NATIONALGUARD.com for details)Most non-prior service candidates will earn between $196.26 and $254.91 per drill weekend.Programs and benefits are subject to change.This position may qualify for a bonus, ask your National Guard recruiter for the most up-to-date information.stLight.options({publisher:'dc1d43a6-e554-4b53-8d4f-9e82edc64815',embeds:true});",A Automated Logistical Specialist - Supply Chain Job in Ellenwood,Full Time Employee,"Ellenwood, GA 30294",,http://jobview.monster.com/92a-automated-logistical-specialist-supply-chain-job-ellenwood-ga-us-178216595.aspx?mescoid=1300084001001&jobPosition=8,,Entry Level,7ed8eaad3c616654388d1c7f437ff8a1
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:55:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Global Innovation and Manufacturing team is seeking an IoT Cloud Support Specialist to advance product evolution and development while ensuring terrific customer application experience (troubleshooting, analyzing and escalating customer issues). We need an experienced Cloud Customer Service Specialist to develop the process and tools to provide excellent field service and help desk support. We have a tremendous product and we need you to be sure we are doing all we can to enhance the our customers' user experience.We will help you relocate to Atlanta, GA or Dallas, Texas.If you are a Cloud Support Specialist, please read on!Top Reasons to Work with Us- Cutting edge technology- Tremendous team- Highly visible Project- Green technologyWhat You Will Be Doing- Develop and deploy product and help desk support - Evaluate, respond and escalate customer issues as required- Prepare and maintain test equipment- Ensure successful product launch and sustaining supportWhat You Need for this PositionMore Than 3 Years of experience and knowledge of:- Customer Support for technical products- Proven experience in quality improvement and customer support for cloud based services and mobile applications- Experience working with cross-functional teams and customers- Experience resolving, evaluating and escalating customer concernsSo, if you are a Cloud Support Specialist looking to lead the innovation charge, please apply today! Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""//media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","CyberCoders Job Application for Cloud Support Specialist | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee",Contact name Kristen Keswick,Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/cloud-support-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-178638456.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=8,,,8674352d0bae3b9ba819b6a9fd34821d
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:55:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad Lithia Spring is currently seeking a Machine Operator to work on a temp to hire basis at a client in the Lithia Springs/Austell area. The machine Operator is responsible for operating various machines on the production floor. Machine Operators are measured by the percentage of the end product that is free of defects, as well as the total amount of material damaged due to worker error. Job Duties:Job responsibilities may include but are not limited to standing for long periods of time, advanced mechanical skills, ability to read blueprints, maintaining concentration over a long period of time, ability to make quick decisions, inputting job specifications into the machine, inspecting materials, verifying paperwork and cleaning equipment to optimize output.Working hours: All shiftsSkills:Requirements:Minimum 6 months of prior experienceStrong verbal and communication skillsAttention to detail and accuracyFlexibility to work in different environmentsMathematical and manual calculation skillsFor immediate consideration, please send an updated resume and contact information to Tye Brooks at tye.brooks@randstadusa.com to schedule an interview.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Machine Operator Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/machine-operator-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178460347.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=19,13.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,,6c88358e9c78bbdc5e56f07064d077f1
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:46:48,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sells and promotes company products. The incumbent implements the sales plan designed to achieve established sales and financial goals; calls on prospective and current company customers; involves technical personnel to resolve customers issues and problems as needed; may participate in the establishment of sales targets and design of the territory's sales plan; and controls sales expenses.   Beckman Coulter is an equal opportunity employer.  We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, gender, age, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or any other characteristic protected by law. 2+ years experience, BS/BA degree",Representative II Sales Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30301",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsManufacturing - OtherMedical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/representative-ii-sales-job-atlanta-ga-us-178685413.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),520b05f0d823bcf90d268ab9cfb46cda
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:46:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"UPS is hiring individuals to work as temporary, seasonal Driver Helpers. This is a physical, fast-paced, outdoor position that involves continual lifting, lowering and carrying packages that typically weigh 25 - 35 lbs. and may weigh up to 70 lbs. It requires excellent customer contact skills and a lot of walking. As a Driver Helper you will not drive the delivery vehicle but assist the driver in the delivery of packages. Driver Helpers usually meet the UPS driver at a mutually agreed upon time and location each weekday (Monday through Friday) and typically do not work on weekends or selected holidays. Hours vary but usually begin after 8:00 a.m. and end before 8:00 p.m. Driver Helpers must comply with UPS appearance guidelines.Driver Helper seasonal opportunities are typically between the Thanksgiving and Christmas holiday time period.This job posting includes information about the minimum qualifications (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines), locations, shifts, and operations within the locations which may consider my application.  An applicant or employee may request an exception or change to, or an accommodation of, any condition of employment (including the UPS Uniform and Personal Appearance Guidelines) because of a sincerely held religious belief or practice.UPS is an equal opportunity employer – race/color/religion/sex/national origin/veteran/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity",Delivery Associate Job in Atlanta,,"Atlanta, GA 30336",,http://jobview.monster.com/delivery-associate-job-atlanta-ga-us-176329208.aspx?mescoid=5301046001001&jobPosition=14,,Logistics/Transportation,e841a2eec58b064ee5d257c6371a3249
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:09:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Admin Support Sales DepartmentMust have experience with CRMIn charge of making appointments for sales repsScheduling GoTo Meeting appointmentsProficient with OutlookGeneral Administration Clerical SupportWorking hours: 40Skills:Pay rate of 10.00 - 12.00 hourly. There is opportunity for more once hired on permanently. Everyone in the company starts off a the same pay rate and position and opportunity for advancement is available!Looking to make a decision ASAPRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Sales - Admin Supprt Job in Roswell,Full Time Employee,"Roswell, GA 30076",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-admin-supprt-job-roswell-ga-us-178468063.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=1,10.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,5ec0cb670504df3ef3844b1135bf85eb
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:05:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Alteryx Developer- Data Asset Planning Tool projectNorth Highland is a global consulting firm with a proven record of enabling great returns on our clients' investment. Our high-caliber employees offer deep experience and expertise across many diverse industries and service areas. We specialize in solving tough business challenges, being easy to work with, and nurturing long-standing relationships with the most recognizable brands in the world. Ask any of our clients, and they'll tell you.We have an exciting opportunity for an Alteryx Developer to work with a North Highland client on a 4-month long project, with the possibility of extending to one year!Skills:Alteryx experience (not only training)Prefer some general AWS experience and SQL/Database experiencePrefer prior ETL developer experience in Informatica or Datastage would be helpfulDuration:Statement of Work is for 4 months at a time, with a strong possibility of extension up to one yearLocation: At the client site in Atlanta; may have some flex to work remotely 1x per week North Highland is an equal employment opportunity company committed to diversity in the workplace.",Alteryx Developer Job in Vinings,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Alteryx Developer- Data Asset Planning Tool projectNorth Highland is a global consulting firm with a proven record of enabling great returns on our clients' investment. Our high-caliber employees offer deep experience and expertise across many diverse industries and service areas. We specialize in solving tough business challenges, being easy to work with, and nurturing long-standing relationships with the most recognizable brands in the world. Ask any of our clients, and they'll tell you.We have an exciting opportunity for an Alteryx Developer to work with a North Highland client on a 4-month long project, with the possibility of extending to one year!Skills:Alteryx experience (not only training)Prefer some general AWS experience and SQL/Database experiencePrefer prior ETL developer experience in Informatica or Datastage would be helpfulDuration:Statement of Work is for 4 months at a time, with a strong possibility of extension up to one yearLocation: At the client site in Atlanta; may have some flex to work remotely 1x per week North Highland is an equal employment opportunity company committed to diversity in the workplace.",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/alteryx-developer-job-vinings-ga-us-177882112.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=11,,IT/Software Development,de3ca71c4021039db08a874a56124266
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:05:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theNorcross area for same day autoparts deliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with20+ years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimizationbusiness. Partsfleet II is technology drivento help you best manage your business from services provided to reliableinvoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Norcross area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Norcross, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25367 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",Driver Job in Norcross,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Delivery Driver / Courier Needed with Large SUV or Minivan Partsfleet II is seekingprofessional, quality focused, independent contractors / owner operators in theNorcross area for same day autoparts deliveries. A solid and stable presence as an industry leader with20+ years of experience in the logistics planning and route optimizationbusiness. Partsfleet II is technology drivento help you best manage your business from services provided to reliableinvoice payment.   ThePartsfleet II Advantage:Flexibility based on the contractor’savailability. No overnight or “over the road” routes – Home every day. Weekly settlement paid by direct deposit atno extra charge. Details:*Optimal Vehicle:  Large SUV or Minivan *Contract(s) available in the Norcross area. *Daytime routes available Monday throughSaturday.*Opportunity perfect for individual seekingsupplemental income. *Smart phone preferred to meet customerscanning requirements. Independent contractors are subject to background checks, drug screens,and/or motor vehicle checks as required by customer. Respond online for more information today!  Respond online today.​ Location: Norcross, GA Type: Independent Contract Ad # : 25367 Vehicle Type: Minivan / SUV Click here to view full ad with details and Apply Online. All responses are done online.​ CBDriver.​com - CourierboardDriver.​com - a free website with driver wanted ads for Drivers",All,http://jobview.monster.com/driver-job-norcross-ga-us-178644862.aspx?mescoid=5301048001001&jobPosition=16,,Logistics/Transportation,b75d4886c804e3dc899803b3712c8a24
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:05:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:Kforce has a client that is searching for a Desktop Support in Atlanta, GA.Overview:The ideal candidate will provide frontline technical support and guidance in planning, implementation and ongoing operations of LAN's and WAN's, and implementation of end user computing applications and devices for Company Medical groups and business partners and employees. In general employees are responsible for responding to tickets (inquires or requests for services related to desktop hardware) originating from the National Service Desk. For requests that cannot be serviced over the phone, tickets are generated electronically and distributed via network queue to the relevant location or business line to be resolved by Desktop employees: Incident tickets: all secondary break/fix requests for electronic desktop equipment and Add/Move/change tickets: moving and installing new personal computers and/or ordering and replacing equipment for assigned areas (e.g. building/installing computers for a new office.) Each level includes the skills and duties from the previous level.Essential Functions: Accepts trouble reports including such activities as: handling system installation and configuration, printer systems, fundamentals of security, installing third-party software and documentation of hardware/software logs and operating procedures Provides excellent customer service to computer users May direct and distribute work each day by checking queue of tickets and assigning the incidents and/or moves/changes to the relevant Team members; coordinates Moves, Adds, and Changes to support complex LAN and WAN networks, including configuration, training, installation, maintenance, support and documentation of hardware/software logs and operating procedures Supervision Given and Received: Is competent in most phases of end user computing applications to work on own; typically works under the general direction of the team lead and/or supervision of ManagerREQUIREMENTS: High School diploma or General Education Development (GED) required Bachelor's degree in computer science or IS or four (4) years of experience in a directly related field preferred Minimum two (2) years of professional experience in end user computing and PC/Workstation based LAN applicationsAdditional Skills: Knowledge of mobile devices Current and recent knowledge of Windows, Lotus Notes, and Microsoft Office Suite of products Excellent customer service skills Problem solving and decision making skillsPreferred Qualifications: Some technical consulting experience preferred Microsoft Certifications or training and/or A+ preferredKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Desktop Support Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30309",,http://jobview.monster.com/desktop-support-job-atlanta-ga-us-178281930.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2c94567bb848e89fcab5c55db7eca24b
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:01:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production and Warehouse We need high-energy 1st Shift Warehouse Associates after January 1, 2017!! Come join our professional team at a MAJOR supply chain warehouse in Union City, GA. The Warehouse Associates will focus on receiving, sorting, picking, assembling boxes, and shipping consumer goods. This is a chance to grow with a stable company. If you like to be on the move all day and seek opportunities to learn, then this is the place for you!Working hours: 7:00 a.m. - 5:00 p.m.Skills:Minimum Qualifications:--Motivation and high energy.--Ability to perform work standing up to 10 hours or more.--Push, pull, lift and/or carry repetitively up to 50 pounds.--Demonstrates safe lifting and work place habits.--Flexibility to work in other departments.--Frequent bending, stooping, reaching, grasping repetitive motion.--Must pass a background and drug test.--WE ARE ON THE BUS LINE!!!****Positions pay $9.00 an hour****In order to apply, please create a profile on www.randstadstaffing.com and post your application for the openings.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse General Labor st Shift Job in Union City,Full Time Employee,"Union City, GA 30291",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-general-labor-1st-shift-job-union-city-ga-us-178462273.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=17,9.00 - 9.00 $ /hour,,ccdf4de67137b7a77e72ea415f6171cd
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:09:00:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Social Services Assistant DescriptionSummaryProvides services in support of responsibilities of the Social Services Department.Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesAssists in the completion of care plans and psychosocial assessments.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Coordinates care plan meetings with families.Helps resolve concerns of Resident and/or family.Makes room changes when necessary.Performs other duties as assigned. Social Services Assistant RequirementsQualificationsHigh School diploma or equivalent.Physical Demands & EnvironmentEmployee may be required to sit, bend, stoop, use keyboard, see, talk and hear. May occasionally lift medium to heavy objects including assisting with the movement of Residents. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Social Services Assistant Job in Austell,Full Time Employee,"Austell, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/social-services-assistant-job-austell-ga-us-178402535.aspx?mescoid=2100321001001&jobPosition=5,,,8368b006a5cb7f57a9f487319abc0e5d
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:08:21:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Requirements:Hard worker with a positive attitude. Must be able to stand up, and walk around facility for up to 8 hours.Must be able to thrive in a fast paced environmentMust work well with othersJob Description:Pull orders using a manual order slip, prepare item for shipping/delivery.Some inventory cycle counts required.Shift:Monday - Friday10 AM to 6 PMVery little OTFacility is NOT climate controlled.TEMP TO HIRE OPPORTUNITYWorking hours: 10 AM to 6 PMSkills:Minimum of 6 months previous warehouse experienceReliable TransportationYou MUST apply with your resume!Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Picker/Packer Job in Morrow,Full Time Employee,"Morrow, GA 30260",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/picker-packer-job-morrow-ga-us-178459683.aspx?mescoid=4300744001001&jobPosition=16,9.00 - 900.00 $ /hour,,5680d534b1b15bd773ac83dd7890454b
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:08:18:32,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a Commercial Sales Representative you will sell new and retreaded commercial truck tires and related products and services for a Goodyear Commercial Tire & Service Centers location. Duties include but are not limited to the following:- Managing current customer accounts.- Actively seeking new accounts and represent the company to potential customers.- Developing and maintaining a thorough knowledge of products and services to provide accurate information to customers. - Selling company supported products and services. - Meeting established sales and gross profit goals. - Evaluating customer needs and making recommendations utilizing the ""marketing approach to selling."" - Preparing weekly sales plans and completing all call reports following established company procedures. - Attending sales training and continually working to improve sales skills. - Implementing marketing programs to solicit new clients through cold calls, organizations, referrals, etc. - Scheduling fleet service appointments and coordinating appointments with the service department. - Conducting fleet needs evaluations and providing customers with cost analysis and benefits.- Ensuring prompt resolution of tire adjustments and ensuring that customer casings are handled appropriately. Delivering tires to customers as needed.- Maintaining company property in accordance with company policy.- Assisting with a variety of duties within the assigned location, such as attending to customers, maintaining inventory, moving and stacking tires, and other duties as required.This position operates in all types of indoor and outdoor work environments, therefore exposure to heat and cold is to be expected.Excellent safety and attendance performance is expected.Must be willing to follow all safety procedures and work in a safe manner.Must be able to work in a results-oriented, fast-paced environment as part of a team.Must be a self-starter and willing to take the initiative, able and willing to work without direct supervision, and be willing to attend appropriate training sessions.Must be willing to work for a base monthly salary plus commission.High School Diploma or GED preferred.At least one year of relevant sales experience is preferred.Good oral and written communication ability.Must be able to pass a background check including employment history, SSN verification, criminal history, etc.Must be able to pass a physical exam and drug test (hair-based).Must have a valid driver's license for the type of vehicle required for the position and be able to meet commercial driver qualification requirements, including be at least 21 years of age.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity",Commercial Sales Representative Job in Conley,Full Time Employee,"Conley, GA 30288",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/commercial-sales-representative-job-conley-ga-us-178282425.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=1,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,1481f7ff7cf692662084c2243dfe264b
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:08:18:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Atkins has been providing infrastructure planning, engineering, construction, environmental consulting, urban planning, architecture, and program management services to public and private clients across the United States for more than 50 years. Globally, Atkins is the largest UK-based engineering and design consultancy and one of the world's largest design firm with nearly 18,000 employees worldwide. We have the depth and breadth of expertise to respond to the most technically challenging and time-critical infrastructure projects and the urgent transition to a low-carbon economy. At Atkins, we offer our employees more than just a job; we offer an opportunity to shape the world for generations to come through innovative and sound design. Whether it’s the concept for a new skyscraper, the implementation of a new toll program, upgrade of a rail network, or the improvement of a management process, we plan, design and enable solutions. Within the Public & Private business we provide top-notch A&E services to our Public & Private clients across all aspects of the business including program management, general engineering consultant, construction management, and pre-construction services.   Under general guidance from the COO, the Public & Private Business Unit Director manages a municipality and private client-centric business Unit, with current revenues in excess of $100M and expectation to grow to $300M annually. Responsible for meeting growth and profit goals, as well as the development and implementation of a strong sales program in collaboration with the company’s sales function. Primary focus is on establishing strategic business direction for the business unit, ensuring that it is positioned to achieve business performance goals, and working with senior executive leadership firm-wide in support of the company's strategic business objectives. Candidate can sit in any of Atkins US large offices. Offices preferred are Atlanta, Miami, Austin, Houston, Dallas, Alexandria, New York City or Denver. Typical Duties include: Vision and Strategy: Works closely with COO and Senior Leadership Team to develop and implement strategic initiatives for a business unit which align with firm-wide objectives and strategies. Communicates vision to staff inside and outside of business unit and directs/coordinates efforts toward realizing vision. Staff Administration: Works closely with the TPO Director to ensure projects across the BU are appropriately staffed. Participates in the recruitment and selection of candidates for senior level jobs within the business unit, and potentially in the TPO when appropriate. Reviews and approves personnel actions recommended by senior managers within the business unit and coordinates for those actions within the TPO. Conducts semi-annual performance reviews and annual career planning sessions for direct reports. Promotes effective performance management and career development practices throughout the business unit to ensure employees reach highest possible performance level, job satisfaction, and commitment. Ensures compliance with company policies and procedures throughout the Business Unit, and within the TPO engagements associated with Business Unit clientele.   Project Production and Management: Evaluates the business unit’s ongoing project activities to ensure that high quality standards and productivity levels are maintained, and to keep abreast of status of major projects. Reviews financial performance of projects being managed within the business unit. Directs immediate remedial actions to avoid financial losses and client dissatisfaction. Works with the TPO Director, other Business Unit Directors and the COO office to ensure high performance project delivery and client satisfaction. Assists managers within the business unit in the selection of methods and in the solution of technical problems to maintain or improve profitability; assists in resolving conflicts concerning work with resources from the TPO or with other business units. Sales and Client Management: Works with other business units, the sales and business development group and the TPO to ensure effective delivery against company goals and priorities. Analyzes and interprets technical developments, community needs, political and economic developments, demographic changes and trends that may provide present or future opportunities for the firm. Develops and communicates the business unit's strategic plan and directs its execution. Plans, develops, and implements strategies for the effective and economical penetration of potential/existent geographical markets and business lines for the firm. Investigates possible acquisitions. Coordinates marketing activities with the sales staff, TPO and other business unit managers. Recommends possible clients and/or project pursuits. Maintains contacts with primary current and prospective clients, including initial contacts, presentations, and negotiating agreements. Keeps key client apprised of work progress, and ensures client's satisfaction; identifies and works toward the resolution of client relations problems. Represents the firm at appropriate industrial, professional, technical, civic, and government circles to enhance company image and communicate its capabilities. Attends and plays a leadership role in professional/technical associations and encourages participation of staff to promote the firm's name as well as to maintain state-of-the-art knowledge of professional discipline. Contracts and Financial: Submits the business unit's annual budget to senior executive management. Ensures adherence to budget and oversees forecasting activities. Negotiates and executes non-standard contracts. Reviews and approves operating budgets. Reviews and approves capital expenditures Considers and approves final write-offs and past-due accounts receivables and legal settlements. Requirements: Bachelor's degree in field of practice. Post graduate degree preferred. Management coursework and/or MBA a plus. This level may be achieved by technical professionals or technical managers with 20 years of experience since B.S., with at least five of these years in a senior operating management position.   Preferred candidate should have progressive experience in the municipal transportation and water infrastructure industries. This includes proven experience managing and growing national consulting business of $100M. Experience should include ability to drive and maintain strong business and sales metrics. Special Skills: Excellent technical and interpersonal skills. Proven ability to manage large scope operations and provide leadership to multiple levels of management. Highly skilled at promoting the firm and delivering a successful high-performance consulting business. Must have business vision, excellent communication skills, and be able to represent the firm effectively to clients, key public officials, and the community in general. Atkins offers its employees a robust rewards package which includes: a competitive salary; a broad benefits package including medical/RX, dental, vision, life, disability, legal, hospitalization and other valuable voluntary options; generous time-off programs; flexible work schedules; 401(k) with employer match; professional and career development opportunities through our corporate university, as well as a highly-regarded tuition reimbursement program; and an unmatched culture focused on client-service, quality, and tireless pursuit of excellence in all we do.   Atkins is an EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability employer committed to diversity in the workplace. Atkins is a drug free workplace. Please view Atkins Equal Opportunity Statement. Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 20%",Public and Private Business Unit Director Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/public-private-business-unit-director-job-atlanta-ga-us-178576355.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=17,,Marketing/Product,c2392c6f887113a803e951b7b907d64c
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:07:48:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Want to finally earn what you’re worth? We have a job opportunity for the independent-minded professional. Liberty National makes a difference by helping protect people financially. We also believe in giving back to the communities around us. Our people make us a great company, and we’re always looking for community-focused individuals to join our team.We are currently interviewing entry level and senior level applicants or applicants with business-to business sales experience who want to help people, gain experience and earn the money they deserve. This is a Sales Representative position working one-on-one with families in the community. There is flexibility and room for advancement.5 Reasons To Choose A Job With Liberty NationalYou will be supporting the needs of people in the community and making an impact.You get hands-on training while you manage relationships with existing and new customers.The compensation is very competitive.You can benefit from performance awards, incentives and advancement opportunities.You only need a high school diploma or equivalent, be independent-minded and a good communicator.Liberty National Life Insurance Company has been helping working-class people fulfill their benefit needs since 1900. That's over 100 years of making a difference in lives of people across the United States. See what's going on at Liberty National Life Insurance Company right now. We work hard and play hard.Get to know the people who make our organization successful by visiting us at https://agent-jobs.lnlcareers.com . Take our people's word for it, not just ours. Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-1.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-2.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xlibnatx/cjt/slider-new-3.png"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×","Liberty National Insurance Company Job Application for Customer Service Rep Job Available Now - Local Office | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Part Time, Temporary/Contract/Project",Phone 1-800-405-6522,All,http://jobview.monster.com/customer-service-rep-job-available-now-local-office-job-atlanta-ga-us-178282428.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=4,,,d1447773b0f8064ba700a4715f53ae10
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:07:47:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have experience using Micrometers & Calipers?Randstad has a temp to hire need for a Quality Inspector.Hours are 7am - 7pm 3 days on, 3 days off ongoing including weekendsJob description- Approves incoming materials by confirming specifications; conducting visual and measurement tests using Micrometers & Calipers, rejecting and returning unacceptable materials.- Approves in-process production by confirming specifications; conducting visual and measurement tests; communicating required adjustments to production supervisor.- Documents inspection results by completing reports and logs; summarizing re-work and waste; inputting data into quality database.If this describes your experience, please apply online at www.RandstadUSA.com and attach your resume!!!Working hours: 7am - 7pm, 3 days on, 3 days offSkills:Minimum 3 years in a Quality Inspector position on finished parts.Reliable transportation- this company is not on a bus lineRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Inspector Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/inspector-job-marietta-ga-us-178563203.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=15,12.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,c3054186cca694180f4c366f77aa9570
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:06:15:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Norcross Company is looking for a Shipping Clerk/ Driver for there warehouse Job Duties:* Local Driving of a box truck to pick up and drop of products* Pull order with a pick ticket * Sit down forklift *Ability to multi-task and complete all work* Work with Fed EX and UPS for shipping* Lift up to 60 lbs * Handle cycle counts for Inventory* Intermediate Computer skills of for shipping and inventory trackingWorking hours: 10:00am 7:00pmSkills:*2 years of experience in the shipping department*Will have to submit to a Background check and drug screen*3 year clean DMV record for driving the Box truckRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Shipping Clerk Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30093",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-clerk-job-norcross-ga-us-178580925.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=12,15.00 - 17.00 $ /hour,,fca57067e668d18ed652be17edb2ae04
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:06:15:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"What if you could actually live that life you dreamed of? What ifyou didn’t have to go at it alone? What if you had the Power? Here,nothing is impossible. Your success is in your own hands, and we have your backthe whole way. Strong leaders, mentors, training and powerful tools – they’llhelp you push yourself to the top, and keep pushing, until your idea of the topis higher than you ever imagined. It’s time to kiss your dreams hello. NamedFortune Magazine’s #1 Workplace for Millennials, when you begin your salescareer at Power, you know you will be set up to thrive from day one.  All sales representatives are full-time, W-2 employees whocomplete our proven sales training program — a comprehensive approach tolearning corporate sales strategy, communications, and leadership skills thatwill map out a path to future opportunities and financial independence. Sales representatives will also gain exposure to a variety ofother areas within the company, including business development, marketing andoperations — and will be provided ongoing opportunities for growth in the formof sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis, as well as unparalleledleadership conferences featuring high-profile, world-renowned speakers inbusiness, entertainment, sports, and government twice a year. Primary job responsibilities include: No cold calls required as all leads are pre-qualified Delivery of interactive sales presentations to homeowners on Power’s eco-friendly, green products and services Participation in ongoing sales training and coaching camps on a weekly basis Qualifications: Highly developed interpersonal, organizational and communication skills Ability to speak publicly with confidence and poise Strong sense of ambition, self-motivation and self-discipline Committed individual who is passionate about fulfilling the company’s mission Naturally positive, outgoing and articulate individual who thrives in social settings Previous sales experience preferred BA/BS preferred Salary and Benefits: $75,000-90,000 average first-year compensation Monthly opportunities for performance-based rewards, such as luxury vacations, high-end electronics, gift cards and tickets to concerts and sporting events Various medical, dental, life and disability insurance plans that can be tailored to your specific needs or the needs of your family Ample paid vacation and holidays A competitive 401(k) retirement savings program, matched by Power Access to the latest technology, such as laptops, smart phones and tablets that will help you reach your earnings goals faster and more efficiently A dynamic social program filled with can’t miss events, parties, and activities, including an annual bonus in the form of a company trip to a tropical destination for you and a guest.",Sales Representative Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA 30093",All,http://jobview.monster.com/sales-representative-job-atlanta-ga-us-178567483.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,,Marketing/Product,c2efe68c476e7b8001aba6db43617e24
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:06:15:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"- Operate/maintain all pieces of equipment - Startup/ shut down all equipment and able to perform changeovers - Able to perform basic PM's such as bearing and chain lubrication, inspection of components for wear, etc.- Demonstrated skills at being able to",Pick/Packer Job in Lithonia,Full Time Employee,"Lithonia, GA 30058",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/pick-packer-job-lithonia-ga-us-178683968.aspx?mescoid=5301083001001&jobPosition=20,9.50 - 10.00 $ /hour,,80ca0b7bfaa0647ef295520d1d1151aa
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:06:15:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Bilingual Customer Service/ Call Center Position Features:? Industry leading pay? Fun Work Environment? Unlimited Growth Potential? Pay between $30,000-$35,000Immediate need for bilingual customer service professionals who have a desire to work for a stable, industry leading company. We are offering industry leading pay and the opportunity to work in a place with unlimited growth opportunity. Find your career (not just a job) here! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1104693 Job Experience:,,, Bilingual French or SpanishYears of Experience Required:",Bilingual (Spanish or French) Customer Service Professionals Job in Norcross,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Norcross, GA 30092",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/bilingual-spanish-or-french-customer-service-professionals-job-norcross-ga-us-178573463.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),64a4fd3509398ddb300b90a42ab715ea
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:05:50:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"General Responsibility:  Assist in the operations management of a Piccadilly restaurant, ensuring that quality standards and service standards, financial performance, and team member development are achieved.  Observe the highest legal, moral, and ethical standards at all times. Primary Functions: Search for opportunities to increase unit sales.  Use local store marketing program. Focus on improving guest experiences. Establish and supervise restaurant operating procedures consistent with Piccadilly standards. Regularly inspect restaurant for cleanliness and sanitation according to health department standards. Adherence to procedures, product quality, service delivery, and guest and team member safety.  Follow purchasing procedures. Communicate frequently with management and team members, giving guidance, feedback, and motivation. Manage operating costs, i.e., food, labor, and all expenses.  Manage team member staffing levels, making adjustments as business fluctuates.  Review financial statements, responding quickly to areas that are unfavorable. Develop staffing ideas, source, interview, and hire quality team members. Train, coach, and develop of all hourly team members.  Identify and develop team members with potential to move into management.  Implement ideas to reduce team member turnover to acceptable levels. Conduct hourly team member performance appraisals, counseling sessions, disciplinary actions, and where necessary terminate unsatisfactory performers. Hold regular informational and safety meetings with staff to establish a strong knowledge base and to build a sense of teamwork. Understand and comply with all cash management procedures.  Secure and make bank deposits per policy.  Ensure restaurant security at all times and communicate and train all team members on polices and procedures. Complete administrative duties.  Review and approve payroll. Comply with all Company policies, procedures, and standards.     Job Requirements:Education and Skills Required: High school education preferred with some restaurant management or supervisory experience.  Requires strong people and communication skills, a basic understanding of math and financial statements, use of computers, and a strong guest service focus. Physical Requirements: Must be able to be on feet and move around the entire day/shift, lift up to 25 pounds, speak clearly and persuasively, and read moderate amounts of printed materials.    ",ASSISTANT MANAGER Job in Tucker,Full Time,"Tucker, GA 30084",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-manager-job-tucker-ga-us-178404633.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=10,,Food Services/Hospitality,8d5a942b56f45ccc49c09deea963a78f
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:05:49:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Title                 : SAP PS Functional consultantLocation           : Atlanta, GA     Mode of Hire    :Full Time ·         Should have E2E  implementation experience in the following areas of PS.  o    Engineer to Order (ETO)o    Engineering, Construction and Operationso    Revenue & cost Projectso    Customer projectso    Progress & Result Analysiso    Investment Management·         Should have minimum  5 implementations experience in PS area.·         Should have work Global environment ie multi country and multi-currency implementation experience. ·         Candidate having knowledge in Assembly processing,and also Integration with PS/SD PS/PP.·         Should be expert  in  all aspects of project systems including planning, Budgeting, WBS (Work Breakdown Structure), WBS Element, Network, Activities, Milestones, Cost and resource planning, Plan Versions, Time capacity planning and settlement.·         Generating Reports & Data Analysis on regular basis through SAP Information System. ·         Candidate having knowledge in standard Reports and PS related tables .·         Knowledge in CS would be an advantage. Should have domain Knowledge  Report","GENPACT headstrong Capital Markets Job Application for Senior SAP PS Functional consultant | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Employee","Title                 : SAP PS Functional consultantLocation           : Atlanta, GA     Mode of Hire    :Full Time ·         Should have E2E  implementation experience in the following areas of PS.  o    Engineer to Order (ETO)o    Engineering, Construction and Operationso    Revenue & cost Projectso    Customer projectso    Progress & Result Analysiso    Investment Management·         Should have minimum  5 implementations experience in PS area.·         Should have work Global environment ie multi country and multi-currency implementation experience. ·         Candidate having knowledge in Assembly processing,and also Integration with PS/SD PS/PP.·         Should be expert  in  all aspects of project systems including planning, Budgeting, WBS (Work Breakdown Structure), WBS Element, Network, Activities, Milestones, Cost and resource planning, Plan Versions, Time capacity planning and settlement.·         Generating Reports & Data Analysis on regular basis through SAP Information System. ·         Candidate having knowledge in standard Reports and PS related tables .·         Knowledge in CS would be an advantage. Should have domain Knowledge ",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-sap-ps-functional-consultant-job-atlanta-ga-us-177601717.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=8,,,197da4b1230340aeb56e5a1f6f3151b7
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:49:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Warehouse Worker We need high-energy Warehouse Associates to join our professional team at a retail distribution warehouse in Lithia Springs, GA immediately. The Warehouse Associate will primarily focus on receiving, sorting, and shipping consumer and home goods. Our warehouse is for a retail store so our volume is up and down with the seasons and holidays. Our first shift is 6am 2:30pm and when they are busy it's 4am - 2:30pm. Second shift starts at 3pm - 11:30pm and when they work overtime it's 3pm - 1:30am. Great way to earn more money for Christmas if you are looking for a 2nd job.Working hours: 3:00pm to 11:30pmSkills:Minimum Qualifications:--Motivation and high energy.--Ability to perform work standing up to 10 hours or more.--Push, pull, lift and/or carry repetitively up to 50 pounds.--Demonstrates safe lifting and work place habits.--Flexibility to work in other departments.--Frequent bending, stooping, reaching, grasping repetitive motion.--Must pass a background and drug test.--Must have reliable transportation (no available bus line).In order to apply, please create a profile on www.randstadstaffing.com and post your application for the openings.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Upcoming work Middle of January Job in Lithia Springs,Full Time Employee,"Lithia Springs, GA 30122",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/upcoming-work-middle-of-january-job-lithia-springs-ga-us-178460452.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=17,9.00 - 9.00 $ /hour,,bc34b2a6383f3a44d042a74e95ff2f2e
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:48:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"Recognized by Inavero as a Best in Staffing organization, Randstad Engineering is growing and investing!We’re expanding and need results-driven, team-focused Full Desk Associates in our Norcross, GA location. Do you want to be part of an organization that values employee engagement and results?As the world’s second largest staffing firm, we create exceptional opportunity for professional development, career growth, autonomy, strong income and community impact.Responsibilities for the Account ManagerFull Desk, Direct Hire Associates are responsible for securing clients and job openings, and then directly recruiting to fill those roles. (In the Engineering field and on a national basis) Client activities include client development, new account and retention sales calls, obtaining job orders, maintaining a high fill ratio, penetrating client accounts and taking a positive proactive position in corporate partnering.Candidate activities include recruiting, interviewing, matching, coordinating interviews and filling orders.Qualify Client openings; assess job order requirements and appropriately match candidates to meet client needs and expectationsEstablish and maintain relationships with clients and ability to learn and use a variety of recruiting sourcesRequirements for the Account Manager2+ years in B2B sales experienceBS degree required (with a 3.0GPA or Higher ideally)Proven track record of exceeding goals, expectations and exceptional results1+ years in the staffing industry (Engineering or Technical Industry preferred)BenefitsMedical, dental, prescription and vision insurance; Company paid Life, AD&D, Short-Term / Long-Term Disability Insurance, Company matching 401k, Stock Purchase Plan, Paid Holidays, Vacation, Sick days, Floating holidays and unmatched Training and Development.This Job is located in Norcross, GA -> United States",Account Manager - Account Manager/Technical Recruiter/Full Desk Recruiter Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30092",,http://jobview.monster.com/account-manager-account-manager-technical-recruiter-full-desk-recruiter-job-norcross-ga-us-178557480.aspx?mescoid=1100028001001&jobPosition=19,"40,000.00 - 60,000.00 $ /year",,8a1037e355a4ec8338bc1b34de9befaa
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:15:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad is looking for Loader/ Unloader candidates for the below positions to start 1st week of January.- 6 months of warehouse experience - Ability to lift 30-50 lbs for 6 plus hours of a 8 hours shift per day.- Standing, walking, bending and twisting often- Safely work in a fast paced environment. - Ability to work under pressure both independently and within a team-oriented environment. - Maintain a positive attitude and support the morale of your team members.- Move packages, up to 70lbs in weight, safely from floor to trailer in a timely manner in order to meet delivery deadlines.Working hours: VariesSkills:Required to take Drug screen and submit to a background checkRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Loader/ Unloader Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/loader-unloader-job-norcross-ga-us-178468681.aspx?mescoid=5301089001001&jobPosition=12,10.00 - 11.00 $ /hour,,a33f1fb62d8fc4d2a645b96041391db1
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:14:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"DESCRIPTION:Coordinates and supervises the daily and weekly activities that occur within assigned area of the location/operation; provides leadership, motivation, training, and development of workforce; executes against customer/site requirements; participates in continuous improvement activities as part of the site management team and ensures company policies are followed and site develops positive work culture.CORE DUTIES:1. Assists the Operations Manager in coordinating and overseeing activities of packaging/distribution of product/maintenance of production machines.2. Identifies and troubleshoots tooling, material, process and equipment issues.3. Assigns workers to production lines to meet production requirements and adjusts workers as necessary.4. Participates in, leads and organizes meetings including shift change, safety and team meetings.5. Monitors materials and supplies and makes adjustments as necessary.6. Maintains time and production records. Prepares reports on attendance, Productivity, quality and safety.7. Recommends and executes disciplinary action as necessary.Working hours: 2nd or 3rd ShiftQUALIFICATIONS:Operations backgroundMinimum of 3 to 5 years of Packaging Services experience 1-2 years logistics industry experience 1-3 years experience in lead/supervisor/management role Meets corporate competency model requirements Objective setting Organizational skills Staff management Workload planning Preventative maintenance routines Facility management (i.e., maintenance, sanitation, etc.) Interviewing skills Communication skills People skillsRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Operations Supervisor Job in Stockbridge,Full Time Employee,"Stockbridge, GA 30281",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-supervisor-job-stockbridge-ga-us-178455831.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=5,"50,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",,46b0051a1f27625ee33ed5a49a28ee55
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:05:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad USA has a potential opening for a Shipping & Receiving Clerk WITH Forklift experience in the Newnan area. NO PHONE CALLS! Resumes will be reviewed and you will receive a call if your skill set matches the company need. PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIESNeed FORKLIFT experience -- sit down and stand upCoordinating all shipping and receiving of materials by:- Preparing FedEx, UPS, or DHL shipments for pickups- Receiving, cataloging, and unloading shipments- Configuring, testing and shipping equipment per written proceduresMaintaining shipping database and records by:- Running daily, weekly, monthly reports- Coordinates the ordering of suppliesEnsures quality of shipments by:- Creating shipping invoices- Placing appropriate identifiers in project tracking indicating data is ready for Centrix loading.- Keeping project managers and department manager advised of current issuesMaintains client satisfaction by:- Responding to inquiries in a professional, courteous and timely manner- Assisting in troubleshooting workflow issues- Separating paperwork and distributing to appropriate project bins for filingWorking hours: 40Skills:Contributes to team effort by:- Working with internal staff to resolve issues- Exploring new opportunities to add value to organization and departmental processes- Helping others to achieve results- Maintains security of data and equipment- Performing other duties as assigned** Must have experience in manufacturing or warehouse****NO PHONE CALLS! Resumes will be reviewed and you will receive a call if your skill set matches the company need. ***Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Shipping Receiving w/Forklift Job in Fairburn,Full Time Employee,"Fairburn, GA 30213",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/shipping-receiving-w-forklift-job-fairburn-ga-us-178465359.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=14,10.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,,de6cf3ac55ea40d07dc11c8c3954b14d
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:05:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Great company in Atlanta area looking to bring on a number of highly motivated and skilled production workers to associate with the manufacturing of residential commercial doors. This is a temp-to-perm opportunity with a growing organization with lots of OT paying $11.50-$13.00 an hour. Duties include but not limited to:- Work on door layup line building doors from component parts- Sanding and inspecting doors- Material preparation and material handling- Staging and packaging finished product for delivery- Other general warehouse duties as needed- In all functions, maintains the work area and equipment in a clean orderly condition and follows prescribed safety rules- Preparation of frames and jambs used in pre-hanging process- Prepare, machine and hang wood and fiberglass doors- Learn operation of production line machinery- Palletize, brace, and wrap with stretch film using automated equipment- Maintain quality control on all items produced- Maintain a safe work environment- Must be able to lift 50 lbs unassisted and repeatedly- Must be willing to work some overtime hoursWorking hours: Monday - Friday 6am-2:30pm (OT mandatory)Skills:Must be willing to work overtime with no issues. Must be willing to stand for 8-12 hour shifts at least 5 days a week. Must be able to left up to 50lbs unassisted for entire shift. (The job is strenuous and repetitive.)Background in construction, carpentry, refurbishing homes, etc. is a major plus. Must be a team player. Must be willing to communicate effectively. Knowledge of, or ability to speak, read Spanish is a plus. All interested candidates please email your resumes to demarick.thomas@randstadusa.com You will be contacted within a timely manner.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Door Production Laborer Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30349",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/door-production-laborer-job-atlanta-ga-us-178458360.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=20,11.50 - 13.00 $ /hour,,f1fdc126b63d2dee30ea5fd0e2e4ecc1
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:05:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Office and Administrative branch in the Stockbridge area is looking for a Schedular and Medical Office Support to work in the South Atlanta area. This candidate must have at least three year of experience working in the medical industry with experience in data entry, maintaining medical records and imaging. The candidate must be able to multi task and work in a team environment. This position requires that the candidate have a previous medical records back ground and electronic medical record or document imaging knowledge. Knowledge of the following electronic medical record systems would be excellent: Epic, Horizon Patient Folder or ImageNow. . All interested candidates must apply to posting.Working hours: Monday through FridaySkills:Must be proficient in Microsoft OfficeMust have at least 3 year of Medical Billing and Data Entry experienceAttention to detail and Professionalism is a mustEpic, Horizon Patient Folder or ImageNow experience is a plusMust have Excellent Customer ServiceScheduling Medical Office SupportRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Medical Office Support & Scheduler Job in Stockbridge,Full Time Employee,"Stockbridge, GA 30281",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/medical-office-support-scheduler-job-stockbridge-ga-us-178448069.aspx?mescoid=4300748001001&jobPosition=6,12.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,,481dd9ea13ba484d27459c117074cfc1
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:05:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Tax Reviewer National Tax Group ABOUT THIS OPPORTUNITY As part of its financial planning work, Ayco offers tax preparation services that include completion of complex individual, small business, gift and trust income tax returns. Due to continued growth in the business, we have a current opportunity to fill a Tax Reviewer opening in our National Tax Group located in Atlanta, GA. RESPONSIBILITIES Prepare or review (depending upon experience) complex federal and state returns; Perform research; Provide technical advice and support to associates on a variety of tax related issues. QUALIFICATIONS Bachelor’s degree in Accounting with CPA, EA, or Masters in Taxation preferred; Five years of tax-preparation/review experience required; Proficient knowledge of investment and hedge fund partnership taxation a plus; Understanding of FBAR reporting, PFIC reporting, and other foreign jurisdiction reporting a plus. READY TO APPLY? For additional information, please visit our website at www.ayco.com We offer a competitive salary, comprehensive benefits package and a high quality of work life. Interested applicants should submit resume, cover letter noting position of interest, and salary requirements via e-mail to hresources@ayco.com Ayco is an equal opportunity employer.",Tax Reviewer,Full Time Employee,AtlantaGA,Financial Services,http://jobview.monster.com/tax-reviewer-national-tax-group-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-178687791.aspx?mescoid=1300115001001&jobPosition=10,,Accounting/Finance/Insurance,ffd000d9df96de5a3f04fdb7e060d4e4
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:04:04:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Job Title: Business System Analyst with Amdocs ExperienceLocation:Bay Area,CA or Atlanta,GA or Tampa,FL(Remote Position)Job Type:6+ Months  Job Responsibilities: ·         Evaluates and analyzes business requirements for new or modified business processes and determines feasibility, cost, time required, and compatibility with current CRM & other enterprise systems.·         Consults with stakeholders in business operations to clarify program objectives and current operating procedures & processes.·         Prepares project plan/schedule, system requirements and solution proposals, facilitates solution review.·         Works closely with the development team on the functional testing of delivered changes.·         Obtains business acceptance, conducts training and supports the business during and after implementation.·         Analyzes complex business problems to be solved with automated systems.  ·         Provides technical expertise in identifying, evaluating and developing systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet user requirements.  ·         Configures system settings and options; plans and executes unit, integration and acceptance testing; and creates specifications for systems to meet business requirements.  ·         Designs details of automated systems.  ·         May provide consultation to users in the area of automated systems.  ·         May lead cross-functional linked teams to address business or systems issues.·         Overall experience of 8-10 years in IT or Consulting with Amdocs CRM.  ·         Strong domain knowledge in customer support and service operations.  Very strong functional understanding of these Amdocs applications – AmDocs Support, AmDocs CIM, AmDocs Inventory Manager, AmDocs Contracts, Amdocs Field Service & AmDocs Depot Repair.  ·         Ability to analyze business processes.  Prior experience with AmDocs CRM version 7.x or 8.x.  ·         Understanding of SmartClient Architecture with prior experience of designing presentation layer components on Smartclient framework.  ·         Understanding of AmDocs Server Architecture.  Experience configuring AmDocs Security Manager and System Configurator is required.  ·         Excellent understanding of the AmDocs CRM Data Model.  Certification on Amdocs CRM Smartclient is highly desirable.·         Excellent written & verbal communication skills.·         Strong analytical, design and documentation skills. Knowledge of process modeling ·         Ability to work in a distributed team structure that includes cross-functional and technical delivery teams.  Report","PINDI SOLUTIONS LLC Job Application for Business Systems Analyst | Monster.com var MONS_LOG_VARS = {""JobID"":","Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Job Title: Business System Analyst with Amdocs ExperienceLocation:Bay Area,CA or Atlanta,GA or Tampa,FL(Remote Position)Job Type:6+ Months  Job Responsibilities: ·         Evaluates and analyzes business requirements for new or modified business processes and determines feasibility, cost, time required, and compatibility with current CRM & other enterprise systems.·         Consults with stakeholders in business operations to clarify program objectives and current operating procedures & processes.·         Prepares project plan/schedule, system requirements and solution proposals, facilitates solution review.·         Works closely with the development team on the functional testing of delivered changes.·         Obtains business acceptance, conducts training and supports the business during and after implementation.·         Analyzes complex business problems to be solved with automated systems.  ·         Provides technical expertise in identifying, evaluating and developing systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet user requirements.  ·         Configures system settings and options; plans and executes unit, integration and acceptance testing; and creates specifications for systems to meet business requirements.  ·         Designs details of automated systems.  ·         May provide consultation to users in the area of automated systems.  ·         May lead cross-functional linked teams to address business or systems issues.·         Overall experience of 8-10 years in IT or Consulting with Amdocs CRM.  ·         Strong domain knowledge in customer support and service operations.  Very strong functional understanding of these Amdocs applications – AmDocs Support, AmDocs CIM, AmDocs Inventory Manager, AmDocs Contracts, Amdocs Field Service & AmDocs Depot Repair.  ·         Ability to analyze business processes.  Prior experience with AmDocs CRM version 7.x or 8.x.  ·         Understanding of SmartClient Architecture with prior experience of designing presentation layer components on Smartclient framework.  ·         Understanding of AmDocs Server Architecture.  Experience configuring AmDocs Security Manager and System Configurator is required.  ·         Excellent understanding of the AmDocs CRM Data Model.  Certification on Amdocs CRM Smartclient is highly desirable.·         Excellent written & verbal communication skills.·         Strong analytical, design and documentation skills. Knowledge of process modeling ·         Ability to work in a distributed team structure that includes cross-functional and technical delivery teams. ",All,http://jobview.monster.com/business-systems-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-177993729.aspx?mescoid=1500123001001&jobPosition=11,,,fd79d3831d3bf71f963c529fbcad7577
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:49:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"  Job ID:  78042  Position Overview Oldcastle is North America’s largest manufacturer of building materials and a subsidiary of CRH, a global building materials group operating in 37 countries and with annualized sales of approx. €24bn/$26bn. CRH shares are listed on the London, Dublin and New York stock exchanges and it is a component of the FTSE 100 stock index. Oldcastle Internal Audit, based in Atlanta, GA, is part of the CRH group internal audit team and is responsible for assessing the financial and operational risk management and controls of Oldcastle and for helping our businesses achieve process and performance improvements.       Oldcastle is recruiting for the position of Internal Auditor based in Atlanta, GA. The Internal Auditor works as part of a team conducting audits on behalf of the audit committee and management to assess the accuracy of financial records, the effectiveness of internal controls, and the quality of financial and operational processes. The role requires approximately 40% travel within the US. Through exposure to Oldcastle companies, the auditor role provides an excellent opportunity for learning about business and for career development. Many of our alumni have gone on to pursue successful careers within Oldcastle. The position also provides the opportunity for exposure to companies and cultures across CRH worldwide.           The Role Audit Work Conduct audits of financial and operational processesAudit planning and organizationDevise practical solutions and provide advice in relation to issues arising on auditsUse audit software to enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of audits (training provided)Conduct SOX compliance testingCarry out special project work as required Reporting Liaise with company management on audit findings and proposed solutionsPrepare audit reports that document audit scope, findings and recommendationsEvaluate management responses to audit recommendations Promotion of best practices Develop and promote improvements to risk management and internal control processesDisseminate best practices and contribute to business performance improvement Training & Development Pursue personal development plans as agreed with manager Qualifications / Experience Preferences Bachelor’s degree in accounting, finance or a related field2-5 years’ experience in a public accounting firm or in industryProfessional certification such as CPA, CA, CIA, CFE or be actively pursuing certificationCorporate governance, internal control evaluation, compliance (SOX) and substantive testingSolid understanding of accounting principles and internal controls Key Qualities Excellent financial and analytical skillsStrong written and oral communication abilitiesProfessionalism, initiative, commitment and objectivitySelf-motivation and ability to operate independentlyTeam player with excellent interpersonal skills to build effective company relationshipsAmbition and the desire to progress and develop into financial or other roles What Oldcastle Offers You A culture that values opportunity for growth, development and internal promotionHighly competitive base payComprehensive medical, dental and disability benefits programsGroup retirement savings programHealth and wellness programs About Oldcastle Oldcastle has a long and proud heritage as one of North America’s largest corporations. We are a proud reflection of the hundreds of family businesses, local and regional companies and mid to large sized enterprises that together form the Oldcastle family. Oldcastle operates with a decentralized, diversified structure, letting you work in a small company environment while having the career opportunities of a large enterprise. Oldcastle is a great place to grow! If you’re up for a rewarding challenge, we invite you to take the first step and apply today! Please complete your online application and profile which will be sent directly to the appropriate Hiring Manager. Thank you for your interest in the Oldcastle family! Follow Oldcastle Careers on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Pinterest, WordPress (Career Blog) and LinkedIn! Oldcastle is an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer. EOE/Vet/Disability--If you want to know more, please click on this link. Oldcastle is part of the Oldcastlecareers™ network. ",Internal Auditor - Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/internal-auditor-atlanta-ga-job-atlanta-ga-us-177361529.aspx?mescoid=1300102001001&jobPosition=2,,,1839b9ce3aab9a45e5f3975a6e0cd12d
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:48:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our customer in Norcross, GA, known for their high-quality solar products, is currently looking for a 3rd shift Maintenance Tech to join their team on a permanent basis.The right candidate for the position must have industrial maintenance experience listed in ""Required Experience"" below. Please, do not apply without industrial or manufacturing experience.Job Description:Maintain process tools in manufacturing to optimal working order.Follow all safety, quality and other manufacturing procedures.Work effectively with equipment owners and operators to troubleshoot equipment and process problems.Participate and contribute to continuous improvement and problem solving activities.Working with previous and following shifts to make smooth shift transitions.Attend scheduled corporate training and meetings.Execute preventative maintenance schedule for all equipment.Interface effectively with plant facility personnel (e.g., exhaust flows, chemical disposal).Interface effectively with vendors and field service engineers.Respond quickly and effectively to resolve unanticipated equipment problems.Communicate orally, follow written specs and procedures, file reports when necessary.Adhere to all safety procedures and good housekeeping standards (clean, orderly workplace).Be an active member of the ERT unitOther duties as neededQualifications: Skills/Knowledge/Experience: Associates degree in a technical science or equivalent work experience. Technician Level will be assigned based on education and years? experience in Equipment Maintenance.Experience with trouble shooting and repairing electro-mechanical systems and componentsKnowledge and experience working with PLCs, vision system, vacuum systems, chemical and gasses preferred.Experience and knowledge of Lean Manufacturing desirableExperience working within a system consistent with ISO-9001 or equivalent is desirablePlease submit your resume to dan.mintz@trcstaffing.com #TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",rd Shift Maitenance Tech Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30308",,http://jobview.monster.com/3rd-shift-maitenance-tech-job-atlanta-ga-us-178595587.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),e74f3602abe272602fb574b504f9252c
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:26:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Entry-Level RecruiterLewis James Professional is a woman-owned staff augmentation, project consulting and direct hire search and placement firm.  Due to an increase in client service demand we are currently seeking outgoing, energetic self-starters who thrive in a dynamic and fast-paced environment for entry-level recruiting positions. No experience is necessary – we will train you! Recent college graduates with an interest in relationship management are encouraged to apply.What you will need:  Bachelor’s degreeExcellent communication and reasoning skillsGreat attitude and hunger for learningStrong drive and entrepreneurial mindset What you will do:Work in our office located in the Sandy Springs area of AtlantaSource and evaluate candidates for open positionsInterview candidates either face to face or via telephoneSchedule interviews between clients and candidatesNegotiate/close down employment offers Develop and maintain relationships with candidates and clientsWhat we offer:Comprehensive training on the most effective recruiting strategiesProfessional and collegial work environmentChallenging work and career development opportunitiesCompetitive base salary plus commission opportunitiesHealth insurance401(k)Paid vacations, holidays, etc.For immediate consideration, please click “Apply.”  You may also send a copy of your resume to: resumes@lewisjamesprofessional.com and include the following job code in the subject line: Entry-Level Recruiter (#1158) Lewis James Professional is an Equal Opportunity Employer. M/F/D/V  ",Entry-Level Recruiter Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/entry-level-recruiter-job-atlanta-ga-us-178640056.aspx?mescoid=1300081001001&jobPosition=20,,Entry Level,b19be65e320e73f230435252c32a5bc2
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:22:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"This position is responsible for managing the direct relationships of 2 – 5 Managed Service client relationships within a defined geography or industry verticalEDUCATION:• College degree required• Additional education preferredEXPERIENCE:• 5 – 7 years of account management or operational management experienceSKILLS REQUIRED:• Proficient with Microsoft Office tools including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook• Strong customer focus and customer service skills• Experience presenting to C-level executives• Excellent communication, interpersonal and organizational skills• Demonstrated experience managing large, complex accounts or projects• Experience describing and documenting project or client requirements• Must be detailed oriented with a concern for quality expressed by continually initiating system and process improvements• Strong management skills based on several years of experience, including people development and team building• Superior consulting, leadership, management, interpersonal and mentoring skills• May be responsible for a specific area of specializationGet to know us and find out ""What More Could You Do"" at RandstadEqual Opportunity Employer: Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",MSP Regional Director Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30339",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/msp-regional-director-job-atlanta-ga-us-178092710.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=13,,,18dd9d603128732fa66970a6c598fbac
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:22:02,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:Assembling panels onto units using hand tools, pneumatic tools, and saws in fast paced work environment. Building pallets and crates, shipping/receiving, and sitdown forklift operationWill be on feet 8+hours a day, bending, stooping, twisting, and lifting.Ideal candidate will cross train with other departmentsWorking hours: 5am-3:30pm Mon-SatSkills:Must have 2 years prior experience in Construction, HVAC, Welding, Electronic or Production Assembly Must pass background check, drug test screen, and measuring test.Must be detail oriented and work with a sense of urgency. Attendance and positive attitude are manadatory. Absenteeism and tardiness not tolerated. Must have steel toe bootsPay rate is $12.67/hrRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Production Assembler Job in Stone Mountain,Full Time Employee,"Stone Mountain, GA 30087",Construction - Industrial Facilities and InfrastructureManufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/production-assembler-job-stone-mountain-ga-us-178691662.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=11,12.00 - 12.67 $ /hour,,2ab85bd12483ffac574da24e4b81a708
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:21:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Responsible for warehouse supervision, daily production scheduling, staging of products for assembly,Supervising team in a fast paced work environment.- Working side by side with teamInform workers of management conditions of work, rules and regulations guiding the establishment to ensure that they adhere to company policies, and take disciplinary measures against workers who are found not on task.Make available all work related records such as attendance and efficiency score to management for the purpose of payment and other rewards.Give workers detailed feedback on their level of performance most especially when they are not performing up to company expectations, in order for them to sit up and do better.Make a draft of shifts for workers and ensure that they follow it diligently to avoid commotion and agitations between workers over non compliance by some members.Constantly inspect all work equipment to identify shortages and damages, and relate findings to management for quick resolution to enable smooth flow of operations.Place order for new equipments as directed by management, and inspect them upon delivery to ensure that they are of good quality and in the right quantity.Step in to resolve conflicts that may arise between workers on site, and exhibit good sense of judgment to ensure that parties involved are treated fairly without bias.Keep accurate records of workers performance and ensure that all payments are fully made as at when due without shortage and victimization.Work as the middleman between management and workers to facilitate good communication and airing of complaints from both parties, and see to it that all issues are sorted out.Check all outgoing stocks to ensure that they are in good condition and make sure that all documents are accurately signed for proper documentation.Ensure that stock inventory is carried out in a timely manner and that it is in line with the stock balance to avoid mix up.Working hours: 7am-6pm M-F, some SaturdaysSkills:Must be comfortable working in a fast paced, non climate controlled work environmentMust be able to pass background and drug screenMinimum 3 years experience in Manufacturing/Logistics environment. Must have 1 yr minimum Sitdown/Standup Forklift and RF scanner experienceGood team skills to be able to work with others.Good leadership skills.Ability to fully carry out instructions.Ability to management temperament.Ability to multitask and deadline drivenGood knowledge of record keeping.Must have flexible schedule to change with production needsMust be ontime and dependable.- Absenteeism and tardiness are not toleratedPay rate is between $14-$18/hr based on experienceRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse Team Lead Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30324",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-team-lead-job-atlanta-ga-us-178462073.aspx?mescoid=5301033001001&jobPosition=4,14.00 - 18.00 $ /hour,,6b8984b1a07a1cf2c1023b62232a6489
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:21:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Case Manager – Case Management – Licensed Social Worker  –  LSW Case Manager Licensed Social WorkerCase Management LSWAtlanta, GA   Case Manager Social Worker  ·         Days, Monday – Friday 8:30AM – 5PM ·         Discharge planning utilization review, care planning·         Case management of all hospital specialties ·         500+ bed facility MUST HAVE 3 years of social work experience in healthcare  MUST HAVE 1 year case management experience or similar roleInpatient CM experience high preferred – would consider other CM’sMasters degree in Social workLicensed Social worker  REQUIREMENTS:Need to be a licensed social workerNeed to have masters in Social WorkMust have case management experience  OUR SERVICES ARE ALWAYS FREE OF CHARGE FOR YOU!  The ideal candidate has been licensed social worker for 3 + years with a minimum of 1 year experience in case management and would have a strong understanding of all hospital specialties.    PLEASE CONATCT ME TODAY TO LEARN MORE INFORMATION! 1-800-995-2673 X 1568 Peter Hanulec Permanent Placement Specialist CoreMedical Group 800-995-2673 x 1568 (Phone) 866-420-1055 (fax) Peter.hanulec@coremedicalgroup.comwww.linkedin.com/peterhanulec   ",Case Manager – Case Management – Licensed Social Worker – LSW Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/case-manager-%E2%80%93-case-management-%E2%80%93-licensed-social-worker-%E2%80%93-lsw-job-atlanta-ga-us-177664987.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=7,25.00 - 41.00 $ /hour,Medical/Health,f278f8f7f9b3313e8a3a12e9a3771612
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:21:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Market Center AdministratorThe Market Center Administrator is responsible for accounting and financial record keeping, overseeing the administrative systems/operations of the office, including staff and facilities. Accounting functions include AP, AR, PR, GL/bank reconciliations and month-end closing. Do you possess strong leadership skills with demonstrated bookkeeping & accounting experience? Are you up-to-date on technology? Have you supervised a team in a high energy and service oriented environment? The MCA's three main area of focus are (1) Operation and Administration (2) Accounting (3) Support OperationsAdministration As the equivalent to a Chief Operations Officer, the MCA is responsible for all systems in the Market Center. This includes: - Hiring and managing receptionists and Assistant MCAs- Interacting with staff, associates, and vendors- Purchasing supplies and equipment- Ensuring the professional appearance of all physical facilities- Coordinating the maintenance of office equipment and monitoring maintenance agreements- Overseeing Computer Hardware Specialist, Computer Software Trainer, and Internet Specialist- Setting up and maintaining all passwords on computer systemsAccounting As the equivalent to a Chief Financial Officer, the MCA is responsible for accurate banking and accounting services. This includes: - Full charge accounting- Computerized bookkeeping and general computer experience- Staff payroll if not using a Professional Employment Organization (PEO)- Acting as the Market Center liaison to the CPA- Being detailed and action oriented- Maintaining office files, including accounting files, general ledger files, associate files, employee files, listing files, contract pending files, and closed contract files- Monthly reporting of all production and accounting figures for the month- Responsible for processing and paying associate commissions- Responsible for budget setting and trackingWorking hours: 8am-5pmSkills:Strong written and verbal communication skillsDetailedPeople orientedHappy, positiveComputer skillsAccountingHigh school graduateFull charge bookkeeper1-3 years industry, service, administrative, and management experienceComputer skillsJob Type: Full-timeRequired education:High school or equivalentRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Market Center Administrator Job in Smyrna,Full Time Employee,"Smyrna, GA 30080",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/market-center-administrator-job-smyrna-ga-us-178465999.aspx?mescoid=4300763001001&jobPosition=11,"45,000.00 - 48,000.00 $ /year",,90ecc6f5f92ffbb1deef1d452b1ab17f
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:21:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"TRC is seeking a Payroll Analyst for an immediate contract opportunity in Downtown Atlanta, GA.Experience with ADP Workforce Now (WFN) is highly preferred.The job will be 60% Analyzing, 40% Processing.They will be doing payroll for exempt, non-exempt and executive pay.This person must have STRONG MS Excel skills.(Pivot Tables, Look-ups, Formulas, etc.)Please submit resumes to will.swift@trcstaffing.com#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Payroll Analyst/Lead Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30350",,http://jobview.monster.com/payroll-analyst-lead-job-atlanta-ga-us-178595469.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),95b872bde5af833031064bc5fd95e4e0
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:03:06:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Talent will be using air tools (drills, ratchet and rivot guns) to assemble compartments and coolers, etc for service trucks. Talent will also be using handheld sanders, grinders, etc to finish and deburr parts.Working hours: Monday- Friday7:00 am - 3:30 pmSkills:Must have prior experience working in metals fabrication shop. Experience with automotive wiring, etc. is plus as is experience with hydraulics. Talent must have a very strong work ethic....punctuality and reliability are a MUST. Must be able to pass client required screenings to include drug screen and back ground checks.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Mechanical Assembler needed ASAP in Kennesaw Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30062",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/mechanical-assembler-needed-asap-in-kennesaw-job-marietta-ga-us-178568436.aspx?mescoid=5100914001001&jobPosition=14,13.00 - 13.50 $ /hour,,d35e963f5f6ee29a41dc7859d34f5062
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:02:59:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"We have a client in the Norcross area that is seeking sales associates with previous automotive parts sales experience for a Temp to Hire opportunity. The starting pay is $15.00 per hour and the hours are Monday to Friday 8:30am to 5:30pm.Working hours: Monday to Friday 8:30am to 5:30pmSkills:-High School Diploma or GED-1-3 years of previous sales experience-Previous experience with automotive parts sales is a plusRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Automotive Parts Sales Associate Job in Norcross,Full Time Employee,"Norcross, GA 30071",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/automotive-parts-sales-associate-job-norcross-ga-us-178459548.aspx?mescoid=4100670001001&jobPosition=15,15.00 - 15.00 $ /hour,,d4195f1b1d34d0861dbcc04b848252cf
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:02:58:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Aflac Insurance Sales Agent While a career in sales may not be for everyone, those who have been successful say it’s been one of the most rewarding ventures of their lives. So what do these people have in common? They’re problem solvers. They share the desire to help people. And they have a good work ethic. As an independent consultant backed by Aflac, you have the opportunity to run your own business and do the things you love. Put in the work and reap the rewards. That being said, let’s talk about your potential and what becoming an Aflac agent can mean to you. Of course, you probably recognize the Aflac Duck. But that’s only scratching the surface. Let’s look at what our company really does. Aflac plays a vital role in helping people when they need it most when they’re injured or ill. Unlike major medical, Aflac pays benefits directly to customers (unless otherwise assigned) — so they have the financial security and control to handle whatever life brings. Become a Strategic ConsultantYou’ll be the go-to benefit-solutions partner for businesses in your community. As an Aflac associate, you will be a strategic advisor to companies and their employees. Your role will consist of helping business owners figure out the best way to insure employees and guiding individuals to choose the best benefits options. We also have innovative tools to help you grow your business. Everwell is a web-based enrollment platform designed to enable agents to sell Aflac products, as well as major medical and other ancillary benefits from our partner carriers. Work with a Winning Team You’ll be working alongside a group of bright, energetic people who are motivated to help you succeed. As part of our commitment to your development, we’ll provide you with the training you’ll need to help you grow and manage a successful team. Become a LeaderBeing an Aflac agent allows you to own your own business while making a difference. You’ll have the opportunity to advance to a district sales coordinator role where you can grow and develop your own team. The Opportunity to Give BackWhen you join the Aflac sales team, you’ll be part of a passionate and deep tradition of helping those in need in your community. For 20 years, Aflac has actively supported the fight against childhood cancer, and has raised over $100 million to support the Aflac Cancer and Blood Disorders Center of Children’s Healthcare of Atlanta.1 Competitive CompensationAt Aflac we compensate our associates in several different ways including advanced commission, renewals, stock bonus, and a recruiting bonus. You’ll also receive renewals after the first year with 50% vesting starting at only 2 years. That means as long as the policies you’ve sold continue to be renewed, you will continue to receive that income. There are also great opportunities to participate in contests where you can receive awards, trips, and prizes. So if you’re enthusiastic, self-motivated and have an entrepreneurial spirit apply today. About AflacIn the United States, Aflac is the leading provider of voluntary insurance at the worksite. Through its trailblazing One Day PaySM initiative, Aflac U.S. can receive, process, approve and disburse payment for eligible claims in one business day. In Japan, Aflac is the leading provider of medical and cancer insurance and insures 1 in 4 households. Aflac individual and group insurance products help provide protection to more than 50 million people worldwide. For 10 consecutive years, Aflac has been recognized by Ethisphere as one of the World's Most Ethical Companies. In 2016, Fortune magazine recognized Aflac as one of the 100 Best Companies to Work For in America for the 18th consecutive year and included Aflac on its list of Most Admired Companies for the 15th time, ranking the company No. 1 in innovation for the insurance, life and health category for the second consecutive year. In 2015, Aflac’s contact centers were recognized by J.D. Power by providing “An Outstanding Customer Service Experience” for the Live Phone Channel. Aflac Incorporated is a Fortune 500 company listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol AFL. To find out more about Aflac and One Day PaySM, visit aflac.com or espanol.aflac.com. 1Aflac Cancer Center Contribution Report as of Oct 15, 2015 Aflac agents are independent contractors and not employees of Aflac.",Benefits Counselor Job in Atlanta,Full Time,"Atlanta, GA 30311",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/benefits-counselor-job-atlanta-ga-us-178561175.aspx?mescoid=1300090001001&jobPosition=8,,Customer Support/Client Care,277bdb77f079ffc3debd9f75ab24f8bd
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:02:55:18,No,jobs.monster.com,"SummaryProvides services in support of responsibilities of the Social Services Department. Essential Duties & ResponsibilitiesAssists in the completion of care plans and psychosocial assessments.Completes required forms and documents in accordance with company policy and state and/or federal regulations.Coordinates care plan meetings with families.Helps resolve concerns of Resident and/or family.Makes room changes when necessary.Performs other duties as assigned. QualificationsHigh School diploma or equivalent.Physical Demands & Environment Employee may be required to sit, bend, stoop, use keyboard, see, talk and hear. May occasionally lift medium to heavy objects including assisting with the movement of Residents. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",Social Services Assistant Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/social-services-assistant-job-tucker-ga-us-178565028.aspx?mescoid=2100321001001&jobPosition=16,,,a87ac189d06ecec0d30d8f4f49fb0534
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:02:55:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"CALLING ALL NIGHT OWLS!! LONG TERM- 2ND SHIFT AVAILABLE!!+Client in the Fulton Industrial section of West ATL looking for Material Handlers.-SPOTLESS BACKGROUND is required for further consideration-This is a long term opportunity.-RF/Handheld scanner experience is required for consideration-Client looking for motivated, enthusiastic, self-starters looking for career goals in a stable & growing industry-Attention to detail is very critical to the position requirements-Working Interview, cross-training available for anyone coachable within a warehouse environment.Hours are 4PM-12:30AM. If that will not work for you, DO NOT APPLY!!-Ability to stand,bend, twist, and stoop -Extended periods of walking -Ability to lift up to 50 lbs without assistance for prolonged periods-Ability to perform inventory counts, quality checks, shipping/receiving prep and loading/unloading-Close attention to detail is an absolute must, and cross training in multiple areas will be taking place.-Initiative and drive are preferred. Looking for ""self-starters"" interested in gaining invaluable skill sets and knowledge in a secure trade industry .Working hours: 40+ hoursSkills:Please apply to the posting. Qualified candidates will be contacted through email regarding next stepsRandstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Material Handlers-Record Center Specialist Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30336",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/material-handlers-record-center-specialist-job-atlanta-ga-us-178461607.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=13,10.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,,76c490e3ff08fc1db45101673d2db2bc
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:01:46:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are currently looking for Great people to work in a Distribution Facility in Union CityWe are looking for people to sort packageWorking hours: Third ShiftSkills:Must pass criminal background check.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Packing Position Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30349",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/packing-position-job-atlanta-ga-us-178455666.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=1,10.00 - 10.00 $ /hour,,6f03c170282ca4876164bba012b69307
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:01:45:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our customer a well establish German and U.S. consulting company is currently looking for a Digital Transformation Principal to help lead their West Coast Team.Digital Transformation is a huge opportunity as well as a growing challenge for almost any organization in the coming years. Companies must enhance their strengths to be able to develop new digital competencies and the right mindset in order to remain successful and competitive. The ideal candidate will support our clients strategically and operationally on their individual Digital Transformation journeys by assessing their digital readiness, pinpointing opportunities, discovering new value, developing digital agendas, creating digitization concepts, designing data-driven business models, piloting use cases, reinventing business practice, aligning process, implementing future-oriented operating and cooperation models to become more agile and focused on customer value.Job Responsibilities:- Identifies project opportunities- Leads acquisitions by developing, presenting, negotiating and closing of project proposals- Services and primary point of contact for client executives- Lead the problem solving and change management work streams during client engagements- Supports decision makers when solving complex questions- Supports decision makers when solving complex questions- Manages client and project team members- Reviews project delivery documents prior to presentations- Provides ongoing feedback and other development to support the team- Enhances and trains the company on concepts, methods, and tools for digital transformation- Provides content for press articles - Business Development initiatives for the West CoastQualifications:Education:- BS and MS degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or Business Administration- Equivalent work experience will be consideredExperience (Job and Industry)- A minimum of 7 years total professional experience in both consultancies and industrial corporations- 5 years of professional experience with large-scale digital transformation initiatives- 2 years of professional experience with Operational Excellence concepts and tools. Example: LEAN - 2 years of professional experience in business developmentCompetencies:- High level of business acumen- Pragmatism- Analytical and conceptual thinking- Ability to engage and enthuse client personnel at all levels- Planning, organization, project management- Excellent verbal and written communication skills- Professionalism in all client interactions- Ability to travel 30-50%Please submit resumes to will.swift@trcstaffing.com#TrackingJobBody p{margin:5px !important;} #TrackingJobBody li {margin:5px !important;}",Principal Digital Transformation Job in Atlanta,Full Time Employee,"Atlanta, GA 30328",,http://jobview.monster.com/principal-digital-transformation-job-atlanta-ga-us-178596112.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=15,,Experienced (Non-Manager),75ae8998ad6dfa1323649a4e314bdf28
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:01:26:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Randstad in Marietta is hiring for an Project Management Assistant with a background in the LED (Lighting) industry. The right candidate Must be familiar with the Lighting industry. This position will be temp to perm paying 15+hr (pay negotiable). May entertain a direct hire for the right person. Paying 35-40k. -Previous project managing in lighting and or some sort of construction required. Full benefit package available after 90 days. - Inventory- Schedule and Manage Pickups- Repackage and Label- Update database and all related parties with Estimated Delivery Time and Actual Delivery Date- Manage and complete all necessary forms required for payment, obtaining rebates/incentives and installation of products- Following up with clients and confirming delivery of goods and scheduling installation-Working hours: 8 AM-5PMSkills:Must be motivated, organized, work well under pressure and able to work without being micro managed as well as multi task.Microsoft office 365Quickbase Database (not required but a plus)Communication skills (Verbal and written)Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Project Manager Assistant Job in Marietta,Full Time Employee,"Marietta, GA 30067",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-assistant-job-marietta-ga-us-178461473.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=20,15.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,,07733d4c7e5502db318cf4f8bf648705
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:01:24:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:·        Will perform a daily review of sales orders to determine which orders have exceeded allowable discount levels and should be rejected.  Responsibilities:·        Perform discount analysis for sales orders that exceed the established & desired boundaries and recommend how to disposition. ·        Communicate and track when an order needs to have a hard query applied and cleared.·        Run necessary reports and queries to perform daily discount review. Qualifications:·        Reporting skills·        Communication skills  Since 1984, Synectics has been committed to aligning talented professionals with jobs they find challenging and fulfilling. Let us leverage our recruiting experience and our long-standing relationships with our clients to help you in your job search. To view a comprehensive list of jobs offered by Synectics, please visit our website at www.synectics.com. We offer a wide variety of positions in cities throughout the United States.  Synectics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Daily Order Reviewer Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA 30084",Advertising and PR Services,http://jobview.monster.com/daily-order-reviewer-job-tucker-ga-us-177552529.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=13,,Sales/Retail/Business Development,ca9511b298103e3875884a55fb25c6ef
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:01:24:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"RESPONSIBILITIES:A Kforce client is seeking a Visual/UX Designer in Atlanta, GA. The incumbent will be designing UI assets/components for both B2C and B2B websites for mobile, tablet, and desktop to unify the brand.REQUIREMENTS: Exceptional design skills, production value and attention to detail Strong Design background and experience which allows for contribution to overall strategy Designers need to be able to both discuss and document their designs and design decisions effectively to varied audiences Strong working knowledge of Photoshop, InDesign, and Axure experience Experience with user interface design patterns and standard UCD methodologies Strong knowledge of HTML/CSSKforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",Visual / UX Designer Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Atlanta, GA 30319",,http://jobview.monster.com/visual-ux-designer-job-atlanta-ga-us-177942075.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=1,,Experienced (Non-Manager),43694b0cf6cf933a1fd454e5f5df6ae2
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:01:24:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production and Warehouse We need high-energy 2nd Shift Warehouse Associates after January 1, 2017!! Come join our professional team at a MAJOR supply chain warehouse in Union City, GA. The Warehouse Associates will focus on receiving, sorting, picking, assembling boxes, and shipping consumer goods. This is a chance to grow with a stable company. If you like to be on the move all day and seek opportunities to learn, then this is the place for you!Working hours: Fri, Sat, Sun: 7:00 a.m. - 7:00 p.m.Skills:Minimum Qualifications:--Motivation and high energy.--Ability to perform work standing up to 10 hours or more.--Push, pull, lift and/or carry repetitively up to 50 pounds.--Demonstrates safe lifting and good work place habits.--Flexibility to work in other departments.--Frequent bending, stooping, reaching, grasping repetitive motion.--Must pass a background and drug test.--Weekend Shift: Fri, Sat, Sun 7:00 a.m. - 7:00 p.m.--WE ARE ON THE BUS LINE!!!****Positions pay $9.65 an hour****In order to apply, please create a profile on www.randstadstaffing.com and post your application for the openings.Randstad is a world leader in matching great people with great companies. Our experienced agents will listen carefully to your employment needs and then work diligently to match your skills and qualifications to the right job and company. Whether you're looking for temporary, temporary-to-permanent or permanent opportunities, no one works harder for you than Randstad. EEO Employer: Race, Religion, Color, National Origin, Citizenship, Sex, Age, Disability, Ancestry, Veteran Status, Genetic Information, Service in the Uniformed Services or any other classification protected by law.",Warehouse General Labor - Weekend Shift - Fri,Full Time Employee,"Union City, GA 30291",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/warehouse-general-labor-weekend-shift-fri-sat-sun-job-union-city-ga-us-178462391.aspx?mescoid=4700799001001&jobPosition=15,9.65 - 9.65 $ /hour,,c2b1cfa422bc6f09113edffa647aeee7
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:00:46:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"System Administration (Access control management etc.) Translation of business function requirements Liaison between STRH and Vendors regarding bug fixes and enhancements Work with vendors to establish electronic trading connectivity Data reporting and audit services for Internal Audit, Independent Audit, Regulatory Audit, and Model Validation. Business Continuity planning and direction Participate in review of BA requirements and test plan validation as needed. Provides technical training to technology teammates as needed Ability to interface with vendors, management, upstream and downstream partners Ability to learn an existing application Experience with the SDLC process A sense of urgency for handling production support issues in a timely manner Problem-solving skill Ability to follow-through FIXED INCOME EXPERIENCE Database/SQL experience for query requests 6 years related experience and a thorough understanding of the technologies required to support Capital Markets. Knowledge of Fidessa and Bloomberg applications is a plus. Proficient with Data Mapping Technical Business Analyst background preferred",Fixed Income Business Analyst Job in Atlanta,Full Time,Location:,Banking,http://jobview.monster.com/fixed-income-business-analyst-job-atlanta-ga-us-177698467.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=2,,IT/Software Development,cdd2da6a9c051252c1a97b4702af21eb
United States of America,US,04/May/2016:00:45:40,No,jobs.monster.com,-Arrange machine at the beginning of work procedures to ensure that everything is in order.-Test the machine before main work begins to be sure that it's in good condition for production.-Clean up machine parts after every work procedure.-Set all machine ,Machine Operators To Work Rotating Shifts Job in Tucker,Full Time Employee,"Tucker, GA 30084",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/machine-operators-to-work-rotating-shifts-job-tucker-ga-us-178459817.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=8,12.00 - 13.00 $ /hour,,894ced9b2232847575aafcab79b3f79a
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:00:57:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"A manufacturing company located in the South suburbs is looking for a full time direct hire IT project Manager to join their team. A well-known manufacturing company is looking for an IT PM with 5+ years' experience to join their organization. It this role you will be working with multiple lines of business on both software development and technical infrastructure projects. The right candidate will need to be familiar with working on both Agile and Waterfall environments while working on multiple projects at once. You will also be responsible for conducting status meetings with executives within the organization. This company offers excellent benefits, work/life balance and up to a 10% bonus based on performance. This is a highly visible role within the organization and it will allow you to grow within the company! To be considered for this role you should be familiar with the following: 7+ years as a technical Project ManagerComfortable in Agile and Waterfall environmentsExperience with large scale product development projectsAbility to manage multiple projects at onceUnderstanding of software development and back end systemsPMP certification If interested, please send your resume to Paula Resendez at presendez@snitechnology.com or call 847-654-0045 Thank you!",IT Project Manager Job in Hazel Crest,Full Time,"Hazel Crest, IL",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/it-project-manager-job-hazel-crest-il-us-172660531.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=18,"85,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),4e108fa7a704384a4ab6cd0085f2fa0f
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:00:58:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionEaton’s Fluid Conveyance Division is seeking a Commodity Manager.  The Commodity Manager will be based at our Eden Prairie, MN facility.   Position Overview : Responsible for strategic management of rubber polymers, chemicals, oils, fillers, etc. purchased by Hydraulics Fluid Conveyance Division globally.  This position is responsible for $100M of spend in the Americas and will be additionally be responsible to coordinate the global spend of $300M for these commodities.  Will manage external rubber purchases of rubber through custom mix suppliers.   Will develop, manage, and implement commodity strategies that meet the organizations cost, quality, delivery and other prime goals.  Will lead the development, management and implementation of sourcing strategies to position Hydraulics to achieve growth, cost, quality and delivery goals.   Will also develop, deploy and execute direct material cost out projects and strategies, requiring global coordination with Supply Chain, Product Management Operations and Engineering functions.   Essential Responsibilities : Develop commodity sourcing strategies to effectively leverage Eaton’s Hydraulics spend and work with commodity managers in other Eaton businesses to identify synergies to deliver cost benefits. Ensure commodity strategies are aligned with latest internal and external environmental, market and economic factors. Build and maintain organizational consensus and alignment to the commodity strategies.  Regarded as commodity and market subject matter expert for assigned commodities. Build a global strategic supply base that meets the business growth, capacity and performance needs. Manage the supply base to achieve goals working with regional and plant level supply chain and operations functions. Initiate, plan, monitor and execute global direct material cost down projects, and build and maintain project pipeline, within a portfolio program management tool. The projects will provide NET  3-5% savings to achieve SCM objectives. Lead critical, strategic cost out projects to ensure key cost reduction targets are met and process is maximized to deliver expected results.  Negotiate and manage key strategic supplier contracts, Long Term Agreements, cost negotiations and relationships. Responsible for supply continuity and risk mitigation for the responsible commodity. Conduct Supplier Business Reviews with strategic suppliers on a regular basis annually. Develop strong positive ethical relationships with suppliers & adhere to Eaton’s Code of Conduct. Manage supplier compliance and communications associated with Eaton Corporate initiatives (Ethics compliance, EHS requirements, etc.). Support corporate supply chain programs and initiatives, for example Diversity Spend, International Procurement Office and Supplier Risk Management. Develop supply and replenishment strategies that ensure supplier on time deliveries with progressively shorter lead-times.Basic Qualifications (Including Educational Requirements)Basic Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree in Business, Engineering, Chemistry, or Physics from an accredited institution Minimum 3 years supply chain management experience Minimum 3 years combined experience in rubber, plastic or chemical commodities Legally authorized to work in the US without company sponsorship    Preferred Qualifications : MBA Professional Purchasing Certification preferred 3+ Years technical experience in hose manufacturing and development 3+ years’ experience working with suppliers  Ability to lead teams, influence and manage people Demonstrated strategic thinker, capable of developing plans and actions to achieve targeted goals Solid relationship builder and team player with  strong interpersonal skills Experience working globally and dealing with multi-national and off-shore suppliers Manufacturing industry/environment experience required Strong ethics and professional presence required Proven negotiation skills Demonstrated project leadership success spanning multiple regions Results and detailed oriented Commodity or technical expertise preferred in the areas of raw material and manufacturing Ability to create a compelling vision, establish strategies, communicate them effectively and measure results Demonstrated leader, team player and relationship builder with strong interpersonal skillsEaton is a power management company with 2015 sales of $20.9 billion. Eaton provides energy-efficient solutions that help our customers effectively manage electrical, hydraulic and mechanical power more efficiently, safely and sustainably. Eaton has approximately 97,000 employees and sells products to customers in more than 175 countries. For more information, visit www.eaton.com At Eaton, we see things differently. We see opportunities to innovate, go above and beyond, and we work hard because what we do reflects who we are. If you see things differently—if you’re determined, motivated and focused on improving the world around you—then it’s time to see where a career at Eaton can take you. For more information, visit www.eaton.com/careers Eaton is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Eaton is committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",Commodity Manager - Fluid Conveyance Job in Eden Prairie,"Full Time, Employee","Eden Prairie, MN 55346",,http://jobview.monster.com/commodity-manager-fluid-conveyance-job-eden-prairie-mn-us-172129045.aspx?mescoid=1100022001001&jobPosition=6,,Quality Assurance/Safety,d16a74c8335da12a329f87714e1b28b7
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:01:44:49,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leading diversified international family entertainment and media enterprise is currently seeking a Field Representative in the Anaheim, CA area. This is a 1-year CONTRACT position. No per diem available. Candidate should be open to working 3rd shift when needed.Responsibilities for the Construction SupervisorThis position is accountable to ensure that all assigned projects are properly scoped, design and executed with an emphasis on strict scope, budget and schedule control. Has full accountability for implementation of assigned projects. Must perform accountabilities according to established operating procedures and is expected to take an active role in continually improving these processes. The position objective is to successfully manage each assigned project from inception to completion. The goal of this position is to continually deliver projects within approved budget and schedule with the highest quality and in the most cost effective and efficient manner.Requirements for the Construction SupervisorHigh School Diploma. Special classes in building construction (MEP, estimating, reading contract documents). Minimum of six years’ experience with Construction Supervisor experience of multiple commercial construction projects ranging from $10,000 to $5,000,000. Proven leadership skills and the ability to manage people. Self-motivated and capable of managing/supervising multiple projects. Demonstrates good communication skills, negotiation skills, and administration skills. Competent in reading, reviewing and interpreting contract documents/specifications. Capable of assisting with project budget preparations. Technically competent with various software programs such as construction management software and Microsoft suite of products (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, etc.). Competent in OSHA Rules and Regulations.BenefitsHealthcare401kThis Job is located in Anaheim, CA -> United States",Construction Supervisor - Building Construction/OSHA/MEP Job in Anaheim,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Anaheim, CA 92801",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-supervisor-building-construction-osha-mep-job-anaheim-ca-us-172661231.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=16,17.00 - 24.00 $ /hour,,0960308e006498cd52ed0121db9b09f0
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:01:45:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Michael J. Hennessy Associates, Inc., is dedicated to providing healthcare professionals with the information and resources they need to optimize the quality care of their patients. As a company, we are the preferred source of daily news and information within the healthcare industry, and are committed to launching innovative platforms and video programming. Our passion for preserving quality of life and advancing healthcare is paramount to everything we do. The overall role and primary responsibility of the Project Coordinator is to effectively support the project team through delivery and tactical implementation of project elements and keep projects and all related processes running smoothlyAssist/ partner with project director/manager on the implementation of assigned projects/tasksCoordinate marketing materials-banners/eblast/covertips/journal adsTraffic content through internal/external editing/proofingReferencing/permission gatheringPrep websites for submissions-screen grabs/reference annotationsAttend/follow up submission review meetingsPrep project for DDMAC final submissionTrack timelines and ensure that all deadlines are maintainedTrack banner materials & placementsFaculty logistics-travel/hotel/car transfersFaculty expenses/honoraria processing/trackingOnsite assistance for live video shoots-faculty logistics/cateringTranscript/video edit accuracy checkWeekly quality check on all existing websites/videosPull metrics-client specific reports 1-3 years of experienceExcellent communications skills (verbal and written)Accurate and detail-orientedProductive, flexible, manage multiple tasks, and meet deadlinesWork well under pressure and with tight deadlinesPI95233793Apply Here",Project Coordinator Job in Plainsboro,Full Time Employee,"Plainsboro, NJ 08536",Printing and Publishing,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-job-plainsboro-nj-us-171612479.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,30f02ac9dfa974fe36bb4cd6c702b954
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:02:47:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.Reports to: DIR, Customer Experience and InnovationCenturyLink is the third largest telecommunications company in the United States and is recognized as a leader in the network services market by technology industry analyst firms. The company is a global leader in cloud infrastructure and hosted IT solutions for enterprise customers. CenturyLink provides data, voice and managed services in local, national and select international markets through its high-quality advanced fiber-optic network and multiple data centers for businesses and consumers. CenturyLink is an S&P 500 company and is included among the Fortune 500 list of America’s largest corporations.Candidate Profile:Assist in leading the research, development, test and certification of various wireless technologies and platforms. The candidate will have significant experience in a wireless lab, familiar with current testing methodologies and familiar with necessary test equipment. In addition to the testing capabilities, the candidate will be current on many unlicensed access technologies, such as 802.11ac and be able to articulate the benefits of each of those technologies in a relative fashion. From an innovation perspective, the candidate will be able to provide roadmap support from within the wireless domain commiserate with such concepts as IoT, SON, Public SSID, WiFi boosters, Meraki, airtime management, band steering, etc. in MDU and SDU environments   Key Responsibilities Include: Support the architecture & product owner's strategy and articulate the vision and mission of the product roadmap, including implementation and prioritization of wireless access technologiesMaintain & Develop the Innovation Lab to support the growth and development of future wireless productsWork to develop and maintain relationship/s with academia/graduate students for the purpose of utilizing local expertize and generating new ideas and solutionsE2E wireless test strategy, solution and plan across multiple domains demonstrating compliance to regulatory, performance and functional requirements  Qualifications: 5+ years of experience in relevant leadership rolesLooking for a wireless lab manager who has been involved with the technologies listed below over the course of his/her career. Want to see the demonstration of applicable knowledge applied during the certification process. This experience includes creating, managing and executing test plans, utilizing results to manage firmware or other types of improvements. Involved in managing budgets inclusive of both CAPEX and OPEX. Demonstrated a skill for managing highly talenter engineers.Degree or equivalent in education and experience (CCNA,CCNP)Background in developing cutting edge technologies.As manager of the wireless lab, not only will certification of existing technologies be needed, but also the ability to innovate in the wireless domain – looking for alternative solutions, improving performance, with innovative tuning etc.Hands on experience in rapid development environmentsThis illustrates the managers ability to handle a multitude of prioritizations around varying request types.Ability to communicate effectively with engineering teams to accomplish project goalsDirection and vision are crucial, but motivating and and managing goals of the team is a must.Capable of managing multiple stakeholders on the best course of action for the productAligning and managing expectations is critical for success.Excellent oral and written communication and presentation skillsAble to conceptualize, negotiate and sell ideas internally and externalManaged large-scale lab environments and teamsAlternate Location: US-Louisiana-MonroeRequisition #: 93207 This job may require successful completion of an online assessment. A brief description of the assessments can be viewed on our website at http://find.centurylink.jobs/testguides/ EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",MGR WIRELESS INNOVATION Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/mgr-wireless-innovation-job-monroe-la-us-171784331.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=1,,,8f34b71f096a264476f2ff8615ff81f1
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:02:56:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"An Project Engineer is needed for a renowned manufacturing organization. The Project Engineer is responsible for developing manufacturing equipment concepts, and leading business justification initiatives for capital plant projects. In addition, the Project Engineer will create equipment specifications, project schedules, start-up and commissioning activities. Qualified candidates must have 2+ years’ of related Project Engineering experience for a manufacturing organization, preferably automotive. Candidates must also be proficient with 3D design software, preferably Catia. Our client would like candidate to have a BS in Engineering, although related experience will also be considered. This is a long-term contract opportunity, in San Antonio Texas. Our client is only seeking local talent at this time. Responsibilities for the Project EngineerCreate manufacturing equipment concepts with internal customers, and lead cost and business justification initiatives Create equipment specifications, project schedules, and lead start-up and commissioning activitiesManage equipment suppliers and sub trades during installation, start-up, and run off Ensure project schedule and cost are met Requirements for the Project Engineer2+ of project engineering experience within a manufacturing environment, automotive preferred A BS in Engineering is preferred3D design proficiency is required, preferably with Catia or Inventor Ability to travel 20% of the time as needed BenefitsComprehensive contractor benefits This Job is located in San Antonio, TX -> United States",Project Engineer - Automotive/Assembly /CATIA Job in San Antonio,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"San Antonio, TX 78201",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-automotive-assembly-catia-job-san-antonio-tx-us-172662315.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=6,30.00 - 43.00 $ /hour,,f933be78926184def3ebe46a08a22f33
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:02:57:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Project Assistant/ Administrative Support Specialist is needed for a leading manufacturing organization. The Project Assistant/ Administrative Support Specialist is responsible for coordinating daily departmental functions for the production engineering department. Tasks include budget management, running reports, record and draft minute meetings, and coordinating weekly engineering schedules. Qualified candidates must have 2+ years of project coordination experience and strong proficiency with Microsoft Office applications. Preference will be given to candidates with Peoplesoft, those with a MOS certification, and proficiency developing Macros in Excel. This is a long-term contract assignment in the northern Evansville, IN area. Our client is only seeking local talent at this time. Responsibilities for the Project CoordinatorAct as the project assistant for an engineering team Coordinate daily departmental functions including budget management, travel, expenses, and related project coordination Run weekly reports and coordinate updates with engineersTrack key performance indicators Record and draft minutes of meetingsRequirements for the Project Coordinator2+ years of project coordination experienceStrong with Microsoft Office: Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access, VisioProficient PeopleSoft is strongly preferred An MOS certification and experience developing Macros in Excel are preferred AS Degree is highly preferred BenefitsComprehensive contractor benefits This Job is located in Princeton, IN -> United States",Project Coordinator - PeopleSoft/Microsoft /Automotive Job in Princeton,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Princeton, IN 47670",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-peoplesoft-microsoft-automotive-job-princeton-in-us-172662851.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,15.00 - 22.00 $ /hour,,60d5aaeb9ffd1f405fd361e52989b28a
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:03:48:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Project Manager Assistant - Needed - Full Time- Entry Level Proof Management is one the fastest growing marketing firms in the area. Our project development department continues to grow! We represent major consumer products in the electronic industry as well as clients in beauty, culinary products, health and food.We are looking for college graduates, and MOTIVATED professionals willing to grow with our company to fill some of our Entry-Level positions in:· Project / Promotional Planning· Showcase Event Management· Event Marketing - Sales· Campaign Management· Office Administration· Event Coordination  RequirementsIf you think your personality fits our qualifications below, we encourage you to apply:· Excellent Communication Skills· Motivated Self-Starter· Ambitious with Strong Work Ethic· Ability to work in a High-Energy environment· Outgoing· Leader with great problem solving skills· Willing to learn all aspects of the companyWe Offer:TrainingOptional TravelIncentives/BonusesOpportunities for growthFun, exciting, fast-paced environmentWe offer a 100% Base Pay to all employees PLUS Bonuses in addition to the Competitive Base Pay!Positions are Limited. Submit your Resume immediately to be considered.",Project Manager Assistant - Needed - Full Time- Entry Level Job in Farmington Hills,Full Time Employee,"Farmington Hills, MI 48334",RetailBusiness Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-assistant-needed-full-time-entry-level-job-farmington-hills-mi-us-172760761.aspx?mescoid=4300749001001&jobPosition=4,,Project/Program Management,306f12d6cb358629697df3edd17c39bb
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:03:49:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"TelForce Group is looking for a Project Manager in the AL, TN, GA & LA markets. Responsible for the securing, managing and coordinating all aspects of Critical Facilities Power and Construction projects. Reports to Regional Broadband Manager. Project Manager Responsibilities:·         Meet with customers to review projects and understand scope and time lines ·         Complete oversight of the project from start to finish ·         Ability to work directly with all trades on detailed scopes of work ·         Manage Project Coordinators and oversee Installers within region ·         Develop detailed project schedules and ensure that all aspects of the project stay on track for on time delivery ·         Coordinate meetings between customers, vendors, subcontractors and client personnel; prepare materials and draft minutes ·         Adjust project schedule; notify other departments as needed ·         Create customer estimates and quotes as needed ·         Oversee all subcontractors, vendors, and contractors for compliance to quality, safety, cost, and timeliness requirements ·         Maintain a close interface with the customer, project management office, broadband service group stakeholders regarding schedules, quality and standards ·         Manage project change orders, and timely, accurate invoicing ·         Understand and monitor the projects, on-time delivery, revenue, margin quality ·         Communicate change orders to the customer and/or Regional Manager in a timely manner ·         Understand and implement customers’ standards of safety, installation quality, processes and communication methods ·         SAP Document Number: 10000032626 Version:- 2 ·         Understand and enforce client’s standards of professionalism, quality, safety, metrics and processes·         Accurately track all time, expenses and reporting using the approved methods·         Create and transmit all kick off, closeout documentation, floor plans, schematics and specifications relevant to projects·         Collaborate with design professionals, subject matter experts and other resources to ensure the timely and cost effective completion of all projects·         Cultivate customer relationships and identify new business opportunities Project Manager Requirements:·         2 year degree or equivalent training in field·         4-6 years of experience in construction or related industry·         Proven Project Management experience·         Knowledge of code requirements for specialty trade systems and their integration into overall facility or project plans·         Ability to follow written and verbal directions·         Detail oriented·         Strong organizational skills·         Excellent interpersonal and communication skills·         Ability to coordinate activities of groups of people to achieve maximum efficiency·         Valid driver license·         Available weekends and after hours when on call Candidates mustbe at least 18 years old and be able to pass a Background, Drug and DMV screening to be considered for all job openings. Candidates must have a valid driver’s licenses and be insured; some jobs may require travel up to multiple weeks at a time. Please send all resumes with certifications relative to the job to bobby@telforcegroup.com. In subject line, please note the position you are applying for, a current resume in Word format, 2 references, phone number and email. We reserve the right at all times to disclose any information as we deem necessary to satisfy any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request, or to edit, refuse to post or to remove any information or materials, in whole or in part, in our sole discretion. All resumes submitted to TelForce will become the property of TelForce and shall have the right to display to a third party or in our database for consumption. Call Bobby at 404.219.4346.  ",Project Manager Job in Atlanta,"Full Time, Employee","Atlanta, GA",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-atlanta-ga-us-171804114.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Project/Program Management,f8ab920b49dfdee845f27245365caffa
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:04:44:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bioclinica, Inc. is looking for intelligent, creative and dedicated professionals to join our growing team. We are a company that values technical excellence, teamwork and a commitment to success. We employ cutting edge technology to provide our customers with industry leading solutions and are currently seeking to fill the position of Assistant Clinical Project Manager to work out of our Princeton office.Primary ResponsibilitiesAssists Project Managers with project administration byDrafting project protocol documentsReviewing and editing project presentationsParticipating in project meetings, conference calls, and training callsAssisting with preliminary financial tasks and monthly billingActing as a liaison with cross-functional team members to ensure timely completion of all study deliverables.Reporting study needs and issuesAssists Project Managers in maintaining, reviewing and communicating project progress byMonitoring internal data flow to ensure completion of tasks within agreed upon timeframesCommunicating with clients regarding project statusResearching and responding to client inquiresServing as acting Project Manager in the absence of the assigned Project ManagerMentoring, guiding and supporting the Operations team, including providing feedback to Operations Manager for performance appraisalsEnsures the development and adherence to project timelines as they relate to therapeutic processes byFollowing up on outstanding items including missing data, incomplete paperwork, etc.Assisting in tracking and resolving of client issuesServing as additional point of contact to client, sites, sponsors, etc.Keeping supervisor advised of current issuesPerforms function of Project Manager under direction of management byEstablishing clear and measurable project operating guidelines including timelines, milestones and budget allowancesPerforming project analysis and managementProviding team leadership including team training, communication and delegationEnsuring deliverables are metKeeping client and/or management advised of current issues, study progressResponding to client inquires in a timely and professional mannerMaintains client (internal and external) satisfaction byResponding to inquiries in a professional, courteous and timely mannerMaintains Quality Service and Departmental Standards byReading, understanding and adhering to organizational Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs)Assisting in establishing and enforcing departmental standardsParticipating in the modification of company SOPs related to the therapeutic teamReviewing and providing recommendations to management on operational procedures, and by participating in process improvement initiatives.Secondary ResponsibilitiesContributes to team effort byHelping others to achieve resultsPerforming other duties as assignedMaintains Technical Knowledge byAttending and participating in applicable company-sponsored trainingWorking conditions:Travel: 0-5%Lifting: 0-15lbsOther: Computer work for long periods of time Required Skills:Qualifications: Education:Bachelor's Degree required.Additional skill set:Ability to work in group setting and independently; ability to adjust to changing prioritiesExcellent attention and orientation toward meticulous workStrong interpersonal and communication skills, both verbal and writtenStrong organizational skillsGoal orientedAbility to project and maintain a professional and positive attitudeRequired Experience:Experience:Experience working with computer software including Word, Excel, Access and Project preferred1 + years experience working with clinical trials and/or within pharmaceutical environment required",Assistant Clinical Project Manager (-) Job in Princeton,Full Time,"Princeton, NJ",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-clinical-project-manager-1298-050-job-princeton-nj-us-172664031.aspx?mescoid=1100049001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),acae2b73282e72cc076d6276f9692e60
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:04:44:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Live IT Up at Ciber   At Ciber, we believe the most inspired, innovative and industrious companies should win, regardless of size or legacy. We’re the small company that cares and the big company that can. We deliver breakthrough performances and powerful solutions that are anything but cookie cutter in order to give our clients the competitive advantage they deserve.  Work. Role Description:  The Project Manager is responsible for delivering and supporting technology projects.Serve as the primary point of contact for assigned projects, and be responsible for the overall delivery of services.The primary function of this position will be to manage an audit of network and telecommunication services across multiple entities, and gather and report upon results of the audit. Responsible for working with these entities post-audit to enact any recommendations agreed upon by the company and the entities involved.Collaborate with company engineers and architects to plan and implement a consolidated network approach for the enterprise.Plan and manage IT projects by identifying tasks, resources delivery timelines and success metrics.Manage program scope, schedule, budget and resources to successfully fulfill business andtechnical requirements with high customer satisfaction.Facilitate technical support as needed including but not limited to architectural reviews, compliance reviews and various project artifacts.Manage project issues and risks to prevent potential barriers to project success.Review with management project schedules and milestone dates.Create and maintain relevant project documentation such as project charter/scope, project plans, status reports and operational checklists.Provide presentations as necessary to customers, agency staff and management including use of company tools to maintain current information.Ensure deployed solutions are compliant with Enterprise Technology and Security Standards.Assist with procurement necessary to acquire goods and services to facilitate the project.Lead project meetings with customer stakeholders and project teams on a regular basis. Minimum of eight years in information technology with at least five years in a project management role.Experience creating and implementing plans according to project goals and objectives.Demonstrates a high degree of customer service and team work.Ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously.Working knowledge of project management concepts as defined by PMI.Knowledge of Agile/Scrum concepts.Knowledge of ITIL concepts.Experience working in a highly matrixed organization.Good communication skills, both written and verbal with the ability to be respectful and diplomatic at all timesUnderstanding Network principals, a must.Networking experience a plus.PM for Network consolidation a plus.Previous experience consolidating multiple entities.Experience auditing large scale environments.The ideal candidate is proficient in different project management methodologies such as Waterfall, Agile and Scrum. This position requires the successful completion of a background investigation and/or drug screen.  Ciber, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Females/Gender Identity/Sexual Orientation/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.  Learn. Talent Services bring clients a range of staffing solutions, from a single contractor to a team of experts to help achieve their key business goals on target and within budget. Our talent sourcing model uncovers the right IT talent and aligns critical skills with client technology, culture, and expectations.  Grow.  For more than 40 years, Ciber has delivered the technical savvy and IT solutions that help businesses achieve strategic goals. A global IT consulting company with some 6,500 people, Ciber has offices on four continents and in 15 countries. Founded in 1974, Ciber remains client focused and results driven. The company trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE: CBR). For more information, visit http://www.ciber.com/.",Senior Project Manager Job in Boston,"Full Time, Employee","Boston, MA 02108",,http://jobview.monster.com/senior-project-manager-job-boston-ma-us-172649149.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=14,,Project/Program Management,eb4aaa4b8f2083d774e3ee06f0075b52
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:04:56:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This position is fully dedicated to the transformation/restructuring projectResponsibilities:Work with internal partners and external supplier to remediate legacy PVE Drive new or revised SPV special process validations as needed with specified suppliers Support evaluating vendor risk during outsourcing activities. Provide overall quality assurance leadership in the management of select contract manufacturing sites engaged in the production of Client products. Provide complex product team support for quality system design and audit, compliance assessment, and for support of steady state manufacturing processes. Utilize multifaceted industry and process excellence standards on an expert level in daily quality operations, including good manufacturing practices (GMP), and international organization for standardization (ISO). Report on contract manufacturer performance metrics. Handle complex technical issues for manufacturing processes that are to be transferred to satellite facilities. Provide Quality Engineering support to suppliers including audits/assessments, inspection technique support, verification/validation activities, CAPA and change managementExperience & Skills:A minimum of 6 years of experience in a highly regulated industry is required. Experience in the Medical Device industry and/or Pharmaceutical industry is required. FDA and ISO regulations knowledge is required, with FDA CFR Part 820 and ISO 13485 knowledge required. Auditing background is an asset. Blueprint literacy including GD&T is preferred. Experience in root cause analysis is required. Experience or knowledge with machining manufacturing processes and injection molding an asset. Six Sigma, Lean, or ASQ Certification and trainings an asset. This position will require up to 25% travel with occasional international Education:A minimum of a Bachelor's degree is required, preferably in an Engineering, Life Science, or related discipline. ",Quality Engineer / Medical Devices Job in Raynham,Full Time Employee,"Raynham, MA 02767",Biotechnology/PharmaceuticalsHealthcare ServicesStaffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-medical-devices-job-raynham-ma-us-172731450.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,Quality Assurance/Safety,b702d08406789c245dbfea405968c39d
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:04:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Hello,We currently have An excellent opening for a Quality Control Supervisor HEBRON, Illinois but we also have other opportunities so don't let this description stop you from sending me your resume directly to mike.thompson@experis.com and calling me so we can talk about what would be the perfect career move for you.Best regards,MichaelMike.thompson@experis.com630-414-1637 CellPosition Summary: The Quality Control Supervisor has responsibility to plan and manage the effective operation of the manufacturing quality functions. The candidate will be responsible to ensure that quality objectives and goals are established and deployed in order to continuously improve and exceed the required quality performance levels. This position is a leadership role with a team of direct reports that will require significant oversight in terms of daily tasks as well as culture and team development. Primary Responsibilities: Collect and utilize quality performance data to reduce cost of non-conformances and assess the effectiveness of the overall plant quality system. Train and apply formal problem methods (8D) to analyze and resolve customer complaints in a timely fashion. Provide support and direction utilizing core tools such as PFMEA, Control Plans and other proven process control elements from initial product launch through PPAP submission. Maintain robust supplier management practices, including but not limited to, incoming receiving inspection and supplier quality development. Uphold adequate maintenance and calibration of gages and measurement devices. Maintain internal auditing processes aimed at achieving robust quality systems and sustaining industry quality and environmental certifications. Lead and support improvement initiatives to reduce scrap/rework through improved process control and error proofing methods. Oversight and development of quality team members including talent assessment, development and performance management in conjunction with the Human Resources Business Partner. Create and sustain a positive quality-operational culture including team-building, recognition and reward aspects. Manage adequate quality staffing levels and improve quality competency levels by providing leadership and training to the manufacturing teams on quality tools and systems. Position Skills and Experience Requirements: Minimum of 5 years of progressive quality management experience Minimum of 4 years of increasing leadership experience and demonstrated ability to lead a team including talent and performance management Extensive knowledge in automotive requirements including PPAP, SPC, APQP, PFMEA, MSA and Metrologies Comprehensive knowledge of ISO9001 and ISO/TS16949 Quality System requirements Comprehensive knowledge of ISO14001 Environmental System requirements Expert skills in utilizing the fundamentals of problem-solving and mentoring others in the accurate use of these Quality tools Excellent verbal and written English communication skills Self-motivated with the ability to motivate others to achieve high levels of performanceExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Quality Control Supervisor Job in Hebron,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Quality Control Supervisor,"Hebron, IL 60034",http://jobview.monster.com/quality-control-supervisor-job-hebron-il-us-172523236.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=4,,Quality Assurance/Safety,6f2250d39ce245c0840ba75f1aa3a09a
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:37:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: Consultant - Exchange 2013 associated with the Legal eDiscoveryLocation: Foster CityEssential Duties and Job Function Supporting the integration, configuration and support of Exchange 2013 associated with the Legal eDiscovery processing and management implementation project.Assist with the configuration of Exchange/eVault during the software implementation.Support project team during testing of software against Exchange in POC environment.Prepare documentation related to Exchange and functionality with legal hold technology.Preferred Skills Exchange 2013 CertifiedEnterprise Vault ExperienceDiscovery Accelerator experienceeDiscovery experienceTechnical writing skillsExcellent Communication skillsAbility to escalate issues to Management as neededRisk mitigationExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Legal eDiscovery Consultant Job in Foster City,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Job Title: Consultant - Exchange 2013 associated with the Legal eDiscoveryLocation: Foster CityEssential Duties and Job Function Supporting the integration, configuration and support of Exchange 2013 associated with the Legal eDiscovery processing and management implementation project.Assist with the configuration of Exchange/eVault during the software implementation.Support project team during testing of software against Exchange in POC environment.Prepare documentation related to Exchange and functionality with legal hold technology.Preferred Skills Exchange 2013 CertifiedEnterprise Vault ExperienceDiscovery Accelerator experienceeDiscovery experienceTechnical writing skillsExcellent Communication skillsAbility to escalate issues to Management as neededRisk mitigationExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Foster City, CA 94404",http://jobview.monster.com/legal-ediscovery-consultant-job-foster-city-ca-us-172762123.aspx?mescoid=2300327001001&jobPosition=1,,Project/Program Management,4f0e07418e2d5ab86efcb2c8dad760ba
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:37:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThe Development Manager is responsible for donor recruitment, development, cultivation, and activation, leading assigned fundraising events, and meeting fundraising objectives of the March of Dimes in the assigned market.Principle roles and responsibilities include revenue development and volunteer leadership development. The position reports to the Senior Development Manager OR Executive Director of Market Development.• Increase overall market revenue by implementing core tactics for fundraising events, resulting in aggressive and sustainable year over year growth.• Identify prospects, research and analyze development options in order to predict business opportunities. Manage a personal portfolio of prospects.• Develop relationships with constituents, referral partners, or existing volunteer leaders in order to obtain personal introduction to prospective constituents.• Develop and present sales presentations in order to educate and sell mission engagement opportunities to prospects or constituents.• Research prospects’ needs, concerns and objectives in order to create effective sponsorship proposals. In partnership with the Senior Development Manager or Executive Director of Market Development, take a lead role on significant sponsorship asks in the market. Drive all sponsors in the market to activate their sponsorship aggressively.• Identify candidates for top volunteer leadership roles. Create plans to gain access to volunteer leadership prospects and candidates. Recruit qualified candidates and articulate goals, outcomes and objectives for performance in order to enable candidates to make good decisions regarding the acceptance of critical revenue generation goals.• Develop, execute and monitor development strategies to enhance cultivation, solicitation and stewardship of donors.• Make periodic visits, explore specific needs, and resolve problems in order to build and maintain constituent relationships.• Coach and guide volunteers in the execution of the event and achievement of expected outcomes.• Communicate the mission of the March of Dimes with staff, volunteers and within the community in order to connect current and prospective donors with Mission outcomes.• Utilize electronic data management tools in order to review and analyze pertinent information and monitor financial and mission related results.• Perform other duties from time-to-time in order to ensure the attainment of market financial goals.• Represent the March of Dimes as an official spokesperson and provides a high degree of expertise within his/her area and in broad and organizational areas to internal and external contacts. Contacts are critical to motivating, negotiation with, developing and collaborating with others.• Decisions, or decisions this position leads in making, have significant impact on fundraising success of the market.Position Qualifications• Previous Experience: Minimum of 3 years of directly related work experience in increasingly responsible positions• Education: Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and/or directly related professional skills and experience• Physical Demands: May involve lifting and carrying boxes; may involve traveling by car or plane to meetings and training.",Development Manager Job in Salt Lake City,"Full Time, Employee","Salt Lake City, UT",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/development-manager-job-salt-lake-city-ut-us-171743960.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=9,,Project/Program Management,a3f583dca87cdd1e8fb51115bb09b5a9
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:39:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"About UsNew Construction Electrical WiringResponsibilities• Familiarize and gain knowledge of electrical wiring phases• Communicate with respective Project Analyst• Identify damaged and defective goods• Conduct and submit physical monthly cycle counts of inventory• Perform routine counts on units• Coordinate material issuance, working directly with Superintendent• Inspect for quality and monitor misuse of material, tools and equipment• Maintain and track tools• Acquire, organize and maintain storage units• Input all material transactions into software• Receive, inventory, track and secure materialsEducation• College Diploma/Degree in Construction Management or related fieldQualifications• Must pass background check• Bilingual in Spanish preferable, but not required• Reliable Transportation for Commute & Material Transport• Electrical Background a plus, but not required• Ability to stand for long periods of time and lift up to 60lbs• Excellent written and oral communication• Exceptional Microsoft Excel skills• Experience with Microsoft Windows, Mac OS X and Mac iOS• Construction Management experienceSkills• Ability to absorb and retain information• Well organized• Highly self-motivated, requires little or no supervision• Solve problems effectively• Perform well under stress• Keen attention to detailCompensation$30,000 - $35,000 per yearPosition TypeFull-TimeBenefitsMedical, Dental, Vision. Short term, Long term disability & 401k.",Inventory & Quality Assurance (Entry Level) Job in King Of Prussia,Full Time,"King Of Prussia, PA 19406",All,http://jobview.monster.com/inventory-quality-assurance-entry-level-job-king-of-prussia-pa-us-171794786.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=5,,Entry Level,65e69b1750d618e457695c54eedca947
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:41:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  678843Job Summary:The Field Service Diagnostics Engineering team is seeking candidates with strong Software Quality Assurance experience to assist with validation of Mac and iOS diagnostic tools used in field service channels to drive key performance metrics and support customers.Key Qualifications:3 or more years of professional work experience in Software QA or a related field.Solid background in mobile and desktop Software QA processes.Functional knowledge of QA methodologies that cover regression testing, ad hoc testing, functional testing, localization testing, user interface testing, and systems integration testing.Experience with hardware and software (iOS and OS X, and associated hardware).Proven ability to deliver high-quality work on tight schedules.Self-motivated, independent, and proactive.Outstanding collaboration skills.Excellent written and verbal communication skills.Proven ability to accurately collect and track incoming test data, and to assist developers and project leads in gauging its impact.Description:Assist in executing systematic, end-to-end test plans and test cases by working with developers and project leads.Use bug-tracking software to report and prioritize issues; work with developers and team leads to understand and pursue issues to resolution.Provide project managers and team leads with timely and accurate QA status and progress during all project testing phases, including summarizing QA results at project conclusion.Collaborate with and provide support to developers, readiness, localization, and other cross-functional teams.Contribute to initiatives to improve the overall QA process, such as identifying and closing gaps in testing coverage or inefficiencies in workflows.Hours: 8:00am to 5:00pmTo Apply: Send resume to jowings@apexsystemsinc.com Job Details: Additional Requirements: Experience with python or other basic scripting / coding is a plus. UNIX proficiency is a plus. Experience with a test tracking software packageEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Junior QA Job in Santa Clara,Full Time Employee,"Santa Clara, CA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/junior-qa-job-santa-clara-ca-us-172581353.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),765725f2b2c80e311f82982650463020
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:48:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"My client is looking to add a Commercial Construction Estimator to their team in Charlotte, NC!Client DetailsMy client has been in business for over 50 years and is a market leader in US covering commercial and industrial construction. They are expanding their team in Charlotte and looking to add a Junior Commercial Construction Estimator!DescriptionThis Junior Commercial Construction Estimator will have the following responsibilities:Estimating various types of commercial construction projects for all aspects of the projectWork closely with various team members including subcontractors to fully understand the entire job scopeAnalyze everything in the project to determine/establish the costs, schedules, labor estimates, etc.Maintain a list of all suppliers, contractors, and subcontractorsPresent all estimates to upper management teamProfileThis Junior Commercial Construction Estimator will have the following qualifications:BS degree in engineering, construction science, or related discipline4+ years of construction estimating experience with a strong background in commercial construction workExperience with high-rise, tilt-wall, mixed use construction a plus!Strong experience using various estimating softwareAbility to travel 10% to various project sites in the USJob OfferGreat opportunity to join a market leader in the commercial construction industry with strong benefits and growth potential!",Commcercial Construction Estimator Job in Charlotte,"Full Time , Employee","Charlotte, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/commcercial-construction-estimator-job-charlotte-nc-us-172737343.aspx?mescoid=1300080001001&jobPosition=17,,,8795465f751e3126a3bc3d613fa05699
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:49:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70412 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Oakdale Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6014 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747831.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=13,,Project/Program Management,93104a1deebb5a058de035b4fe8d1cea
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:05:58:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position PurposeThe part-time Development Specialist is responsible for coordinating and executing cost-effective fundraising events in order to meet fundraising objectives of the March of Dimes in the assigned market. The position acts as a liaison between the March of Dimes and the community by recruiting volunteer and corporate participation in fundraising activities.Principle roles and responsibilities include revenue development and volunteer leadership development.• Identify prospects, research, and analyze sales options in order to identify business opportunities for designated area of responsibility. Develop relationships with constituents, referral partners or existing volunteer leaders in order to obtain introduction to prospective constituents.• Develop and present sales presentations in order to educate and inform top level constituents or prospects.• Accurately sense when and how to follow up and to advance from initial call to the final decision.• Identify, recruit and train qualified candidates for volunteer roles for all event committees within the designated area of responsibility. Manage fundraising volunteers for designated fundraising events.• Work with volunteer committees to effectively manage the execution of all assigned fundraising events, including fundraising and logistics. Be the lead staff for data management, systems management, report generation, etc. for fundraising events and donors.• Adhere to all event budgets, adjust and control expenditures.• Communicate the mission of the March of Dimes with staff, volunteers and within the community in order to connect current and prospective donors with Mission outcomes.• Perform other related duties from time-to-time in order to ensure the attainment of market financial goals.• Represent the March of Dimes with other professionals and volunteers both internally and externally. Contacts are critical to motivating, negotiation with, developing and collaborating with others.• Decisions or decisions this position leads in making, may have important consequences and may directly impact the fundraising success of the market.Position Qualifications• Previous Experience: Minimum of 3 years of experience in fundraising and event execution.• Education: Bachelor’s degree strongly preferred and/or directly related professional skills and experience• Physical Demands: May involve lifting and carrying boxes; may involve traveling by car or plane to meetings and training.",Development Specialist Job in Wayne,"Part Time, Employee","Wayne, PA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/development-specialist-job-wayne-pa-us-171968760.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,53d2d8fa245f522f6e90a12178042dd5
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:06:17:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"An established tier 1 automotive supplier is actively seeking a Program Manger for Automotive Mechanisms at their technical center near Pontiac, MI. This is a newly created position due to the growth of the company and this has been coined as a ""critical fill"" by the Engineering Manager. This person will design and develop this company's industry leading components. Responsibilities for the Program ManagerEstablishes and maintains DFMEA's, DVP's, and design micro-schedules for all projectsTechnical interfaces with the customer, design, manufacturing plants, testing, sales, program management, purchasing and suppliersDevelopment and implementation of creative cost-effective solutions to technical, performance, quality and durability problems discovered during development of new productsSupport internal teams with on-going development of new programs to meet customer requirementsSupport customer Product Development Teams (PDT’s) to address open issuesMaintains the overall APQP process and lead assigned gate sign-off with the Functional Managers.Requirements for the Program ManagerBachelor's Degree in Engineering or related disciplineAt least 5 years working with the design or development of automotive components. Ability to lead functional teams and products with moderate resource requirements, risk and complexityLeads others to solve complex problems; uses sophisticated analytical thought to exercise judgement and identify innovative solutionsBenefits401kExcellent BenefitsThis Job is located in Pontiac, MI -> United States",Program Manager - Program Manager/APQP/Mechanical Systems Job in Pontiac,Full Time Employee,"Pontiac, MI 48340",,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-program-manager-apqp-mechanical-systems-job-pontiac-mi-us-172661550.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=13,"95,000.00 - 108,000.00 $ /year",,5c0684e9da1e45904aaa8ca7e5ce2d8a
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:06:21:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description Quality Assurance Supervisor Discover the Difference You Can Make at Gate Gourmet Gate Gourmet, a gategroup company, is the world’s largest independent provider of catering and provisioning services for the airline industry.  For the past 70 years, we have served over 250 carriers in more than 30 countries. Gate Gourmet combines culinary expertise with the highest standards of food safety and production to deliver delicious, healthy, and affordable meals to over 270 million travelers around the globe.  Position Summary : This position is responsible for quality element control related to operation, auditing policy and procedure, leading quality improvement projects, driving defect prevention and detections. Acts as the primary business unit liaison to Corporate QA. The position supervises quality assurance staff in the unit.  Main Duties and Responsibilities: Leads and monitors quality improvement projects Monitors corrective action system Plays a key role in developing a comprehensive quality program Implements the quality system detailed in the quality manual Champions the total quality improvement efforts and initiates problem solving efforts and assures implementation Drives prevention vs. detection of defects Coordinates actions to prevent the occurrences of nonconformities Maintains customer compliance resolution Responsible for the maintenance of key performance metrics for the Quality organization Controls Food safety and Quality of processing and manufacturing within the business Supports customer audits, government audits to meet compliance Verifies and insures company policies and procedures are followed Insures quality specifications and requirements are followed and met Develops Standard Operating Procedures Responsible for safety, quality and compliance to customer specification Trains and monitors employees on proper work procedures to ensure maximum productivity and security with minimum labor and costs Responsible for performance evaluation, coaching, counseling and preparing corrective action for employees and liaises appropriately with HR and other support functions In conjunction with department leaders determines number of employees needed by shift   Qualifications   Education: High School graduate or equivalent with experience in related discipline required College degree in related discipline and knowledge of HACCP, quality management and six sigma preferred   Work Experience: Minimum 1 year experience in Food safety control practices (GMP's, SOP's, and HACCP) and quality program control required Minimum 2 years of supervisory experience working in a high volume, manufacturing, food production, restaurant or catering environment or equivalent experience in the related field preferred Experience working in the airline industry is preferred   Job Skills: Minimum skill requirements: Intermediate level Microsoft office tool skills (excel, word) Knowledge of quality auditing, inspection methods Detail oriented Strong organizational skills, able to prioritize responsibilities and multi-task Strong interpersonal skills, interact well with multiple departments as required Abel to work with little supervision Excellent reading, writing, and oral communication skills Project management skills Knowledge of FDA regulations and will to be HACCP certified Basic lean, six sigma knowledge, and continuous improvement understanding a plus Language / Communication Skills: Excellent oral and written communication skills Multi-lingual a plus   Communication Skills : ·         Excellent oral and written communication skills ·         Multi-lingual a plus Travel : None Environmental Requirements : Regularly, stands, bends, lifts, and moves intermittently during shifts of 10+ hours. In a normal production kitchen facility there may be physical discomfort due to temperature and noise. Must be able to lift, push, pull and move product, equipment, supplies, etc., in excess of twenty-five (25) pounds. Demonstrated Competencies to be Successful in the Position : Thinking - Information search and analysis, problem resolution skills Engaging - understanding others, team leadership, developing people Inspiring - influencing and building relationships, motivating and inspiring, communicating effectively Achieving - delivering business results under pressure, championing performance improvement, customer focus The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by the individual(s) assigned to this position. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, responsibilities, and skills required. Management reserves the right to modify, add, or remove duties and to assign other duties as necessary. In addition, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position. Candidates will be required to go through pre-employment drug screen, criminal check and/or airport fingerprinting. gategroup is an equal opportunity employer committed to workforce diversity.  All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability status or other category protected under applicable law. For further information regarding Equal Employment Opportunity copy and paste the following URL into your web browser:  http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf. #ggi# #jobcopy p {margin: 5px 0 0;}",Quality Assurance Supervisor Job in Chicago body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time, Employee",Chicago,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-supervisor-job-chicago-il-us-172362002.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=10,,Experienced (Non-Manager),7f794730949d3d74ec6a97b1a17fbc36
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:06:48:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Administration for Children's Services (ACS) manages the largest child care system in the country with an approximate budget of $1 billion and is responsible for managing the administration of subsidies for early care and education benefitting more than 100,000 children. Under the supervision of the Associate Commissioner for Program Development, the Executive Director of Program Design has the following duties and responsibilities:Analyze and assess feasibility, implications and cost/benefit of potential child care delivery enhancements and initiativesSupervise staff managers with responsibility for ensuring compliance among contract early childhood programs, with service content requirements, including but not limited to family and community engagement, health, mental health and nutrition, and education and disabilitiesDevelop scenarios and work plans for program design and management, including providing expertise on child development and oversight of curriculum and contentDevelop, coordinate and implement work plan for analyzing and updating community needs assessmentDevelop scenarios and work plans for the implementation and management of program development initiativesCoordinate implementation and planning within Division of Early Care & Education, with other ACS divisions, and with city, state and Federal agencies with jurisdiction over child care service deliveryConvene intra-agency and inter-agency workgroups to design and execute tasks to facilitate child care service delivery management, and other strategic program development and service enhancement initiativesCommunicate with and get input from governmental and community stakeholders regarding child care service delivery",Executive Director of Program Design Job in Manhattan,Full Time Employee,"Manhattan, NY 10038",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/executive-director-of-program-design-job-manhattan-ny-us-172651243.aspx?mescoid=1100001001001&jobPosition=8,,Project/Program Management,8d955e26e577c2995c0850f7f3196582
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:06:49:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Leading wireless telecom client has an immediate need for an experienced Construction Project Manager to join their S.FL team on a 12 month contract basis. We are looking for candidates with 3+ years of Construction experience within the wireless telecom industry who can assist with site design, manage all pre-construction activities and assist with site integration. Contractor benefits, PTO and 401k available. Responsibilities for the Construction ManagerAttend all site design, construction & bid walks in the S.FL area. Provide Architecture and Engineering drawings and fulfill all field construction pre-requisite requests for Entitlement.Assist with vendor negotiations and SOW's to ensure project pricing is satisfactory and assist with material acquisition and facilitate requests for material replacement.Manage and all pre-construction activities in preparation for site construction.Assist with Site Integration activities. Attend post-construction site walk & manage all reporting/hand off to Field Ops.Other admin duties like reporting, punch lists, etc. will be required. Requirements for the Construction Manager3+ years of Wireless Telecom Construction experience. 3+ years of Project Management experience. Some local/regional travel may be required. Personal laptop is needed for the assignment. BenefitsContractor benefits, PTO and 401K available. This Job is located in Sunrise, FL -> United States",Construction Manager - Wireless / Telecom/Construction /Design / Integration Job in Sunrise,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Sunrise, FL 33323",,http://jobview.monster.com/construction-manager-wireless-telecom-construction-design-integration-job-sunrise-fl-us-172662343.aspx?mescoid=1100034001001&jobPosition=5,46.00 - 50.00 $ /hour,,ceadb17a01ef7a8f0007c5b908f7e379
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:07:49:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Project Manager is needed for a leading Utility Services organization. The Project Manager responsible to direct a variety of water and wastewater capital improvement projects. Tasks include overseeing project schedule, budget, and sub-contracting activities. Qualified candidates must have a BS in Engineering or Construction Management, and 5+ years' of related field construction management experience for water and wastewater utility construction projects. This is a direct hire position located in the greater Washington, DC metro area (Clinton, MD). Our client will consider relocation assistance for qualified regional candidates. Responsibilities for the Project ManagerEnsure completion of all capital projects on schedule and on budget; Projects will include replacing/installing mains, connections, and other water infrastructureDevelop detailed scopes of work and cost estimates for projects and provides detailed scopes and technical information for RFP'sEnsures that legal, regulatory, and company requirements are met for assigned capital projects; monitors quality control and inspection activities on assigned projects and implements corrective actions when requiredWork with contract management to resolve any issues with vendors and contractors; Coordinates field changes with engineering staffPresent project status reports to senior management Requirements for the Project ManagerBachelor’s degree in Engineering or Construction Management 5+ years' of related construction management experience for water and wastewater construction projectsMust have excellent MS Excel skills; Experience with project management software, Primavera, MS Project, or JD Edwards is a plusProficiency with AutoCAD, 3D preferred BenefitsComprehensive benefits 401 K with Match This Job is located in Washington, DC -> United States",Project Manager - Water & Wastewater /Construction/AutoCAD Job in Washington,Full Time Employee,"Washington, DC 20001",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-water-wastewater-construction-autocad-job-washington-dc-us-172662259.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=7,"95,000.00 - 110,000.00 $ /year",,7bb35fa6ab7d3d60284438524b6c8db0
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:07:49:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you are a keen observer with an eye for detail and always gives 110% in order to achieve success, then a career as a private investigator is custom-made for you! Claims Verification Inc. (CVI) is looking for qualified candidates for an INSURANCE FRAUD INVESTIGATOR position in the Alexandria, VA area. Qualified candidates must live in the area and cover the adjoining areas of the state as needed. Virginia License and experience is required. We will train the right candidate. This field position will report to the Southington, CT office.CVI is the premier insurance fraud investigation company in the industry since 1978. We set the standard for quality investigations and ethical behavior that our competitors try to meet. We are successful for only one reason: our employees are simply the best. Our management philosophy is no-nonsense and non-invasive, so the employees who thrive are those with high integrity who are able to work independently, and who aren't afraid to put in the time and effort to achieve their goals. If you are that type of person, then CVI will definitely work for you.Investigator responsibilities include, but are not limited to: * Conduct full investigations related to insurance fraud, to include surveillance, activity checks, background checks, locates and statements. * Write reports and submit with video evidence to field office. * Testify as needed at hearings. * Work closely with professionals in industry. * Manage own caseload and work independently in the field. Qualified candidates must possess a Virginia license and excellent verbal/written communications skills, and proficiency with Microsoft Word. The ability to work independently, keen observation skills, a strong work ethic and the inability to accept less than the best from oneself is a must. The candidate must be able to adapt to a flexible schedule that will involve extensive travel, long days and evenings/weekends; overnight assignments are to be expected. Must have own well-maintained vehicle and clean driving/criminal records. Prerequisites: A four-year degree (Criminology a plus) is required, or an Associate's degree combined with prior military investigative experience or insurance surveillance experience.  CVI provides investigators with surveillance equipment, office supplies and laptops. We offer a competitive salary plus expense reimbursement, as well as a comprehensive benefits package, including:* Health, Dental and Prescription coverage* Voluntary Life and Long-term Disability plans* Voluntary Vision Plan* Paid Vacation and Personal daysFor immediate consideration, please apply online, OR fax your resume WITH cover letter to 877-284-4717, OR email in Word format to cgagnon@cvi.com. You must indicate ALEXANDRIA in the subject line of your email. CVI is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Please check our website at http://www.cvi.com  ",Licensed Investigator - Alexandria VA Job in Alexandria,Employee,"Alexandria, VA",All,http://jobview.monster.com/licensed-investigator-alexandria-va-job-alexandria-va-us-171618099.aspx?mescoid=3300593001001&jobPosition=12,,,9554fa69c99889e84f4b6539dac8acd3
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:07:50:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"A Project Engineer is needed for a premier food manufacturing company in Southwest Ohio. Responsibilities include cost reduction, process improvement activities, leading capital projects, and an active involvement in the mechanical and maintenance aspect of food machinery. Candidates must have a BS in Industrial or Mechanical Engineering, and 5+ years of experience in the food industry-meat manufacturing is a plus. Knowledge of AutoCad is a must. Relocation is available for qualified candidates. Responsibilities for the Project EngineerPerform activity to promote cost reduction and equipment functionality Lead and conduct quantifiable experiments to provide improvements Analyzing capital processes and coordinating with operations, maintenance and other departments as neededRequirements for the Project EngineerBachelor's Degree ME or IE5+ years in food manufacturing industry CAD experienceBenefitsExceptional medical benefitsRelocation availableCompetitive bonus structure401k plan with company matchThis Job is located in Cincinnati, OH -> United States",Project Engineer - Process Improvement/AutoCad/Food Manufacturing Job in Cincinnati,Full Time Employee,"Cincinnati, OH 45275",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-engineer-process-improvement-autocad-food-manufacturing-job-cincinnati-oh-us-172661463.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=14,"80,000.00 - 90,000.00 $ /year",,42adfd3f75f95219443c7b10c243241b
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:08:59:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leading automotive supplier is seeking a Project Manager to provide full-scope support to product launches (design through production) and to contribute technical expertise within business development efforts. This position will be based in Northwest Ohio and reports directly to the Director of Engineering. Qualified candidates will posses strong engineering background with plastic injection molding and also posses a demonstrated ability to excel in customer-facing roles.Responsibilities for the Project ManagerManage product launch processes in cooperation with manufacturing departments and suppliers (concept design through production).Contribute to sales/business development efforts with new and current customers through technical expertise and product knowledge.Ensure project timelines are met and TS16949 procedures are properly followed.Requirements for the Project ManagerBachelor's degree in Engineering required.8+ years of engineering and design experience within automotive industry.Strong familiarity with plastic injection molding (design, performance, tooling, material selection, etc.).Proven ability to build strong relationships with customers.Willingness and ability to travel regionally (25%)Benefits for the Project ManagerOur client offers a highly-competitive portfolio of insurance and retirement benefits.This Job is located in Defiance, OH -> United States",Project Manager - Automotive/Plastic/Launch Job in Defiance,Full Time Employee,"Defiance, OH 43512",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-automotive-plastic-launch-job-defiance-oh-us-172742828.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=5,"80,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",,c2b0d569570b74a69409b20a84d9d79b
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:09:01:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sr. Manager of Quality ValidationMy client, a small pharmaceutical company in South San Francisco, is looking to add a Sr. Manager of Quality Validation to head up their quality team. They are building a new manufacturing site and have hired a CMO to run the facility and a validation company to be doing all the ""hands on validation"". The Sr. Manager of Quality Validation would be acting as the company's QA representative and sign off for all protocols, reports and validation work as a whole.Necessary Experience: Facility ValidationProcess ValidationEquipment ValidationMethod ValidationIQ, OQ, PQGMP (know good documentation process)Quality SystemsIf interested in the role please respond with an updated resume. I will review all resumes and contact candidates that I believe would be a good fit for the role. If I don't contact you I will shortlist your resume for future roles.Thank you!",Sr. Manager of Quality Validation Job in South San Francisco,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","South San Francisco, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-manager-of-quality-validation-job-south-san-francisco-ca-us-172747258.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=2,,,a9f76bbdf50948a6e72885f051c4a6f1
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:09:05:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Great 6 month contract opportunity for experienced Quality Assurance Auditor with prestigious pharmaceutical organization near Exton, PA.  This position offers excellent compensation!The Quality Assurance Auditor III will collaborate with Contract Manufacturing Organizations and Suppliers to assure the quality of their products, materials, components and/or operations.Responsibilities for the Quality Assurance III include:Attends weekly meetings to represent Quality Assurance for production of products at CMOsReviews batch records, carton label proofs, solution records, and participates in resolution of deviations.Reviews and approves validation protocols, reviews and approves shipping validation.Experience with quality records such as deviations, change controls, CAPAs, and laboratory investigation failures.Guides others in resolving complex issues in specialized area based on existing solutions and proceduresServes as an expert within own disciplineServes as a resource for best practices/quality on functional teams or projectRequires specialized depth and/or breadth of expertiseInterprets internal or external business issues and recommends solutions/best practicesSolves complex problems; takes a broad perspective to identify solutionsWorks independently, with guidance in only the most complex situationsProgression to this level is typically restricted on the basis of business requirementRequirements include:BA or BS degree in applicable discipline and 4 -10 years of related quality assurance experienceFor immediate consideration, please send your resume to Jennifer.Elliott@systemoneservices.com  ",Quality Assurance Auditor III Job in Exton,"Full Time, Employee","Exton, PA",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-auditor-iii-job-exton-pa-us-171691664.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=6,,Quality Assurance/Safety,633b945675310d1761ddaf43c2db3f83
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:09:06:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"ViaWest, Inc., a super-regional provider of Hybrid IT Solutions has an exciting opportunity for a Program Director – Systems Automation in Denver, CO. ViaWest has built a reputation for delivering legendary service and support to our customers. ViaWest offers solutions that allow our customers to securely and effectively do what they do best. Employees at ViaWest have a unique opportunity to be part of a growing environment where we can make a difference in our customers’ business and support their critical company objectives.The Program Director of the Corporate Systems Automation program oversees the coordination and administration of all aspects of an ongoing program including planning, organizing, staffing, leading, and controlling program activities. The focus of the program is introducing new technology, replacing existing systems and updating the Operations Support Systems (OSS) and Business Support Systems (BSS) for the company.  The Program Director performs a wide range of duties including some or all of the following:Plan the delivery of the overall program and its activities in accordance with the mission and the goals of the organizationDevelop new initiatives to support the strategic direction of the organizationDevelop and implement long-term goals and objectives to achieve the successful outcome of the programDevelop an annual budget and operating plan to support the programDevelop a program evaluation framework to assess the strengths of the program and to identify areas for improvementDevelop funding proposals for the program to ensure the continuous delivery of servicesEnsure that program activities operate within the policies and procedures of the organizationRequirements:8+ years proven experience as a Program Manager and/or PMP Certification is REQUIREDExperience with Agile and or SAFe tools and methodologies5 plus years of experience with ERP or software applications implementation Required OR5 plus years and relevant working experience including expertise as a proven ERP consultant is PREFERREDWe are a rapidly growing organization and we embrace change as a way of life. ViaWest provides a collaborative environment, encouraging employees to participate in strengthening our core business on a daily basis. At ViaWest we work hard and know how to have fun! If you are ready to work in a cultivating environment where you can make a difference in the world of technology, then ViaWest is the place for you!We offer a competitive salary and benefits package. Criminal background check required.  EOE",Program Director – Systems Automation Job in Denver,Full Time Employee,"Denver, CO 80204",Internet Services,http://jobview.monster.com/program-director-%E2%80%93-systems-automation-job-denver-co-us-172746296.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=16,,Project/Program Management,cc7f0fd88d52f8d937864de532f8e688
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:09:46:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Global leader in the healthcare/medical product manufacturing industry is looking for a Quality Engineer in Round Lake IL. This is a contract position expected to last 12 months, possible temp to hire. This position will support complaint evaluations and CAPA investigations for Renal Quality Engineering activities related to medical device post-market product support for quality systems and associated disposables.This position will analyze quality data from various inputs (including but not limited to: nonconformance, FCA, complaints, MDR, etc) to determine trends and systemic issues. They will prepare and issue reports based on information analysis. Looking to Hire ASAP, Apply Now! Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerUnderstand principles of complaint handling process, supports complaint investigations, and prepares complaint risk assessment if requiredResponsible for providing a technical review of complaints and completing an indepth assessmentInteracts with Global Field Surveillance, plant representatives, and other cross-functional team members in complaint analysisEvaluations for complaints will be documented and appropriate corrective and preventative actions will be determined as part of these assessmentsRequirements for the Quality EngineerBS in Engineering1-3 years quality engineering experience in disposables, device, or drug renal manufacturing, will consider university experienceComplaint handling experience is preferredTechnical writing background related to product complaints and risk assessments is preferred Working knowledge of 21CFR820Experience with any statistical software package (Minitab a plus) BenefitsPaid Vacation401KHealth Insurance, and more...This Job is located in Round Lake, IL -> United States",Quality Engineer - Medical Device/Complaint Handling /CAPA Job in Round Lake,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Round Lake, IL 60073",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-medical-device-complaint-handling-capa-job-round-lake-il-us-172521557.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=5,23.00 - 28.00 $ /hour,,4835d609c55ab8ee4297164fd003d64b
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:09:47:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Location: OshkoshDescription: Great leadership opportunity for a food processing company offering solid growth and upward mobility. Responsibilities:Food processing product safety, quality and regulatory compliance;Overall supervision of Quality Control and Quality Assurance Teams;Developing and implementing a preventative quality system, specification compliance, sanitation, operator training and development, quality testing of ingredients and finished products, Federal Regulatory Coding, and labeling;Handling complaints;Communicating with sales and plant personnel regarding quality program. Experience: Education:   4-year degree required; Animal Nutrition, Life Science or related disciplines preferred. Master’s degree is desired. Required Skills:5+ years of Quality Control and Quality Assurance supervisory experience in a food grade manufacturing facility;Experience in both sides of quality food manufacturing, including laboratory testing/chemical and on the floor/lines;Knowledge and experience in SQF, Sanitation, SOPs, Federal Regulatory compliance, FDA, GMP, HACCP, etc.;Familiar with quality assurance specifications of raw materials, packaging components and finished goods;Department budgeting, audits, statistical analysis;Strong leadership and implementation skills;Excellent communication and presentation skills. .Salary: $85-95K + BonusEducation: 4-year degree required; Animal Nutrition, Life Science or related disciplines preferred. Master’s degree is desired.Relocation: YesJob Number: 54013 Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Location: OshkoshDescription: Great leadership opportunity for a food processing company offering solid growth and upward mobility. Responsibilities:Food processing product safety, quality and regulatory compliance;Overall supervision of Quality Control and Quality Assurance Teams;Developing and implementing a preventative quality system, specification compliance, sanitation, operator training and development, quality testing of ingredients and finished products, Federal Regulatory Coding, and labeling;Handling complaints;Communicating with sales and plant personnel regarding quality program. Experience: Education:   4-year degree required; Animal Nutrition, Life Science or related disciplines preferred. Master’s degree is desired. Required Skills:5+ years of Quality Control and Quality Assurance supervisory experience in a food grade manufacturing facility;Experience in both sides of quality food manufacturing, including laboratory testing/chemical and on the floor/lines;Knowledge and experience in SQF, Sanitation, SOPs, Federal Regulatory compliance, FDA, GMP, HACCP, etc.;Familiar with quality assurance specifications of raw materials, packaging components and finished goods;Department budgeting, audits, statistical analysis;Strong leadership and implementation skills;Excellent communication and presentation skills. .Salary: $85-95K + BonusEducation: 4-year degree required; Animal Nutrition, Life Science or related disciplines preferred. Master’s degree is desired.Relocation: YesJob Number: 54013",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-manager-job-oshkosh-wi-us-172191266.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=6,,,827336a16c8715666a302340d35bc9b9
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:29:16,No,jobs.monster.com,"Immediate need for a Quality Engineer located in Kansas City, MO for a growing industrial manufacturer that services the industrial and transportation markets. This role is responsible to provide day to day quality support to manufacturing and quality assurance in the form of plans and procedures. Candidate must have a 4 year technical degree in Science, Engineering or Quality (Degree in Engineering discipline is coveted)and at least two (5) years of experience in a manufacturing environment. This is a direct hire opportunity to join a stable and growing organization. Relocation assistance is provided for the ideal candidate.Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerProvide day to day quality support to manufacturing and quality assurance in the form of plans and procedures.Drive Continuous Improvement in the quality system to help improve the quality Participate in the establishment of quality specifications for raw materials, goods in process, and finished product.Develop and implement quality control inspection and sampling techniques which will assure products meet quality standards.Conduct research on product defects, test performance, plant reject and scrap, and recommend process or product changes to overcome quality issues.Assist with conducting and preparation of quality audits and reportsRequirements for the Quality EngineerMust have a 4 year technical degree in Science, Engineering or Quality (Degree in Engineering discipline is coveted)Must have at least (5) five years Quality experience in a manufacturing environment to be consideredAutomotive, Tier 1 or OEM manufacturing experience is covetedKnowledgeable in APQP methodology; Control Plans, FMEAs, and PPAPsKnowledgeable in TS16949 quality standardsKnowledge of Statistical Process Control (SPC).BenefitsFull benefits packagePTO / Vacation planRelocation assistanceThis Job is located in Kansas City, MO -> United States",Quality Engineer - Quality Systems/ISO / TS/Automotive Job in Kansas City,Full Time Employee,"Kansas City, MO 64111",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-quality-systems-iso-ts-automotive-job-kansas-city-mo-us-172662019.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=5,"85,000.00 - 95,000.00 $ /year",,f2d3ff3bc14dd542871a2d21c0528215
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:55:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70409 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Pacifica Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5891 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-part-time-job-camphill-pa-us-172747834.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=12,,Project/Program Management,bcb43c8ec5d778c0bff3d5353edc92ee
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:56:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70424 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Healdsburg Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6029 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747807.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,fdb38fddacfc239d20793dc423221ad0
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:59:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leader in pharmaceutical manufacturing is currently seeking a Mechanical/Quality Engineer that is located in the Raynham, MA area. This is a 1-year CONTRACT position. No per diem is provided.Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerSupport maintenance of existing products including but not limited to design changes, process changes, supplier changes, remediation, re-certification and brand extensions. Support design control activities for product development efforts. Support product development and design through verification and validation activities. Develop risk assessment; inspection methodology and acceptance criteria for inspection sample plans and conduct audits of new suppliers as part of the project teams Communicate at all levels within Quality as well as cross functionally with departments such as R&D, Regulatory, Manufacturing, and Marketing. Requirements for the Quality EngineerA Bachelors Degree in an Engineering or Scientific discipline is required. An Advanced Degree in a related field is an asset. Quality engineering experience is preferred. Experience with Blueprint reading/literacy including GD&T is preferred. Familiarity with inspection methods and techniques is an assetKnowledge of the QSR, Design Controls, and ISO quality requirements is preferredBenefitsHealthcare401kThis Job is located in Raynham, MA -> United States",Quality Engineer - Mechanical/Quality /Engineer Job in Raynham,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Raynham, MA 02767",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-mechanical-quality-engineer-job-raynham-ma-us-172662231.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,30.00 - 42.00 $ /hour,,42148f41cb0a089073a82d48cc411e32
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:59:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"CenturyLink (NYSE: CTL) is a global communications, hosting, cloud and IT services company enabling millions of customers to transform their businesses and their lives through innovative technology solutions. CenturyLink offers network and data systems management, Big Data analytics and IT consulting, and operates more than 55 data centers in North America, Europe and Asia. The company provides broadband, voice, video, data and managed services over a robust 250,000-route-mile U.S. fiber network and a 300,000-route-mile international transport network.  Job Overview:SAP Business Intelligence manager to oversee the design, development, and support of SAP business intelligence solutions.TechnologySAP BWBusiness ObjectsHANAData ServicesJob Responsibilities:Directly accountable for the quality, availability, effectiveness and support of BI efforts.Build and maintain business and personal relationships with functional business leaders and internal customers in assigned business areas and within IT organization.Monitor industry trends, customer trends and external developments that may impact assigned business functions.Lead, support and participate in multiple projects and oversee onshore/offshore resources to ensure that specifications are met.Organize and prioritize development work effectively to meet key milestones and business objectives.Provide leadership and direction to assigned IT team and ensures the availability of required facilities, tools and resources. Minimum Qualifications:Bachelor's degree in Computer science, Information Systems of Business Administration., or equivalent experience. Master's degree or MBA preferred.7+ years work experience including 2-3 years managing team(s) responsible for warehousing, decision support systems and/or related systems BI systems.Demonstrated experience gathering business requirements, employing full development lifecycle, designing and building business intelligence solutions for stakeholders and senior management.Demonstrated expertise working closely with business users on a variety of enterprise wide development projects from inception through completion, including scope definition, process re- engineering, solution design, technology evaluation, implementation and project management.Job ID 65813#LI-POST1Alternate Location: US-Louisiana-MonroeRequisition #: 65813 EEO StatementNo Discrimination. We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training. Any offer of employment is contingent upon the results of a pre-employment drug test and background check.DisclaimerThe above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job.  Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",SAP Business Intelligence Manager Job in Monroe,Full Time Employee,"Monroe, LA 71203",,http://jobview.monster.com/sap-business-intelligence-manager-job-monroe-la-us-171851599.aspx?mescoid=1100011001001&jobPosition=19,,,82a4ba8bef9308db2c1f8cf22cd1f4c4
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:59:50,No,jobs.monster.com,"Vivint Solar is now hiring a Residential Electricians... pay negotiable! Want to work for an amazing company? Competitive pay with amazing health insurance & benefits package! Medical, Dental, Vision, PTO, HSA, and 401K.Qualifications:*Must have 4+ years of residential wiring*Must be have a valid driver's license*Must be able to pass pre-employment drug screen*Must be able to pass criminal background .I work for the HR department for Vivint Solar - send me your resume and lets schedule a 15 minute phone interview. https://www.linkedin.com/in/jfannenknight Official Job Description -At Vivint Solar, we’re changing the way people generate and consume power. We believe that people should have a choice between using outdated, dirty technologies and using innovative, clean solutions to produce the energy they use to live every day. That’s why we’re making it easy for millions of people nationwide to choose to go solar. Simply stated, we’re doing work that really makes a difference.To undertake such a huge task, we need motivated people who want to make a difference. Right now, we are seeking a Residential Electrician that will be a solid contributor within Vivint Solar. The Residential Electrician is responsible for installing, maintaining and troubleshooting electrical components of our residential solar projects. In this role, you will report directly to a Crew Foreman or Operations Manager within the Field Operations group.The Residential Electrician must have a 4 years of electrical installation and repair experience.Responsibilities:Install electrical systems that interconnect our solar array to the grid power of our customer’s residential propertyEnsure work performed by all electricians is of good workmanship and compliant with current NEC and local codesTroubleshoot system problems and resolve electrical issuesWork with the Operations Manager and home owners to fulfill any necessary system upgrades/repairs to support our solar equipmentWork with local Inspectors to satisfy local requirements and expectationsInterface with Electrical Manager to ensure compliance with ratios and continuing education requirementsTrain, mentor and develop Electrical ApprenticesMaintain high quality control on tools, vehicles and materials needed for job responsibilitiesKeep accurate records of material used and proper documentation on work orders relating to the installationMaintain compliance to all PPE and safety regulations per OSHA and Vivint Solar standardsPerform other needed job tasks as requested by leadershipRequired Skills:Valid and current Journeyman (or Master) Electrician License within the state preferredExperience with electrical installation, troubleshooting and repairAbility to perform advanced electrical calculationsUnderstanding of wire and conduit sizing as well as how to make adjustments for environmental factorsAbility to read and interpret one line drawings and electrical schematicsKnowledge of the 2011 NEC and the ability to navigate the guidelinesAbove average computer skillsMust be willing to work in high places (our installations are on rooftops)Required Experience:4+ years of residential electrical installation and repair experienceWorking knowledge of the usage of a volt meterWorking knowledge and experience replacing residential electrical services and distribution panelsEmployees of Vivint Solar must submit to a criminal history check, motor vehicles check, drug screening, and obtain clearance from the state based upon the state requirements.Vivint Solar is a proud promoter of employment opportunities to our Military and Veterans. We, an equal opportunity employer, do not consider any protected traits (e.g. race, creed, color, religion, gender, national origin, non-job-related disability, age, or any other protected trait) when hiring—under federal, state and local laws.",Residential Electrician - Solar - + years exp Job in Temple Terrace,Full Time Employee,"Temple Terrace, FL 33637",Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.monster.com/residential-electrician-solar-4-years-exp-job-temple-terrace-fl-us-172362441.aspx?mescoid=4700805001001&jobPosition=9,25.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,Quality Assurance/Safety,2e4a83db30729523da2e5b73c72dbcdf
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:10:59:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Risk Management Expert-POS_75056325-0002JCDescriptionSanofi, an integrated global healthcare leader, discovers,develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs.Sanofi has core strengths in the field of healthcare with seven growthplatforms: diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumerhealthcare, emerging markets, animal health and the new Genzyme.Sanofi USAt Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people,connected in purpose by career, life and health.Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, SanofiUS is part of a leading global healthcare company that is dedicated toimproving health and driving back disease by making innovative medicinesaccessible to people around the world.Our extensive research and development efforts encompass a wide range oftherapeutic areas that are in line with public health issues, trends and themost pressing health needs.Sanofi US, along with the other US affiliates, Genzyme, Sanofi Pasteur, Merialand Chattem, employs more than 17,000 people across the country.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together.Sanofi US endeavors to make our career center accessible to anyand all users. If you are experiencing difficulty and need assistance applyingonline, please call 1-800-207-8049 Option 7, then Option 3.Sanofi US is anequal opportunity employerthatembraces diversity to foster positive, innovative thinking that will benefitpeople worldwide. Sanofi US is also committed to employing qualifiedindividuals with disabilities and, where warranted, will provide reasonableaccommodation to applicants, as well as its employees.The RMO is the general risk management expert and leader forsupporting safety risk management (assessment and minimization) strategy, itstransversal dissemination and follow-up of the risk minimization activitiesInternal and external risk management expertise forprojects/products:·Provide expertise and support to GPE projects/products teamrepresentative (GSOs) andother internal or external team representatives for elaboration ofrisk managementstrategies for all products at all stages of the life-cycledevelopment (risk managementincludes: list and impacts of risks, risk assessment, riskminimization and measurementof the effectiveness of risk minimization activities)·Ensure consistency of risk management documents, activitiesand strategies·Ensure tracking of implementation and execution of riskmanagement activities atglobal/local levels·Provide contribution to Health Authorities’ questions, andparticipate to meetings andinteract with regulators·Ensure follow-up of effectiveness of minimizationactivities, and set up adequate actionplan for improvement if neededQualificationsM.D., Pharm.D, PhD or MPH Degree·Minimum of 5 years total experience in pharmacovigilanceand/or relevant medical field orequivalent (e.g., clinical development)·Knowledge/background in epidemiology concepts·The senior RMO has a minimum of 4-5 years in the riskmanagement field and has an excellent capability, leadership and autonomycarrying out the missions and addressing major challenges listed in this jobdescriptionKnowledge of product risk management, involvement in management ofpublic health risksand/or clinical safety data analysis·Technical skills (i.e. familiarity with document managementsystems, medical writing, assembly of document)Expertise in pre and post marketing risk management, includingrisk assessment/minimizationtools and local and global implementation and follow up of riskminimization activities beyondlabeling of products (i.e. elements to assure safe use (ETASU))·Excellent understanding of the concept of risk associatedwith the use of a medicinalproduct/medical device, in its clinical, public health andregulatory dimensions·Excellent networking and collaboration skills·Excellent medical interpretation skills·Demonstrates initiative and capacity to work under pressure,to manage safety crisis·Demonstrates leadership within cross-functional teamenvironment·Strong ability to teach and/or share risk managementknowledge, or manage internal/externalstakeholders·Knowledge of international regulatory and scientificenvironment in pharmacovigilance·Fluent in English #LI-SAJob:QualityPrimary Location:United States-New Jersey-BridgewaterJob Posting:Jun 23, 2016, 9:30:06 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",Risk Management Expert Job in Bridgewater,"Full Time, Employee","Bridgewater, NJ",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/risk-management-expert-job-bridgewater-nj-us-172603041.aspx?mescoid=1300119001001&jobPosition=12,,General/Other: Quality Assurance/Safety,b0b212637d8361856b9610b398ecada4
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:11:48:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"Do you have experience with CAPAs or investigations? Have you worked in pharmaceutical manufacturing? Are you looking to join a company with extensive growth opportunities? If so, look no further!A Fortune 100 and Forbes 100 pharmaceutical company is looking to add talented Quality Engineer Investigators to their team. The positions are located in Kansas, near Wichita. This company is a global leader in the pharmaceutical industry and is committed to positively impacting the lives of their customers and patients while delivering value to their stakeholders.These are permanent positions that provides extensive relocation assistance. Kansas is a great state to live in and has an extremely low cost of living. Wichita is MSN Real Estate's #1 most affordable city in the US! Kansas is known for being an incredibly friendly state with great BBQ and lots of family fun. Wichita is the largest city in the state and was named by CNN as the 9th best city in the US to live in.The Quality Engineer Investigators will be responsible for writing exception reports regarding plant issues and defect audit failures.Quality Engineer Investigator Responsibilities include:Conducting personnel interviews and system reviewsEvaluating corrective actionsIdentifying and implementing preventative actionsQuality Engineer Investigator Qualifications:3+ years of CAPA, investigations and/or manufacturing quality assuranceExperience in a pharmaceutical manufacturing facilityBS degree required, major in a scientific or engineering field preferredGreat benefits include: competitive salary, bonus potential, generous 401k match, tuition assistance, adoption assistance, medical benefitsThis is a fantastic opportunity to share your expertise in QE Investigations! This opportunity offers plenty of room for growth within this Fortune 100 and Forbes Global 100 company. Don't miss your opportunity to get your foot in the door with this cutting edge organization!If this sounds like a good fit and you would be interested in learning more, apply on-line to be contacted directly to discuss the next step.",Quality Engineer Job in Wichita,"Full Time, Employee","Wichita, KS",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-job-wichita-ks-us-172466144.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=9,,,17189b383051fe8bc0e974d2505a94aa
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:11:49:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"My direct client, a Fortune 20 Bio-Pharmaceutical Company, seeks a Scrum Master to join their regional headquarters in Fort Mill, SC.Role: Scrum MasterLocation: Ft. Mill, SCRate: FlexibleStart Date: ASAP Core Requirements7-10 years of experience as a scrum master. Scrum master will be responsible for two teams consisting of local and remote people. Some travel to Rockville, MD may be required Experience standing up new teams is a plus Certified scrum master accreditation (CSM) from ScrumAlliance or equivalent Role OverviewThe ScrumMaster III provides effective collaboration, facilitation, leadership and coaching skills supporting the agile development process and delivery of our applications.As an agile expert, the ScrumMaster will be responsible for enforcing the agile tenants as they fit in the Lash culture and processes removing impediments and promoting transparency.This position requires committment to exceptional results, a strong desire for continuous improvement and the ability to build a collaborative culture within our team.You will facilitate Agile ceremonies and ensure the integrity of the agile process by capturing velocity and removing obstacles to drive projects to successful release.In this highly visible role, you will have significant interaction with product owners and regular contact with senior management. Primary Duties and Responsibilities Organize and facilitate daily stand-up meetings, reviews, retrospectives, sprint and release planning, demos and other Scrum-related meetings Work collaboratively with Product Owners, cross-functional development teams, and Project Managers to support development and software delivery Assist the Product Owner in user story creation/prioritization and product Backlog grooming via emergent requirement elicitation while supporting overall organizational goals Track and report team metrics as requested Resolve or escalate blocking impediments as necessary Coordinate dependencies between teams with other Scrum Masters and Project Managers Work with Development managers to manage team capacity Ensure development team is working efficiently towards Sprint goals Coach the development team and stakeholders on how to use Agile/Scrum practices Ensure the development teams are practicing the core agile principles of collaboration, prioritization, team accountability, and visibility Ensure cross functional coordination (analysts, developers and testers) is occurring early and often. Adhere to and coach team on Lash-specific best practices Recommend improvements and assist in changes to best practice Adapt approach based on cultural shifts and regulatory requirements Assist with internal and external communication, improving transparency, and radiating information Create an environment that empowers and energizes team members, with a focus on accountability, adaptability, and collaboration Must be a Certified Scrum Master with 5+ years Scrum Master experience 6+ years of information technology experience Thorough understanding of agile software development methodologies, values, and procedures Experience working with an agile methodology on large scale, technically complex projects Ability to deal with multiple projects and deadlines Must be self-motivated as well as creative and efficient in proposing solutions to complex, time-critical problems Data driven analysis skills for measuring and managing delivery Experience with relevant business software e.g. Microsoft Office applications, Team Foundation Server Experience using Microsoft Team Foundation Server Agile or Scrum templates Excellent team player with the ability to influence and negotiate Ability to understand and communicate technical issues Highly adaptable to changing environment Excellent interpersonal skills and ability to work with diverse teams SM needs to have situational awareness with an understanding of when to listen and when to be assertive. Strong analytical and problem solving skills with a high attention to detail Ability to hold team members accountable, set clear sprint performance standards, resolve sprint performance issues, keep team engaged and on task Previous technical experience with the Microsoft technology stack (C#, SQL Server) is desired Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems or Engineering; or equivalent work experience ",Scrum Master Job in Fort Mill,Full Time Employee,"My direct client, a Fortune 20 Bio-Pharmaceutical Company, seeks a Scrum Master to join their regional headquarters in Fort Mill, SC.Role: Scrum MasterLocation: Ft. Mill, SCRate: FlexibleStart Date: ASAP Core Requirements7-10 years of experience as a scrum master. Scrum master will be responsible for two teams consisting of local and remote people. Some travel to Rockville, MD may be required Experience standing up new teams is a plus Certified scrum master accreditation (CSM) from ScrumAlliance or equivalent Role OverviewThe ScrumMaster III provides effective collaboration, facilitation, leadership and coaching skills supporting the agile development process and delivery of our applications.As an agile expert, the ScrumMaster will be responsible for enforcing the agile tenants as they fit in the Lash culture and processes removing impediments and promoting transparency.This position requires committment to exceptional results, a strong desire for continuous improvement and the ability to build a collaborative culture within our team.You will facilitate Agile ceremonies and ensure the integrity of the agile process by capturing velocity and removing obstacles to drive projects to successful release.In this highly visible role, you will have significant interaction with product owners and regular contact with senior management. Primary Duties and Responsibilities Organize and facilitate daily stand-up meetings, reviews, retrospectives, sprint and release planning, demos and other Scrum-related meetings Work collaboratively with Product Owners, cross-functional development teams, and Project Managers to support development and software delivery Assist the Product Owner in user story creation/prioritization and product Backlog grooming via emergent requirement elicitation while supporting overall organizational goals Track and report team metrics as requested Resolve or escalate blocking impediments as necessary Coordinate dependencies between teams with other Scrum Masters and Project Managers Work with Development managers to manage team capacity Ensure development team is working efficiently towards Sprint goals Coach the development team and stakeholders on how to use Agile/Scrum practices Ensure the development teams are practicing the core agile principles of collaboration, prioritization, team accountability, and visibility Ensure cross functional coordination (analysts, developers and testers) is occurring early and often. Adhere to and coach team on Lash-specific best practices Recommend improvements and assist in changes to best practice Adapt approach based on cultural shifts and regulatory requirements Assist with internal and external communication, improving transparency, and radiating information Create an environment that empowers and energizes team members, with a focus on accountability, adaptability, and collaboration Must be a Certified Scrum Master with 5+ years Scrum Master experience 6+ years of information technology experience Thorough understanding of agile software development methodologies, values, and procedures Experience working with an agile methodology on large scale, technically complex projects Ability to deal with multiple projects and deadlines Must be self-motivated as well as creative and efficient in proposing solutions to complex, time-critical problems Data driven analysis skills for measuring and managing delivery Experience with relevant business software e.g. Microsoft Office applications, Team Foundation Server Experience using Microsoft Team Foundation Server Agile or Scrum templates Excellent team player with the ability to influence and negotiate Ability to understand and communicate technical issues Highly adaptable to changing environment Excellent interpersonal skills and ability to work with diverse teams SM needs to have situational awareness with an understanding of when to listen and when to be assertive. Strong analytical and problem solving skills with a high attention to detail Ability to hold team members accountable, set clear sprint performance standards, resolve sprint performance issues, keep team engaged and on task Previous technical experience with the Microsoft technology stack (C#, SQL Server) is desired Bachelor’s degree in Information Systems or Engineering; or equivalent work experience ",,http://jobview.monster.com/scrum-master-job-fort-mill-sc-us-172114622.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=14,,Project/Program Management,68a011203590b33e2559bf56a7ed805c
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:24:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Triumph Structures - Wichita is a global leader in contract manufacturing specializing in the high speed machining of complex monolithic structural components and assembly of intricate products. With a large selection of multi-axis machines, we provide a wide-range of solutions to our customer's complex machining requirements. We are currently seeking a Quality Engineer - MRB. This position applies a strong knowledge of quality systems to developing and/or improving the systems and products necessary to ensure that the business attains its annual goals and meets internal, customer, and regulatory requirements, in addition to meeting requirements to ISO9001/AS9100. Perform daily Material Review Board (MRB) activities and insuring a thorough RCCA process has been achieved before completing all MRB activities. Perform internal and external audits and prepare summary reports. Write and follow up on internal and external corrective actions for root cause analysis. Write and revise internal procedures as necessary. Works with customers during audits at Triumph. Solves problems and troubleshoots by using good judgment, interfacing with other departments/suppliers. Develops and implements quality programs, including tracking, analyzing and reporting. Interprets quality assurance philosophy to all personnel in organization. Communicates significant issues or developments identified during quality assurance activities and provides recommended process improvements. Plays an active role on quality management teams within the organization. Contributes to team effort by maintaining a positive outlook. Maintains and distributes Quality Metrics. Prepares and presents necessary information for Management Reviews. Complies with all company policies and procedures, including safety requirements. Other duties as assigned to ensure customer needs are met. Triumph Structures-Wichita is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Minorities / Females / Disabled / Veterans. Previous experience required. Job Code : TSW082916 Division/Department : Triumph Structures - Wichita % of Travel Required : None Shift/Hours : First Shift (Day)",Quality Engineer - MRB Job in Wichita,Full Time Employee,"Wichita, KS 67215",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-mrb-job-wichita-ks-us-171465840.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=3,,Quality Assurance/Safety,526ab938ff07cc9a1fc315a3cf7f24be
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:25:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"If you thrive on leading a store team to achieve success and are motivated to coach them on delivering excellent customer service in a fast-paced and friendly environment, consider an Assistant Store Manager position at Sprouts Farmer Market. As one of the fastest growing natural foods retailers, we’re seeking proven leaders who appreciate that healthy living is a journey and are ready to provide an inviting experience where shoppers and team members alike are inspired to make healthier choices. Sprouts Assistant Store Managers are responsible for supporting the Store Manager in the management and leadership of the entire business operations of an assigned Sprouts’ store, including all departments. The Assistant Store Manager has a special responsibility to ensure the success of all perishable departments, including Bakery, Deli, Meat, and Produce in addition to supporting overall store operations.   This position is key in assisting with the efficient and profitable operations of the store. In the absence of the Store Manager, the Assistant Store Manager assumes complete responsibility for all phases of store operations. The Assistant Store Manager must be familiar with all the departments and department-related activities throughout the store, and assists the Store Manager in ensuring cleanliness, safety and a well-stocked inventory. The Assistant Store Manager also assists with forecasts, schedules, and monitors labor to be consistent with store sales and productivity guidelines and wage budgets; and creates action plans to address cost control issues. This position directs, oversees, and evaluates the training of all perishable department Team Members in order to reduce and control turnover, promote more efficient operations and to provide better control over labor costs. Developing and maintaining communication with the other departments and Store Manager in the store in order is key in this role to execute merchandising plans which will help to meet the financial objectives of the store. To be an Assistant Store Manager at Sprouts Farmers Market you must: Must have 1-3 years retail management experience. Be dependable and reliable, having the ability to work a flexible schedule that changes as the business changes; including nights, weekends and holidays as well as having flexibility with store assignments. Have strong written and verbal communication skills, the ability to give direction, while participating in a team environment. Have and show an outgoing and friendly behavior along with a positive attitude and the ability to interact with our customers in an engaging manner. Be able to manage department staff to include: interviewing, hiring, training and development, delivering on-time performance appraisals, providing feedback, scheduling, counseling and terminating. Possess a proven leadership ability to build, motivate and maintain staff, while possessing a working knowledge of personnel reports, margin reports, weekly sales numbers and financial goals. Have a strong focus on detail, analytical and problem solving skills. Be able to coordinate sales promotion activities and prepare/supervise preparation of merchandise displays and advertising copy. Be responsible for compliance ensuring dates on merchandise, such as dairy products, meats, and baked goods, are checked and expired food pulled off the shelves on a regular basis pursuant to Sprouts procedures. Have the ability to deal with emergencies, crises, and any problems which crop up during the day in the store, writing reports for accidents or other incidents such as when employees or customers are hurt within the store or in the parking lot and processes according to company procedures. Have and maintain Food Safety certification. Must also ensure that all federal, state, and company regulations and standards for all labor, health, safety and sanitation issues in order to maintain a safe and clean work environment for employees and customers to ensure compliance with all OSHA requirements, other governmental regulations and company standards. Have strong organization and planning skills; able to prioritize and handle multiple tasks. Have the ability to lift moderately heavy loads up to 75 lbs., the ability to bend, reach, kneel, squat and stand for long periods of time. In addition to a rewarding career, Sprouts offers a comprehensive program to help support you and your family. These programs include:- Competitive pay- Opportunities for career growth- 15% discount for you and one other family member on all purchases made at Sprouts- Flexible schedules- Participation in Telemedicine: Teledoc- Employee Assistance Program (EAP)Eligibility requirements may apply for the following benefits:- 401(K) Retirement savings plan with a generous company match- Affordable benefit coverage, including medical, dental vision- Pre-tax Flexible Spending Accounts for healthcare and dependent care- Company paid life insurance and short-term disability coverage  Grow with us! If you have a passion for inspiring people and a flair for fresh food, consider applying for a job at Sprouts! With a focus on customer service, our neighborhood grocery stores offer high-quality, farm fresh produce, natural meats, plenty of scoop-your-own bulk goods and much more in a fun, friendly, old-fashioned farmer’s market setting.  Come grow your career in healthy living with a fast-paced, rapidly growing company and teams that pride themselves on empowering others along their journey. *MNST*",Assistant Store Manager Job in Walnut Creek,Full Time Employee,"Walnut Creek, CA",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/assistant-store-manager-job-walnut-creek-ca-us-172667594.aspx?mescoid=4100665001001&jobPosition=14,,Project/Program Management,8dcdeed5853469ce6636a591eaefbe2a
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:25:31,No,jobs.monster.com,"Major Utility needs Project Controls Specialists to support Project Managers on multiple Utility Construction Projects. The Specialist will have a proven track record of meeting project scope, cost, schedule and quality measures for the entire project lifecycle. Requires Primavera expertise and be proficient with MS Project, Excel, MS Word,Visio and Business Objects. A Construction Management degree is preferred but Construction Management preferred. Degree in Engineering, Accounting, Finance, Business Management. There is some travel to project sites. These are long term Contract position in Minnesota. Responsibilities for the Project Controls EngineerThe project scheduler will assist Project Managers in developing project schedule via Primavera and web in a corporate environment. Manages the entire project lifecycle and is accountable for meeting agreed upon scope, cost, schedule and quality measures. Provides direction to project resources and ensures the project teams are provided the resources to meet goals.Requirements for the Project Controls EngineerMust be a Primavera expert and be able to create BusinessObjects reporting with MS Project, Excel, MS Word and Visio.A Construction Management degree is preferred but Construction Management preferred. Degree in Engineering, Accounting, Finance, Business Management, MIS or 10 years of relevant project work experience is also considered.Must be experienced in supporting project resources and ensures the project teams are provided the necessary resources to complete project deadlinesSome travel for site training.Benefits for the Project Controls EngineerInsurance, PTO, 401KThis Job is located in Minneapolis, MN -> United States",Project Controls Engineer - Utility Project Controls/Scheduling/Primavera Job in Minneapolis,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Minneapolis, MN 55402",,http://jobview.monster.com/project-controls-engineer-utility-project-controls-scheduling-primavera-job-minneapolis-mn-us-172662369.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=3,39.28 - 46.42 $ /hour,,995e915cb5c9b02982f57101b156c93f
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:39:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70467 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Burney Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6101 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747737.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=3,,Project/Program Management,5c6a530249d165056f9330155369b88c
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:45:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70505 # Positions  1 State  CA City  San Jose Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5985 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747728.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=6,,Project/Program Management,933f7388948ed01d53cf6e5916b5d6ba
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:58:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job DescriptionEaton Corporation, in Raleigh, NC, has a Quality Specialist opening.    Job Functions:   Responsible for ensuring the production quality of all products in accordance with established Lean Manufacturing workmanship standards, assembly procedures, ISO 9001 Quality System requirements and the Eaton Quality System   Assist in quality audits, workmanship defect reduction efforts, corrective and preventive action identification, analysis and reporting, inspection of returned units, special inspections     Assist departments in meeting product quality targets by working closely with Engineering, Materials Management and Operational Excellence     Perform inspection support activities on in-process and completed assemblies as required.   Analyzes and reports production non-conformances. Coordinates feedback on problems affecting quality (e.g. work instructions, BOM, tooling issues, raw materials, training and prints) to Supervisors and Quality Engineers., Mfg Engineers, or product Engineers as needed.     Initiate, participate  in and/or coordinate internal 8D corrective actions (CARs), Failure Effect Mode Analysis, and Control Planning to include follow-up of vendor 8D corrective actions   Train and educate associates in product inspection to drive performance improvements and communicate quality standards on an ongoing basis to production personnel and teams as needed.   Create and manage product line critical characteristic check sheets and assist in developing actions for continued Quality System improvements.     Follow commitment to Eaton Health and Safety (EHS) by following safety policies and procedures, setting safety objectives and following JSA and PDA procedures.   Fosters an environment that promotes Eaton’s goals, philosophies, and encourages continuous improvement through participation and teamwork.   Perform other duties as required.  Basic Qualifications (Including Educational Requirements)Basic Qualifications:   Associate’s Degree from an accredited institution Minimum of 3 years’ experience in quality, manufacturing, and/or engineering of electro- mechanical devices     Legally authorized to work in the United States without company sponsorship   Relocation assistance is not available for this position. Only candidates in the immediate geographic area (60 mile radius) will be considered.     Position Criteria:   Ability to use standard computer applications: Excel, Word, Access, PowerPoint required   Ability to use good judgment and problem solving skills to make informed decisions   Demonstrates a strong customer service attitude   Strong written and oral communication skills   Ability to prepare, read, analyze, and interpret product drawings, manufacturing documents, quality specs, and industry/trade magazines.   Working knowledge of  ASQ and ISO auditing standards     Preferred Qualifications:   Associate’s Degree in electronics from accredited institution   Understanding of Six Sigma and Lean Manufacturing concepts preferred   Basic understanding of the principles and methodology of Quality Control and Quality Assurance   Basic computer skills   Ability to lift 20 lbs   Ability to distinguish colored wired   Ability to frequently stand, bend, and walk  Eaton is a power management company with 2015 sales of $20.9 billion. Eaton provides energy-efficient solutions that help our customers effectively manage electrical, hydraulic and mechanical power more efficiently, safely and sustainably. Eaton has approximately 97,000 employees and sells products to customers in more than 175 countries. For more information, visit www.eaton.com At Eaton, we see things differently. We see opportunities to innovate, go above and beyond, and we work hard because what we do reflects who we are. If you see things differently—if you’re determined, motivated and focused on improving the world around you—then it’s time to see where a career at Eaton can take you. For more information, visit www.eaton.com/careers Eaton is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. Eaton is committed to ensuring equal employment opportunities for all job applicants and employees. Employment decisions are based upon job-related reasons regardless of an applicant's race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, national origin, disability, marital status, genetic information, protected veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",Quality Specialist Job in Raleigh,"Full Time, Employee","Raleigh, NC 27602",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-specialist-job-raleigh-nc-us-172649062.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=5,,Quality Assurance/Safety,f9d3ff29899644bb7284ad4745f2a5e9
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:58:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job CL Coatings, a Safway Group Company, is seeking a Safety Representative for full-time employment.  Our Company is a national painting contractor specializing in industrial applications of coating systems.  The position will be based out of our Midwest office located in Mokena, IL.  Ideal candidates should have at least 2-5 years of experience in general industrial safety and/or environmental background.  We desire candidates with an aspiration to learn and the ability to take on many projects under the guidance of senior safety management.  Word processing and communication skills are a plus. The ability for overnight travel throughout the Midwest and a valid driver’s license with good driving record are also required.  OSHA 500 and a degree in industrial safety or environmental studies are advantages for the successful candidate, but not limiting factors.Primary Duties:  To train employees following our established safety program, to perform site visits, audits, inspections, compose site specific safety/environmental plans, and to support production as necessary.  Pay range will be commensurate with ability and will be based on experience and certifications.  Health Benefits and 401K will be offered. For immediate consideration, please contact Andrea Archambeault at andrea.archambeault@nacoatings.com  .    CL Coatings is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and Individuals with Disabilities. CL Coatings is also an E-Verify participant.  www.clcoatings.us Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 815-464-3053 Fax 815-464-3060 Address 8450 W. 191st Street Unit 19Mokena, IL 60448",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/safety-representative-job-mokena-il-us-170479769.aspx?mescoid=2900540001001&jobPosition=5,,,89f33304f77b2d49d4b087e1abb26ffb
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:12:59:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70466 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Susanville Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  6105 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747740.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=2,,Project/Program Management,ad2018ab9e7c641d05042bb814e529d7
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:13:00:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695488Apex Systems, 2nd largest staffing firm, has a Senior Project Manager opportunity with one of our largest clients in Knoxville & Chattanooga, TN. You will have the opportunity to work within a global team environment utilizing resource teams and skill-sets from around the world, working with the leaders of the industry to create innovative solutions within the Business and Technology space. This position will provide; Action, Issue, Risk and Decision Management support on multiple IT projects from the direction of an IT Project Manager.  These projects include replacements and upgrades to vended, enterprise HR and Financial systems. This is a long term contract opportunity.Project Manager Job Responsibilities:•  Develops sprint task input to IT Release Planning for IT Technical Resources. Helps team develop commitments by using value and risk to prioritize work; by selecting, sizing and tasking stories and project activities; and by limiting work in progress to the team’s capacity. Tracks and reports historical team metrics and progress toward sprint and release plan goals•  Identify, log, assign, review, monitor and complete tasks, actions and issues that are due to be assigned, reviewed or resolved; and current risk plan and schedule activities•  Identifies resource conflicts that could impact schedule and budget•  Schedules and attends routine and other project team meetings. Drafts correspondence to stakeholders, including team meeting agendas and minutes•  Ensures project team meetings are effectively facilitated at an expected cadence with expected outcomes. Instills a sense of urgency reflecting the goals for the current project activities and milestones. Facilitates retrospectives by sharing metrics to help the team identify and implement improvements.•  Identifies and logs relevant lessons learned from other projects, and from the current projects as they progress•  Facilitates formal risk workshops and assesses all changes for risks•  Establishes a Risk Register to capture the sources, causes, consequences, potential health, safety, security, environmental and quality impacts, direct financial impacts, indirect business impacts (reputational, operational, financial), likelihood of occurrence, and estimated severity of impact•  Prioritizes the register using estimates of probability and impact•  For each risk, establishes Mitigations and Contingency Plans with clearly-defined deliverables, a completion timeline, the names of those responsible, review dates, and triggers•  Establishes a project Risk Management Process including processes and methods for monitoring, updating the risk management plan, and escalating risk related issues that implement project and company standardsProject Manager Qualifications:•  Requires at least five years of experience as an IT project manager, or in a support role on IT projects with budgets greater than $10M•  Experience with enterprise-wide IT system projects required•  Demonstrated experience developing and maintaining risk management plans, and developing and gaining consensus for key project decisions•  Project Management Institute (PMI) certification as Project Management Professional (PMP) or Risk Management Professional (RMP)•  Advanced experience with Microsoft Office and Microsoft Excel required•  Experience with Microsoft Access, Microsoft SharePointThe position is based in Knoxville, TN, with limited travel to Chattanooga (5%-10%), and is expected to be funded through March 2018.If interested, please contact Scout @ sturner@apexsystemsinc.comEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Manager Job in Chattanooga,Full Time Employee,"Chattanooga, TN",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-chattanooga-tn-us-172668492.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2b0f594cfe5cb33dbc06217d2ef31777
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:13:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Qulailty Project Manager- Electro-Mechanical Medical Devices-POS_75080039-1DescriptionSanofi, a global healthcare leader, discovers, develops and distributes therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs. Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme.Sanofi USAt Sanofi US, we are committed to the growth of our people, connected in purpose by career, life and health.Headquartered in Bridgewater, NJ, Sanofi US is part of a leading global healthcare company dedicated to discovering, developing and distributing therapeutic solutions focused on patients’ needs.Sanofi has core strengths in diabetes solutions, human vaccines, innovative drugs, consumer healthcare, emerging markets, animal health and Genzyme.Sanofi US employs approximately 17,000 people across the country all dedicated to protecting health, enhancing life and responding to the hopes and potential healthcare needs of seven billion people around the world.Commitment is our Strength. Ready to grow together?Sanofi US endeavors to make our career center accessible to any and all users. If you are experiencing difficulty and need assistance applying online, please call 1-800-207-8049 Option 7, then Option 3.Sanofi US Services, Inc. and its U.S. affiliates are Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employers committed to a culturally diverse workforce. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race; color; creed; religion; national origin; age; ancestry; nationality; marital, domestic partnership or civil union status; sex, gender, gender identity or expression; affectional or sexual orientation; disability; veteran or military status or liability for military status; domestic violence victim status; atypical cellular or blood trait; genetic information (including the refusal to submit to genetic testing) or any other characteristic protected by law.POSITION REPSONSIBILITIES AND DESCRIPTION:Guarantees the quality and regulatory compliance of products developed marketed and distributed by the affiliate in accordance with regulatory requirements and the Group guidelines. Guarantees the implementation and maintenance of the affiliate Quality System. Provides Quality Leadership across the affiliate organization.•Lead the development related Quality tasks in multifunctional, international project teams to progress business/project issues or objectives.•Providing quality leadership; guidance and support in design control methodologies for electromechanical medical device designs• Liaise with other functions (R&D, GMA, GPE, SFD, Regulatory, Evaluation, User needs Analysis, Usability, Project Manager, Global Device Leader) to progress investigations or corrective actions where appropriate.• To provide co-ordination and planning support within the Quality Group, including the management and hosting of external inspections.•Utilize risk analysis techniques (e.g. fault tree; FMEA) to lead others through process mapping exercises and coaching others in problem•Conduct and manage both internal and third party audits of suppliers ensure compliance to medical device regulation and standards• To follow and uphold the Company's and Site's EHS Policy and procedures to ensure the safety of people and materials.•Establish and assure that Sanofi Quality and Compliance Standards and applicable Government Regulations are met by means of consistent Quality Management for medical devices / combi¬nation products under development•Provide immediate expert assessment to Senior Management of critical Quality Management aspects during medical device development•Establish, monitor and improve the MED Quality System and ensure that this continues to meet regulatory requirements•Monitor and analyze trends within MED to ensure corrective action is effective and recurring issues are highlighted for Senior Management reviewQualificationsBASIC QUALIFICATIONS:•Minimum Science Graduate or equivalent with at least 5-7 years relevant experience in electro-mechanical Medical devices /Quality Assurance/Control, Manufacturing, and/or Pharmaceutical Research and project management.PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:•German and English fluent.• Proficient in usage of quality systems (e.g. Design controls, management review, Quality By Design);• Good knowledge of international medical device regulations and ISO 60601 series; • Proficient in usage of risk management tools (e.g. FMEA, FTA) acc. ISO 14971;• Good knowledge of international quality standards ISO 13485 & QSR FDA Part 820• Human Factors and Usability acc. To EN 62366•Ability for cross functional work with other global functions GRA, IQC, GMA, GPE, Diabetes Division, Marketing, R&D• Financial awareness of cost of quality and risk management to businessHuman relations ability is a critical requirement for the job of a Quality Manager. Communication skills and sensitivity are key aspects to keep good working relationship with the different sites and global/regional functions of sanofi-aventis• Ability to overcome discrepancies in interpretation of quality requirements without compromises. Ability to talk round and negotiate ‘grey’ areas.• Ability to build up human relationships and a basis of mutual trust between quality and project teams• Ability to enter into highly different cultural and regulatory backgrounds worldwide with ‘diplomatic sensitivity’.• Capability to present the results of the quality assessments to all levels of Local/Regional/Global Management.• Flexibility in approach and ability to adapt to changing circumstances when required.•Excellent team player and team leader, decision making and problem-solving skills.#LI-SAJob:QualityPrimary Location:United States-Massachusetts-Cambridge (U.S.)Job Posting:Sep 21, 2016, 9:06:43 AMJob Type:RegularEmployee Status:Regularp.MsoNormal, li.MsoNormal, div.MsoNormal, p.MsoListParagraph, li.MsoListParagraph, div.MsoListParagraph, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpFirst, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpMiddle, p.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, li.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast, div.MsoListParagraphCxSpLast,font{font-size: 12px !important;font-family: Verdana,Arial,Helvetica,sans-serif !important;}",Qulailty Project Manager- Electro-Mechanical Medical Devices Job in Cambridge,"Full Time, Employee","Cambridge , MA",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/qulailty-project-manager-electro-mechanical-medical-devices-job-cambridge-ma-us-172603033.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=13,,General/Other: Quality Assurance/Safety,629e5e802e393ebb987a6f96b73924c7
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:13:59:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"An industry leading automotive supplier is searching for a Program Manager with experience leading new programs and new product launches. This person will lead the program team(s) through the program life cycle in order to achieve customer expectations and company mandated targets for all assigned program(s). Our client is a $2B automotive manufacturer and is one of the fastest growing automotive suppliers in North America. The company has doubled in size over the last 6 years and shows no signs of slowing down in the future. Responsibilities for the Program ManagerActs as primary customer interface for all program issuesEnsures engineering targets (BOM cost, quality, delivery timing, tooling, performance, project engineering budget, etc.) for all assigned programs are met.Provides technical leadership in directing the efforts of cross-functional project team in the development and production release of all relevant project deliverables in compliance with the product development process and customer expectations.Provides onsite customer support from their team for vehicle level issues related to the assigned programs.Requirements for the Program ManagerBachelor's degree in engineering or related discipline.Experience launching new programs with any automotive customer (Ford, GM, Chrysler, Honda, Nissan, Toyota, Subaru)Benefits for the Program ManagerExcellent medical benefits, bonus, relocation assistanceThis Job is located in Florence, AL -> United States",Program Manager - Launch/Project Manager/Automotive Job in Florence,Full Time Employee,"Florence, AL 35632",,http://jobview.monster.com/program-manager-launch-project-manager-automotive-job-florence-al-us-172662476.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,"75,000.00 - 85,000.00 $ /year",,1c294cc6645d5c3f4c6ece161f6e52be
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:14:57:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70539 # Positions  1 State  MI City  Mt. Clemens Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  4404 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747713.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=11,,Project/Program Management,87ab3dfcba931b3b17d230ec16c86bfb
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:14:58:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  685972Apex Systems, the nation’s 2nd largest Information Technology staffing firm, has an opportunity for a QA Automation Analyst to work for a large HR company in south Miami.  This is a contract to hire opportunity that will go full-time after 6 – 9 months. The QA Automation Analyst will be joining an existing team, but will need to be able to work on his/her own and take ownership of the project. The technical landscape consists primarily of automated and manual testing of web-based applications, Selenium IDE/WebDriver, Team Foundation Server, and Visual Studio in a .NET environment.Applicants must have 5+ years of Quality Assurance testing experience. Candidates must have experience with Automation testing and Selenium. If interested in this position or any other Quality Assurance opportunities, please send a resume to Sara Newell, Professional Recruiter at Apex Systems - snewell@apexsystemsinc.com.Responsibilities:This position will take ownership of testing application enhancements made by a team of 6-7 developers in an Agile environment.This position will be setting up automated test scripts for web-based applications using Selenium IDE/WebDriver.Manual testing required. QA work will involve performance, regression and unit testing.This position will work closely with the Scrum Master and will require a strong understanding of the business needs and implicationsRequired Skills: Automated testingSelenium IDE / WebDriverTeam Foundation ServerVisual Studio*Please note that as a contract employee of Apex Systems, you’d be eligible for Health, Dental, Vision and Life Insurance; Short Term Disability; Hospitalization Coverage; Direct Deposit; Weekly Pay Periods; Training and Development Programs; and our Referral Program.*EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",QA Tester Job in Miami,Full Time Employee,"Miami, FL",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-tester-job-miami-fl-us-172351056.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),57ea2945daf26d6c45c49e29a314e1b7
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:15:30:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Did you know that Gartner positioned eXcell as a Leader in its Magic Quadrant for End User Outsourcing? Come work for the leader today! Our client is in need of a Senior IT Project Manager to assist in implementing their very large scale roadmap. The extensive data gathered by the roadmap project is being used to make key changes in IT infrastructure throughout the client’s very extensive organization. Because each division is at a different stage of upgrading technology to meet their business requirements, the project provides guidance and oversight and manages initiatives to support integration, process improvements and communications across the organization. The candidate in this role will specifically support the Data Exchange facet of the larger project. Responsibilities: Ensures that the Data Exchange project is delivered on time, within budget, and to customer specifications Plans and oversees Data Exchange project to completion: Identifies scope and objectives Identifies deliverables and establishes schedules and timelines Assigns work to the project team members Identifies project resources and skill level of necessary resources Meets with stakeholders to establish goals, priorities, major work schedules Tracks and reports status of projects, including timelines, schedules, risks and resources Facilitates the resolution of complex problems, by meeting with stakeholders, vendors, and technical staff to identify problems and potential solutions; revises project plans to reflect changes Develops cost and budget analyses Participates in the development of and advises management on information technology strategy and technology deployment Performs other related duties as requiredSkill Requirements: Principles and practices of configuring and implementing data exchanges Concepts related to an data sharing and integration Computer software used to manage projects Principles and practices of technical problem solving Team dynamics and team building Strong written and verbal skills to effectively communicate resource needs and project issues with management and project teams Strong meeting organization and facilitation Proven ability to work independently and in a fast-paced, multiple-priority environment Understand highly complex information sharing and methodologies Ability to work effectively with stakeholders and executive management Understanding of system integration strategies Ability to work closely with agencies and departments to assist with operational change management and technical system implementation Design, installation, and transition from project team to operations support of data exchanges with applications Knowledge of the criminal justice business environmentExperience Requirements: At least 5 years of experience managing IT Information Sharing projects Resource Request At least 5 years of experience implementing Data Exchange Projects following the National Information Exchange Model and practices At least 5 years of staff supervision and management Good understanding of public safety and criminal justice systems Data Exchange and Application Integration testing Information system integration Vendor Data Exchange Contract ManagementEducation Requirements: Bachelor's Degree required; Master's Degree in Management Information Systems or related field highly desirable PMP preferred W2 only, no Corp to Corp. We are unable to sponsor H1B visas at this time. **eXcell™ Supports Equal Employment Opportunity** eXcell™, a division of CompuCom® Systems, Inc., a global company headquartered in Bellevue, Washington, provides IT staffing services and solutions to Fortune 1000 companies as well as small and medium business. For more information, visit www.excell.com.",Sr. IT Project Manager – Data Exchanges Job in San Jose  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,"Full Time , Temporary/Contract/Project",San Jose 95112,Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-it-project-manager-%E2%80%93-data-exchanges-job-san-jose-ca-us-171969428.aspx?mescoid=1500145001001&jobPosition=11,,Experienced (Non-Manager),fc75848a47c812bc06ba9f3860cc09bf
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:15:48:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company IntroductionKamtek, Inc. is a Tier 1, automotive manufacturing supplier that specializes in Metal Stamping and Assembly for Mercedes, Volkswagon, Kia, Ford, Nissan and Hyundai. As a local distributor and supplier, Kamtek's market segmentation to Cosma International, (a division of MAGNA INTERNATIONAL) provides a ""state-of-the-art"" product that utilizes the most technologically advanced Pressing processes in order to maintain a competitive advantage to other OEM's within the market. Our company's culture of team spirit & mutual respect with a focus on fair treatment helps us to embrace our multi-cultural affiliation with Magna International, and supports our mission through process efficiency and competitive product pricing. Furthermore, the culture at Kamtek focuses on Job Security, with employees being given the opportunity for continuous training, advancement within the skill/trade, and potential for growth within our safe work environment. We offer Employee Equity and Profit Participation programs which increase our employees' ownership within the company. Kamtek, Inc., part of Cosma International and a division of Magna International, represents the most diversified automotive supplier in the world. We design, develop and manufacture automotive systems, assemblies, modules and components, and engineer and assemble complete vehicles, primarily for sale to original equipment manufacturers (OEMs) of cars and light trucks in our three geographic segments - North America, Europe, and Rest of World (primarily Asia, South America and Africa). Our capabilities include the design, engineering, testing and manufacture of automotive interior systems; seating systems; closure systems; metal body & chassis systems; mirror systems; exterior systems; roof systems; electronic systems; powertrain systems as well as complete vehicle engineering and assembly. We have a global presence in order to support our customers on a worldwide basis, consisting of 136,000 employees in 319 manufacturing operations and 85 product development, engineering and sales centers in 29 countries on four continents as of Q2 2015.Job IntroductionThe function of the Quality Auditor-Supplier Quality in KAMTEK is to inspect and audit any part of blanking and blank process through receipt of conforming material to press lines. Also ensure all documentation and Systems being used on the line are accurate and complete. The Quality Auditor-SQ is to ensure that all associates follow current work instructions for given part being run at that time. During the shift the Quality Auditor-SQ is to inspect all applicable systems in manufacturing to verify that good quality parts are being produced. At the end of the shift, Auditors are to report findings and actions taken in reference to any concerns previous or current to the Group Leader or designee.Major ResponsibilitiesThe Quality Auditor-SQ is responsible for their safety and well-being, quality, part audits, system audits, customer cost, productivity, and ergonomic issues through using the company policies and procedures and the Magna Employee's Charter as a guideline. 1) Follow and enforce all plant safety rules and policies. 2) Follow and comply with all operational procedures/policies as stated in the employee Environmental Health and Safety programs 3) Understand and promote Magna's philosophies (Magna's Operational Principles, Corporate Constitution and Employee's Charter). 4) Ensure containments and certification requirements are met in a timely manner. 5) Audit and report out on NCM material, along with plans to minimize 6) Audit and report out on Scrap material, along with plans to minimize 7) Pass down to communicate all shift concerns. 8) Interface with engineering and quality to resolve quality concerns. 9) Conduct daily supplier audits for production parts and process in accordance with the layered process audit system 10) Review coil yield to optimize material usage 11) Incoming coil inspection and storage review 12) Blank inspection and storage review 13) Review and track supplier scrap, supplier related downtime, supplier claims etc. 14) Process Supplier Chargebacks (SMRR) 15) Monitor Supplier defective material handling for Steel or Aluminum 16) Audit raw material receiving to insure compliance to receiving requirements. 17) Quality System Audits 18) Promote good housekeeping 19) Perform other duties as requiredKnowledge and EducationEDUCATION: * High School Diploma or GED required; * Six months to one year related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. TECHNICAL TRAINING: GD& T, Weld Standards, Manufacturing Practices, SPC OTHER: Computer skills; proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel, and PowerPoint * Demonstrated proficiency in the use of precision measuring tools including tape measures, scales, vernier calipers, etc. * Metal Finish experience a plus. * Proficient in Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and Outlook Express. * PDCA/8D/5 why knowledge a plus.Work ExperienceOne year of Quality auditing experience in the automotive manufacturing environment.Skills and Competencies-Must possess working knowledge and understanding of quality systems, standards, and procedures -Must have strong team-focused, interpersonal and leadership abilities -Must have excellent communication skills -Must be willing to work extended or flexible hours -Must be willing to work in various locations within and outside the facility -Must be able to pay good attention to detail -Must possess good human relations, leadership skills, and a maturity of judgment -Must have good organizational and problem-solving skills.Work EnvironmentSome of the physical demands for this position include being able to lift up to a weight of 40 pounds and the ability to stand, sit, and walk for prolonged periods of time.",Supplier Quality Auditor Job in Birmingham,"Full Time, Employee","Birmingham, AL",Automotive and Parts MfgManufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/supplier-quality-auditor-job-birmingham-al-us-172302523.aspx?mescoid=5101004001001&jobPosition=8,,Quality Assurance/Safety,be25f76265f00fdddccf6112374d5c8b
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:15:49:33,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  687704Title: Project ManagerLocation: Columbus, OHLength: 6+ Month ContractApex Systems is currently seeking a Project Managers for 6+ month contract in Columbus, OH.Roles & Responsibilities:- Ability to manage both large (10,000+ hours) and smaller projects- Manages all project communication and reporting- Coordinates efforts across multiple IT and Line of Business organizations- Establishes and maintains project schedules and reports progress against the schedules- Manages all project issues and risks- Facilitates project meetings and associated logistics (scheduling, agendas, minutes, action items)- Assigns tasks and performs follow-up with project team members- Facilitates the review and approval of all project deliverablesRequirements:- 5-10 years of Project Management experience. Background must include leading a full project from scoping through implementation to support.- In depth experience managing multiple projects within an application development technology environment- Leadership and relationship building skills- PMP certification is preferred, but not required.- Previous experience with Clarity or PPM will be a huge plus.- Banking/Financial experience is ideal- Proven ability to manage multiple projects at one time.- Any background in development is highly preferred.If you are interested in applying please contact Brittany Mullen: bmullen@apexsystemsinc.com 614-467-4200 EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Manager Job in Columbus,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  687704Title: Project ManagerLocation: Columbus, OHLength: 6+ Month ContractApex Systems is currently seeking a Project Managers for 6+ month contract in Columbus, OH.Roles & Responsibilities:- Ability to manage both large (10,000+ hours) and smaller projects- Manages all project communication and reporting- Coordinates efforts across multiple IT and Line of Business organizations- Establishes and maintains project schedules and reports progress against the schedules- Manages all project issues and risks- Facilitates project meetings and associated logistics (scheduling, agendas, minutes, action items)- Assigns tasks and performs follow-up with project team members- Facilitates the review and approval of all project deliverablesRequirements:- 5-10 years of Project Management experience. Background must include leading a full project from scoping through implementation to support.- In depth experience managing multiple projects within an application development technology environment- Leadership and relationship building skills- PMP certification is preferred, but not required.- Previous experience with Clarity or PPM will be a huge plus.- Banking/Financial experience is ideal- Proven ability to manage multiple projects at one time.- Any background in development is highly preferred.If you are interested in applying please contact Brittany Mullen: bmullen@apexsystemsinc.com 614-467-4200 EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-job-columbus-oh-us-172750974.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),5181b368cc97f192bec9aa36735c90af
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:15:57:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"SR. QA ASSOCIATE - CLINICAL OPERATIONSA global biopharmaceutical company is looking for a Sr. QA Associate to add to their Clinical Operations team in St. Louis, MO. This site is a multi-product and multi-client location with manufacturing facilities for biopharmaceutical products (i.e. antibodies, recombinant proteins and enzymes) for both (pre) clinical and commercial applications.The Sr. QA Associate will provide leadership and experience with introduction of new client molecular entities. This individual will perform client quality project management, assisting the client in Quality needs and understanding of Quality guidelines and Regulations, ensure commitments and adherence to Quality Agreements.A Sr. QA Associate in Clinical Operations is a recognized subject matter expert in one or more of the following Quality Assurance areas: cGMP compliance, GLP, biopharmaceuticals manufacturing, and/or regulatory affairs.This individual is responsible for, but not limited to, batch record review, disposition of product, change control approval and ensuring alignment of the Clinical Operations program with respect to clinical phase appropriate requirements and strategies.Candidate Requirements:B.S. / B.A. Degree with at least 4 years of experience in a regulated manufacturing environment.Knowledgeable of FDA/EMA regulatory requirements applicable to biologics or pharmaceuticals.Technical knowledge of biopharmaceutical manufacturing is desirable.Depth of experience in regulatory requirements for the manufacturing of API including: facility clean room requirements, batch records, and technical transfer protocol review for clinical and commercial GMP manufacturing.This is an excellent opportunity to work with an organization that was ranked number one, globally, in Pharmaceutical Development Services and ranked #2, globally, in Commercial Manufacturing Services.The company offers great benefits, a competitive salary, and an opportunity to make a difference.If you meet the requirements above, apply on-line for consideration.",Sr. QA Associate - Clinical Operations Job in St. Louis,"Full Time, Employee","St. Louis, MO",,http://jobview.monster.com/sr-qa-associate-clinical-operations-job-st.-louis-mo-us-172436535.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=7,,,f07d5dd1523cc12b47df6dd9de735107
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:16:57:38,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  696122Apex Systems Inc. is currently looking for a Jr. Project Manager/Project Coordinator for an opening available with a growing client in the Englewood, CO. For this role you will partner with the project management team to drive initiatives from discovery through project implementation.  Day to day you will be responsible for scheduling, facilitating project meetings, distributing status updates and project communication, updating project plans across project work streams and creating and updating executive level communication.Qualified candidates should possess the following skills:2 – 5 years of experience as a Project Coordinator or Jr. Project ManagerMS Project, PowerPoint and MS Excel experienceStrong documentation skills with the ability to put together meeting notes and communications for the teamAbility to run smaller projects from beginning to endExperience working on both IT (SDLC) and business projectsSharePoint experience would be a PLUSIf you are interested in applying for this role, please respond with a Word document of your resume to eadler@apexsystemsinc.comEEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Coordinator Job in Englewood,Full Time Employee,"Englewood, CO",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-coordinator-job-englewood-co-us-172761730.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2fb1cf3dd3c2b104f47957518533c8c4
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:16:58:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job We have an exciting leadership opportunity with a growing and profitable food manufacturer! This job is with a company who has very strong and steady growth and you will have promotional opportunities here. The company growth is driven by demand for our existing products and we are developing new products each year. We are now hiring a Quality Assurance Supervisor to lead our 2nd shift team. If you are interested in an opportunity to build a career, this may be the place for you.Position SummaryProvide Quality Assurance Supervision to ensure that all products meet established standards.Essential Requirements:Bachelors degree is a minimum requirement.  (Prefer Food Science, Biology, Chemistry or other science degree)2 or more years of Supervisory experience is required.Experience in the food processing industry is required.Must live in the Rockford, IL area (or be willing to relocate to this area with assistance)Background in food quality and food safety, HACCP, SQF, allergens, pest control, FDA regs, GMP's, SOP's, etc.Duties:Supervises and trains all QA Technicians for assigned duties. Maintains attendance records, approves payroll, and administers discipline for QA Technicians. Conducts plant inspections and issues reports. Communicates food safety and quality issues to Management.Maintains lab and QC equipment and facilities needed for product inspection. Facilitates resolution of Quality issues between production and QC. Involvement in third party and customer audits as required. Maintains hold and release program. Maintains environmental testing program. Instructions/How To Apply/What to Do Next:If you believe you are qualified and wish to apply, please click on the Apply button. You will be instructed to complete an online job interest submission. Upon completion, you will receive an automated email confirmation verifying your interest submission has been received. We will contact you shortly via email/phone if your qualifications meet the requirements of the position. Thank you for applying!! Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Phone 800-424-8053 Fax 888-252-5635 Address 4650 S. National, Ste. A6Springfield, MO 65810",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals; Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing; Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-supervisor-qc-supervisor-quality-supervisor-job-rockford-il-us-172190289.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=8,,,545b7c2d68abb477cd23e65d745a1d6d
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:17:08:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Role: Quality Assurance Specialist IIDuration: 6 Months (Strong potential to be extended)Location: Abbott Park, Illinois (60064)Description:Will review/approve Batch Record packets and associated documentation. Provide quality approvals in materials management system as defined in procedures. Participate with support groups in developing QA activity timelines. Identify Entry Level issues and propose Solutions. Maintain databases as applicable. Assures the quality of products and processes per standard operating processes(SOP'S) and GMP (Good Manufacturing Practices).Qualifications:Bachelor's Degree or at least 4 years of experiencePharmaceutical QA experience REQUIREDPackaging and labeling experience highly preferredExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Quality Assurance Specialist II Job in Abbott Park,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Role: Quality Assurance Specialist IIDuration: 6 Months (Strong potential to be extended)Location: Abbott Park, Illinois (60064)Description:Will review/approve Batch Record packets and associated documentation. Provide quality approvals in materials management system as defined in procedures. Participate with support groups in developing QA activity timelines. Identify Entry Level issues and propose Solutions. Maintain databases as applicable. Assures the quality of products and processes per standard operating processes(SOP'S) and GMP (Good Manufacturing Practices).Qualifications:Bachelor's Degree or at least 4 years of experiencePharmaceutical QA experience REQUIREDPackaging and labeling experience highly preferredExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)","Abbott Park, IL 60064",http://jobview.monster.com/quality-assurance-specialist-ii-job-abbott-park-il-us-172518192.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=13,,Quality Assurance/Safety,b3ac93958d438089275a5b0870d0e2fe
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:17:58:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job QA EngineerLocation: Overland Park, KSSalary: Up to $95KTop Reasons to Work with Us- Top places to work in Kansas City in 2015!- Work with innovative and proprietary software- Awesome team and leadershipWhat You Will Be DoingYou will be working on our innovative software!What You Need for this PositionMust Haves:- QA experienceBonus (not required):- SQL- JavaScript- Java- Selenium- Automation- Experience working in a high security/compliance organizationWhat's In It for You- Benefits: Health, Dental, Vision, Life, 401k- Flexible ScheduleSo, if you are a QA Engineer with experience, please apply today! Or email your resume to sydni.estrella@cybercoders.com Report Previous Next {""Caption"":"""",""Images"":[{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/1.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/2.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null},{""Src"":""http://media.newjobs.com/mm/xcybercx/cjt1/3.jpg"",""Title"":null,""Text"":null,""Caption"":null}]} ‹ › ×",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","QA EngineerLocation: Overland Park, KSSalary: Up to $95KTop Reasons to Work with Us- Top places to work in Kansas City in 2015!- Work with innovative and proprietary software- Awesome team and leadershipWhat You Will Be DoingYou will be working on our innovative software!What You Need for this PositionMust Haves:- QA experienceBonus (not required):- SQL- JavaScript- Java- Selenium- Automation- Experience working in a high security/compliance organizationWhat's In It for You- Benefits: Health, Dental, Vision, Life, 401k- Flexible ScheduleSo, if you are a QA Engineer with experience, please apply today! Or email your resume to sydni.estrella@cybercoders.com",Computer Software,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-engineer-patented-software-job-overland-park-ks-us-172033598.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=4,,,299d637a1fb6f5ce46d1b48ded996487
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:17:59:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  695604Top Client, Des MoniesThe Program Manager (PM) designs, plans, and coordinates work teams. Provides technical support to project team members. Handles complex application features and technical designs. Designs and implements the components required for complex application features. Generally manages a group of applications systems analysts. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals. Usually reports to a senior manager.PM38 to 10 years of experience.  Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals, performs a variety of complicated tasks, may lead and direct the work of others, may report directly to a project lead or manager, a wide degree of creativity and latitude is expected.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Project Manager III Job in Ankeny,Full Time Employee,"Ankeny, IA",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-iii-job-ankeny-ia-us-172750896.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),80eb743187f4ef0844e59b3e82408823
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:18:57:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"One of the Nation’s premier Leaders in the metal forming industry has an immediate opening for a Quality Assurance Manger. As a Quality Manager you will beresponsible for implementing the quality systems. This individual supports the inspection Department of 5 Team members and coordinates the work assignments of the inspectors.  This is a “hands on” position and is an integral part of our management team. This person assists special projects in Stamping. We are looking for a candidate with experience in supervision in metal forming. We are looking for someone who is highly motivated and goal oriented.WHAT DOES THIS JOB ENTAIL?Manages the daily workflow of the inspection department and assigns work to inspectors as needed.Reviews the condition of inspection equipment and assures it is fit for use. This includes initiating requests for calibration and maintenance.                              Perform minor calibrations and gage repeatability and reproducibility (GR&R) studies.Assist production in determining proper set-up and maintenance/repair issues needed to produce a quality product.Investigates customer complaints and initiates corrective actions with the aid and approval of the business unit manager.Develops and maintains control plans and work instructions for production that include customer  requirements including special characteristics and controls.Verifies engineering changes and insures that they are distributed to the appropriate departments.Updates and corrects control plans after management review and approval.  Distributes control plans and data collection sheets to job sites as appropriate .Travels to customer’s facility to perform specified corrective action and to develop stroger working relationships with the customers quality organization  mainly in the US and Mexico.Trains inspectors and production personnel in inspection methods and completion of quality records.Facilitates Quality Meeting and Continuous Improvement board meetings.Promote sound quality practices and techniques to plant personnel.Ability to comprehend complex technical topics and specialized information.Ability to take care of the customers’ needs while following company procedures.Ability to pay attention to the minute details of a project or task.WHY ARE YOU INTERESTED?We have been in Business over 50 YRS. & Offer Great Benefits. 401K, Medical including Dental & Vision. Vacation 1st Yr.IS IT RIGHT FOR YOU?*Bachelors Degree in Quality Assurance, Industrial Management or related Engineering Degree.*Minimum 4 years quality experience including automotive component manufacturing.*Strong knowledge of QMS requirements to maintain TS16949 and ISO 9001 and ISO 14001certifications.*PPAP experience to include preparation and related activities.*Must have non conformance resolution experience and corrective action experience.*Experience with performing calibrations and GR&R studies.*Must have experience with continuous improvement projects.*Experience establishing and maintaining customer and vendor relations.*Experience with the  organization and direction of projects to completion*Microsoft word, excel, power point, outlook, and ERP Software.*Experience with measurement equipment to include; micrometers, calipers, gages, optical comparator, & CMM.Please Submit Resumes To:Email: hotjobs@ppswork.com Fax: 330-374-9144or Call 330-374-9133",Quality Manager Job in Canfield,Full Time Employee,"Canfield, OH",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-manager-job-canfield-oh-us-172442187.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=1,,Quality Assurance/Safety,401478ecb608e7b7ddd0702edd261495
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:18:59:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Job #:  688539For more information about this position please contact Kelsey at kpoe@apexsystemsinc.com  Position: Telecommunications Project Coordinator Duration: 1 year Location: Frisco, TXAt least 1 year relevant experience required.Support Project Manager by maintaining document control and tracking project activities within project timelines.Responsibilities include:Gather all project information: schedules, data requests, assignments, tasks, and project meetingsWork with project team to understand and assist with tracking all work, task and project assignmentsAssist Project Manager with development of a comprehensive project workflow process for projectMonitor and modify project schedule as assignedMaintain document control, database management, track project activities and team communicationAssist project team and team lead in strategic meetings, and follow up with meeting notes and actionsSchedule project follow up meetings as neededDevelop and publish communications to project stakeholdersDevelop and review project status reportsSpecial projects as assigned.All candidates must be proficient in all Microsoft Office programs as well as MicroSoft Sharepoint.Excellent verbal and written communication skills are required.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",TMOBJP - Project Coordinator Class A - I - Frisco,Full Time Employee,"Job Description Job #:  688539For more information about this position please contact Kelsey at kpoe@apexsystemsinc.com  Position: Telecommunications Project Coordinator Duration: 1 year Location: Frisco, TXAt least 1 year relevant experience required.Support Project Manager by maintaining document control and tracking project activities within project timelines.Responsibilities include:Gather all project information: schedules, data requests, assignments, tasks, and project meetingsWork with project team to understand and assist with tracking all work, task and project assignmentsAssist Project Manager with development of a comprehensive project workflow process for projectMonitor and modify project schedule as assignedMaintain document control, database management, track project activities and team communicationAssist project team and team lead in strategic meetings, and follow up with meeting notes and actionsSchedule project follow up meetings as neededDevelop and publish communications to project stakeholdersDevelop and review project status reportsSpecial projects as assigned.All candidates must be proficient in all Microsoft Office programs as well as MicroSoft Sharepoint.Excellent verbal and written communication skills are required.EEO EmployerApex Systems LLC is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics. If you have visited our website in search of information on employment opportunities or to apply for a position, and you require an accommodation in using our website for a search or application, please contact our Employee Services Department at 866-612-2739.",Computer/IT Services,http://jobview.monster.com/tmobjp00005839-project-coordinator-class-a-i-frisco-tx-job-frisco-tx-us-172773261.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cef3d5aab4d62425e41387247f03a043
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:19:45:26,No,jobs.monster.com," Do you find yourself asking this question?""How am I supposed to have 3-5 years experience if nobody will give me a chance?""If so, look no further. You have found the company that will personally create the future leaders of the event marketing industry. NOW HIRING! Event Team : Customer Service / Marketing / SalesDynamic specializes in marketing and sales for top name companies in the PRO-RACING industry. Our goals are easy: HAVE FUN and MAKE MONEY! We help our pro-racing clients set up, run and manage daily high energy events spanning WA to help their products become household names.  Creating personal relationships is the foundation of our firm. We uphold long-standing relations with our clientele not because we are the biggest, but because we strive to be the best. Plain and simple - Using our direct event marketing methods, we have continuously achieved dramatic results for clients both large and small from many different industries. All openings are part of a marketing business model. The ideal candidates will possess a ""second-to-none"" work ethic and an unbelievably positive business attitude. We've created a working atmosphere that has not only proven effective, but energetic and fun, so YOU must be too! A big part of our success is based on a foundation of every day being different while having unlimited opportunities - every team member contributes to the expansion of the company. We like to say we 'grow' our team from the ground up! We start all positions at the entry level and give unlimited growth potential whether it be with our events team, sales team or marketing team. Everyone has management potential- we just help bring it out!In order to give you the best chance for amazing results, we will train all of our team members in the areas of:ManagementTeam LeadershipMarketing & SalesPromotional EventsTraining & DevelopmentClient RelationsAccount ManagementFinance & BudgetingBusiness/Campaign DevelopmentNew Customer AcquisitionHuman ResourcesAdministration   RequirementsExperience in event planning, marketing, fundraising, or related degree or equivalent special event experience would be great, but is not mandatoryTop Notch Organization SkillsStrong and professional interpersonal skills to interact effectively and appropriately with all customers at each eventStrong verbal and written communication skills required to manage events and ensure details are clearly understood and properly executedAbility to motivate and influence volunteers to perform assigned duties completely, in a timely manner and consistent with quality standardsMonday-Saturday work schedule; daytime hours  A few majors that will match our availabilities are: Marketing Public Relations Advertising Communications Psychology Business Management / Administration        People from all backgrounds seeking part time or full time opportunities in the following areas are encouraged to inquire about our program: sales, customer service, sales representative, internships, part time, manager, clerical, management, purchasing, administrative, receptionist, maintenance, warehouse, part time, restaurant, office, assistant, hotel, supervisor, general, advertising, writer, graphic, office manager, communications, sales manager, admin, executive assistant, pharmaceutical, food, production, project management, editor, hospitality, professional, bartender, call center, inventory, photography, bilingual, sports, cashier, clerk, distribution, sales management, shipping, waiter, waitress.  Apply if you have the following experience: entry level sales, customer service, manager, marketing, student, accounting, entrepreneur, summer job, entry level, sales, marketing, general, retail, restaurant, hospitality, home improvement, construction, management, administrative, administrative assistant, business development, business, internship, advertising, human ",Event Team Hiring : Customer Service / Marketing / Sales Job in Renton,"Full Time , Employee","Renton, WA 98057",Advertising and PR Services Entertainment Venues and Theaters Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/event-team-hiring-customer-service-marketing-sales-job-renton-wa-us-172755474.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=9,,Project/Program Management,7a3842b558b312e6f891f43ed10f8fcc
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:19:46:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Supplier Quality Engineer Experis Engineering is hiring a Staff Supplier Quality Engineer in Raynham, MA to support a transformation/restructuring project.As a Supplier Quality Engineer, you will have the opportunity to:Provide overall quality assurance leadership in the management of select contract manufacturing sites engaged in the production of productsProvide complex product team support for quality system design and audit, compliance assessment, and for support of steady state manufacturing processesUtilize multifaceted industry and process excellence standards on an expert level in daily quality operations, including good manufacturing practices (GMP), and international organization for standardization (ISO)Report on contract manufacturer performance metricsHandle complex technical issues for manufacturing processes that are to be transferred to satellite facilitiesProvide Quality Engineering support to suppliers including audits/assessments, inspection technique support, verification/validation activities, CAPA and change managementWork with internal partners and external supplier to remediate legacy PVEDrive new or revised SPV special process validations as needed with specified suppliersSupport evaluating vendor risk during outsourcing activitiesIdeal Candidate:Bachelor's degree is required, preferably in an Engineering, Life Science, or related discipline.5+ years of experience in a highly regulated industry is required.Experience in the Medical Device industry and/or Pharmaceutical industry is required.FDA and ISO regulations knowledge is required, with FDA CFR Part 820 and ISO 13485 knowledge required.Auditing background is an asset.Blueprint literacy including GD&T is preferred.Experience in root cause analysis is required.Experience or knowledge with machining manufacturing processes and injection molding an asset.Six Sigma, Lean, or ASQ Certification and trainings an asset.This position will require up to 25% travel with occasional internationalApply today for consideration!Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Supplier Quality Engineer Job in Raynham,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Supplier Quality Engineer,"Raynham, MA 02767",http://jobview.monster.com/supplier-quality-engineer-job-raynham-ma-us-172661831.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=7,,Quality Assurance/Safety,3ffb018e24a23b69bd47ed7eb2c87b31
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:20:58:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Operations Manager is responsible for the day to day management of the assigned secure juvenile detention facility during an assigned tour which includes direct oversight of Group Services, Security, and coordinates all related support services. Specific duties include: Manage the overall operation of the assigned tour (7:00 AM-3:00 PM, 3:00 PM-11:00 PM, 11:00 PM-7:00 AM) of the secure detention facility by planning, monitoring, and evaluating the ongoing programs relating to the supervision, conduct and order of the juveniles in care. Evaluate current practices and policies around various operational issues that impact on safety and security for staff in all titles and residents within secure detention; assess and evaluate their shift's critical areas where they will formulate policies based on identified operational needs to better manage secure detention. Direct facility-specific functions regarding the selection, hiring, transfer, and related duties for Associate JuvenileCounselors, Juvenile Counselors, Supervising Special Officers, and Special Officers, working closely with the ExecutiveDirector of Compliance and Control and collaborating with ACS Personnel Administration as required. Collaborate with Labor Relations regarding labor/management issues and the impact of new policies and procedures with regard to collective bargaining. Manage the facility security operations to ensure the proper care, safety, and security of the residents and monitor the resident census. Manage and coordinate the programs including administrative duties relating to fiscal, personnel, food services, property management, plant management, and housekeeping of the secure facility. Coordinate program services including education, recreation, medical, and social services to ensure that programs are implemented to meet the needs of the residents. Conduct individual and group conferences with staff concerning the interpretation and implementation of agency policies and procedures, including techniques to be used in addressing behavioral and adjustment issues, and develop staffs' skills in observing, recording, and addressing these issues. Manage staff scheduling and deployment with special attention to the use of overtime and absenteeism. Conduct investigations of child abuse allegations, critical incidents, and suicide attempts which occur while on duty which includes conducting interviews, viewing videos, preparing managerial reports and submitting corrective action plans to the Executive Director within 24 hours of occurrence. Establish and maintain a managerial system of control to ensure effective program operations. Serves as a liaison with court administrators, as well as federal, state, and city regulatory agencies. Provide coverage for facility operations in the absence of the Director of Operations.  Oversee, monitor, and resolve Citytime related issues.Note: Shift managers may be assigned to work based on the operational needs of the facility and will include holidays and weekends.PREFERRED SKILLS:The preferred candidate should possess the following: Experience within the Juvenile Justice and related systems, an understanding of the functions and operations of juvenile detention, demonstrated superior judgment, analytical ability, and management ability; experience and ability managing professionals and civil service staff; ability to problem-solve and make decisions in a timely manner; ability to work under pressure and with tight deadlines; strong organizational, written, and oral communications skills; ability to lead and work as part of a team, as well as independently, to achieve the necessary results; the ability to prioritize tasks and undertake several critical projects simultaneously; an understanding of the functions and operations of juvenile detention.",Operations Manager Job in Brooklyn,Full Time Employee,"Brooklyn, NY 10455",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/operations-manager-job-brooklyn-ny-us-172664456.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=5,,Project/Program Management,eb410fc0aad84ebc9a4cedafb2cd020b
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:20:59:42,No,jobs.monster.com,"Case Manager, Interim, Kindred Boston ( Job Number: 280825 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Summary: Case Manager job will coordinates management of care for a specified patient population in a single hospital; follows patients throughout the continuum of care and ensures optimum utilization of resources, service delivery and compliance with external review agencies. Provides ongoing support and expertise through comprehensive assessment, care planning, plan implementation and overall evaluation of individual patient needs. Enhances the quality of patient management and satisfaction, to promote continuity of care and cost effectiveness through the integration of functions of case management, utilization review and management and discharge planning. Case Manager, Case Management, CM, Utilization Review, CCMC, RN, Registered Nurse, Hospital,  Healthcare, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals, #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Appropriate minimum degree for preferred licensure or certification or commensurate experience in a related healthcare field. Licenses/Certification: Healthcare professional licensure preferred as Registered Nurse, Respiratory Therapist, Physical Therapist, Occupational Therapist or Social Worker. Appropriate certification in Case Management preferred for example, Commission for Case Manager Certification (CCMC) Association of Rehabilitation Nurses (ARN) certification. Experience: Three years clinical experience. Prefer experience in Case Management, Quality Management, Utilization Review, or discharge planning If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Case Mgmt/MDS Primary Location : MA-Boston-Kindred Hospital - Boston Organization : 4688 - Kindred Hospital - Boston Shift : Day #CJT-jobBodyContent p {margin: 0px!important;}",Case Manager,"Full Time, Employee","Case Manager, Interim, Kindred Boston ( Job Number: 280825 ) Description Interested in a career with Kindred Hospitals – a place where you can put your heart into and make a real difference in our patient’s lives. Come and grow your career with Kindred Hospitals, a division of Kindred Healthcare. Our culture of caring for our patients and residents begin with our core values – our employees.  We are committed to fostering professional growth and dedicated healthcare teams that make us the provider of choice.  We embrace a diverse workforce and understand that hiring outstanding people is the key to providing quality care – and quality care is what we do every day!  Join us! Summary: Case Manager job will coordinates management of care for a specified patient population in a single hospital; follows patients throughout the continuum of care and ensures optimum utilization of resources, service delivery and compliance with external review agencies. Provides ongoing support and expertise through comprehensive assessment, care planning, plan implementation and overall evaluation of individual patient needs. Enhances the quality of patient management and satisfaction, to promote continuity of care and cost effectiveness through the integration of functions of case management, utilization review and management and discharge planning. Case Manager, Case Management, CM, Utilization Review, CCMC, RN, Registered Nurse, Hospital,  Healthcare, Long Term Acute Care, Transitional Care Hospitals, #MON-HD #LI-HD Qualifications Education: Appropriate minimum degree for preferred licensure or certification or commensurate experience in a related healthcare field. Licenses/Certification: Healthcare professional licensure preferred as Registered Nurse, Respiratory Therapist, Physical Therapist, Occupational Therapist or Social Worker. Appropriate certification in Case Management preferred for example, Commission for Case Manager Certification (CCMC) Association of Rehabilitation Nurses (ARN) certification. Experience: Three years clinical experience. Prefer experience in Case Management, Quality Management, Utilization Review, or discharge planning If you are a current Kindred/RehabCare employee . Job : Case Mgmt/MDS Primary Location : MA-Boston-Kindred Hospital - Boston Organization : 4688 - Kindred Hospital - Boston Shift : Day #CJT-jobBodyContent p {margin: 0px!important;}",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/case-manager-interim-kindred-boston-job-boston-ma-us-172647106.aspx?mescoid=2100316001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,44f54b871d1b25c057daa5257983b187
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:21:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70418 # Positions  1 State  CA City  Livermore Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  5925 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned:   • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor - Part-Time Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-part-time-job-camphill-pa-us-172747819.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=18,,Project/Program Management,d0aa9e1571f690b0992d7978824b83d1
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:21:47:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"A leader in innovative products and complete solutions in the healthcare industry is currently seeking a Quality Engineer in the Berkeley, CA area. This is a 9-month CONTRACT position with the possibility of extension. No per diem is available for this assignment.Responsibilities for the Quality EngineerThe electronic controlled document management systems, including management of Quality Records, Design History Files, Engineering Change Orders, Design History Record reviews, and Batch/Raw material Release. Final product lot release activities with scans of manufacturing executed batch records and raw material QA review acceptance. Correspondence with appropriate stakeholders. QA review of label documentation, verifies printed sample labels for correctness Overseeing the archiving process and inventory listings for on-site and offsite records, retention and destruction of archived documents. Create, monitor, and administer the management of Purchase Orders for Document Control activities, including off site storage. Assists authoring and processing changes through the Change Control, ECO, and Document change notices supporting design changes, SOP changes and Manufacturing documents. Reviews documents submitted to ensure the use of correct templates, types, training, and quality requirements prior to posting for release. Review document changes and provide effective communications of changes for site awareness and to facilitate training requirements. Administer and maintain compliant periodic review scheduling and reporting. Administer and maintain records and number issuance for equipment and log notebooks. Requirements for the Quality EngineerScience or related degree preferred 1.5+ years’ experience in Quality roles. Experience working on a regulated Medical Device, IVDD or Pharma environment. Experience with Design Control and manufacturing. Experience with Quality Assurance approval of materials, labels, and Batch Records within a manufacturing environment. Electronic document management system control/administration and/or management experience, ideally in the role of system owner; with 1-2 years LMS implementation and control/administration or system owner Experience in the Medical Device industry and manufacturing environment in the medical field. Experience with Lotus Notes Document Change and SAP document structures. Working knowledge of US / EU regulations and guidelines, including 21 CFR Parts 803, 820 Strong technical writing skills. Advanced software skills (including SharePoint, Acrobat Pro, Microsoft office, and SAP), and demonstrated troubleshooting and problem-solving techniques to work independently. Ability to develop and present training materials to large groups, author and update controlled document procedures as needed Benefits401KHealthcareThis Job is located in Berkeley, CA -> United States",Quality Engineer - Document Management/Change Controls/Medical Device Job in Berkeley,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Berkeley, CA 94701",,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-engineer-document-management-change-controls-medical-device-job-berkeley-ca-us-172591644.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=10,23.99 - 31.89 $ /hour,,328de239a8aa36e979f9726e0ce9e85a
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:22:19:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"Report this job About the Job Location: 100% travel required At Inspection Services, our unwavering commitment to quality and safety begins with the caliber and expertise of the people we employ.  We currently seeking Project QA/QC Inspectors in Welding, Piping, Mechanical, Civil and Structural environments. As liaisons between the client’s key personnel (Engineering and Project Managers) and on-site contractors, qualified individuals will work diligently to ensure quality, safety and integrity of construction.   They will be on-site to monitor all aspects of a project and must be highly efficient at establishing and maintaining positive working relationships with all parties involved.  They will also be required to create, manage and maintain daily documentation for all work related to each project, including but not limited to as-builds, X-rays, certified welding inspection, operator qualifications verifications, hydrostatic testing processes and, material acquisitions and reconciliations and overall job and site safety.  This position requires extensive travel to support project demands (often 100% travel), apply ONLY if you are willing to travel.  Regular and reliable attendance is required in performance of job in addition to physical stamina to stay on your feet or travel on a regular basis. Minimum Requirements By Type:•          Welding Inspectors (Piping, Pressure Vessel, Bridge and Commercial Structures) -active CWI/CPWI•          Coating / Painting Inspectors (NACE Level 1, 2 and 3) •          Project QA/QC - trade experience in the refinery, pipeline, chemical and power utility projects and turnarounds•          API Inspector - Licensed to perform API 653 inspections, 510, and 570 inspections•          Electrical Inspector •          Utility Inspector Special Conditions:•          Must be eligible to work in the US, valid driver license, pass a background check including criminal history, pass a drug test, and may be required to pass additional screening. •      Safety Certifications is a plus (OSHA 30 construction, OSHA 510, etc.)•     Ability to manage and maintain a knowledgeable and legible Project Book throughout the project•     Experience in use, function, accessing and utilizing computer applications Legal Disclaimer:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of gender, race, marital status, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation or persons with disabilities. Report",Monster,"Full Time, Employee","Location: 100% travel required At Inspection Services, our unwavering commitment to quality and safety begins with the caliber and expertise of the people we employ.  We currently seeking Project QA/QC Inspectors in Welding, Piping, Mechanical, Civil and Structural environments. As liaisons between the client’s key personnel (Engineering and Project Managers) and on-site contractors, qualified individuals will work diligently to ensure quality, safety and integrity of construction.   They will be on-site to monitor all aspects of a project and must be highly efficient at establishing and maintaining positive working relationships with all parties involved.  They will also be required to create, manage and maintain daily documentation for all work related to each project, including but not limited to as-builds, X-rays, certified welding inspection, operator qualifications verifications, hydrostatic testing processes and, material acquisitions and reconciliations and overall job and site safety.  This position requires extensive travel to support project demands (often 100% travel), apply ONLY if you are willing to travel.  Regular and reliable attendance is required in performance of job in addition to physical stamina to stay on your feet or travel on a regular basis. Minimum Requirements By Type:•          Welding Inspectors (Piping, Pressure Vessel, Bridge and Commercial Structures) -active CWI/CPWI•          Coating / Painting Inspectors (NACE Level 1, 2 and 3) •          Project QA/QC - trade experience in the refinery, pipeline, chemical and power utility projects and turnarounds•          API Inspector - Licensed to perform API 653 inspections, 510, and 570 inspections•          Electrical Inspector •          Utility Inspector Special Conditions:•          Must be eligible to work in the US, valid driver license, pass a background check including criminal history, pass a drug test, and may be required to pass additional screening. •      Safety Certifications is a plus (OSHA 30 construction, OSHA 510, etc.)•     Ability to manage and maintain a knowledgeable and legible Project Book throughout the project•     Experience in use, function, accessing and utilizing computer applications Legal Disclaimer:We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of gender, race, marital status, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation or persons with disabilities.",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/industrial-inspections-job-chicago-il-us-172517240.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=2,,,6ce860dfd1ede892a42b678560db3a7d
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:22:34:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis leads in the creation and delivery of services that enable our clients to win in the changing world of work. We are the premier vendor for some of the most prestigious companies in the Wisconsin area. We have partnered together with a local Government State Agency to find a Project Manager - Change Management to join their team in Milwaukee, Wisconsin.Title: Project Manager - Change Management JOB DESCRIPTION:Organizational Change Management Lead needed to own and direct the change management efforts for a new large Enterprise Resource Planning Project, Security Program, and other IT initiatives requiring organizational change. Looking for an individual who is passionate about driving change across a large scale organization, excited by deploying new technology-led customer experiences, and an expert in classic and emerging behavioral change management methods. Individual must possess the ability to understand and balance user needs, tool capabilities, and best-in-class processes. Must possess the skills to communicate and work with all levels within the organization.RESPONSIBILITIES:Create, drive, manage, and monitor readiness strategies and activities in Organizational Change Management, Communications, and Training Plans. Provide regular reporting to the PMO, project team, and Executive Steering Committee on the overall readiness of department staff, key activities, and issues. Lead execution of the Communication Plan and drive employee engagement on the project. Work with departmental staff to track and monitor readiness for departmental staff, including: o Workgroup and employee readiness assessments (highlights current and future job roles, readiness level, training gaps, tasks/actions required to mitigate issues and prepare staff for the changes) o Business processes and policies changes (coordinate with team module leads) - employees understand how they will perform their job duties given county-wide and departmental business processes, policies and procedures o Employee acceptance and support Coordinates countywide and departmental employee outreach activities Works with teams to monitor, report and respond to employee concerns, points of risk or resistance, and corresponding mitigating actions Monitors and escalates issues that may require one-on-one meetings with employees, soft skills workshops o Training and support Facilitate communications and work with the training coordinator on the development and execution of the training plan, ensuring employees have learning paths and attend the appropriate training workshops and activitiesResponsible for overall coordination, status reporting and stability of project oriented work efforts. Establishes and implements project management processes and methodologies for the IT community to ensure projects are delivered on time, within budget, adhere to high quality standards and meet customer expectations. Responsible for assembling project plans and teamwork assignments, directing and monitoring work efforts on a daily basis, identifying resource needs, performing quality review; and escalating functional, quality, timeline issues appropriately. Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Administration, or other related field. Typically has 10 to 15 years of IT work experience, including 4 or more years managing projects.If this sounds like you and you are interested in learning more contact kelsey.faber@experis.comExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)Experis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Project Manager - Change Management Job in Milwaukee,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Project Manager - Change Management,"Milwaukee, WI",http://jobview.monster.com/project-manager-change-management-job-milwaukee-wi-us-172726682.aspx?mescoid=1300087001001&jobPosition=20,,Project/Program Management,bec1469c1a3c58f735b53f313ffb7981
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:22:38:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESCoordinate the quality control laboratory processes- Train to perform all standard testing, including control of equipment, calibration maintenance, test method development and documentation of product specific testing.Provide the technical support necessary to assure that blends meet the quality requirements of customers, including necessary control of blend adjustment.Ensure quality compliance of materials to be received and shipped.Ensure customer requirements are met as it relates to quality standards, documentation and communicate progress to plant and management. Enter and maintain all quality requirements in Chempax.Coordinate quality aspects of the Quality Management System, including validation of new processes, documentation of quality processes, procedures and work instructions.Under the direction of the Operations Manager, support quality improvement efforts plant wide.Process technical and quality related customer questionnaires.Coordinate the qualification of new materials, blends and technical aspects of new processes; provide the necessary interface for new materials and blends in Chempax.Provide employees and customers with requested technical information and product compliance documents in a timely manner.Prepare and ship customer samples as requested by sales/ customer service.Demonstrate the ability to communicate in oral and written formProvide necessary reports to Management.QUALIFICATIONS To perform this job successfully, the individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Proficient with computer software such as MICROSOFT OFFICE, EXCEL, WORD, PROJECT, and internal database, Chempax.EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCEEducationBS in Chemistry or Mathematics2-5 years quality assurance responsibility and quality control laboratory experience required.Working knowledge of wet chemical laboratory best practicesWorking knowledge of solvent and ethanol products preferred.Working knowledge of continuous improvement systems.",Quality Coordinator / Chemist Job in Saint Louis,Full Time,"Saint Louis, MO 63147",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/quality-coordinator-chemist-job-saint-louis-mo-us-171692896.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=11,"40,000.00 - 50,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),e20f4fb8cfffb440ab5c2a187468a375
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:22:55:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"Due to an increase in client demand, Sharp Decisions Inc. is actively looking to bring on a Developer/QA Analyst to support client initiatives within the Healthcare Industry, to be based at Lake Mary, Florida.Developer/QA Analyst with the following:    MUST BE US MILITARY, RESERVIST, NATIONAL GUARD or US MILITARY SPOUSE/FAMILY 2 to 5 years of Development background and a QA background would be a plus May have worked as a Data Analyst or Business Analyst Should have a development background with language like C# or .Net from a mature software development environment Experience with OpenSpan is a big plus Experience with Agile/Scrum Methodology, a plus Familiar with the health insurance industry from a business process perspective (claims settlement preferred) a plus Medicare/Medicaid experience preferredPlease submit your resume only if you possess the skills required. Be sure to properly articulate the functionality of your background as it pertains to this role.ABOUT SHARP DECISIONSFor more than 25 years, Sharp Decisions has provided superior, award-winning service in strategic business and technology consulting services to government agencies at all levels, as well as domestic and global corporations. With subject matter expertise in Investment Banking, Finance, Healthcare, Media & Telecommunications, and Manufacturing, Sharp Decisions is well equipped to serve your needs.Headquartered in New York City, with locations throughout the U.S., Europe and Canada, Sharp Decisions has been the technology backbone for a client portfolio that includes an array of well-known companies. As a Certified Woman-Owned Business Enterprise and approved vendor, Sharp Decisions offers a powerful, cost-effective advantage. We actively partner with other MBEs to add value and meet diversity program requirements. Sharp Decisions is also committed to hiring and training post-9/11, tech-savvy U.S. armed forces veterans through our V.E.T.S.TM (Vocation, Education and Training for Service members) Program.For more information visit www.sharpdecisions.com ",Developer / QA Analyst Job in Lake Mary  body { margin:px; overflow: visible !important; } #ejb_header { color: #; font-family: Verdana,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,Lake Mary 32746,Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/developer-qa-analyst-job-lake-mary-fl-us-172254595.aspx?mescoid=1700192001001&jobPosition=16,,Quality Assurance/Safety,01556400ad3c514180648e5eeaea9c43
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:22:56:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary/Objective The QA Technician is responsible for efficiently and accurately performing tasks related to product quality including testing and inspecting product at various stages of the batching and production process.  Compile and evaluate data to determine and maintain quality and reliability of products. Essential Duties & Responsibilities Conduct quality audits on the production floor daily, including verifying implementation of product quality protocols, Good Manufacturing Practices and Housekeeping. Conduct raw and packaging component sampling, inspection. Records and evaluates test data, alerting Quality Assurance Manager to any deviations from specifications. Act as facilitator/coach in areas such as Quality Control techniques, Good Manufacturing Practices, and product quality/safety.  Test product for a variety of qualities including chemical/physical characteristics, microbiological integrity and sensory evaluation, requiring taste & smell. Ensure all paperwork is filled out in a clear, legible and accurate format, and completed with required information in accordance with company and regulatory agencies standards. Utilizing continuous improvement mindset, assist in identifying opportunities to improve processes. Additional Responsibilities May perform additional responsibilities directed from management. Promote and follow Rizo Lopez policies and procedures. Maintain a clean and sanitary work area Recognize the importance of safety in the workplace, follow safety rules, practice safe work habits, utilize appropriate safety equipment and report unsafe conditions to the appropriate administrator. Utilizing continuous improvement mindset, assist in identifying opportunities to improve processes. Follow Good Manufacturing Practices.  Knowledge and Skills Requirements Solid understanding of GMP guidelines (Good Manufacturing Practice). Able to add, subtract, multiply and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions and decimals. Working knowledge of Microsoft Word and Excel. Display strong organizational and interpersonal skills, along with the ability to work individually as well as part of a team. An ability to communicate verbally and through writing is essential, as well as a working knowledge of computer systems. Knowledge of basic statistical sampling and product sampling protocols needed.  Utilizing various testing equipment such as: moisture, protein, fat, salt, and pH analyzers.",QA Laboratory Technician Job in Modesto,Full Time Employee,"Modesto, CA 95357",Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/qa-laboratory-technician-job-modesto-ca-us-172449654.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=14,,Quality Assurance/Safety,8b59983d4a699c3c62e01e41eef986c5
United States of America,US,03/May/2016:23:51:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position ID#  70384 # Positions  1 State  VT City  Hardwick Category  Store Associates - Shift Supervisor Store #  10336 Shift  .. The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   The primary purpose of this position is to provide direction and assistance in the completion of daily merchandise and operating tasks and to perform such other duties as assigned by the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. The incumbent is required to perform all tasks in a safe manner consistent with corporate policies and applicable laws. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action. Situations surrounding these issues should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   The associate is responsible for the functions below, in addition to other duties as assigned: • Provide superior customer service by assisting customers with their shopping needs, handling all customer transactions in a timely and courteous manner, and responding to customer complaints/concerns with a sense of urgency to see to their resolution. • Attend to merchandising of plan-o-grams within seasonal departments, end caps, displays and basic inline departments as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Control inventory by performing proper receiving and stocking including accurate cycle counting, processing merchandise transfers according to procedures, and reporting inventory problems to the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager. • Accountable for store cash and other financial assets, reconciling cash register drawers, preparing deposits, and ordering changes from the bank as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Assist with the general maintenance and appearance of the store by ensuring a safe and pleasing environment for both customers and associates; respond to any unexpected emergencies to ensure the protection of company assets. • Oversee that store inventory is regularly inspected in accordance with the Product Freshness Review Schedule as directed by the Store Manager and/or the Assistant Store Manager. • Ensure that all outdated product and product with less than 30 days until expiration is removed from the sales floor to be processed through the established returns process. • Manage tasks and supervise store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable.   Supervisory Experience This position involves managing tasks and supervising store associates in those limited circumstances when the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager is unavailable. This position does not involve, hiring, firing, or disciplining associates or recommending any such action, which should be brought to the attention of the Store Manager and/or Assistant Store Manager.   *All duties described in this document are to be performed in keeping with the core values and service attributes consistent with the Rite Aid brand and strategy.   • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. • In accordance with state law, candidates must satisfy minimum age requirements to sell and/or supervise the sale of alcohol and/or tobacco products. • Ability to pass drug test. • Committed to providing customer service that makes both internal and external customers feel welcome, important, and appreciated. • Ability to preserve confidentiality of information. • Ability and willingness to move with purpose and a strong sense of urgency. • Ability to work weekends on a regular basis. • Ability to work day or evening hours. • Accuracy and attention to detail. • Ability to organize and prioritize a variety of tasks/projects. At least one (1) year of experience in retail, food service, restaurant or customer service industry, preferably at a supervisor level, and/or a two (2) year college degree.         Options: Apply for this job online Apply Share Refer this job to a friend Refer Share on your newsfeed Not ready to apply? Connect with us for general consideration.",Shift Supervisor Job in Camphill,Full Time Employee,"Camphill, PA",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/shift-supervisor-job-camphill-pa-us-172747840.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=10,,Project/Program Management,1da30f8efade4a079f1a5ac95a3eeb25
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:00:30:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"A manufacturing company, specializing in Die-Casting, Plastic Injection Molding, CNC Machining, and related processes, is searching for an electronics technician with an emphasis on knowledge of electronic systems and machine controllers.Must have knowledge and experience in electronics, PLCs, logic controllers, relay logic, variable frequency drives, and computer logic controlled machines.Duties will include, but not limited to:Assist with any breakdowns within the plant, either electrical or mechanicalTroubleshoot, test, diagnose, repair, or replace as needed, electrical and electronic systems, circuits and equipment within the plant.Perform routine electrical and electronic maintenance or repairs of plant equipment without supervision.Routinely connect and disconnect large machines, compressors, power supplies,  AC-DC motors, and other facility equipment is a plus.Knowledge of installing industrial electrical wiring, bending conduit, motor hook-ups, 220/440 single/3 phase systems is desireable.Must have the ability to read schematics, understand logic diagrams, and work from drawings, sketches and layouts",Maintenance Technician Job in Chico,Full Time,"Chico, CA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Chico-CA-US-165310676.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=9,,,f937cfc0d177c7c7078a8e222b2597ce
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:00:30:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experis is seeking a Network Field Technician for a Direct Hire role in the Kansas City area. Responsibilities The Network Field Technician will specialize in designing, provisioning, installing, disconnecting, monitoring, troubleshooting, and maintaining equipment used to provide our customers with wireless internet services. Utilizes and manages third party vendors in systems support and implementations when necessary. Vendor work includes but not limited to cabling, PBX, fax machines, Routers/switches, cellular phones, pagers, and video conferencing equipment Requirements Must have an understanding of electronics, computers, a mechanical aptitude, and the ability to troubleshoot technical problems. Must have general knowledge of and experience installing Cat5 and Cat6 cabling in commercial environments You are expected to own your own complete set of cabling hand tools. Must have a valid drivers license and clean driving record Required to use company-issued vehicle. Excellent customer service skillsExperis is an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE/AA)",Field Tech Job in Overland Park,Full Time Employee,Field Tech,"Overland Park, KS",http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Tech-Job-Overland-Park-KS-US-165667467.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,"50,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Installation/Maintenance/Repair,9daa7faa0779f8dc8d1cf41ce8ea0941
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:00:58:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: KKelly, Inc.Location: Green Bay, WI 54311Positions: Installer; Technician (Boilers); Technician (Chillers); Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (DDC); Technician (Geothermal); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial; Residential/Light Commercial-------------------Clean Background, Clear Drivers Record. Sign on bonus* (must pass probation period of 6 months). Great Customer Service Skills. Increase your own wage by programs we have in place. Overtime available, On-Call rotation, Vehicle provided. KKelly, Inc.920-469-3500",HVAC Service Technician Job in Green Bay  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Green Bay 54311,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Green-Bay-165010903.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c717252646e0324c936c0dc82fccf931
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:00:59:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Automotive Manufacturing Second Shift ManagerJIT/JIS Manufacturing Plant This is a Very Hot JOBWe are looking to hire a full-time, very skilled candidate.  Do you have experience managing teams in a JUST IN TIME/JUST IN SECQUENCE manufacturing operation?  Your role will be managing up to 4 production supervisors and the entire operations area.  The shift is 4 PM to 4 AM.Bachelor Degree 5+ years in automotiveLean Manufacturing experienceJob Purpose:Manufactures products by scheduling and monitoring production; maintaining equipment; establishing and enforcing manufacturing practices; developing process improvements; managing staff.Duties:* Accomplishes human resource objectives by developing and organization structure; recruiting, selecting, orienting, training, assigning, scheduling, coaching, counseling, and disciplining employees; communicating job expectations; planning, monitoring, appraising, and reviewing job contributions; planning and reviewing compensation actions; enforcing human resource policies and procedures; arranging for special training.* Improves operations by contributing manufacturing information and recommendations to strategic plans and reviews; identifying short-term and long-range issues; identifying and evaluating options; preparing and completing action plans; identifying and implementing new technology and resources; redesigning systems; re-deploying human resources.* Meets financial objectives by forecasting manufacturing requirements; preparing an annual budget; scheduling expenditures; analyzing variances; initiating corrective actions.* Develops production plan by coordinating requirements with sales, distribution, purchasing, and engineering; establishing priorities.* Completes production plan by scheduling requirements and resources; monitoring progress; adjusting requirements and resources; resolving problems.* Maintains equipment by meeting maintenance requirements; scheduling repairs; identifying opportunities for engineering improvements.* Establishes manufacturing practices by developing and enforcing standards, methods, policies, and procedures.* Maintains safe, secure, and healthy work environment by establishing, following, and enforcing standards and procedures; complying with legal regulations.* Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations.* Accomplishes manufacturing and organization mission by completing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Coaching, Managing Processes, Tracking Budget Expenses, Documentation Skills, Production Planning, Controls and Instrumentation, Strategic Planning, Dealing with Complexity, Financial Planning and Strategy, Process Improvement, Quality Management",Shift Manager/Shift Superintendent_Automotive Job in Tuscaloosa,Full Time,"Tuscaloosa, AL",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Shift-Manager-Shift-Superintendent_Automotive-Job-Tuscaloosa-AL-US-166034414.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=18,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),30884ac84ee5e66a933d3f9d6abffb35
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:01:34:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Manufacturing – Change Career to - Truck Driver – Entry Level,Full Time,"Thousand Oaks, CA",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-%E2%80%93-Change-Career-to-Truck-Driver-%E2%80%93-Entry-Level-No-Experience-Full-Time-w-Training-Job-Thousand-Oaks-CA-US-165910277.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=3,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,2ed1dcdf59cd67d051fe9459e872dd7f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:01:58:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"This manufacturing company is offering an immediate, full-time position for a Machinist/Shop Foreman to manage the day-to-day responsibilities of the shop.  You will be required to formulate production schedules, train employees, handle shipping, receiving, and inventory control, build machines, read and interpret blueprints, use calipers, gauges, and micrometers, and set-up and operate manual lathes, mills, honing, grinding, drilling, and tapping machines.  Work hours are Monday through Friday, from 7 a.m. to 3:30 p.m. Qualified candidates must have at least 10 years of machine building experience, must have expensive experience with the set-up and operation of various machines, including mills, lathes, grinding, honing, drilling and tapping, must have the ability to read and interpret blueprints, must have experience with calipers, gages and micrometers, must have shop supervisory experience, and must have own tools. Knowledge of Prototrak CNC is a plus. For an immediate interview, please call 216-535-7564.",Machinist/Shop Foreman Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH 44110",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Machinist-Shop-Foreman-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-164854070.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=19,18.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),e477962bf72ce1310d1a7cd9672f5f26
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:02:00:07,No,jobs.monster.com,"BSH Home Appliances Corporation Operating in the United States under the brands, Bosch, Thermador and Gaggenau, BSH Home Appliances Corporation is highly regarded as a market leader for innovation in home appliance technology.  As an international group with over 12.2 billion in annual sales, we continually strive to engage our dedicated customers around the world through intelligent engineering, streamlined design and a distinct ease of use. We are currently seeking applicants in the New York City/5 Boroughs area for: Home Appliance Service Technician We are seeking a full time technically oriented individual to trouble shoot and repair a wide range of appliances in customer's homes. We provide ongoing product training, a uniform, laptop, cell phone and a company van. Our work week is Monday through Friday, with Saturday work rare.   Requirements:   ·         2-3 years of appliance repair experience, refrigeration a plus. ·        Organized with the ability to complete multiple service calls in a timely manner on a daily basis while providing high levels of customer service. ·        Must be a self starter and be able to work independently with minimal supervision. ·        Strong communication and superior customer service skills. ·        Continuous updating of progress to Managers in regards to service requests. ·        Strong Microsoft office skills as well as Outlook. ·        Maintenance of company provided van. ·        Ability to lift 70+ lbs. ·        Valid driver’s license. Benefits:   We offer a competitive salary, an Incentive Plan and a Monday through Friday work schedule with Saturday work rare! Our comprehensive benefits package includes paid vacation, holidays, medical, dental, vision, life insurance, disability insurance, educational assistance and 401(k) plan.   This position is eligible for the BSH Associate Referral Program     EOE / AA Employer We participate in E-Verify   Additional Information:",Home Appliance Service Technician NYC area Job in Brooklyn,Full Time,"Brooklyn, NY 11201",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Home-Appliance-Service-Technician-NYC-area-Job-Brooklyn-NY-US-165544516.aspx?mescoid=4900886001001&jobPosition=15,,"Executive (SVP, VP, Department Head, etc)",95bc1d531ec43e051eee1b0b60041495
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:02:57:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Maintains production and quality by ensuring operation of machinery and mechanical equipment.Duties: * Ensures operation of machinery and mechanical equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements on engines (gas and diesel), motors, pneumatic tools, conveyor systems, and production machines; following diagrams, sketches, operations manuals, manufacturer's instructions, and engineering specifications; troubleshooting malfunctions. * Locates sources of problems by observing mechanical devices in operation; listening for problems; using precision measuring and testing instruments. * Removes defective parts by dismantling devices; using hoists, cranes, and hand and power tools; examining form and texture of parts. * Adjusts functional parts of devices and control instruments by using hand tools, levels, plumb bobs, and straightedges. * Controls downtime by informing production workers of routine preventive maintenance techniques; monitoring compliance. * Fabricates repair parts by using machine shop instrumentation and equipment. * Maintains equipment, parts, and supplies inventories by checking stock to determine inventory level; anticipating needed equipment, parts, and supplies; placing and expediting orders; verifying receipt. * Conserves maintenance resources by using equipment and supplies as needed to accomplish job results. * Provides mechanical maintenance information by answering questions and requests. * Prepares mechanical maintenance reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends. * Maintains technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing technical publications; establishing personal networks. * Maintains continuity among work teams by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs. * Maintains safe and clean working environment by complying with procedures, rules, and regulations. * Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Equipment Maintenance, General Maintenance, Deals with Uncertainty, Basic Safety, Power Tools, Attention to Detail, Flexibility, Job Knowledge, Productivity",General Maintenance and Repair Job in Starke,Full Time,"Starke, FL 32091",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/General-Maintenance-Repair-Job-Starke-FL-US-164864284.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),97c60ef8e5cae2502d77df09e35a51ac
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:02:58:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Installer/Service Technician If you love dogs and working outside, Canine Company wants your talent and ambition to drive our company forward. We currently have openings for field representatives to work directly with clients and their pets, installing, training pets, troubleshooting electronics and promoting the Invisible Fence brand systems.  Sales experience is a plus as you will have the opportunity to make a commission on additional sales & services made outside of the actual install you are scheduled for.Benefits:• Competitive compensation package• Company vehicle• Excellent benefits including health insurance, dental, and vision care• Superior paid training • Career advancement opportunities• Paid time off• A 401(k) plan• Profit –sharingThe ideal candidate loves to work outside, has an aptitude for troubleshooting and an outstanding attitude for customer service. WE PROMOTE FROM WITHIN!If you love dogs and want a career where you love coming to work every day APPLY NOW at www.caninecompany.com/careers",Installer/Service Technician Job in Belfast,Full Time,"Belfast, ME 04915",,http://jobview.monster.com/Installer-Service-Technician-Job-Belfast-ME-US-164137175.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,,,3914a649c9516bd56da1148ebdf7a4ff
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:06:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"  PES will not accept or honor any resumes from recruiters, agencies or any other third parties About Philadelphia Energy Solutions Headquartered in Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, Philadelphia Energy Solutions (PES) is a leading manufacturer of petroleum and petrochemical products. PES owns and operates two domestic refineries, Girard Point and Point Breeze, the longest continuously operating refineries on the East Coast. PES processes approximately 335,000 barrels of crude oil per day, making it the largest refining complex on the Eastern seaboard.  However, the PES complex is more than just an oil refinery; it will be an industrial conglomerate.  It is destined to be a critical energy solution in the Northeast and will be a reliable and critical supplier of fuels to the regional market. Job Description The TA Lead Planner/Scheduler is the focal point of and maintains continuous control over the planning functions of the refinery Turnarounds. The TA Lead Planner/Scheduler provides planning management to support the TA Department Manager within the guidelines established in the TA Best Practices Manual and works closely with the Project Controls Coordinator and TA Project Managers to assure the implementation of planning and project controls consistent procedures. This position has oversight/management responsibility for approx. 4 to 12 TA planners including contractor planners. This position is responsible for all of the coordination, quality, accuracy and efficiency of the planning functions for all Turnarounds. Below is a list of job duties from PES TA Best Practices Manual. Note that this position includes the job duties below which are for a specific TA project/event Lead Planner and/or oversight of specific project/event Lead Planners, which are required for larger more complex events. Planners coordinate scope development, estimate (man-hours), plan, and schedule the scope. In addition, they provide ongoing assistance to ensure the project stays on schedule. TA Lead Planner/Scheduler Job Duties Function as the focal point of all planning activities Coordinate the gathering and development of the T/A scope Provide oversight to ensure all plans utilize/include: standard man-hours and resources generic structures and codes standardized reporting packages Identify planning resource requirements and coordinate timing Supervise (hire contractors as needed) all planners on the turnaround Organize and chair the appropriate planning meetings Set up milestone plan for all planning activities including completion dates for preliminary scopes, final scopes, critical path Track the planning progress of all areas & recommend corrective action to T/A manager for areas behind schedule Ensure that long lead material items are specified and ordered on time Assist area planners, EWR planners, and material planners in all phases and aspects of the turnaround Set up the turnaround calendar for all areas Develop scheduling criteria based on best practices of all of the planners Work with Operations to set shutdown and startup time frame Review critical path scope and logic for each area Audit planner updates to assure correct reporting Analyze schedule reports to identify problem areas and suggest solutions to T/A Managers Participate as a member of EWR committee Track and assist in the management of the scope growth and EWR flow process and correct problems as necessary Develop the overall equipment (e.g., cranes, trucks, etc.) list for the turnaround When work fronts impact multiple operating areas, coordinate: Schedules for systems that cross multiple areas. (i.e., steam outages, electrical work & unit outages) Inspection requirements across all areas with the Inspection Department Manpower requirements for subcontractors Run reports for the T/A Managers for all areas combined Required: Refinery Turnaround Experience Previous Turnaround planning experience per job description tasks Understanding of refinery equipment repair planning (vessels, towers, exchangers, piping, etc.) to be able to evaluate “completeness” and sequencing of repair steps Experience and ability to work in the very fast paced environment of a Turnaround Previous supervisory experience Team orientation High degree of proficiency with Planning tools including Primavera P-6 (preferred) and/or Immpower, planning and scheduling Required to apply for and obtain a TWIC card.  Having a valid TWIC will be a requirement for your continued employment with Philadelphia Energy Solutions.  Additional information about TWIC is available at http://www.tsa.gov/for-industry/twic.   Required to submit to a pre-employment physical, background check, and drug screening (including hair).  Preferred: Experience as TA Lead Planner on a major Refinery Turnaround (FCCU or Crude Unit) Refinery TA Dept. Lead Planner experience Management experience Expert proficiency with Primavera P-6 Benefits: Medical, vision, and dental and life insurance 401k matching plan and Cash Option Savings plan   EOE M/F/D/V  ",Turnaround Lead Planner/Scheduler Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19145",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Turnaround-Lead-Planner-Scheduler-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-164944542.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=7,,Experienced (Non-Manager),cb9b7a95912d9bc475ceb1a85789d175
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:14:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Primarily responsible to Test, troubleshoot and assemble Electronic & Electro-mechanical components (manufactured in the Sources work cell) in accordance with schematics and procedures in a production environment. In additon, this technician will also be responsible for ?heavy assembly? of a select group of transformers in our Sources Product Line. Other responsibilities include, material data entry, and working closely with team members to meet challenging delivery and quality targets.? Sets up test equipment and performs electrical testing of Trigger Modules and various Transformers in a fast pace production environment per work instructions? E/M assembly of Transformers? Works from and interprets schematics, assembly prints, sketches, pick lists, and routers.? Works independently in a safe and productive manner.? Tests daily production builds using routing specified test equipment. ? Troubleshoots using electronic schematics to diagnose and interpret failure modes in order to disposition product.? Communicates with area assembly technicians, based on findings, and recommends rework steps necessary to bring non-conforming product into conformance. ? Performs other related duties of comparable complexity as needed.? Must have the ability to set up test equipment, and conducts electrical tests required for production testing per work instructions.? Must have knowledge to safely perform electrical testing of various Transformers and trigger modules. ? Must have the ability to clearly read and interpret all work instructions and be willing and able to suggest changes to improve current practices.? Effectively communicates with and engages all levels of the organization verbally and in writing. Works and relates well to others.Requirements: A) Experience: Requires a high school diploma, trade school certification and 3-5 years of progressively responsible experience, or other equivalent training and experience.B) Technical Competencies: 3-5 years of electrical testing and evaluation of electronic components. Transformer E/M experience, ?J? standard or IPC-610 solder certification and pertinent E/M experience.C) Other Competencies: Allocates time and resources efficiently, focusing on ever-shifting priorities; continually seeks way to improve individual/team efficiency. D) Physical Requirements: ? Be able to stand and walk for up to 8 hour and ability to occationally lift up to 15 lbs.? Must also be able to walk the test station area as well as have the ability to walk to and from the general White Board Area final inspection, assembly, and stock areas to transport parts and assemblies.? Ability to adhere to various gowning requirements which will include wearing, lab jacket, EH safety shoes, and safety glasses. Click here to apply!",Test Technician Job in Salem,Full Time,"Salem, MA 01970",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Test-Technician-Job-Salem-MA-US-165915795.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),424fdf1298e24a686f6f89e3dbcb295f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:15:01,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Maintains diesel equipment operation by completing inspections and preventive maintenance requirements; correcting vehicle deficiencies; making adjustments and alignments; keeping records.Duties:* Determines vehicle condition by conducting inspections and diagnostic tests; identifying worn and damaged parts.* Keeps equipment available for use by completing preventive maintenance schedules; installing component and part upgrades; controlling corrosion; completing winterization procedures.* Corrects vehicle deficiencies by removing, repairing, adjusting, overhauling, assembling, disassembling, and replacing major assemblies, sub-assemblies, components, parts, or systems, such as, power and drive trains, electrical, air conditioning, fuel, emission, brake, steering, hydraulics; completes machine shop operations; making adjustments and alignments including bearing loads, gear tooth contact, valve mechanisms, governors, oil systems, control linkages, clutches, and traction units.* Verifies vehicle performance by conducting test drives; adjusting controls and systems.* Complies with federal and state vehicle requirements by testing engine, safety, and combustion control standards.* Maintains vehicle appearance by cleaning, washing, and painting.* Maintains vehicle records by annotating services and repairs.* Keeps shop equipment operating by following operating instructions; troubleshooting breakdowns; maintaining supplies; performing preventive maintenance; calling for repairs.* Contains costs by using warranty; evaluating service and parts options.* Keeps supplies ready by inventorying stock; placing orders; verifying receipt.* Updates job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading technical and regulation publications.* Enhances maintenance department and organization reputation by accepting ownership for accomplishing new and different requests; exploring opportunities to add value to job accomplishments.Skills/Qualifications:Tooling, Supply Management, Mechanical Inspection Tools, Technical Understanding, Attention to Detail, Dependability, Thoroughness, Verbal Communication, Documentation Skills, Inventory Control, Job Knowledge",Diesel Technicians--Diesel mechanic Job in Fort Wayne,Full Time,"Fort Wayne, IN",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Technicians-Diesel-mechanic-Job-Fort-Wayne-IN-US-164365629.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,32f809b69fb9295ca54ea2cc2c49f6e8
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:48:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Large horizontal boring mill operator, must do own set-ups. Competitive wage based on experience.2 week paid vacation and 9 paid holidays. ************************************************************************************",Machinist Job in Leetonia,Full Time,"Leetonia, OH 44431",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Machinist-Job-Leetonia-OH-US-153594470.aspx?mescoid=5100939001001&jobPosition=5,13.00 - 20.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),3e5d4c9d9c32e4062f537253cfbbb2b0
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:49:13,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Assist Maintenance Manager by maintaining production and quality by ensuring operation of machinery and mechanical equipment.  Provide overall direction and job assignments to maintenance team on a daily basis.  Follow escalation process to ensure maintenance manager is kept informed of all risk to production or project timelines.  The successful candidate will be able to preform the duties of an industrial maintenance technician (listed below) to provide support to his team.  He will also use this knowledge to evaluate, mentor and hold his reports accountable for timely repairs and project timelines.  Duties:* Ensures operation of machinery and mechanical equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements on engines, motors, pneumatic tools, conveyor systems, and production machines; following diagrams, sketches, operations manuals, manufacturer's instructions, and engineering specifications; troubleshooting malfunctions. * Locates sources of problems by observing mechanical devices in operation; listening for problems; using precision measuring and testing instruments. * Removes defective parts by dismantling devices; using hoists, cranes, and hand and power tools; examining form and texture of parts. * Determines changes in dimensional requirements of parts by inspecting used parts; using rules, calipers, micrometers, and other measuring instruments. * Adjusts functional parts of devices and control instruments by using hand tools, levels, plumb bobs, and straightedges. * Controls downtime by informing production workers of routine preventive maintenance techniques; monitoring compliance. * Fabricates repair parts by using machine shop instrumentation and equipment. * Maintains equipment, parts, and supplies inventories by checking stock to determine inventory level; anticipating needed equipment, parts, and supplies; placing and expediting orders; verifying receipt. * Conserves maintenance resources by using equipment and supplies as needed to accomplish job results. * Provides mechanical maintenance information by answering questions and requests. * Prepares mechanical maintenance reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends. * Maintains technical knowledge by attending educational workshops; reviewing technical publications; establishing personal networks. * Maintains continuity among work teams by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs. * Maintains safe and clean working environment by complying with procedures, rules, and regulations. * Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Equipment Maintenance, Technical Understanding, Technical Zeal, Deals with Uncertainty, Basic Safety, Power Tools, Attention to Detail, Flexibility, Supervision, Job Knowledge, Productivity",Assistant Maintenance Manger Job in Mascot,Full Time,"Mascot, TN 37806",Management Consulting Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Maintenance-Manger-Job-Mascot-TN-US-165461101.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,,Experienced (Non-Manager),28edf8b0209ca6bf47db89a3dfd23810
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:58:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"INDUSTRIAL MAINTENANCE MECHANICPackaging plant in Independence, MO is currently seeking an experienced Maintenance Technician. Will perform all of the following duties: • Locates sources of problems by observing mechanical devices in operation; listening for problems; using precision measuring and testing instruments. • Dismantle machines or equipment, replaces defective parts and motors, and adjusts feed mechanisms.• Will ensure operation of machinery and mechanical equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements on motors, pneumatic tools, conveyor systems, and packaging machines; following diagrams, sketches, operations manuals, manufacturer's instructions, and engineering specifications; troubleshooting malfunctions. • Controls downtime by informing production workers of routine preventive maintenance techniques; monitoring compliance. • Connects wire to motors, fixtures, and other electrical equipment, replaces switches and fuses, and splices wire and insulates wire with friction tape. • Conserves maintenance resources by using equipment and supplies as needed to accomplish job results. • Installing equipment, electrical and mechanical. Includes running conduit, pulling wire, connecting wire • General troubleshooting including checking incoming 480v power and equipmentREQUIREMENTS• Minimum 3 years industrial electrical/mechanical maintenance experience• Willing and able to complete a background check and drug screen• Must be able to lift at least 50 lbs, climb ladders and operate hand tools and operate fork lift• Must have working knowledge of single-phase and 3-phase power and control systems up to 480vPay will depend on experience / $17 +. Please send resume for review. 3600 S. Noland Road, Suite JIndependence, MO 64055816-489-7850www.lsistaffing.com",Industrial Maintenance Mechanic Job in Independence,Full Time,"Independence, MO 64055",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Maintenance-Mechanic-Job-Independence-MO-US-165300633.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=7,,,c62478678687c704436dd6766dd2490c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:03:58:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Qualifications: High school diploma or GEDPossess a valid Texas Operator’s LicensePossess a  Texas Department of Agriculture (TDA) pest applicator license (3A or Structural WL)Ability to plan and evaluate turf, lawn, and ornamental treatmentsExperience in sports fields applications preferredKnowledgeable in IPM, thresholds, and identificationRequires irregular work hours Ability to maintain effective schedules for pest controlEffective communication skillsEfficient record and time management skillsPhysically able to lift 50 poundsAbility to comprehend written and verbal EnglishPrimary Purpose: Maintain athletic fields in safe, playable condition and participate in campus turf improvement.  Keep playgrounds pest-safeMajor Duties or Responsibilities:Application of, herbicides, pre-emergent, insecticides, and pest control chemicals.Maintain procedures that will ensure quality turf and ornamental growth.Evaluate special pest control problems and take effective action.Assist in developing effective outdoor custodial pest control treatment in accordance with the Integrated Pest Management Program.Maintain records required by the Integrated Pest Management Coordinator.Maintain inventory control of all chemicals used.Communicate with school personnel and other district employees as needed for scheduling safe applications.Equipment Used:Power, push and hand-held sprayer application equipment, backpack sprayer, spreader, commercial boom sprayer, hand and power tools. Light truck or van.Working Conditions:Frequent walking, twisting, reaching, bending, climbing, kneeling, moderate lifting and carrying, crawling in tight spaces. Work outside and inside. Exposure to dampness and humidity, toxic chemicals, and noxious odors. Occasional prolonged or irregular hours.The foregoing statements describe the general purpose and responsibilities assigned to this job and are not an exhaustive list of all responsibilities and duties that may be assigned or skills that may be required. ",Grounds TDA A Applicator Job in Katy,Full Time,"Katy, TX 77492",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Grounds-TDA-3A-Applicator-Job-Katy-TX-US-163990453.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=8,18.33 - 27.51 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f6964058536580adf98978f752127af
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:02:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"Requisition Number 36369BR Title Manufacturing VAVE Engineer Business US - SSS - SMS State / Country / Province Indiana City Indianapolis No. of Positions 1 Job Description Specific Responsibilities:1. Lead and support continuous improvement activities to increase manufacturing and assembly efficiency, reduce standard costs and create new opportunities for revenue generation. 2. Create and develop design concepts from product requirements and design specifications.3. Develop 3D computer models of components and assemblies using ProEngineer CAD software.4. Coordinate procurement and building of engineering models and prototypes.5. Coordinate and oversee verification and validation testing of models, prototypes, and final product.6. Utilize knowledge of manufacturing processes, Design for Manufacture and Assembly (DFMA) techniques, and tolerance stack-up analysis to finalize product designs.7. Oversee the creation of detailed component and assembly drawings that conform to geometric dimensioning and tolerance standards.8. Develop product structure and detailed bills of material.9. Perform other duties as assigned by the manager to support departmental goals.10. Modify designs to reduce material and manufacturing costs of existing products.Knowledge/Skills/Abilities:• Strong understanding in Design for Assembly and Design for Manufacturability.• Strong problem solving capabilities.• Skills or experience with personal computers and applications which include electronic E-mail, personal scheduling, word processing, electronic spreadsheets, and project management required• Working knowledge of SAP or ERP systems preferred.• Ability to use Pro/ENGINEER CAD software to create 3D models and detailed drawing preferred• Knowledge of typical manufacturing processes such as die casting, injection molding, powdered metal, forging, stamping, and machining is required• Understanding of basic electrical circuit theory preferred• Understanding of the design of basic mechanical elements such as springs, fasteners, gaskets, gears, and bearing required• Knowledge of geometric dimensioning and tolerancing required• Knowledge of tolerance stack-up analysis required• Strong Lean manufacturing knowledge and ability to apply Lean principles.• Strong time and project organization skills• Excellent communication skillsEducation/Experience:• Four year technical degree in mechanical engineering preferred• Five years mechanical design experience required• Two years experience with Pro/ENGINEER software preferred EEO Statement All qualified applicants that apply for Stanley Black & Decker will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.",Manufacturing VAVE Engineer Job in Indianapolis,Full Time Employee,"Indianapolis, IN",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-VAVE-Engineer-Job-Indianapolis-IN-US-165432547.aspx?mescoid=1700194001001&jobPosition=15,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,015c542ca7884b2aacfad4fea70ab764
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:09:23,No,jobs.monster.com,".CNC GrindersFreeport,PADirect Hire Adecco direct-hire group, a national leader in permanent placement solutions, has openings for OD/ID, Jig and Surface Grinders. Our client is a global leader in CNC manufacturing that designs and manufactures parts for industries including: Aerospace, Automotive, Medical and Oil & Gas. Business is booming and so can your career! Job responsibilities for CNC Grinders include:Set-up and operation of various grinding equipment such as Jig Grinders, OD/ID and Surface grindersSet-up and fixturing of materialsInspecting parts prior to grinding to check for chips and/or cracksVerification that dimensions of the work piece match those of the blueprintsWorking with tolerances of +/- .0005 Successful candidates for the CNC Grinder positions will have the following:Minimum of 2 years experience in a position of similar natureKnowledge of manual and CNC grinding equipmentAbility to work 50 hour work weekHS diploma or GED required 1st and 2nd shifts available with at 20% shift differential for the 2nd shift. Pay is based on experience. Employment package includes Medical, Dental and Vision benefits; 401K w/ match; 2 weeks vacation and quarterly bonuses. To apply for this position, please send a resume to Brett Windham at brett.windham@adeccona.com Applicants may also apply by clicking “Apply Now” or by visiting our website at www.adeccousa.com Question about this position will be answered by calling 724-219-4113. Adecco, Better Work, Better Life!Equal Opportunity Employer: Women/Veterans/Disabled/Minorities Apply Online",CNC Grinder Job in Freeport,Employee,"Freeport, PA 16229",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Grinder-Job-Freeport-PA-US-165910561.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),1f30386cd5bdab5fbd8073be5888c829
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:09:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:Are you a great sales person? Do you enjoy building relationships with your clients? Do you like being a part of a stable company with excellent benefits?Our client was established in 1954 and is still going strong! They are looking for a Sales Representative with five years experience in business to business sales and a Bachelor's degree. The individual in this position will be servicing a customer base within an assigned territoryas well as recruiting new customers. The areas of responsibility will be Georgia, Alabama and Tennessee. In this role you can work from home or report to the local plant. Some travel over night may be required. Car allowance and phone allowance will be given to the employee in this role. If you are interested in this position, apply today at www.appleone.com We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.appleone.com/?sc=11&id=1027798 Job Experience:,, Bachelor's degree. Light travel.",Sales Representative - $,Full Time,"Brunswick, GA 31520",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Representative-100-000-yr-Job-Brunswick-GA-US-165992683.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=13,Up to $100000.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),952c813e4b2c9c5b029e02db8c93c7ba
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:17:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are seeking an experience Toolmaker/Tool and Die maker to join our company.We have been in operation for over 100 years and service many customers.We produce Metal Stampings, Stamping dies, Assemblies, Welded Assemblies and Production Machined Parts.**We pay will pay a highly competitive salary for this position.Job Purpose:To build and repair tools, jigs, fixtures, and  gauges. Build prototypes.Duties:* Develop tools, jigs, fixtures, and gauges by reading prints, specifications, and descriptions; applying knowledge of materials, machining, and assembly methods and mathematics.* Operate lathe, mill, CNC Mill, EDM, grinder, and related equipment.* Confirm  and Assemble tools, jigs, fixtures, and gauges  by comparing measurements to specifications using micrometers, thickness gauges, gauge blocks, and other measurement tools.* Trouble shooting tooling issue.* Contribute to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.**We offer excellent health insurance, 401k w matching, vision and dental insurance. Skills/Qualifications:Equipment Maintenance, Manufacturing Experience, Mechanical Inspection Tools, Tooling, Safety Management, Problem Solving, Documentation Skills, Power Tools, Judgment, Decision Making",Tool and Die Maker Job in Faxon,Full Time,"Faxon, PA 17701",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Tool-Die-Maker-Job-Faxon-PA-US-165896050.aspx?mescoid=5100947001001&jobPosition=3,Yearly Bonuses,Experienced (Non-Manager),7c870f9285da7fd2a7a6dc37d7bb02f1
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:17:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"As a DRS Field Technician you will be trained in the installation and servicing of the DISH Satellite TV System. As a Technician you will be routed from home daily. The routes will consist of a variety of jobs (new installs, trouble calls, upgraders and movers) where commissions will be earned by selling the latest in home entertainment solutions.REQUIREMENTS;·        Must successfully pass a criminal background check and drug test·        We also require a valid Florida Driver’s License. (no more than 2 moving violations in 3 years)EXPECTATIONS;·        The tech position can be physically challenging as you will be climbing and working from ladders, in some case in excess of 30 feet. ·        You will be entering attics and will be exposed to variety of weather elements including; heat, cold, wind, and rain.·        You must be able to safely lift and carry up to 75lbs.·        The job requires you can safely use small hand tools.·        Required to trench/dig, sometimes up 100 feet in order to lay cable.·        You will interact with consumers daily and should be comfortable and able to effectively communicate/train customers on the DISH system·        Technicians must be comfortable offering our customers additional services and products while earning incentives.·        You must be able to safely operate a cargo van·        We operate seven days a week and techs are required to work weekends and holidays.·        Overtime is a daily event as your ending time will vary from day-to-day depending on your assigned jobs and business needs.We currently offer the following benefits:·        We provide a fully stocked late model logoed van, handheld Android tablet device, cell phone, and applicable tools necessary to perform quality work·        Company uniforms and proper safety boots are required·        Medical/Dental/Vision Care Insurance; Flexible spending accounts·        Company provided life insurance and long term disability insurance·        Employee assistance and education assistance programs·        Employee purchase program·        Voluntary coverage options include short term disability, optional life insurance and supplemental benefit plans such as accident, critical care and hospitalization·        401(k) Plan with discretionary annual company match – Eligible to participate from date of hire·        Paid Time Off – Eligible from date of hire (PTO will vary based on hire date)·        Career advancement Please apply at http://www.drsinstall.com/",Field Service Technician Job in Orlando,Full Time,"Orlando, FL",,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-Job-Orlando-FL-US-164934340.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),6015c76f0fd2e01a6f167bacbe39bba6
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:34:46,No,jobs.monster.com,"HELLO!!! We are currently recruiting for Green Mt. Coffee! They are looking for TWO facilities Tech/Cleaners! Both positions are Day ShiftTEMP-TO-HIRE position!What you will do:Clean, dust, vacuum and/or mop floors of offices, breakrooms, hallways, conference rooms, common areas and rest rooms; including cleaning sinks, toilets and showers on a daily basisCollect trash from the break rooms, offices, hallways, conference rooms, rest rooms and common areas, including cigarette disposal units at entrancesCollect recyclable materials, including SMOW, cardboard, boxboard and returnable containers on a daily basisSweep, mop and polish floors in break rooms and foyer areasRoutine maintenance of restrooms, including cleaning sinks, showers and floorsStock all restrooms with paper goods on a daily basisPerform scheduled extra maintenance of hard floors and carpetsClean offices, halls, and conference roomsParticipate in spruce up cleaning of all facilities on campus including washing windowsDrive a company vehicle as neededAssist Facilities staff upon requestFill in for co-workers as neededPerforms other duties as requested by management.Follow all Keurig Green Mountain policies and proceduresWhat you must have:Self-motivated individual with strong attention to detailStrong commitment to qualityAbility to effectively work independently with minimal supervisionAbility to work in a team environmentAbility to work a flexible schedule as neededAbility to follow directionsAbility to follow GMCR policies and proceduresAbility to get along with others and work within team to reach a common goalPositive attitude with ability to work a fast paced environmentMust obtain lockout certification and be able to wear OSHA approved safety gearAbility to obtain forklift/scissor lift certificationMust consent to a background checkMust have a valid driver’s license and a clean driving recordAbility to get along with others, be punctual, and follow instructionsPHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS/WORKING CONDITIONS:*Ability to lift 50 pounds on a regular basisAbility to stand for an entire shiftRepetitive motion is involved; ability to kneel, squat, bend, stoop, reach and work overhead on a regular basisAbility to work with cleaning solutions and de-greasersAbility to work at heights above 20 feet including on ladders and liftIF YOU ARE INTERESTED PLEASE CONTACT ELIZABETH: 253-293-8163Job Type: Full-timeSalary: $11.00 /hourRequired experience:Janitorial: 1 yearRequired education:High school or equivalent",Facilities Technician Job in Sumner,Full Time,"Sumner, WA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Facilities-Technician-Job-Sumner-WA-US-166040284.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=16,$11.00+ /hour,Entry Level,c2445669286a6b819c0094e0ad07fd07
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:56:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chuck E. Cheese’s is currently seekingveteransto join our team asElectronicGameroom Technicians.Veterans bring unique abilities, experience, skills and values to the civilian workplace and are a perfect fit for the fun, wholesome Chuck E. Cheese’s environment. By joining the family dining and entertainment leader, veterans can help create a fun, safe place for kids, their families and friends. Your leadership skills and service attitude can make a difference to families and our communities.Job Responsibilities:Manage the electrical and mechanical aspects of the gameroomWork on the latest video games and skill games, kiddie rides, sky tubes, robotic shows, kitchen equipment, register systems and coin and ticket mechanismsRepair and/or replace defective electronic components and take responsibility for timely scheduled and unscheduled inspectionsOperate stage show equipment and manage repairs and preventative maintenance, including compressor operation, lighting and sound, pneumatics, mac valves, cylinders, boards and stage show cosmeticsMaintain an inventory of electronic equipment, mechanical parts and tools while staying within monthly budgetsPerform daily preventative maintenance and repairsCreate and maintain a fun, customer-focused environment where every guests leaves happy.Maintain a safety-focused attitude at all timesMake daily decisions to uphold company principles, product quality and cleanliness standardsSkills:Ability to read schematics and troubleshoot down to the component board levelPlanning, organization and multi-tasking skillsAttention to detailTime management skills and a sense of urgencyMilitary experience, a technical degree, or previous electrical or mechanical training preferredReasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.The CompanyFor more than 35 years, CEC Entertainment has served as the nationally recognized leader in family dining and entertainment and the place Where A Kid Can Be A Kid®. As the award-winning, number-one, kid-friendly restaurant for millions of families across the world, the company and its franchisees operate a system of more than 575 Chuck E. Cheese's stores located in 47 states and 10 foreign countries or territories. CEC welcomed Peter Piper Pizza to its portfolio in October 2014. More than 15,000 employees are dedicated to ensuring Every Guest leaves Happy!BenefitsCEC Entertainment offers a wide variety of benefits including medical, dental, vision, life, disability and 401(k) to eligible U.S. employees as part of their overall employment package. We also offer job training and career growth opportunities.* * *At CEC Entertainment, we believe that our workforce should reflect the diverse backgrounds, experiences and perspectives of the many guests we serve. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we do not discriminate against applicants due to race, ethnicity, gender, veteran status, or on the basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class. Employment is contingent upon a successful background check and drug screen. Applicants must be eligible to work in the United States.",Electronic Gameroom Technician Job in Everett,"Full Time , Employee","Everett, MA 02149",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Electronic-Gameroom-Technician-Job-Everett-MA-US-165622872.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=14,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,f44c295aaa5816db6a346606cc036870
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:04:57:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Company Overview:      XPO provides cutting-edge supply chain solutions to the world's most successful companies, including Boeing, Home Depot, Ikea, L'Oréal and many others. We're growing worldwide. And we're constantly looking for talented individuals at all levels who can deliver the caliber of service our customers require. If you're ready to give us your best, let's talk. We'd like to invest in you.  (NYSE: XPO)     Job Summary:   The position reports the Manager of Fleet Maintenance and is responsible for the management of maintenance on company owned equipment associated with the local and surrounding Service Centers as dictated by Operational routing.  Responsibilities will include but are not limited to supervision of shop personnel, managing both scheduled and unscheduled repairs to maintain workflow and shop throughput, parts inventory control (ordering, returns, non-movement) uptime and outside vendor repair cost control.  This position will also provide safe, reliable and roadworthy equipment to our drivers (i.e. DSR’s), allowing them to provide superior and safe service to our customers. This is expected to be accomplished at the lowest cost of ownership to XPO Logistics.   Description of Essential Job Functions: 1.        Manage maintenance employees and contingent workers. o    Responsible for hiring, mentoring, work assignments, employee training and development, promotions, discipline and termination recommendations, and employee compliance with company policies and procedures. o    Facilitate Job Selection/Shift Bid (JSP) process for shop employees. o    Utilize timekeeping, recruiting, and other employee data systems effectively. o    Develop and maintain a culture where employees want to work for the premier maintenance department in the Less than Truckload (LTL) industry. 2.       Maintain effective and positive relations with key internal and external players. o    Cross-functional relationships with Operations, Safety and HR. o    Manage vendors for quality, timeliness of repairs, communication, invoicing issues, etc. o    Support Manager of Fleet Maint (MFM) in over-seeing equipment maintenance and out-of-service at outlying Service Centers supported by the shop. 3.       Oversee routine maintenance functions to ensure equipment proficiency, highest productivity levels to support quality service delivery by XPO Logistics.  o    Adjustments, parts ordering, inventory control and levels as well as return of cores and overstock on all types of class 7 and 8 diesel equipment, forklift and trailing equipment in compliance with the manufacturers' and company schedules. o    Ensure all Work Orders (WO) including Commercial WO’s are closed timely and accurately o    Responsible for shop Cycle Counts and inventory including movement and non-movement of inventory within assigned thresholds.  o    Oversee part and supply receipts from vendors.  o    Monitor the sale and disposition of retired and scrapped equipment   4.       Utilize and monitor metrics to manage efficient shop operations:  o    Monitor and analyze trends in parts utilization; gains, shortages, usage, up-time, and non-movement in a way that ensures highest efficiency and productivity of shop. o    Adhere to internal audit requirements through self audit checks and internal audits. o    Monitor shop for, safety, service, quality, efficiency, and financial controls and maintenance compliance. o    Determine, adjust, and maintain proper staffing levels.  5.       Promote a safety culture and the XPO Logistics value of safety o    Ensuring shop cleanliness, safety and compliance with company safety policy.  o    Perform safety inspections of equipment and prepare safety documentation. 6.       Compliance:  Ensure DOT (Dept of Transportation) policies, XPO Logistics policies, and other required Standard Work Instructions are followed by all shop employees. 7.       Perform other duties as assigned. Top Five Desired Competencies:  ·         Strategic Agility ·         Approachability ·         Business Acumen ·         Conflict Management ·         Develop Relationships Qualifications: High School diploma or equivalent required.  Associates of arts/science degree preferred. At least three years fleet maintenance experience required. Demonstrated ability to lead and motivate others. Strong written and verbal communication skills, with ability to organize and effectively present information. Excellent time management skills Ability to work flexible (off) shifts as required Strong work ethic/stable work history Industry experience within the LTL Industry is a plus Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word, and Outlook) Valid driver's license Current CDL is desired Current ASE certifications desired, not required Work Conditions: ·         Safely walk, reach (including above your head), bend, climb, push, pull, twist, squat & kneel as necessary to perform the job duties. ·          Safely walk & stand for extended periods of time in various locations that may be outside. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer M/F/D/V Additional Information:Travel Percentage: 5%",Shop Manager Job in Alliance,"Full Time, Employee","Alliance, OH 44601",,http://jobview.monster.com/Shop-Manager-Job-Alliance-OH-US-165717453.aspx?mescoid=5100910001001&jobPosition=9,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,d6e8189cb71ab4250e718d96323d791e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:03:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Diesel Mechanic (Kansas City, Missouri)We are looking for experienced Diesel Mechanics.  You must have experience in the repair of Heavy Equipment, Diesel Trucks, and Construction Equipment involving Diesel Mechanic, DOT inspections, power train and air brakes, AC repair, etc. A valid driver license, good driving record and the ability to obtain a Class E driver license is required. Must be detailed oriented, work well with other team members and have good communication skills. The Diesel Mechanic performs repairs on Diesel Trucks, Heavy Equipment, and Construction Equipment as outlined by the Fleet Manager.Responsibilities/Skills/Qualification:·        Performs routine and in-depth maintenance on company fleet and construction equipment in an effort to minimize breakdowns and extend equipment life. ·        Perform all maintenance services according to appropriated codes, safety regulations, company policies, DOT requirements, etc. Duties include working with electrical, piping, welding, machine repair, hydraulic and pneumatic equipment, fabricate and install new equipment.·        The work environment includes working in confined spaces, heights, lifting heavy loads, climbing ladders, and being on your feet for extended periods of time. ·        Heavy equipment usage includes forklifts, cranes, loaders, man lifts, skid loaders and backhoes. ·        The ability to obtain a Class E license is mandatory.·        Ensuring safety in all that we do.·        Maintain a good attendance and punctuality record. ·        Be available to work overtime on a short notice as needed. Overtime and weekends are required at times. Job also includes working around hazardous materials (hot oil, caustics, etc.).·        DOT inspections - power train and air brakes, ·        AC repair, troubleshooting equipment, etc. involving electrical, mechanical, and hydraulic. ·        The ability to read and write fluently and perform moderately difficult mathematical calculations is mandatory. ·        A good driving record and Class E driver's license is required.·        Maintain individual maintenance labor log sheets and time cards. ·        Maintain the buildings, equipment, etc. in a well-kept condition. ·        Assure all maintenance tools and equipment is well cared for. ·        Maintain spare parts inventories as necessary for adequate maintenance response times. ·        Maintain work areas in a clean and safe manner.·        High School diploma or equivalent.Compensation & Benefits Full time status - paying commensurate with experience.O.T. paid after 8 hours worked with Shift differentialPaid Health InsuranceOptional Dental, Vision, Life Insurance and Short Term Disability.401K, Pension and Profit sharing.Paid Vacation & Holidays.Interest-Free Employee LoansMechanic Tool Purchase Program Accepting applications M-F 8a-5:00p at Vance Brothers, 5201 Brighton, K.C., MO. 64130 (just north of the KC Zoo)*Reply with resume attached or cut and paste resume.  *Visit website http://www.vancebrothers.com/ *bottom of page click on ""about Vance"" then click on Career Opportunities and download application.  *Email application or resumes to vbjobs@vancebrothers.com. E.E.O. POLICYIt is the policy of this company to assure that applicants are employed, and those employees are treated, during employment, without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, marital status, sexual orientation, medical condition, disability, age, gender, veteran status or occupational qualification. Such action shall include, but is not limited to, application procedures, employment, upgrading, promotion, demotion, transfer, rehire, job assignment and classification, recruitment, recruitment advertising, layoff, termination, compensation, leave, fringe benefits, social activities, training and working conditions.",Diesel Mechanic Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, MO 64130",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Mechanic-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-164749026.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=8,,,f2d8bd9c34cfb3e5e8a7effa945b3f5e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:46:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"IFA Rotorion NA, LLC is the North American headquarters for one of the world's leading suppliers of drive shafts for the automotive industry.  Located in Ladson, South Carolina and Novi, Michigan, IFA Rotorion brand is well-known and respected around the world.  Our unique combination of German and American culture provides our associates with a excellent working environment and comprehensive total compensation package.   Due to the continued growth of our business we are seeking an experienced, energetic and motivated individual to join our Ladson, SC team as a: Maintenance PlannerJob SummaryIn this position you will assist the maintenance supervisor in planning & scheduling all maintenance activities for the facility, including maintaining Computerized Maintenance Management Software (MP2), working with engineering, production, & other maintenance personnel in organizing & maintaining indirect material, spare parts and tooling.Essential Elements:Resolve maintenance problems by establishing rapport with operations personnel to develop an understanding of maintenance requirements. Support product development and improvement by reviewing new production plans, discussing equipment needs, and modifications with appropriate personnel.Design, implement and modify preventative/predictive maintenance programs by reviewing data from production, quality and maintenance & other statistical dataInspect operating machines, equipment & systems for conformance with operational standards.Perform equipment failure analysis.Interface with internal customers to support and/or suggest changes in processes and/or use of equipment to increase efficiency & quality of facility, equipment processes, or worker performance standards.Insure necessary spare parts and production tooling are procured & stocked to support maintenance and production needs.Maintain Computerized Maintenance Management Software (MP2).Establish new PMs according to IFA standards, define & verify acceptance criteria of new machines and maintain all machine documentation.Education:Bachelor's Degree in a related field and/or at least ten (10) years of equivalent experience.Required Experience:Familiarity with computer applications and/or controlled systems.Demonstrated understanding of Lean Manufacturing principles.Demonstrated understanding of plant operations and equipment.Knowledge of job-related product information.Knowledge of total productive maintenance principles (TPM)Ability to interpret blueprints and engineering drawings.Must be familiar with OSHA, NIOSH, federal, state and local regulatory requirements.Demonstrated knowledge of Microsoft Office computer software applications.Must be familiar with TS 16949 and/or ISO 9000 requirements.Demonstrated understanding of Statistical Process Control required.Must be proficient with PLC and PC based control systems.Working knowledge of hydraulics, pneumatics, and mechanical power transmission systems.Proficiency with Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS) required.Specific SkillsExcellent oral and written communication skills.Strong analytical and problem solving ability.Excellent interpersonal skills to train, motivate and lead employeesAbility to work any shift and/or flexible hours required.Must possess a high level of energy and enthusiasm.Strong desire to work in a team-oriented environment.SAP R/3 enterprise system preferred/Benefits: We offer a highly competitive total compensation package that includes paid holidays, vacation, medical, dental, vision, life, LTD, STD and a company matching 401(k).  How to Apply: To be considered for our Maintenance Planner position upload your resume and cover letter using the link below before the application deadline of April 15, 2016. https://home2.eease.adp.com/recruit/?id=19100762Equal Opportunity Employer/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity",Maintenance Planner Job in Charleston,Full Time,"Charleston, SC 29456",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Planner-Job-Charleston-SC-US-165265467.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=19,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c6237a7964a8038a4057d057ec10c17e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:46:47,No,jobs.monster.com,"Leading global skincare retailer seeking a dynamic Helpdesk Support Analyst (POS & retail pro experience) to assist with the support of critical ICT operational functions required within regional offices in the US, Canada and Brazilian markets.  This full time position will report to the GM & President and will be based in New York. The main responsibilities of this role involve keeping software up to date and to ensuring that software standards are maintained.  The role will also be responsible for being proactive in the development of existing systems and new retail developments at both Head Office and Retail stores, as well as materially contributing to administrative efficiencies and the implementation of new processes as required.USER SUPPORT:Deliver friendly, courteous, patient, timely and outstanding service to all staff.Maintain status records of support tasks undertaken via the centralised helpdesk system.Assist the global Head of ICT and other ICT team members to: Provide ICT support for all staff at the regional US office and retail locations across the United States, Canada and Brazil.Troubleshoot user issues & problemsCoordinate additional support from established external vendors where resources are inadequate or where onsite support is needed and remote support cannot be facilitated effectively.Procure and install systems and equipment for new office staff and at new retail locations.Ensure the security and integrity of regional office and retail ICT systems and data.Maintain building access and security processes for staffAdhere to global ICT standards, procedures and governanceMonitor and enforce global ICT security and access policies within the organization.Facilitate strong communication between the regional US office and retail locations establishing relationships with key staff.Working on-site at Retail store locations as required.Log in remotely to distributed locations to perform support duties.STAFF TRAINING:Develop and deliver training for ICT systems to develop ICT skills within the US Office.Liaise with retail management to coordinate and perform retail staff training as necessary.Participate in relevant retail meetings to understand staff requirements, concerns and issues as well as to report to retail staff on relevant ICT developments.Proactively understand and implement on-going training requirements of head office and retail staff.TECHNICAL SKILLS: Retail Pro / MS Windows 7 through 10 / OSX – Small Number / MS Office 365 (Microsoft Office Suite, Exchange, Skype for Business, SharePoint) / Windows 2008 Server and Active Directory Domain Administration / ERP – Netsuite / Webroot Endpoint Security / Webroot Web Proxy / Mail Marshall – Email Filter / LAN/WAN Troubleshooting (Network Services, Switches, Routers) / Apple and General PC Laptop and Desktop Hardware / Polycom Teleconference / General Windows Printers and Printing / VPN – Fortinet / General PC, Laptop Troubleshooting experience / Adobe Creative Suite / Traffic Counter Systems / In-House / Reporting DashboardComputer Hardware and Software and Communications Equipment Procurement, Installation, MaintenanceAssist management to: Procure ICT hardware, software, other equipment as guided by regional management or the global ICT function.Perform installation of hardware and software for new and existing computers and other ICT equipmentResearch, test and evaluate industry trends and new software.Perform upgrades and necessary configuration changes as directed.Ensure new starters have the correct hardware and software upon commencementLiaise with established ICT vendors as necessary during day-to-day tasks.Monitor performance of existing systems and equipment and recommend improvementsMonitor and perform necessary backup and disaster recovery procedures to ensure business continuityReporting & Documentation:Maintain a detailed support log through the established ICT helpdesk system, provide monthly reporting for review by global Head of ICT.Assist in the preparation and development of reports for key business functions particularly retail reports and time reporting.Ensure ICT documentation and procedures are maintained and kept relevant and up to dateMaintain and contribute to the ICT knowledge base.REQUIRED SKILLS & EXPERIENCE:Bachelor’s degree or the equivalent experience in IT, Computer Science, Engineering, or similarHands on past experience in retailSTRONG attention to detailShows initiative and proactively presents and escalates ideas, suggestions and problems to ensure outstanding resultsStrong communication and language skills (written and verbal)COMPANY VALUESRespect: We take every opportunity to work together in an environment of mutual trust, candor and honesty. We believe that the best and most creative ideas are arrived at and accomplished collectively, with personal and cultural differences celebrated and fostered.Creativity: We embrace all creative possibilities and challenges, particularly those that arise in times of change and evolution. We have a strong desire to learn more, aim higher and examine more keenly, with a love of the unusual and interesting. We explore ideas and have a thirst for deeper understanding through constructive debate.Excellence: We go beyond what is expected, seeking to have a broader and longer lasting impact and producing outcomes of impeccable quality. We are unremitting in the pursuit of excellence; attention to detail and quality permeate every aspect of our working day.Passion: We apply energy and enthusiasm to all our activities and express passion in our working life. We have the strength to bounce back from setbacks and continue in our enthusiastic pursuit of creative endeavors.Integrity: We hold fast to an unwavering moral compass predicated on honesty, effort and quality. Integrity, principles and ethics matter to us, and resonate within every decision we make.Submit updated resume to patricks@dtg-usa.comPatrick Shtekel   212.629.4440Qualified candidates will receive immediate call/email upon review",Helpdesk Support Analyst (POS & Retail) Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10001",Retail,http://jobview.monster.com/Helpdesk-Support-Analyst-POS-Retail-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165263423.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=9,"65,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),c90438fbf4c3e6f68bdf08d5885fd9af
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:47:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"AUTO BODY PERSON NEEDED ( START TODAY ) (SOMA / south beach) © craigslist - Map data © OpenStreetMap(google map)compensation: To be discussed during interviewemployment type: full-timeWe believe that happy employees are what drives a successful business and a happy customer base!Our goal is to provide a positive work environment and the tools needed to accomplish any challenges that come our way!If you are a successful Auto Body Technician that shares our vision, and wants to become part of our family we may have a spot for you?We believe you can take us to the next level and we can do the same for you. We've built a business that challenges the norm, rewards excellence, and provides a comfortable life for all of us. We're always innovating, making improvements, and setting the bar higher for ourselves and the automotive service industry.· 5day work week with Saturday's available· Paid vacation and holidays· Paid trainingWell established independent auto collision repair shop located in San Francisco, need of an experienced Automotive Body Technician - Frame Straightening & repair - Body panels replacement etc.Applicant must have ""excellent"" diagnostics ability in analyzing damage after vehicle has been in an accident. Hours available are 8.00 AM to 5 PM Monday -- Friday. Saturday upon request.Must be responsible, reliable and have good work ethic with leadership ability. Good communication skills are a must to report to service writer results of diagnosis or damage analysis.Minimum 5 years' experience and own tools required. ASE -- I-CAR Certification helpful. Pay to be discussed during interview",Automotive Body Technician Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Multiple locations,Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Body-Technician-Job-US-165039393.aspx?mescoid=4900866001001&jobPosition=7,25.00 - 35.00 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),aa0225399b855eb6fffe3a5bed2bf321
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:48:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"Sears Home Improvement Products and Services, a member of the Sears Holdings Corporation (NASDAQ: SHLD) family of companies, is one of America's largest home improvement companies for siding and windows installation with operations in 45 states. Our products include siding, custom manufactured and installed windows, custom home entry doors, kitchen remodeling, custom cabinet refacing and Heating Ventilation and Air Conditioning (HVAC).Sales Reps Wanted. Pre-Qualified Leads. No Cap on Commission. Sharon Hill- PA - 800 Calcon Hook Rd Bay 6, Sharon Hill, PA 19079 Complete the application here: https://sjobs.brassring.com/TGWEbHost/jobdetails.aspx?partnerid=455&siteid=185&areq=684241br Are you ready to join a winning sales team with pre-qualified leads, no cold calling, flexible schedule, and no cap on sales commission earnings?• All leads are provided, pre-qualified and confirmed• Relax, our appointment center will schedule all appointments for you & make any adjustments you need based on traffic or weather condition – it’s like having your own personal assistant!• No cap on commission earnings – sky is the limit!• Fully paid training program• Fuel reimbursement program• Company provided laptop for in-home presentations• Medical /Dental/ Vision coverageMore than half (57%) of homeowners in the US have a home improvement project on their to-do list this year.  Based on a recent survey by the Joint Center for Housing Studies at Harvard University, sales are expected to approach $300 billion this year – the highest level since 2007. Who better to partner with than the most reputable name in its 122 year history? Sears is the nation's largest home services provider with a leadership position in appliance repair, home improvements, product installation and heating and cooling maintenance, repair and installation.Based on the recent increase in demand, Sears is in need of Residential Sales Representatives in your area today. No experience? No problem – Sears will train anyone with the right passion and drive! There is absolutely NO CAP ON EARNINGS.  We provide all the tools you need to be successful, including paid training so you can focus on closing our top of the line products!For immediate consideration take the following step to see why Sears is the national leader with over 196K employees:Apply online at https://sjobs.brassring.com/TGWEbHost/jobdetails.aspx?partnerid=455&siteid=185&areq=684241br Questions? Call 1-877-827-9315Have more questions, read our FAQ’s for some of the most commonly asked questions:What are the requirements of the role?· A minimum of a High School Diploma or Equivalent· Must have valid driver’s license and carry required level of automobile insurance· Excellent communication skills (Written and verbal)· Able to lift and carry up to 40lbs· Computer proficiencyWhat is the day in life of a Sears Sales Representative?Please click on the link below to view a short video which describes ""A day in the life of a Sales Project Consultant."" http://www.sellatsears.comWill I have to do any cold calling or door knocking?No, you are not required to do any cold calling or door knocking. Your appointments are set up for you by the Sears Appointment Center. Not only do they set your appointments, they’ll make any adjustments you need based off of traffic or weather conditions. So it’s like having your own personal assistant.Will you provide training?Yes, we provided a 3-week PAID training program. We have training classes scheduled monthly, so you can be assigned to the next one quickly. QualificationsREQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS:· A minimum of a High School Diploma or Equivalent· Must have valid driver’s license and carry required level of automobile insurance· Excellent communication skills (Written and verbal)· Able to lift and carry up to 40lbs· Computer proficiencyPREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:• Prior sales experience• Ability to negotiate contractsSears is an Equal Opportunity /Affirmative Action Employer – Minorities/Veterans/Females/Disabled EOE Minorities / Females / Protected Veterans / Disabled",Sales Reps Wanted for Sears. Invitation only interview Philadelphia Job in Philadelphia,Full Time,"Philadelphia, PA 19019",Insurance,http://jobview.monster.com/Sales-Reps-Wanted-for-Sears-Invitation-only-interview-Philadelphia-Job-Philadelphia-PA-US-165001131.aspx?mescoid=4100683001001&jobPosition=4,Commensurate with Experience,Entry Level,10ca48cd69f62d641c0ee720509abbad
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:56:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"  MACHINE BUILDER MECHANIC/Machine Technician           STEADY DAYS -NO NIGHTSMechanical ability.Able to read mechanical drawings and/or have an understanding of them.Able to work on multiple types of equipment.Electrical ability, understanding of schematics diagrams, drawings.Welding experience certification, a plus.Experience in rotating equipment a plus.PLC knowledge and repair ability.     SUMMARY of the Candidate We Seek:The Candidate We Seek. Ideally will be coming out of a machine building/or maintenance, repair type environment in a manufacturing oriented facility.You have good welding skills, you have better than average electrical ability and very strong machinery mechanical skills. You will be needed to break down different types of rotating machinery, equipment able to read drawings and schematics having the ability to troubleshoot and diagnose problems.We also need someone who can put machinery back together after the correct components have been replaced and on occasion test the machinery and debug any problems that might arise                                       The type of environment: If you have at least prior 5 to 7 years’ experience recently working as a machine builder or diversified manufacturing type of maintenance mechanic with electromechanical capabilities and are looking for an excellent career path with a growing machine manufacturing company who sells, distributes, and services various types of mixing, rotating and agitating types of equipment throughout the United States and Canada and Europe.We are looking for a career minded person with the above background and experience who has the opportunity to work hands-on repairing and troubleshooting and rebuilding equipment in-house with a steady, stable company offering excellent opportunity for advancement and the possibility of some advancement capabilities into other company areas in the future. If you demonstrate the type of skills, personality and work ethic. We are looking for.The ideal candidates live within a 15 to 20-mile radius of the Butler New Jersey area. Please respond to our monster site ASAP if you feel you are qualified for this position. If you do not have email capability, please fax your resume in to the below fax number or if you wish to leave a message on a 24/7 direct hotline a response will be returned to you within 24 hours. Thank you very much Fax Number (201) 336-9174                                                            24/7 Hotline (201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426(201) 896-0426CallSend SMSCall from mobileAdd to SkypeYou'll need Skype CreditFree via Skype",Maintenance Machinist Job in Mahwah,Full Time,"Mahwah, NJ",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Machinist-Job-Mahwah-NJ-US-164152452.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=13,"52,000.00 - 62,000.00 $ /yearBenefits, Vacation, Holidays, Medical",Experienced (Non-Manager),76d2f1352f8200ac0caf0da6f780d46f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:05:56:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Franklin Center for Rehabilitation and Nursing is seeking a handyperson / facility engineering technician .  The primary responsibilities of this position include:* Light Construction* Drywall Repair and Painting* Basic Plumbing* Light Electrical/Wiring Repair*Complete Preventative Maintenance and Troubleshooting on Facility Mechanical Equipment, Heating and Air Conditioning Systems as directed*Maintain PM and testing logs on equipment such as alarms*Wheelchair and Basic Medical Equipment Repair* Maintain safe work environment by following standards and procedures.* Maintain continuity of work operations by documenting and communicating actions, irregularities, and continuing needs.* Ability to read and write in English is required The ideal candidate must work well in a team oriented environment. Experience in a health care, hospitality setting or as a building superintendent is preferred.  Salary with benefits commensurate with experience.Franklin Center for Rehabilitation and Nursing is a 320 bed skilled nursing facility located in Flushing, New York.",Building Maintenance Technician Job in Flushing,Full Time,"Flushing, NY 11355",Healthcare Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Building-Maintenance-Technician-Job-Flushing-NY-US-165816463.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,Negotiable,Entry Level,f6104e6605c4d71798de1f112fce7636
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:42:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"This is an exciting opportunity for a field service technician to join a rapidly growing service organization. MorphoTrust is a privately owned company based in MA. MorphoTrust is a supplier to the US State Department to furnish advanced-technology digital passport printers and related materials used in the production of fraud resistant passports. This technology allows photographs that were previously cut and physically mounted in passports, to be digitally printed, permitting the printing of both photographs and personal data in one step. Maintenance and service of the printers is managed through a national system of regional service centers. MorphoTrust also has several other contracts to provide onsite maintenance for various computer, network and office related equipment such as personal PC's, printers, hubs routers and high speed scanning equipment. This maintenance will also be handled though the same national service centers. Currently MorphoTrust is looking for a field service technician to work out of the NY region. Required Experience:Familiarity with electro-mechanical devices, thermal printers, or High speed scanning equipment.Knowledge PC's and there peripherals as well as the windows environment.Ability to read and understand schematic diagrams and be non-adverse to dis-assembly and reassembly on complex mechanical devices including servo motors and fiber optic scanning systems.Must have good troubleshooting skills.Capable of working without direct supervisionGood communications skills25%-50% national travelU.S. citizenship requiredCandidate must be able to obtain and maintain a U.S. Department of State background check. Must be a US Citizen, without dual CitizenshipsMorphoTrust is an equal opportunity employer.We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex,sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other protected characteristics",Federal Field Service Tech (-) Job in Little Rock,"Full Time, Temporary/Contract/Project","Little Rock, AR","Computer Software, Computer/IT Services",http://jobview.monster.com/Federal-Field-Service-Tech-2312-758-Job-Little-Rock-AR-US-165108649.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=12,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,ef3977eadecf5874453fcff0d9dd406c
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:42:28,No,jobs.monster.com,"Auto Detailer (Full Time) - Haasz Automall Haasz Automall is looking for a full-time Automotive Detailer to clean, refurbish and detail vehicles sold by the dealership. Will inspect for imperfections in repairs while cleaning the vehicle and will correct imperfection or inform management of the situation. Experience preferred. Job Responsibilities: * Cleaning, refurbishing and detailing of vehicles for delivery to customer. * Install pin stripes and or decals and emblems as required. * Polish and or wax vehicles as required or directed. * Retrieve vehicles from and return to shop or storage area. * Ensure that working area is kept clean. * Adhere to all company policies, procedures and safety standards. Qualifications: * Must meet company's requirements for employment * Must have a valid drivers license * Professional appearance * Provide quality customer service * Ability to operate an automobile, including automatic and manual transmission vehicles * Ability to exercise good judgment and follow directionWe offer competitive salary, medical, dental, vision, and 401k benefits.Please apply online at haaszautomall.com, email resume to tknight@haaszautomall.com , or call 330-389-7129 and ask for Tim KnightSource: Akron Beacon Journal",Auto Detailer Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,44266,Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Auto-Detailer-Job-US-165647966.aspx?ch=newsohio&mescoid=5301080001001&jobPosition=16,,Entry Level,1a1e34921247bc03428115fb56547500
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:43:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Layne is a global water management, construction and drilling company, providing responsible solutions for water, mineral and energy resources.Layne operates in more than 100 integrated offices worldwide. Our philosophy of responsible growth guides us in consistently doing the right thing for our people, the environment, our company and the clients we serve every day. We strive to leave the individuals and places we touch better off for their interaction with us, and our culture is embodied in our unwavering commitment to the four core values that define us: Safety, Sustainability, Integrity and Excellence. Layne is currently seeking skilled full-time pipe-layers with at least 2 years of experience working with underground utilities including water, sanitary sewer and storm sewer. We offer competitive pay ($17.00 - $20.00 per hour based on experience) with benefits including health insurance, 401k and paid vacation. Primary ResponsibilitiesInstall/Repair sanitary or storm water sewer structures or pipe systemsLay out pipe routes following written instructions or blueprints and coordinate layouts with supervisorsInstall or use instruments such as lasers, grade rods or transit levelsGrade or level trench bases using tamping machines or hand toolsCheck slopes for conformance to requirements using levels or lasersCover pipes with earth or other materialsCut pipes to required lengths; align and position pipes to prepare for sealing using welding equipment, cement or gluePosition Qualifications Requirements/PreferencesMinimum 2 years’ experience in site work, utilities, plumbing and/or construction laborAbility to stand, bend and walk for major portion of shift Must possess adequate mechanical aptitude and basic math skills Must possess valid driver’s licenseMust be dependable, reliable, honest, trustworthy and to work for short periods of time without supervision Construction and Welding experience preferred ",Pipe-layer Job in West Palm Beach,Full Time,"West Palm Beach, FL 33401",,http://jobview.monster.com/Pipe-layer-Job-West-Palm-Beach-FL-US-166067491.aspx?mescoid=4700811001001&jobPosition=14,17.00 - 20.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),de114a6c04a197026e892034a833a09d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:43:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"Maintain innovative products and an exciting career with an industry leaderAlways well ahead of the curve in serving the technological needs of major clients, Cummins Allison is a global leader in developing advanced technologies and software equipment for counting, sorting and authenticating currency, ATM's, coins and checks. Using sophisticated mechanical systems, embedded software controls, and Windows-based customer interfaces, we serve the majority of financial institutions worldwide, as well as leading organizations in retail, casinos, law enforcement, and government.Our privately held, U.S.-based company has built a heritage of leadership in technology and product innovation that spans more than 100 years. This proud legacy of success includes serving the best interests of our talented professionals as well by encouraging them to learn, grow, and succeed as never before. If you’d like to be part of an organization that is constantly evolving, creating, and finding new ways to succeed, join our team as:FIELD SERVICE TECHNICIANLouisville, KYInstallation/Maintenance/RepairHere is an excellent opportunity to join a major, global organization. Servicing clients in Louisville and the surrounding areas. The individual we select will perform scheduled, on-site maintenance as well as emergency repair of check, coin & currency equipment, software and specialized office products.Qualifications: We are looking for candidates with:   1 or more years of related experience  Strong electromechanical aptitude  Proven proficiency with PC’s and windows based operating systems  Excellent customer service and communication skills, including a positive attitude  The ability to work flexible hours  Level 2 ATM or currency recycler experience preferred  Willingness and ability to travel locally on a daily basisIn return for your skills and hard work, we offer a competitive base salary with commission opportunities; company vehicle and expenses; major medical, dental, pharmacy and 401(k) options; and a corporate training program. Essential tools and a cell phone will be provided by the company at no cost to you.All applicants must provide a copy of a clean DMV report and pass a drug-screening test.Equal opportunity employer, minorities/females/disability/veteran ",Field Service Technician I Job in Louisville,Full Time,"Louisville, KY 40205",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Field-Service-Technician-I-Job-Louisville-KY-US-165464745.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=8,,Experienced (Non-Manager),050965b11e5a7217c9cf7b6f151f23f5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:44:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Services aircraft, performing any combination of the following tasks:  Directs incoming and outgoing aircraft near terminal or flight line to assist pilot maneuvering using hand or light signals; secures aircraft in parking position with chocks and tie-downs  as required; services aircraft fuel, oil, air, hydraulic and other systems to make ready for flight; checks for fuel contamination; makes required entries in  associated records; operates ground support equipment; examines tires for proper air pressure; may be required to change tires and wheels; cleans aircraft; and performs other flight line servicing operations.  All operations are completed in accordance with CNAFINST 4790.2 guidelines.  Performs pre and post-flight inspections on assigned aircraft in accordance with applicable technical publications.Requirements:High school graduate or equivalent.  Must have completed the appropriate Navy Skill Specialty FA-18 required/FA-18A-F (preferred Class ""C"") school in airframe, electronic, avionics, hydraulic, or power plants and related systems training or USMC/USCG equivalent.  Must have minimum of 2 years experience in Organizational Level maintenance in F/A-18A-F or EA-18G.  FA-18/EA-18G Plane Captain qualified.  Tow tractor, duct diver and shipboard firefighting experience are desired.  Preferred to have 2 years FA-18/EA-18 experience within the last 2 years. Current clearance desired. Must possess a U.S. states driver license.  Must be able to obtain and maintain a secret security clearance.  Must be available to work any shift.",Plane Captain Job in China Lake Nwc,Full Time Employee,"China Lake Nwc, CA 93555",Government and Military,http://jobview.monster.com/Plane-Captain-Job-China-Lake-Nwc-CA-US-164639213.aspx?mescoid=5301037001001&jobPosition=1,0.00 - 29.50 $ /hour,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,9615e902c21aed90eeeb7ab77ab6621d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:46:35,No,jobs.monster.com,"Associate is responsible for building loads for deliveries. In addition, must maintain a safe, clean and well organized lumber yard, load and unload lumber and/or building supplies, and operate a forklift. Other duties as assigned.Essential Functions:Build loads for deliveryLoad and unload lumber and building suppliesOperates forkliftKeeps management aware of any delays or discrepanciesKeeps lumber yard clean, well organized and safeEsta posicion es responsable de mantener un ambiente seguro, limpio y bienorganizado con la madera, de carga y descarga de madera y o materiales de construccion, entrega de cargas de construcci n, y operaci n de un|montacargas. Debe ser capaz de levantar los materiales de construccion a lo largo del dia. Otras tareas que le asigne.Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, short correspondence and memos; write simple correspondence; effectively present information to others one-on-one.Ability to apply common sense understanding and carry out simple one or two-step instructionsCapacidad para leer y comprender instrucciones simples, la correspondencia|y notas breves; escribir la correspondencia; presentar informacion|de manera eficaz a los demas uno a uno.High School diploma or general education degree (GED); Or 1 to 3 months related|experience and/or training. Un diploma de escuela secundaria or de educacion general (GED); o 1 a 3 meses|de experiencia o entrenamieto relacionado. Tiene la capacidad de usar el|sentido comun y puede ejercer simple instrucciones de uno a dos pasos; manejar|situaciones regulares con m nimo o sin ninguna dificultad.",Yard Associate ( E ) Job in Wilmington,Part Time Employee,84 Lumber,,http://jobview.monster.com/Yard-Associate-2305-9E-002-Job-Wilmington-NC-US-165789498.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=15,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,00277e8c09382cc65bffbdbfa787ebb0
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:47:10,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: Alliance Mechanical Services, LLCLocation: Euless, TX 76040Positions: Installer; Technician (Chillers); Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (DDC); Technician (Geothermal); Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Commercial/Industrial; Residential/Light Commercial-------------------“Why is Alliance Mechanical Services a Better Choice?”• Alliance Mechanical Services recognizes we are only as good as our technicians and support team• We have a proactive approach towards building year-around business• Our technicians tend to have better family lives because they spend more consistent time with their families with dependable wages• You receive competitive wages and benefits combined with a caring and respectful atmosphere• We have mutual respect and integrity not only as a company but also in our customer base• We offer continuous training• Tool allowance.• We are growing and want people to grow with us.• Medical benefits• Retirement matchingJOB DESCRIPTION: • Must have a clean driving record and free of Felony convictions• Seeking HVAC Commercial Technician with a minimum of 6 years of commercial service.• Must be experienced in trouble shooting and repairing HVACR system controls, rooftop systems from 2 to100+ tons, reciprocating (and/or boilers and screw chillers. is a plus)• Be knowledgeable of Pneumatics, DDC, VAV systems, Refrigeration and Variable Frequency Drives. • Must be able to read Electrical Schematics and Diagrams• Must be able to communicate effectively with others, share knowledge with team members• Must be able to be self-motivated to work independently • A positive attitude and professional demeanor is a must• Excellent customer service, strong work ethics, and attention to detail• Must have basic computer skills PLUSES:• Liebert Certification• Intellipak• Knowledgeable with Aaons• Reciprocating and Screw Chillers• Refrigeration/Ice Machines• DDC & pneumatic Controls• Other unique skills",HVAC Service Technician Job in Euless  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Euless 76040,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Euless-165191510.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),a6d28c6b35bb69c390ea35a891088f30
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:47:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: Tristate Mechanical Services, Inc.Location: Saint Louis, MO 63114Positions: Installer; Technician (HVAC/R); Technician (DDC); Technician (Appliance Repair); Technician (Ammonia Refrigeration); Technician (Commercial Refrigeration); Technician (Chillers); Technician (Commercial Cooking Equipment); Technician (Boilers); Technician (Geothermal)Industry: Residential/Light Commercial; Commercial/Industrial-------------------HVAC/Commercial Refrigeration Eqp Service Tech (St. Louis) We are a local family owned company in search of an experienced service technician (prefer someone with at least 5 to 10 years experience). Line of work will include Commercial/Industrial HVAC, Rooftops, Commercial Refrigeration Equipment, Exhaust Ventilation, and Boilers and Chillers. There is also some residential HVAC work, but very limited. Must be able to correctly diagnose and repair while being highly productive. Must have proven work experience in the commercial industry and be able to work independently. We provide year round work and need to add additional qualified technicians immediately. Salary is $20-$30 per hour depending on experience, plus benefits. Full benefit package includes hourly wage with bonus opportunities, medical and dental insurance, paid vacations/holidays, 401K Retirement Plan with Match.EPA Certification is required, as well as a valid driver license with good driving record. St. Louis County and City License preferred but not mandatory. Must be willing to work on call rotation and overtime as needed. Please forward resume with proven work experience in this field for immediate consideration.",HVAC Service Technician Job in Saint Louis  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Saint Louis 63114,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Saint-Louis-164974385.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ac7e0a319301c697d8ed4b7b8883a222
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:47:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a new and exciting opportunity to use your skills in a successful and growing company? Do you desire a fast-paced, casual work environment that is driven by employees who thrive on innovative thinking? If you have a desire to work in an energetic, collaborative environment, then check out this opportunity at Proto Labs! About Proto Labs: Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Proto Labs Is: #4 on Forbes list of Best Small Public Companies in the United States 2nd fastest growing public company in Minnesota by the Twin Cities Business Journal Top 100 Best Places to Work in the Twin Cities by Star Tribune – 4 times!   Position Overview: Utilizes expert knowledge to set-up, and operate a variety of CNC Lathes to timely and efficiently produce complex prototype and production parts to required specifications.   *We have shifts available on the Weekday Days, Weekday Nights, Weekend Days and Weekend Nights. Specific duties include: Set-up, and operate CNC lathe machines in a safe and efficient manner to produce prototype and production parts to specifications, including complex or difficult part. Set up and operate numerical control (CNC) lathe machines that hold to the high quality machine standards required within the organization. Set up fixtures and tooling to run CNC lathe production processes Starts and observes machine operation to detect malfunctions or out-of-tolerance machining, and adjusts machine controls as required. Ensures operation of equipment by completing preventive maintenance requirements; following manufacturer's instructions; troubleshooting malfunctions; calling for repairs. Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed. Select, align, secure holding fixtures, and set offsets for, cutting tools, attachments, accessories, and materials on lathes with minimal assistance. Select tooling, set up machines, and operate CNC lathes, to produce quality parts. Understand the concept of tool wear and cutter compensation. Recalibrate Lathe mills after maintenance was completed. Works with a wide variety of materials, tooling, and machine operations Inspects precision parts and makes necessary adjustments to maintain accuracy Install, adjust and maintain fixtures. Assist in new Lathe set up and changes. Adhere to all quality and safety standards within the department. Maintain clean and organized work area with emphasis on safety, quality, efficiency, and utilization. Continually seek to improve work processes and individual performance. Adhere to all company policies and operational procedures. Perform additional tasks as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required High School or better. Experience Required Must have four years’ experience either in a production or job shop environment, setting up CNC equipment (lathe-machining) doing comparable work. Knowledge of CNC Lathe setup and operation is required Skilled in the use of measuring instruments such as indicators, gage, dial bores, and plate inspection methods, and in-process inspection of precision machined parts. Ability to maintain close tolerances (within .001”) of all processes required. Knowledge of cutting feeds, speeds, and tool life. Basic working knowledge of geometric dimensioning and tolerances (GD&T) preferred. 3 and 4 axis lathe setup and operation, and basic understanding of G & M code. Able to safely operate hand held and stationary power tools. Able to use a computer and calculator. Ability to comprehend and follow printed and computer-screen instructions, and direction from supervisors or technical leads. Able to read and write in English, and do basic arithmetic. Must have good Shop Math skills. Able to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment. Must be punctual and have good attendance. Strong attention to detail is required. Good written and oral communication skills",CNC Lathe Specialist - Weekend Night Shift Job in Plymouth,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Lathe-Specialist-Weekend-Night-Shift-Job-Plymouth-MN-US-165979003.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=20,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,0ac38b96ba3dc84b6fb6a2b977d73dce
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:47:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Assembly TechnicianBunting Magnetics Co. has an immediate opening for a fulltimeAssembly Technician for 1st shift. This position will beresponsible for assembly of machinery in a manufacturingsetting.• Must have strong mechanical aptitude• Electrical Wiring experience a plus• Must be able to read blueprints & spec details• Strong attention to detail• Minimum 2 years’ experience in a productionenvironmentEmail your resume to HR@Buntingmagnetics; or apply inperson at 500 S. Spencer Rd, Newton, KS. ",Assembly Technician Job in Newton,Full Time,"Newton, KS 67114",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Assembly-Technician-Job-Newton-KS-US-166020893.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=16,,,495615e9671576dda929d34e97b19291
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:47:37,No,jobs.monster.com," Looking for a rewarding, challenging and exciting opportunity – Apply atMartech, one of the world’s leading Medical Device Developer and Contract Manufacturer. Let’s help save lives together!Martech Open Positions – send resumes and salary requirements to resumes@martechmedical.com·         Extrusion Engineero   Responsible to research, design, develop and validate medical grade tubing and tooling/fixtures.o   BS degree in plastics, mechanical engineering or other related technical discipline.o   5+ years of hands-on experience with extrusion/plastics (PP, PE, PU, PVC, Nylon, etc.).o   Preferred – Extrusion Simulation software experience.o   Preferred – Solidworks software experience.",Extrusion Engineer Job in Harleysville,Full Time,"Harleysville, PA 19438",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Extrusion-Engineer-Job-Harleysville-PA-US-165364522.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=7,,,91961371e4c14c736edb71fb6e3aff5f
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:47:39,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our Client is currently seeking a Site Manager for its facility in Texas, located outside San Antonio. This person will report to the Head of Production, who holds the corporate leadership for all manufacturing facilities in the US.The Site Manager will be responsible for leading a production team and handling all aspects of a fast paced batch manufacturing facility. Daily duties include monitoring daily key point measures, budgets, safety, and production flow.Client DetailsOur client develops and manufactures high chemical products in a global scale, supporting several other industries.DescriptionOptimize plant operations to maximize the Efficiency of all manufacturing equipment and lines.Monitor and address daily production and quality metrics.In conjunction with the EHS Department, drive safety excellence in the plant.Develop and maintain standard operating procedures that meet ISO9001 and Process Safety Management requirements.Uses resources and assets to meet the market demand and enable the site to support new product introductions.Minimize out-of-specification production by ensuring equipment is maintained in the condition that is required.Conduct thorough non-conforming product and customer complaint investigations necessary to identify root causes.Investigate appropriately all EHS incidents to identify root causes and appropriate corrective/preventive actions.Identify causes of product waste in order to minimize generation.Apply problem solving techniques and resources, as required, to quickly respond to operational issues.Lead the Maintenance and Engineering teams, as needed, to address production bottlenecks and equipment issues, and also to implement new small capital projectsProfileOur client develops and manufactures high chemical products in a global scale, supporting several other industries.Job OfferCompetitive SalaryMedical BenefitsDental BenefitsVision Benefits401(k) Savings PlanVacation DaysSick DaysPaid Holidays",Site Manager - Special Chemicals Job in Gonzales,"Full Time , Employee","Gonzales, TX",,http://jobview.monster.com/Site-Manager-Special-Chemicals-Job-Gonzales-TX-US-165904002.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=5,,,8b30ca484c2a50458cb77889acb83d16
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:49:04,No,jobs.monster.com,"Well maintained apartment community in N.E. Philadelphia seeks maintenance person with HVAC experience to join a talented team.  Includes apartment make-readies, light electrical, plumbing and appliance repair, and on-call.  Previous experience and valid driver’s license necessary.  Excellent salary and benefits. Fax 610-239-7334 or e-mail 51968jlb@gmail.com",Maintenance Technician Job in Rhawnhurst,Full Time,"Rhawnhurst, PA 19111",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Rhawnhurst-PA-US-165229392.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=20,,,da686032f2e5d80af7605f6bdb912988
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:49:05,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Conducts analysis on various products in a laboratory environment.Duties:* Determines product specifications by studying consumer requirements; conferring with management and engineering staff.* Identifies chemical and physical properties of raw materials, in-process and/or finished products as well as stability samples by conducting analyses such as titrations, viscosity, chromatography, HPLC, GC, GCMS, UV, Vis, AA, PCR, ELISA, Immunoassays.* Utilizes lab notebooks to record and document test results and prepares technical reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends.* Maintains organization's stability and reputation by complying with government regulations, cGMP and FDA.* Ensures operation of equipment by completing preventative maintenance requirements; following manufacturer's instructions; troubleshooting malfunctions; calling for repairs; evaluating new equipment and techniques.* Maintains database by entering and backing up data.* Maintains safe and clean working environment by establishing and complying with procedures, rules, and regulations.* Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Lab Environment, Animal Science, Microbiology, Biology, Chemistry,Chemistry Techniques, Reporting Results, Safety, Equipment Maintenance, Attention to Detail, Quality Focus",Laboratory Technican Job in Kansas City,Full Time,"Kansas City, MO 64116",Biotechnology/Pharmaceuticals,http://jobview.monster.com/Laboratory-Technican-Job-Kansas-City-MO-US-164557135.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=14,,Entry Level,e29f21ad9df944b20b14fc93ae53eb05
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:50:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Scale Technician Job AdTitle:Industrial Scale TechnicianLocation:Memphis, TN Jonesboro, ARLittle Rock, ARFayetteville, ARAtlanta, GABirmingham, ALYoungstown, OH Number of Positions:Multiple Type:Full-time, Temporary to Permanent Salary:Hourly, rate based on experience  Description:Working at customer site locations or in assigned location’s shop performing                                           installations, maintenance, and scheduled testing of industrial scale systems Responsibilities:Performs installation, calibration, troubleshooting, preventative maintenance, and repair on industrial weighing and measuring equipmentCompletes required paperwork to document repair, calibration and preventative maintenance Drives company vehicle while traveling to customer’s site or to pick up materials needed to complete assigned job dutiesAny other job related duties assigned by management Reports to:Location Service ManagerHow to Apply:Please email resume to humanresources@mtaweighing.com noting the location you are applying for in the subject line of your email",Industrial Scale Technician Job function wrap(EL,Full Time,Multiple locations,Business Services - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Industrial-Scale-Technician-Job-US-165760310.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=20,,Experienced (Non-Manager),054e5ca4938f6c5fab809b95fc0e8092
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:07:50:30,No,jobs.monster.com,"Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/VeteranWaste Management (WM), a Fortune 250 company, is the leading provider of comprehensive waste and environmental services in North America. We are strongly committed to a foundation of operating excellence, professionalism and financial strength. WM serves nearly 25 million customers in residential, commercial, industrial and municipal markets throughout North America through a network of collection operations, transfer stations, landfills, recycling facilities and waste-based energy production projects.With more than 130 energy projects using naturally occurring landfill gas to power homes and businesses, WM Renewable Energy produces over 550 megawatts of electricity every year - enough to power more than 440,000 homes. This is equivalent to offsetting over 2.2 million tons of coal per year.I. Job SummaryManage the Landfill Gas to Energy Facility to maximize production, while ensuring safe work practices, environmental compliance, timely maintenance, compliance with contracts, and coordination with the landfill management and operations. This role acts as a plant owner, and is available whenever necessary to meet the objectives of the role and the needs of the facility.II. Essential Duties and ResponsibilitiesTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. Other minor duties may be assigned.By thorough evaluation of operational data, be responsible for planning a proper course of action and have complete ownership for managing production capacity in efforts to reduce plant operating expenses while limiting equipment downtime without impairment. Inspects ongoing activities for safety and environmental compliance, and for adherence to Standard Operating Procedures. Reports and develops recommendations for corrective actions in any instances of reoccurring shutdowns or equipment de-rating in order to notify WMRE operations managers whether further analysis is necessary.Responsible for ensuring compliance with all operational requirements of the air permit, which may include CYCLE task tracking, documentation of compliance with standard operating procedures, performing emissions tests, and adjusting equipment to meet emissions limits. Represents WMRE during third party testing and regulatory inspections.Secures, manages, and coordinates all 3rd party vendors for scheduled plant maintenance, unscheduled down time, compliance, and well-field issues. Regularly communicates this with the Market Area Gas Operations Manager (MAGOM) and/or WMRE Operations Manager.Manages various relationships with power/gas purchasers as a first point of contact, with respect to facility operations and compliance with scheduling requirements. Complies with power purchase agreements, gas sales agreements, interconnect agreements, or other contracts.Inspects plant machinery and equipment. Repairs, maintains, and services all equipment in accordance with the facility Standard Operating Procedures, equipment maintenance manuals, and WMRE policies and training. Must also be knowledgeable to handle non-routine repairs or issues that may arise and require sound, immediate judgment without direct supervision.Implements WM and WMRE safety policies and practices for all work activities, and ensures these practices are followed by other WM staff, vendors, contractors, and visitors entering the facility.Completes all mandatory training activities for both safety and operational training as assigned by supervisor.Procures plant supplies and replacement equipment in an efficient manner by identifying needs in advance, managing vendors, and working within WMRE guidelines as well as being responsible for the annual budget.Promptly responds to call-outs of plant shutdowns during non-business hours to identify the cause of the shutdown and rectify/diagnose through appropriate repairs or adjustments to return the plant to operation while consulting with WMRE operations managers (as needed). This role is given discretion to judge the situation and respond accordingly without management intervention, until needed.Identifies backup staff in coordination with the WMRE regional manager, and assigns call-out schedules to ensure that there is at least one plant manager available 24/7/365 for plant shutdowns and emergencies. For self and backup, adjusts daily or weekly on-site presence at plant during business hours to reflect time spent for call-outs, with consideration that all other daily and monthly duties must be completed on a timely basis.Maintains the facility spare inventory and provides a written inventory count twice annually.Schedules and conducts plant tours as requested to support good community relations. Represent WMRE as the on-site technical expert on production of renewable energy from landfill gas. Participates actively in developing and implementing ongoing public relations between the plant and community to ensure favorable outlook of the facility from both customer and community.Participates in public forums to support business development and community education. Ensures the potential for use of the facility as a marketing platform and supervises such activities. Maintains effective relationships with key political and community decision makers in the region.Completes special assignments/tasks as required by WMRE Operations Manager, Market Area Gas Operations Manager, or Landfill District Manager.III. Supervisory ResponsibilitiesThis job has no supervisory duties.IV. QualificationsThe requirements listed below are representative of the qualifications necessary to perform the job.A. Education and ExperienceEducation: High School Diploma or GED (accredited)Experience: 5 years of relevant work experience diagnosing and repairing internal combustion engines and cooling systems.B. Certificates, Licenses, Registrations or Other RequirementsMust have valid driver's licenseC. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities RequiredFundamental knowledge of computer data entry and interpretation.Must be able to successfully manage fiduciary responsibilities.Must be able to lift a minimum of 100 lbs.Must be able to travel up to 15% with overnight stays.Must be able to diagnose and repair DC circuits 12/24 volts.Basic knowledge of 120/240/480 3ph volt AC circuits.Understand concepts of 4160 volt circuitsMust be familiar with basic principles of building maintenance.V. Work EnvironmentListed below are key points regarding environmental demands and work environment of the job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of the job.Normal setting for this job is: shop/power plant environment.BenefitsAt Waste Management, each eligible employee receives a competitive total compensation package including Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance and Short Term Disability. As well as a Stock Purchase Plan, Company match on 401K, and more! Our employees also receive Paid Vacation, Holidays, and Personal Days. Please note that benefits may vary by site.If this sounds like the opportunity that you have been looking for, please click ""Apply.""",Renewable Energy Plant Manager/Technician - Naples FL Job in Naples,Full Time Employee,"Naples, FL",Energy and UtilitiesWaste Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Renewable-Energy-Plant-Manager-Technician-Naples-FL-Job-Naples-FL-US-165805189.aspx?mescoid=1100015001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,72d6b8e3277c7ab1bac640d97972fce7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:08:23:36,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Viox Services, a wholly owned subsidiary of EMCOR Group, Inc., offers a complete package of facilities services from grounds and preventative maintenance to construction services and integrated facility management. Job Title: HVAC Technician   Job Summary:Maintains, repairs, installs, inspects, and adjusts commercial and industrial HVAC systems. Supervises and directs the activities of other workers associated with HVAC system operation, repair, installation, etc. Also estimates, lays out, and schedules jobs.     Essential Duties and Responsibilities: Ability to read and understand system blueprints, specifications, and performance data to determine configuration and purpose of system components such as compressors, motors, pumps, fans, switches, controls, ducts, or pipes. Starts systems, observes operation, read gauges and instruments, and adjusts mechanisms such as actuators, valves, controls, and pumps to control system operation. Opens valves on equipment such as compressors, pumps, and condensers to prepare system for operation and starts equipment and auxiliary machinery. Screws, bolts, rivets, welds, and brazes parts to assemble structural and functional components such as motors, controls, switches, gauges, wiring harnesses, valves, pumps, compressors, condensers, cores, and pipes. Discuss system malfunctions with users to isolate problems. Installs wiring to connect components to electric power source. Lubricates fans, motors, and control units. Replaces defective/worn parts. Cuts, threads, gas welds, connects pipe to functional HVAC component systems. Performs preventative maintenance tasking on all HVAC equipment. Dismantles malfunctioning systems and tests components. Attends classes and seminars on air conditioning components and system design to update skills.     Qualifications:Graduate of a certified technical school; and 10 or more year’s related experience and training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.Minimum 10 years of experience in facility/plant engineering and maintenance supervision. Must possess a valid driver's license Fork Truck and Aerial Lift CertificationUniversal Recovery CertificationRefrigerant Transition and Recovery CertificationType I and Type IIType I - Small AppliancesType II - High Pressure and very High Pressure AppliancesType III - Low Pressure AppliancesUniversal - Type I, II and IIIAbility to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or associates of the organization. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",HVAC Technician Job in Nashville,Full Time Employee,Location:,Manufacturing - OtherReal Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Technician-Job-Nashville-TN-US-164849442.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=6,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,9a85ce97dcf93fbf5a1b5f68b2c1f8a5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:08:27:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is seeking a degreed Quality Assurance Manager for a national food manufacturer in Texas. The qualified individual will ensure consistent production of quality, safe product by following government and corporate guidelines. He or she will supervise all Quality Assurance & Sanitation associates.The QA Manager will perform all jobs safely, accurately and efficiently to improve and maintain the performance of the entire plant in the areas of Safety, Quality, Reliability (SQR) and our strategy of putting the Customer first. He or she will be a role model and will demonstrate the company's core values. Responsibilities:•           Provide leadership to the plant in areas of product quality and food safety•           Serve as a liaison for all governmental inspections•           Participate in corporate regulatory compliance audits and inspections•           Audit plant sanitation process through product testing, environmental testing, and physical inspections•           Assure that Good Manufacturing Practices (GMPs) are effectively and consistently followed•           Ensure pest control program is in compliance•           Support quality initiatives by participating in food safety or quality initiatives •           Monitor to ensure that Sanitation Standard Operating Procedures (SSOPs), Hazard Analysis Critical Control Point (HACCP), formulations, allergen programs, and finished product consistently meet specification•           Assure that Quality Assurance staff is properly resourced and trained•           Ensure effective and thorough annual training of GMPs, SQF, and Food Safety Programs•           Assure that record keeping is accurate and meets company, SQF and government regulations•           Ensure all receiving procedures for ingredients are in compliance with safety and quality standards•           Investigates all consumer comments; collaborates with production on action plans•           Assist Food Technology Department with product audits, product development and calculation of raw materials•           Provide support to production in all continuous improvement effort•           Provide feedback to suppliers to resolve quality issues and improve relationships•           Assist the staff management team in all SQF requirements and policies•           Support the creation, application, maintenance, and continuous improvement of the SQF 2000 Systems•           Accountable to the company Food Safety and Quality Principles•           Oversee and train direct reports in the performance of their duties•           Complete all performance reviews and provide feedback to direct reports  Qualifications:•           Bachelor's Degree in a technical field (BS)•           3+ years quality assurance lab experience•           Ability to read, analyze and interpret technical and scientific journals, legal documents and financial reports•           Able to apply advanced mathematical concepts and statistical process control concepts on an as needed basis•           Strong critical and analytical thinking skills•           Able to define problems, gather data, establish facts and draw conclusions•           Able to interpret technical instructions in diagram or mathematical form•           Comprehend concrete and abstract variables•           Proficient in Microsoft Suite of productsInterested parties please respond with resume to BSD@JUDGE.COM",Quality Assurance Manager Job in San Antonio,"Full Time, Employee","San Antonio, TX",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Quality-Assurance-Manager-Job-San-Antonio-TX-US-166026368.aspx?mescoid=1100016001001&jobPosition=10,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,ca8f084b51bf556d185931a9072d12d3
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:08:52:09,No,jobs.monster.com," Looking for a rewarding, challenging and exciting opportunity – Apply atMedcomp, one of the world’s leading Medical Device Developer and Contract Manufacturer.  Let’s help save lives together!Medcomp Open Positions – send resumes and salary requirements to resumes@medcompnet.com·         Regulatory Associateo   AA/BS degree in scientific or related discipline; 4+ years of experience; or combination of education and experience.o   Prior Medical Device industry experience preferred.o   ISO 13485 and FDA regulations/standards knowledge is preferred.o   Responsible for preparation and submission of 510k and CE for product approvals.",Regulatory Associate Job in Harleysville,Full Time,"Harleysville, PA 19438",Medical Devices and Supplies,http://jobview.monster.com/Regulatory-Associate-Job-Harleysville-PA-US-165363747.aspx?mescoid=1300079001001&jobPosition=8,,,0fb595ff24d95a1741fba7730112ec75
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:08:52:11,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description Private Family seeks experienced live-in or live-out Domestic couple to maintain their Bedford NY residence as well as assist the family with service and accommodations as needed. Responsibilities include but are not limited to: Working alongside additional domestic staffLiaising with and overseeing vendors and contractorsProvide hands-on housekeeping including all aspects of general and deep cleaning: laundry and ironing, cleaning of kitchen, bath, and living areas, organization of closets, pantries, etc., care for art, antiques, and fine furniture, etc.Maintain home for guest readiness at all timesPlanning fresh and healthy menus, preparing and serving daily meals as well as parties and events.Fine vehicle care; including service scheduling and insurance upkeepDriving family to appointments and engagementsGeneral handyman services and facilities / home maintenance tasksMaintaining household inventories; supply procurement including grocery shoppingMaintaining complete indoor and outdoor appearance of the homeHandling special requests and related duties as neededTravel with the family to additional residences / alternate destinations as needed This is a full-time, live-in or live-out position with a 5-day workweek. Flexibility to work overtime as needed is required. Salary is generous but DOE, this position also includes a full benefits package as well as the potential to earn a discretionary annual bonus. Requirements At least 5 years of related experience each working in a Private EstateStrong English communication skills, both written and verbal; additional language skills are a plusExperience supervising household staff and working with service staff and other outside vendorsAbility to work independently as well as with a team, ""hands on"" as necessaryExperience caring for fine art and antiques, fine garments and linens, and silver and brassExcellent references from both current and previous employersStrong culinary skills; ability to prepare meals and serve events and dinners as neededDemonstrate an understanding of complex physical house systems (lighting, heating and cooling, security), including “smart home” systems (i.e. Kaleidoscape)Working knowledge of all areas of property maintenance; initiative in tackling home projects hands-onGreat with children and pets (no allergies)Flexible scheduling with flexibility to work overtime and weekends as neededValid driver’s license with clean driving recordValid passports and flexibility to travel with the family as needed to summer and winter estatesLegally able to work in the United States SOCIETY STAFFING295 Madison Avenue, 16th FloorNew York NY 10017Tel: (646) 681 4780Agency DCA License #2008231 Due to the volume of employment applications received, Society Staffing is unable to respond to each application individually. Applicants will be contacted directly if selected as a candidate. Please be advised that the first round of our interview process involves a direct meeting at our Manhattan offices for all positions located in the tri-state area. ",Domestic Couple,Full Time,"Bedford, NY",,http://jobview.monster.com/Domestic-Couple-Live-In-or-Live-Out-Bedford-NY-Job-Bedford-NY-US-165263685.aspx?mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=6,"$1,000,000.00+ /yearDOE",Student (High School),27ff04c781d36a1758d9e8cacd3ab953
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:08:59:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Listing provided by: The Standard Speaker, Hazleton, PATimes-Shamrock Communications Monster Partner Products:thetimes-tribune.com | citizensvoice.com | standardspeaker.com | republicanherald.comHIRING FOR IMMEDIATE OPENINGS JOB FAIR Wednesday, March 30, 2016 10:00 a.m. - 2:00 p.m. at First Quality Nonwovens 500 Oakridge Road Hazle Township, PA 18202 Please bring a copy of your resume to the job fair and/or attach it to a completed online application at www.firstquality.com WE ARE HIRING additional team members for the following openings: Technical Operators, Slitter Lead, Warehouse, Maintenance Technicians, Warehouse Manager and MORE! Qualifications and Requirements Include: High School Diploma or GED 1 Year Process Manufacturing Experience Highly Preferred Strong Problem-Solving Skills Ability to Work 12-Hour Rotating Shifts Medical, Vision, Dental, Vacation, Personal Time Off, 401(K), Short Term Disability, Life Insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts, Employee Assistance Program, Onsite Fitness Center, Competitive Starting Pay Rates, Increased Pay Based on Successful Demonstration of Knowledge and New Skills, Quarterly Bonus, Year End Bonus, Clean Environment EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER First Quality Nonwovens philosophy is built on a proud culture driven by safety, quality, respect, humility, integrity, customer focus, and teamwork.",Technical Operators,Full Time,18201,All,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Technical-Operators-Slitter-Lead-Warehouse-Maintenance-Technicians-Warehouse-Manager-MORE!-Job-US-165317697.aspx?ch=standardspeaker&mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=14,,Entry Level,81d755076628ba4aaca63304114518d5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:09:00:26,No,jobs.monster.com,"Bindery Worker with 1+ year(s) experience working in a bindery environment. Work entails the set up and operation of various bindery equipment including, but not exclusive to, folders, numbering, uv coater; as well as, a lot of handwork including collating, folding, stitching, coilbinding, padding, etc. This is a seasonal non-benefited position. University of Utah Job ID# PRN05462N, University Print & Mail Services COMPENSATION: $9.28 to $14.00/hour. A free bus/TRAX pass is provided.WORK SCHEDULE: Full-time,40 hours per week, Monday-Friday 8:00-4:00, can be flexible.RESPONSIBILITIES:1. Sweeps, cleans, mops, scrubs and dusts floors. 2. Cleans toilets, basins, showers, bathtubs, and scrubs walls; dusts, cleans and vacuums furniture, fixtures doors and related furnishings by using appropriate cleaning supplies as instructed. 3. Operates and maintains electric floor machines, snow blowers, industrial vacuums, carpet shampooing equipment and upholstery shampooing equipment. 4. Cleans, refinishes and maintains a variety of floor coverings. 5. Labels and removes infectious waste bags and containers, when necessary. 6. Transports custodial supplies and equipment to and from storage and work areas. 7. Replaces sharp containers, transports trash and refuse, removes empty boxes and organizes closets. 8. Observes all applicable safety procedures and regulations regarding cleaning products and procedures. 9. Changes light bulbs, tightens screws, and performs other light maintenance activities when necessary.QUALIFICATIONS: One year experience or equivalency working with medium or large toner-based copiers or printer or one year experience in production offset press environment or bindery environment. Knowledge of paper specifications and color printing are required. Demonstrated human relations and effective communication skills are also required. Must demonstrate an ability and willingness to cross train upwards and fill in as needed and have a commitment to provide excellent customer service.This is a temporary, non-benefited position.PREFERENCES: Offset printing experience preferred, but not required.TO APPLY, VISIT:http://utah.peopleadmin.com/postings/51188EQUAL EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITY The University of Utah is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer. Upon request, reasonable accommodations in the application process will be provided to individuals with disabilities. Please contact the Office of Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action, 201 S. Presidents Cr., Rm 135, (801) 581-8365 (V/TDD), for further information or to request an accommodation. The University of Utah is committed to diversity in its workforce. Women and minorities are encouraged to apply.",Bindery Technician (N) Job in Salt Lake City,Full Time,"Salt Lake City, UT 84112",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Bindery-Technician-5462N-Job-Salt-Lake-City-UT-US-165997174.aspx?mescoid=5100959001001&jobPosition=3,9.28 - 14.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,2f2caaff0a9c2aff5793eeb20226d967
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:09:55:06,No,jobs.monster.com,"Essential Functions:Under the direction of the Department Supervisor or Maintenance Supervisor, the Maintenance Technicians responsible for maintaining and repairing production machinery to meet production and satisfy customer specificationsSupervision Received and Given:  Reports directly to the Maintenance Manager, Maintenance Supervisor or the Department SupervisorEducational Requirements:High School Education/GEDExperience/Knowledge/Skills:Previous six to twelve months related experience and/or trainingComputer skills preferredMath skills to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals essentialAbility to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs",Maintenance Technician Job in Milwaukee,"Full Time, Employee","Milwaukee, WI 53224",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Milwaukee-WI-US-165718187.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=7,18.00 - 21.00 $ /hour,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,7163312607ae4091d9713a023b230d68
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:09:56:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"Housekeeping position opening at Oakwood Mall! Offers a great work environment, good hours, competitive pay, and benefits package. Applications are available in the Mall Office at 4125 West Owen K. Garriott Road, from 8 am-5 pm Monday-Friday. This job listing brought to you by The Enid News & Eagle",Housekeeping Position Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,73703,Personal and Household Services,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Housekeeping-Position-Job-US-165662630.aspx?ch=newsenid&mescoid=3700623001001&jobPosition=7,,Entry Level,9cfbfc77d0d4428e468a39cf7d909abc
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:10:55:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"Craft Machine Works Inc has a 40 year history as a nationally recognized manufacturer of large, custom-built products for industry and defense. Craft has the expertise, facilities, and equipment to fabricate, weld, heat treat, machine, assemble and test large and complex components to demanding specifications.""We are looking for (multiple) experienced CNC and conventional machinists. Very interested in machinist with experience in large horizontal boring mills and vertical turning machines. We will consider training pre-qualified persons. Day and night shift needed. Large back log of work with overtime opportunities.*Must have min. 5 years experience.*Read and interpret blueprints.*Inspect the accuracy of the machine's operation.*Measure the parts and make adjustments.",CNC Machinist Job in Hampton,Full Time,"Hampton, VA 23661",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Machinist-Job-Hampton-VA-US-158765452.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=17,"40,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),3ecf4fa356db1a2e9dadd605701ef26a
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:10:56:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Compu-Net Systems has an immediate opening for a Client/Server Support Engineer.  Candidates being considered for this position must have at least 5 years of experience working with computer repair, Client/Server networks using Windows Servers and Workstations, have superior customer service skills and able to manage multiple tasks efficiently and effectively.  This position requires travel to customer locations in the Cleveland Ohio area for onsite service. The job duties include:- Level 1, Level 2 Support - remote and onsite.- Desktop PC and Laptop repair / upgrades, hardware and software.- Creating and maintaining customer system documentation.- Installation and support of Windows, Apple iOS and Droid.- Install, service, support, troubleshoot and repair Client/Server environments running Microsoft Windows Operating Systems.- Install, service, support, troubleshoot and repair network infrastructure components including wiring, switches and routers.- Install, service, support, troubleshoot and repair various line of business applications.- Produce and maintain system documentation.- Stay current on Microsoft certifications.- Keep a positive attitude and maintain a professional appearance toward all customers.- Maintain a flexible work schedule as this job may require support on any given day at any given time. Candidates must:- Hold a Microsoft Windows 7, 8, Server 2008, 2012 certification.- Have a high attention to detail with a focus on quality and customer service.- Be able to manage his own schedule.- Be very honest and reliable.- Maintain reliable transportation.- Pass a mandatory background, salary and attendance check. Summary of helpful experience:- Symantec Backup Exec, Endpoint Protection- StorgeCraft Shadow Protect- TigerPaw PSA Software- Labtech RMM Software- TeamViewer, ScreenConnect- Microsoft SBS, Windows Server 2008, 2012- Exchange Server 2010, 2013, 2016- SQL Server- Windows 7 / Windows 8 / Windows 10- Microsoft Office 2010, 2013, 2016- Cisco / NetGear Network Routers, Switches, Wireless- Microsoft Office 365 Administration- Sophos UTM- QNAP Network Attached Storage and VioStor- Hyper-V and VMWare Virtualization- APC UPS and Safe Shutdown software This position has a high potential for growth.  Compensation and rate of growth will be based on performance and dedication.- Competitive Salary with Incentives- Relaxed and fun work environment- Medical, Dental, Vision and Insurance Benefits are available- Tremendous growth opportunities",IT Support Technician,Full Time,"North Ridgeville, OH 44039",Computer Hardware,http://jobview.monster.com/IT-Support-Technician-Managed-Services-Job-North-Ridgeville-OH-US-163994326.aspx?mescoid=1500134001001&jobPosition=7,"19.00 - 30.00 $ /hourMedical, Vacation, Holiday",Experienced (Non-Manager),a4bf249af9bd4c5032e2e488f9c285af
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:11:44:27,No,jobs.monster.com,"Structure Works Inc has an opening for a full time Security Technician position in the Hicksville, NY area.​ This Security Technician will be responsible for maintenance and installation of the security systems, components, and infrastructure.​ The systems to be maintained are Access Control, CCTV, Video Management Software, Intercoms, Alarms, and others.​ This position is a Lead Technician position and the desired candidate will be self- motivated and will have the skill set to interface directly with the end customer and factory representatives.​REQUIREMENTS:- 5+ years previous experience in Security- Have a working knowledge of CCTV, Access Control, Intercoms, Intrusion detection and Network Infrastructure- Be a US Citizen and consent to full background check- Have a valid US drivers license as local travel is required- Be able to climb ladders, work from lifts - Be able to pass drug and background checkDESIRABLE KNOWLEDGE/​SKILLS- Implementation and Maintenance of Intercom Systems, Intrusion detection systems and access control and video surveillance systems- Experience evaluating, designing and implementing electronic security technologies- Proven experience in low voltage and access control hardware​​COMPANY BENEFITS:1. Competitive salary.2. Company Medical insurance for employees, which includes Dental.​ 3. Holidays and paid Vacation and sick leave.​4. 401k Plan with company match5. Company vehicle with Gas Card.",Security Technician Job in Hicksville,Full Time,"Hicksville, NY",Security and Surveillance,http://jobview.monster.com/Security-Technician-Job-Hicksville-NY-US-163779026.aspx?mescoid=4900864001001&jobPosition=17,,,9a7559c749e6c894e6bd0613ebf3d277
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:11:49:00,No,jobs.monster.com,"We are looking for an awesome individual to fill our residential landscape maintenance supervisor position.  This individual must have knowledge in all phases of landscape maintenance.  Envirogrow provides services to residential and commercial customers that include lawn mowing, mulching, fertilization, plantings, general clean-ups, aeration, leaf removal and snow removal.  We are looking for an individual who works well with a mid-sized company.  You will be responsible for managing 3-5 crews, consisting of 2-6 persons.  You must know and understand the landscape industry.  You must be able to teach your crews “best landscape practices”, instilling safety and quality.  Ideal candidates must be bi-lingual (Spanish).  The individual must already have or be able to obtain a registered technician applicators license within 60 days of employment. Basic duties will revolve around managing multiple crews doing routine landscape and turf maintenance.  You will be in charge of producing a million dollars in work a year.  You must be able to adapt to changes and adjustments made throughout the day.  On a daily basis you will you are responsible for:Inspecting vehicles and equipment prior to leaving officeGetting crews outMaking a site visit with each crewVisiting completed and upcoming jobsGathering supplies for upcoming jobsPreparing crews for the next day Requirements3+ years supervisory field experienceBi-lingual Spanish both written and oral a plusValid driver’s license with good driving record3+ years of operating heavy equipment such as skid steer and track loaders Must know the northern Virginia region well. Job skillsSupervise production at multiple sitesRead and follow plans, material list and guidelinesExperience with operating hand held landscape power toolsAbility to coordinate company resources efficiently and profitabilityAct as intermediary between field employees Other duties Manage and track all job orders.Helping with truck and equipment maintenance along with repairsKeep jobs on track and under budgetEnforce job site safety and proper equipment usage practicesTraining of new and current employeesPolicy enforcementSetting production goalsProblem solve client concerns and on-site issuesEvaluation and inspection of work performed by employee Personality traitsTeam leaderExcellent task management skillsSelf starterSuperior customer service Great communication skills BenefitsPaid vacationhealth insurancepaid sick leavecompany cell phonecompany vehicle  ",Landscaper Job in Fairfax,Full Time,"Fairfax, VA 22031",Construction - Residential & Commercial/Office,http://jobview.monster.com/Landscaper-Job-Fairfax-VA-US-164369422.aspx?mescoid=3700626001001&jobPosition=20,"45,000.00 - 55,000.00 $ /year",Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),b19b0261f9fe6555eb51851914712f65
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:11:49:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Custodian IIFacilities Management DepartmentBrown University, Providence, Rhode IslandBrown University seeks interested applicants for a Custodian to perform custodial work required for the upkeep of buildings. This position will work Thursday – Monday, 11pm – 7am. The Custodian will wet/dust mops floors, scrubs shower stall walls/floors, fixtures and similar equipment, replacing shower curtains, and replenishing supplies as needed. Sweeps/shovels snow from all exterior steps, patios, and terraces up to main walk. Removes rubbish and recyclables to storage and then moves them to the sidewalk for pick up. Makes beds in dormitories and prepares rooms for occupancy. Writes Service Orders for all damages, malfunctions, repairs and informs supervisor of same. Requirements: Requires 6 month’s related experience or demonstrated ability to perform custodial duties. Ability to read and interpret written instructions, service orders, and labels on chemical supplies. Must be physically able to lift and carry 50 pounds unassisted; climb and work from ladders at heights up to 12 feet; walk throughout the campus; climb stairs for duration of shift, use buffing machines, extractors, and associated equipment. To View More Details and To Apply, please use this link to the position on Brown’s Career Site:https://brown.wd5.myworkdayjobs.com/en-US/staff-careers-brown/job/Morriss-Hall-Pembroke-Quad/Custodian-II_REQ123604-1Brown University is committed to fostering a diverse and inclusive academic global community; as an EEO/AA employer, Brown considers applicants for employment without regard to, and does not discriminate on the basis of, gender, race, protected veteran status, disability, or any other legally protected statusAbout Brown (Please visit our website and get to know us better at: www.brown.edu )Located in historic Providence, Rhode Island and founded in 1764, Brown is an independent, coeducational Ivy League institution comprising undergraduate and graduate programs, plus the Alpert Medical School, School of Public Health, School of Engineering, Executive Master of Healthcare Leadership and the IE Brown Executive MBA. With its talented and motivated student body and accomplished faculty, Brown is a leading research university that maintains a particular commitment to exceptional undergraduate instruction.Brown is being recognized by the Alliance for Work-Life Progress for success in work-life programs, policies and practices. To earn the Seal of Distinction, Brown had to meet criteria and be assessed in each of the seven categories listed for work-life effectiveness that defines a best-in-class work-life portfolio in today's workplace.",Custodian II Job in Providence,Full Time,"Providence, RI",Education,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodian-II-Job-Providence-RI-US-165864745.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=18,,,4a9484c46cfe0440e6b9991eaee9b9f6
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:00:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"KDH Defense Systems, Inc.Position Title:Sewing Supervisor Department: ProductionFLSA Standard: Non-ExemptReports To:  Plant ManagerRevision Date: 0Approved:Effective Date:  10/20/2008   Description: With direction from the plant manager interacts with multiple levels of staff within KDH’S organization. Involved with developing, implementing, and enforcing systems and procedures to meet production goals.   Major Responsibilities:Directly manage sewers and support personnel to meet production goals and schedulesImplement improvements to drive efficienciesAdjust personnel tasks based on skill mix and production demandDevelop work instructions and methodsSupport product line set-up and floor layout designInterface with maintenance to optimize equipment operationProvide appraisals, maintain time tracking, and resolve conflictSupport daily production meetingsOther duties assigned by management    Qualifications:5 years supervisory experience in manufacturing environmentAbility to adapt and work in a changing environmentAbility to accurately follow detailed instructions and procedures.Proactive work habitsAbove average computer skillsStrong communication skills.Must be able to work in both a independent and team environment.Ability to delegate, train, and supervise subordinates   Physical demands:Ability to communicate orally with others.Standing on hard surface for extended periods.Move between different production areas and the warehouse.Hearing and vision within normal ranges is essential for safe conduct on the manufacturing floor and to meet job responsibilitiesAble to perform basic mathematic calculations.Good manual dexterity to meet job responsibilitiesGood reasoning ability is required to solve a wide range of problems.Occasional lifting up to 65 pounds   Work Environment:This job is indoors in a traditional manufacturing/warehouse setting. Activities will include both sitting and standing. These activities will occur in the production areas. Although the position is indoors there will be varying temperatures between   different areas.           Production SupervisorRev. 0Approved for Issue: Dave HerbenerMay 20, 2008",Sewing Supervisor Job in Greensboro,Full Time Employee,"Greensboro, NC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Sewing-Supervisor-Job-Greensboro-NC-US-166068389.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=7,,General/Other: Production/OperationsSewing and Tailoring,fdbbb58798e239cf8199f3ef26fd3071
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:27:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description                                  Equipment Specialist is responsible for managing the coordination, scheduling and auditing of regional vehicle maintenance, to include preventative service, mechanical and electrical repair to all fleet units. Requirements also include fleet maintenance management, repair expense controls, customer issue resolution for multiple locations. Essential Job Functions (other duties may be assigned):Coordinates vendor repairs for units including securing best pricing on parts and labor.                                 Promptly follow up on repairs to ensure quality and safety practices are adhered to with minimum cost and maximizing equipment utilization. Keep up on all unit preventative maintenance schedules to ensure they are being completed regularly.Ensure minimum wait time, competitive pricing, and optimal service to the driver and company by following best vendor selection practices.                                     Provide optimal service to drivers and company by maintaining contact both drivers and vendor on equipment status updates. Promote and adhere to cost improvement initiatives, policies and procedures. Maintain and update fleet maintenance file systems by region while maintaining accurate documentation using fleet maintenance pro. Actively monitor emails and phone systems. Minimum Requirements (education, experience, skills, licenses and/or certifications):High school diploma or equivalent1-3 years of transportation operations experience.1-3 years’ experience with fleet and/or tractor maintenance/technical repair background                                    Ability to read and interpret documentation such as safety requirements, maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.Excellent communication and organization skillsExcellent customer service skills, including dealing with difficult situationsStrong PC skills (Microsoft Office suite) TMW software knowledgeJD Edwards and SkyBitz knowledge preferred Essential Physical Requirements                                    The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an associate to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.  The associate must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds. While performing the duties of this position, the associate are regularly required standing, walk distances, talk, and/or hear. Sitting for extended periods of time. Working Conditions: Tasks generally performed in a normal office setting with minimal exposure to health/safety hazards",Equipment Specialist Job in East Liberty,Full Time,"East Liberty, OH 43319",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Equipment-Specialist-Job-East-Liberty-OH-US-166012867.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=19,,,bc95d55b71552ad9df74ae218d3b2f05
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:27:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manager to lead a fast paced injection molding operation.  Individual needs to show expertise incoordinating operations, support groups, and safety.   Essential Duties and Responsibilities ·         Directs, coordinates, and develops a group of 6 supervisors which are responsible for a 3 shift operation of 150 people that typically function on a 7 day work week.·         Working knowledge of GMP practices and works closely with management personnel to ensure that these as well as Continuous Improvement activities are implemented and followed.·         Leads Cost control activities.·         Leads the production area in conformance to ISO-13485 and ISO-16949 standards.·         Coordinates work-around plans for production schedules and priorities as a result of equipment failure or operating problems.·         Interacts closely with QC, and should have a working understanding of IQ, OQ, PQ, PPAP, and APQP systems.·         Little to no travel required. This job description indicates the general nature and level of work, duties and responsibilities expected of the incumbent.  The incumbent may be asked to perform other duties as required.  The job description may be changed if needed as determined by the Company. Required Competencies, Skills and Experience·         Five (5) to Ten (10) years of proven Management experience in the manufacturing industry·         Excellent communication, organizational and documentation skills·         Ability to accommodate a flexible schedule ·         Willingness to take a hands on role in a manufacturing environmentEducation and Job Experience Requirements·         Bachelor’s degree in Technical discipline preferredWork Environment ·         Production floor",Operations Manager Job in Rochester,Full Time,"Rochester, NY 14606","Ernie Green Industries, Inc.",http://jobview.monster.com/Operations-Manager-Job-Rochester-NY-US-165625615.aspx?mescoid=1100003001001&jobPosition=3,,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),8bf3a56904fbab19d50501c29faecc2e
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:37:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"About Us: Building Technology Engineers (BTE), a wholly owned subsidiary of EMCOR Group Inc., offers a comprehensive single-source solution for facilities services, including equipment repair and replacement, preventative and predictive maintenance, and facility/equipment operations. With more than 60 years of experience and our solid financial strength, we provide a wide variety of customized solutions that meet our customers needs. Job Title: HVAC Maintenance Technician - 2 Job Summary: Performs support for general building operations and needs.  Inspects, tests, and performs Operation & Maintenance (O&M) preventative maintenance inspections on mechanical, electrical and automatic temperature control equipment. Utilize results oriented strategies to ensure continuing operation. Essential Duties and Responsibilities: include the following. Other duties may be assigned. §  Performs mechanical work required for installation/maintenance of equipment, systems and facilities in accordance with diagrams, sketches, operation manuals, and manufacturers specifications. §  Performs preventative maintenance and repairs on all air & water distribution system equipment including air handlers, ductwork, fans & motors, dampers, mechanical cooling/chilled water system, condenser water system, heating & hot water system, pumps, potable & domestic water system, humidification, life safety systems, supplemental heating & cooling equipment, and sanitary systems & equipment.  Including but not limited to belt adjustments, oiling, greasing and cleaning of equipment or replacement of various types of mechanical and electrical equipment. Automation experience is required. §  Performs daily operation, inspects, maintains, repairs or assists in the repairs the buildings Fire Safety Systems when required. Must also stay educated on the operation of these systems either through manuals and or service representative training, when provided. §  Conducts daily/weekly tours of mechanical spaces, tenant/public areas, roofs, and building grounds. §  Respond to service calls/tenant requests for HVAC, plumbing, lighting, escorts, general carpentry & painting duties, key making, picture hanging, safely move furniture and equipment as needed, and provide support or assistants when needed. §  Communicate with the owner’s representative, or supervisor on the work performed and present status of the mechanical system.  Good customer service skills are a must in this Grade A office space environment. §  Stays abreast of changes (safety and code) in the field through seminars and other educational means. §  Provides information for input to client work order tracking system to initiate work orders for unscheduled jobs, develop materials lists for ordering, and may be required to provide technical support for projects. §  Responds to emergency situations and traces, troubleshoots and repairs problems; may wear a cell phone, pager and or carry a shop radio for rapid response. §  Conducts general housekeeping to mechanical/electrical rooms including sweeping, mopping and painting. §  Completes work in accordance with EMCOR Business Systems Standard Operating Procedures and Work Instructions. Qualifications:  To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Certificates, Licenses, Registrations §  Universal CFC Certification §  Technical degree in JVAC or a minimum of two years hand on experience in the HVAC trade industry. We offer our employees a competitive salary and comprehensive benefits package and are always looking for individuals with the talent and skills required to contribute to our continued growth and success.  EOE M/F/Vet/Disabled",HVAC Maintenance Technician -  Job in Boston,Full Time Employee,Location:,Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Maintenance-Technician-2-Job-Boston-MA-US-165176681.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=16,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a3cb136aec96b719d047a830780f1721
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:37:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Team Member-Industrial Housekeeping/JanitorialVoith Industrial Services Inc. is a leading provider of manufacturing support services to the global automotive industry. Our mission is to partner with industrial manufacturers by delivering manufacturing support services that made a measurable improvement in our customers' quality, uptime and total costEssential Duties and Responsibilities:Complete tasks in accordance with standardized quality checklistsContinually seek out opportunities to improve onsite activitiesMaster skills associated with the versatility matrixReview current best practices resulting in efficiencies relating to time, material usage, and safetyLive ""Safety is Your Life"" Program. Use proper personal protective equipment, i.e., hearing protection, steel toed shoes, safety glasses, etc., as required for the task at handAll other duties as assigned by Voith site managementCompetencies:One year of industrial experience and janitorial experience preferredCustomer Service Orientation - Satisfying customersAdaptability - Willingness to deal with unexpected challenges or circumstancesProblem Solving - Define problems and bring about viable solutionsServicing the Customer - Readily initiate actions to meet or exceed the needs of the customerStrong work ethicKnowledge, Skills, and Abilities:Communication Skills - Able to communicate with team members and managementLanguage Ability - Ability to understand written job instructionsMath Ability -Ability to perform simple addition, subtraction and multiplication of manhours / minutesReasoning Ability - Ability to conduct basic problem solvingPhysical Requirements: Frequently required to stand and walk on concrete and/or steel surface for up to 8-12 hours. Occasionally required to reach with hands and arms; climb or balance; stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl into confined spaces. You will be required to push, pull or carry 150 pounds occasionally and lift or carry up to 30 pounds often and up to 50 pounds occasionally. Our vision standard requires the employee to have close and distance vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and focus adjustment.Benefits:MedicalDentalVision401KVacationPaid HolidayEmployee AssistanceMust pass drug screen, background, and physical abilities test.Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",Janitorial/Industrial Housekeeping Job in Louisville,Full Time,"Louisville, KY 40213",All,http://jobview.monster.com/Janitorial-Industrial-Housekeeping-Job-Louisville-KY-US-165869363.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=11,,Entry Level,38aed89df14f6f79b4617d8c97bd3313
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:38:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Demand Planner  A leading manufacturing company located in South, NJ is seeking an experienced Demand Planner.The Demand Planner is responsible for developing and executing the Demand Plan that will enable the business to meet sales and service objectives. Collaboration with other members of the Supply Chain, Sales, Marketing, and Customer Support Teams is paramount to achieve these objectives.The ideal candidate will have exceptional analytical skills. KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:        Generate SKU level and Customer forecasts utilizing Demand Planning software ( Logility)        Assemble and analyze all data pertinent to creating the sales forecast (historical sales, market trends.    seasonality, promotions, and inventory)        Work collaboratively with Customers, Sales, and Marketing in developing forecasts.   Provide direction to other members of the Supply Chain in terms of forecasted demand and potential supply issues.        Participate in monthly SO&P meetings with Business Teams, reviewing recommended sales forecasts, inventory goals, and the impact of supply constraints on production plans.  EDUCATION/SKILLS/EXPERIENCE        Bachelor's degree in Math, Supply Chain, Business, or equivalent experience        Analytical abilities including ability to interpret and organize data from multiple sources        Understanding of ERP systems        Knowledge of business processes and cycles        Ability to utilize forecasting software ( Logility) to create statistical forecast        Effective Interpersonal/Communication Skills         Advanced Excel skills required along with other Microsoft Suite products        Detail oriented        1-3 years related experience. Salary range is 65K-75K and is based on experience. Forward resumes to jobsmart1025@gmail.com    ",Demand Planner Job in Neptune City,Full Time,"Neptune City, NJ",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Demand-Planner-Job-Neptune-City-NJ-US-165411486.aspx?mescoid=1300086001001&jobPosition=9,"65,000.00 - 75,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),891f3f30038a50395f9f10c65e510700
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:38:45,No,jobs.monster.com,"SERVICE AdministratorHeavy Equipment/Construction Industry  Marco Crane & Rigging Co., is an established Crane Rental Company since 1956. Marco Crane has maintained its number one market share in Arizona ranking in the top 20 in the U.S. and the top 50 in the world. Marco Crane along with Mardian Equipment, Mardian Concrete Pumping, Marco Rigging and Technology Testing, Inc.  has over 180 employees and operates in five different states in the Western U.S. Mardian Equipment is an established multi-state Equipment Dealer offering over 25 years of quality service in Equipment Sales; providing one stop shopping opportunities in Equipment Rentals; Parts & Rigging Sales; and Service that exceeds our competitors by providing Factory Trained Mechanics.  Mardian is an Equipment Dealer for Link-Belt, Elliott, Fassi, Shuttlelift, National and Schwing. See our website at www.marcocrane.com.The Service Administrator is responsible for increasing parts and service sales, directing daily service department activity in conjunction with other departments, and increasing efficiency of the parts and service department. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to, the following:  Plan, coordinate and direct the service operations for effective maintenance and repair services.·   Oversee all service requests, ensuring there is an estimate of labor to complete each request.·   Ensure that work orders for service requests are opened in a timely manner and all labor and expenses are properly tracked and reviewed prior to completion of order.·   Oversee all service work to be performed using the squawk system and maintaining log in order to prioritize, schedule and assign work efficiently.·   Oversee productivity and timesheets to ensure repairs are completed according to agree upon schedules and labor estimates. Enter timecards daily in the system.·    Document and ensure that all preventative maintenance is performed.·    Document and ensure that all inspections (i.e. DOT, OSHA, preventative maintenance) are performed in a timely manner.·    Identify changes that increase parts and service efficiencies.Ensure that work orders are open for repairs and that labor and expenses are tracked on the work orders.Provide customer estimates with input from the Foreman.Estimate and review customer invoicing. Responsible for providing the service department’s daily schedule by assigning personnel to jobs.In conjunction with Dispatch, post the daily schedule and service reports.Responsible for parts and rigging will call.Perform periodic cycle counts and year-end inventory count.Maintain stock orders and review reorder points to ensure efficient and economic inventory stock. Responsible for inventory on parts posted to work orders or sales orders.Receive parts and rigging.Responsible for shipping parts and rigging utilizing cost effect methods.Conduct cold calling and provide leads.Monitor open sales and purchase orders. Monitor parts department purchase orders and sales orders for completion.Assist with procurement and completion of parts and rigging orders.Process paperwork in a timely manner.Follow Company policy and procedures.Other duties as assigned.  Candidate Requirements: We are seeking a high-energy leader with strong attention to detail, exceptional customer service skills and excellent decision-making and problem solving experience to join our team.  ·   Knowledge or experience in the automotive, truck, material handling equipment and commercial construction equipment field.·   Ability to maintain effective relationships with other company employees. ·   Ability to work within a proactive team environment. Commitment to customer service. ·   Effective communications skills and the ability to understand and effectively carry out written and oral instructions. ·   3+ years in Related Industry.·    Excellent People Skills – proven record at being a part of a team.·    Heavy customer service experience.·    Strong understanding of building professional relationships to ensure strong communication lines are open and frequently utilized. Benefits Available: We offer excellent benefits, which include: ·         Competitive Salary·         Medical, Dental and Vision Health Insurance Benefits ·         8 Paid Holidays per Year·         10 Vacation Days– Accrual Based Benefit·         2 Personal Days per Year – Accrual Based Benefit·         5 Sick Days per Year  -  Accrual Based Benefit·         401(k) Plan with Company Match – Immediate opportunity to join the plan.·         ESOP – Employee Stock Ownership Plan·         Flexible Spending Account (FSA) We are excited about filling this position as soon as possible.  If you meet the Candidate Requirements and believe your experience aligns with the Service Administrator we look forward to receiving your resume.   ",Service Administrator Job in Lakeside,Full Time,"Lakeside, CA 92040",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Administrator-Job-Lakeside-CA-US-163760295.aspx?mescoid=4300715001001&jobPosition=2,,Experienced (Non-Manager),61c584f527be77f95086197d72f0b214
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:38:46,No,jobs.monster.com," Put Your Career in Motion! Join the Largest Public Transportation Authority in North AmericaAs  Bus Maintenance Supervisor, Exam No. 6303 Or Cleaner/Maintainer’s Helper (Mechanic Helper), Exam No. 6304 MTA Bus Company along with New York City Transit Department of Buses is the largest bus agency in North America.  MTA Bus including NYCT Department of Buses has over 18,000 employees and a fleet of 5,700 buses that transport 2.7 million daily riders.  The goal is to provide the public with safe, reliable and clean buses for service.   The MTA Bus Company is seeking multiple Bus Maintenance Supervisors and Cleaner/Maintainer Helpers. These positions offer an excellent compensation package which includes competitive compensation, comprehensive benefits, promotional opportunities and a diverse collection of work assignments.   JOB DESCRIPTION: Bus Maintenance Supervisor supervise Bus Maintainers (Chassis) and other maintenance and transportation titles performing the maintenance, installation, inspection, testing, alteration, shifting, and repair of buses and other automotive vehicles, and related bus shop equipment; plan work and monitor production levels and trends; use a computerized information system to access data; perform safety assessments and quality audits; perform diagnoses and troubleshooting of bus systems; research technical problems; perform inspection work and research on new equipment; forecast material, tool and equipment requirements; keep records and write reports; operate a bus for testing, evaluation or instructional purposes; and perform related work. Cleaner/Maintainer’s Helper (Mechanic Helper) clean, sweep and wash buses, depots, garages, shops and other MTA Bus Company facilities. They move refuse containers, pallets and other items using forklifts; operate powered/vehicle sweepers; and perform related work.  SALARY:Bus Maintenance Supervisor: $34.73 per hour for a 40-hour week increasing to $38.59 after 36 months of service.Cleaner/Maintainer’s Helper (Mechanic Helper):$16.39 per hour for a 40-hour week increasing to $27.48 after 60 months of service. Locations in JFK/Far Rockaway and Spring Creek: $15.14 per hour for a 40-hour week increasing to $25.39 between 36 to 48 months of service                   HOW TO OBTAIN AN APPLICATION:During the application period, you may obtain an Application for this examination online at http://web.mta.info/nyct/hr/appexam.htm  You may also receive an application in person by visiting the MTA New York City Transit Exam Information Center located at 180 Livingston Street, Lobby;  Brooklyn, New York.  Open Monday through Friday, from 9 AM to 3 PM. Directions: take the A, C, F or R trains to the Jay Street-Metro Tech Station, or the 2 or the 3 train to the Hoyt Street Station. For further information you may contact thee Exam Information Hotline: (718) 566-JOBS (5627) APPLICATION INFORMATION:Bus Maintenance Supervisor:·         Application Deadline: April 8, 2016·         Filing Fee: $85.00 ·         Test Type: Structured Interview to be held the week of June 6, 2016  (subject to change) Cleaner/Maintainer’s Helper (Mechanic Helper):·         Application Deadline: April 8, 2016·         Filing Fee: $47.00·         Test Type: Education and Experience FOLLOW US ON:Twitter.com@NYCTSubwayScoopFacebook: MTA New York City TransitLinkedIn: New York City Transit MTA Bus Company is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Bus Maintenance Supervisor/Maintainer’s Helper Job in New York City,Full Time,"New York City, NY 10004","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Bus-Maintenance-Supervisor-Maintainer%E2%80%99s-Helper-Job-New-York-City-NY-US-165000279.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=8,15.14 - 34.73 $ /hourSee Job Description,,eca03ec5f2b31569b0904cb569149cdc
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:45:12,No,jobs.monster.com,"We Serve our Community to bring Healing through our Commitment to care. We offer care that is culturally competent and matched to patient needs, including direct interpretation services in multiple languages including Spanish, Vietnamese, French, Somali, and Oromo. Our partnership with various agencies throughout the community, as well as multiple service sites is part of our patient-centered approach.We are currently seeking a full time Custodial Worker!Successful candidate must have solid experience & advanced knowledge of:• High School Diploma or GED equivalent.• Basic Computer and data entry skills.• One to two years of specific experience preferred.• Knowledge of building cleaning practices, supplies, and equipment;knowledge of grounds and building maintenance methods, materials, and equipment.Successful candidate must be able to perform primary functions of position:• Clean, sanitize, and maintain all areas of the clinic.• Fill and maintain clinic-wide dispensers.• Provide patient clean-up as directed.• Respond to and report issues regarding fire, accident, natural or man-made disaster incidents, and theft or other criminal activity.• These functions are not all inclusiveExcellent benefit package for full-time employees includes paid holidays, generous PTO accrual; health; dental and vision insurance; cafeteria plan; employer paid long and short term disability; employer paid life insurance; wellness program; 401 (K) retirement plan with up to 5% employer match.Background check & drug screen required. SCHC is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",Custodial Worker Job in Sioux City,Full Time,"Sioux City, IA 51105",,http://jobview.monster.com/Custodial-Worker-Job-Sioux-City-IA-US-165167797.aspx?mescoid=3700622001001&jobPosition=5,,Experienced (Non-Manager),0314e2a219c3f1a7e203e5468e3bf53b
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:45:14,No,jobs.monster.com,"CNC Machine Operators Seeking CNC machine operators with 1-2years of prior experience running CNC Lathes.  Must be able to handle own tooling, offsets and read/work from blueprints.  Operates and adjusts CNC machining equipment to perform standard and repetitive sequences of drilling, reaming, tapping, milling, turning, boring and other machine operations.  Load and unload machined parts. Inspection for quality control - using micrometers, calipers or other measuring devises. Must be able to lift, push and pull up to 30lbs.  Candidates must have prior CNC machining knowledge with Mori Seiki, Mazak, Okuma or Haas would be ideal.Must have good math and mechanical aptitude, be able to use measuring devises for quality inspection.Must to able to train on different CNC machines.Must pass pre-employment background check and drug screen.Must wear steel toe shoes/boots. High school diploma or GED.Positions are 2nd, 3rd or Weekend shifts. ",CNC Machine Operators Job in Janesville,Full Time,"Janesville, WI 53545",All,http://jobview.monster.com/CNC-Machine-Operators-Job-Janesville-WI-US-166067525.aspx?mescoid=5100929001001&jobPosition=13,14.00 - 15.00 $ /year,Experienced (Non-Manager),c8e5cd0284245122337285f124acf809
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:53:17,No,jobs.monster.com,"Description:We are currently looking for an experienced Service Manager for a growing operation in the Bridgewater, NJ area. The ideal manager will have over 5 years of management experience in the equipment industry and have a technical background working as a mechanic. You will be responsible for all aspects of the service department from dealing with customers, scheduling daily work, assigning work to technicians and ensuring the profitability of the department for future growth. You must be very well organized, provide superior customer service at all times, and be computer proficient.Compensation:$75,000 - $90,000/year. Salary offered will depend on previous experience. Full benefits and insurance are also offered along with a matching 401(K) plan.Shifts:Days, 8:00am - 5:00pm, Monday to Friday. Must be flexible to work extended hours as needed.We encourage all who are qualified and interested to apply in confidence, however, only those in consideration will be contacted for this role.  ",Service Manager - Heavy Equipment Job in Bridgewater,Full Time Employee,"Bridgewater, NJ",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Manager-Heavy-Equipment-Job-Bridgewater-NJ-US-165092461.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=7,,,5c8ef349ab095183e1257162fb9c75f8
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:12:59:08,No,jobs.monster.com,"Experienced diesel truck technician needed for growing privately owned truck dealership in Sarasota.  We service all makes and models of medium to heavy duty trucks. We offer a competitive wage, monthly bonuses and pay for 100% of the employee's medical, life and disability insurance, as well as 40% of the dental coverage and a 401k match.Our technicians also earn an annual tool allowance and boot reimbursement.We believe in doing the right things by our customers and our employees. We share our financial results and goals on a quarterly basis with all employees.Relocation assistance is available for out of area candidates.",Diesel Truck Technician Job in Sarasota,Full Time,"Sarasota, FL 34243",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Diesel-Truck-Technician-Job-Sarasota-FL-US-165229552.aspx?mescoid=4900871001001&jobPosition=19,Eligible for monthly bonus,Experienced (Non-Manager),94bc2631f6bd472ce38027a7062a7a19
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:00:25,No,jobs.monster.com,"Oakleaf Property Management (Oakleaf PM) strives to maintain a commitment to excellence with a solid foundation built on achievement. Goals toward total client satisfaction and pride in performance are instilled in every employee. Success is built on the foundation of dedication and ambition, qualities which Oakleaf PM looks for in potential employees.Oakleaf Property Management Company has an opening for a Full- Time Maintenance Technician. The successful candidate must possess the technical skills required to provide quality turns, handle resident service request and perform preventive maintenance. Must have above average Customer Service skills to communicate with residents, co-workers and vendors. Experience in related field of work helpful; carpentry, general maintenance, plumbing.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: Include the following but are not limited to the job specifications contained herein. Additional duties or job functions that can be performed safely may be required as deemed necessary by supervisory personnel.Performs various community maintenance functions. Records activity in maintenance log. These functions may include, but not limited to:-Complete make-ready process of vacant apartments as directed by the Community Manager-Responsible for the completion of all maintenance service requests as assigned in a timely manner.-Light Bulb Changes-Caulking-Filter Changes-Painting-Lock Repairs-Install/Repair Window Coverings-General carpentry-Plumbing Work scheduleMonday – Friday, with rotational on-call weekend and holidays. Must have own transportation and basic tools.Oakleaf Property Management Company offers a competitive salary with a benefit package, including health, dental, vision, 401K, paid time off and holiday pay.",Maintenance Technician Job in Sioux City,Full Time,"Sioux City, IA 51105",,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Job-Sioux-City-IA-US-164547367.aspx?ch=siouxcity&mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=3,,Experienced (Non-Manager),ca5628e45cf4b0e8bf32ebcbeeda6c0d
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:08:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Maintenance Technician is responsible for the repair and maintenance of the plant equipment to ensure maximum production quantity and quality, while supporting the policies, goals, and objectives of the company.  Job Responsibilities: Perform preventive maintenance,Install new equipment,Perform all duties related to boiler operation and maintenance,Perform all repairs and/or construction projects as assigned,Troubleshoot and repair production equipment as necessary (mechanical/electrical),Troubleshoot and repair plumbing, carpentry, and refrigeration duties,Play an active role on the emergency response team,Play an active role in the safety and loss control for the plant;Perform additional responsibilities as deemed necessary and as assigned by supervisor. Qualifications:  High school diploma or GED required.Industrial Maintenance degree or equivalent experience in a related field is preferred.Must be able to obtain forklift certification once hired.Must be able to work independently.Must have mechanical ability,Must have good welding skills (all types) or be willing to learn/develop them,Must have knowledge of electronics,Must possess good manual dexterity,Must maintain neat and clean work areasMust be safety minded in performance of dutiesProficient with basic computer operations.Pre-employment physical, drug screen, background and reference checks, and acceptable motor vehicle record required.Have ability to complete all required paperwork legibly, accurately and timely.",Maintenance Technician/Mechanic Job in Hoven,Full Time,"Hoven, SD 57450",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technician-Mechanic-Job-Hoven-SD-US-166069284.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=5,,,91ea78349a40bb5492b4e392bdfbb827
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:08:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"Cookeville Regional Medical Center, The Proven Choice Seeking Full-Time HVAC Technician A successful candidate will be responsible for the upkeep of all HVAC/refrigeration and air handling systems within the Medical Center. Meet compliance with city, state, federal, NFPA and JCAHO regulations relating applicable codes. Installation, troubleshoot, preventive maintenance, repair and service to all HVAC/refrigeration systems. Performs boiler watch, and helps other trades as needed/requested. Responsible for completing assigned task within the PM program. EDUCATION: High school diploma or equivalent preferred. EXPERIENCE: a. Trade school with courses in A/C, refrigeration, electrical required. b. Experience in another health care facility desirable. c. Must have minimum of three years previous experience. d. Computer experience needed. e. PLC knowledge desirable. f. Knowledge of chillers desirable. Apply online at: www.crmchealth.org EOEThis job listing brought to you by The Crossville Chronicle",HVAC Technician Job in  | Monster.com function wrap(EL,Full Time,38501,Energy and Utilities,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/HVAC-Technician-Job-US-165734842.aspx?ch=newscc&mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=17,,Experienced (Non-Manager),f44d823347c9f9975507e691ec6fd710
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:17:34,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB DESCRIPTIONLocation:Jersey City, NJ Job Title:  Diesel Mechanic Job Description:In this position you will be responsible for handling the assigned inspection and repair of heavy duty trucks to include preventative and non-scheduled maintenance, including inspecting, troubleshooting, repairing and/or replacing components and systems. The service technician willing to work in the shop and on the road providing mobile service. Must have own tools and be willing to work 6-days per/week with overtime pay. Must be fluent in English and have the ability to read and comprehend instruction manuals, interpret diagnostic charts for purpose of learning to troubleshoot and analyze repair of a mechanical or electrical nature. Skills Qualifications: Legally eligible to work in the United States and of 21-years of age or olderMinimum 2years and extensive knowledge of diesel engines, repairs and serviceValid Driver’s License is required. CDL License a plus, but not requiredMust have experience working with HydraulicsPerform diagnostic, repair and maintenance on trucks, construction equipment, including auxiliary components in accordance with manufacturer’s specifications.Knowledgeable in the safe operation of all garage tools, diagnostic equipment, lifts, hoists and jacking equipmentIdentify and obtain necessary replacement parts as needed to execute repairs.Adhere to manufacturer’s warranty policies and procedures.Shall be consistently capable of independently analyzing and safely resolving problemsAbility to work in fast-paced environmentWorking knowledge of air brakes, air brake systems and brake adjustmentsPerform DOT inspections on trucks and experience with injectors, starters and turbosMust have ability to diagnose and repair all electrical systems on trucksRequired to complete routine replacements, will make best value and safety decisions to continue to operate, repair or replace, and then performs technical repairs and/or replacement.Successfully pass pre-employment (post offer) drug screen, background and motor vehicle records check and the Department of Transportation (DOT) Physical. Compensation/Benefits:Weekly rate of pay + overtimeMedical/Dental/Vision BenefitsTerm Life Insurance401K Retirement Plan with company matchPaid Time Off (PTO) Vacation, Personal and Sick Days Employment Status:In accordance with the Company’s Union Collective Bargaining Agreement, the employee will have to be a member of that unit.",Mechanic Diesel Job in Jersey City,Full Time,"Jersey City, NJ",Waste Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Mechanic-Diesel-Job-Jersey-City-NJ-US-163944524.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=17,21.00 - 30.00 $ /yearOvertime,Experienced (Non-Manager),28d113eb13dbd23efa8a94a3134a0341
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:19:22,No,jobs.monster.com,"IES is a national provider of industrial products and infrastructure services to a variety of end markets, including electrical and communications contracting solutions for the commercial, industrial, residential and renewable energy markets. IES is publicly traded on NASDAQ under the symbol IESC. As of the end of IES's 2015 fiscal year ending September 30, 2015, IES produced over $574 million in revenue and employed close to 3,000 employees at over 60 locations across the United States. From office buildings to wind farms, industrial complexes to housing developments, our employees and design professionals design, build, and maintain the systems that empower lives. Our commitment to our employees is reflected by our actions: Safety is Priority One – and our record shows itCompetitive PayCompany 401K plan with Employer Contribution MatchCompany Paid Time OffCompany Paid Life InsuranceChoice of Medical Coverage including Prescription and Short Term Disability PlansChoice of Dental and Vision CoverageOptional Long-term Disability, Critical Illness, Accident, Legal and Pet CoverageAuto and Home Insurance Discount ProgramsJob Summary: The Project Lead will act as the on-site coordinator and crew supervisor for voice and data installation projects. The Project Lead's task will be to ensure job completion according to Company and customer quality and safety requirements while supervising the efficiency of the staff assigned to the project. Job Duties and Responsibilities: 1. Consistently run major project crews; assume responsibility for effective performance and provide necessary training; assume responsibility for adherence to Company and customer safety and quality guidelines and hold weekly safety meetings; initiate performance related communications and escalate to Project Manager if necessary. 2. Coordinate with Project Manager to ensure productivity, job completion and compliance with project budget. 3. Fully complete all IES COMMERCIAL and project paperwork accurately and on time (specifically timesheets, material transfers, work orders, change orders, tool transfers and others as required). 4. Perform quality checks; coordinate moves and cut sheets for voice and data cross connects; prepare red-lined as-built drawings. 5. Serve as main on-site customer contact for questions and/or concerns; attend facility and constructions meetings when required. 6. Perform work consistently demonstrating a detailed level of technical knowledge; troubleshoot and resolve technical issues as they arise. 7. Other responsibilities as assigned. Tools: Basic Hand Tools: screwdriver (regular and Phillips), drywall saw, torpedo level, tape measure, snips (with belt sheath), pliers (needle nose and channel locks), hammer, cable stripper, flashlight and gloves. Trade Tools: punch tool with 110 block and 66 block blade, 6/8 position combo crimp tool, Krone/3M/BIX, butt set, volt-ohmmeter, 4-pair continuity tester and 5-gang punch toolPhysical and Mental Requirements: • Must be self-motivated, positive in approach, professional and help create, develop and implement project process improvement(s). • Must promote the Company culture and mission to all employees, vendors, clients and business partners. • Must be able to act as the Company liaison for interface with customer representative(s). • Must possess proven problem solving skills, critical thinking skills and the ability to effectively read, write and give oral presentation(s). • Must be able to work at heights, off of a ladder and in confined spaces, lift up to 50 pounds and move up to 75 pounds. • Must be able to see and distinguish different colors, read small print and hear and recognize audible signals such as dial tones. • Must be able to travel within the branch territory and/or regional territory as needed. Education, Certification, License, and Skill Requirements: • Must possess at least a High School diploma or GED equivalency • Must possess a minimum of three (3) years of experience in telecommunications or related technical field. • Must be able to terminate fiber. • Must possess a minimum of six (6) months supervisory and/or managerial experience. • Must possess and be able to effectively use the tools listed above. • Must have proven skill level to interpret blueprints and other project documents, including but not limited to, specifications, reporting and quality requirements. • Must know the universal communications color codes. • Must be proficient with Microsoft Office (Word, Excel and MS Project) • Must meet Company minimum driving standards. BICSI Certification preferred.PI93308127Apply Here",Project Lead Job in Des Moines,"Full Time, Employee","Des Moines, IA 50301",Construction - Industrial Facilities and Infrastructure,http://jobview.monster.com/Project-Lead-Job-Des-Moines-IA-US-165545262.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=13,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,1b45fcb9e89fbc7e93728789bc602ccf
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:19:40,No,jobs.monster.com,"Manufacturing Test Technician- Secaucus, NJ  TrueBlue, is looking forManufacturing Test Technicians in your area to work with one of our premier clients. At TrueBlue we value and respect our employees. When you work for TrueBlue you’re not just joining a company but joining a family. If you’re the type of person who gives 100% to what you do, we want to talk to you. We’re not looking for someone who can just get the job done. We are looking for someone who can also be our goodwill ambassador.  TrueBlue Values: Be Optimistic, Be Passionate, Be Accountable, Be Respectful, Be True  Job DescriptionResponsible for set up, trouble shooting and operation of automated assembly equipment within the assembly areaAble to use general/automated laboratory/production equipmentMaintenance to ensure the optimum performance of the electronic and hardware systemsAble to plan use of equipment, materials, production documents and their own personal time efficiently Able to complete/review production-related documentation accuratelyMaintain a clean and safe work areapractices as outlined in the Standard Operating Procedures  Job Requirements/QualificationPrevious electronics manufacturing experience1 year of experience preferredRequires PC aptitude and ability to effectively use hand toolsDedicated approach to product quality, and quality standardsStrong PC, troubleshooting skills, and technical background requiredUnderstands the various lights / buzzers associated with the sorter - conveyer belts - in truck conveyorsAbility to stand, bend for duration of shiftSufficient manual dexterity Must be able to be on your feet for extended periods of time throughout work shiftMust have outstanding work performance, attitude and ethic at all timesExcellent attendance  Pay Rate: $12.00 per hour                                      Shift:1st shift 9:00am-6:00pmFor immediate consideration please apply online: www.laborready.comOr email your resume to: 1466-br@laborready.comOr apply in personat ourbranch office is located at:  630 Newark Avenue, Jersey CityNJ07306   TrueBlue, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We embrace diversity at all levels of our organization and encourage all qualified employees to explore this opportunity.",Manufacturing Test Technician Job in Secaucus,Full Time,"Secaucus, NJ 07094",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-Test-Technician-Job-Secaucus-NJ-US-165853496.aspx?mescoid=1900306001001&jobPosition=12,Will be discussed during the interview,Entry Level,19760321a2a20b13d9ba20bdadbbe7fd
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:22:19,No,jobs.monster.com,"C.R. England is looking for entry level Truck Drivers, if you do not have a Class A license not to worry – We will help train you, and place you…Guaranteed! Become a Class A CDL Truck Driver with C.R. England! At C.R. England, we have had successful Truck Drivers from various industries and job types. Whether you are currently working in Construction, Maintenance, Manufacturing, Security, Transportation, Logistics, Operations, Warehouse, Electrical, Forklift Operator, Supply Chain you can increase the size of your paycheck and start a new career today! Entry Level - No Experience - No problem! Class A CDL training from a C. R. England partner truck driving school will give you the experience you need. Currently, we partner with five trucking schools located throughout the country that provide Class A CDL training for individuals seeking a new career. C. R. England GUARANTEES a job to students who complete the course at a C.R. England partner truck driving school. Career opportunities at C.R. England include: Company, Team, Lease, Dedicated, Regional, Intermodal, Recovery, Relief and Trainer positions. Benefits: Great Training Competitive Pay Top of-the-line Equipment (You’ve seen our trucks and tractors) Strong Driver Support Program Graduated Pay Scale -- experienced drivers earn higher base pay, so start now! Mileage, Safety and Fuel Saving Bonus Awards for Safety Liberal Family Rider Policy Health and Life Insurance Vacation Retirement Plan 401k w/Company Participation Why C.R. England C.R. England is a stable company that has been in the business for more than 90 years and currently employs over 6,000 drivers! Home Time - C.R. England is a family oriented business and values both our employees and their families. We have top of the line equipment and high tech services and are continuing to grow every day. As a C.R. England driver, you will have various career opportunities such as becoming a company driver or a team driver with your spouse, friend or a driver matched to you by C.R. England. You can also earn extra money in as little as six months by becoming a C.R. England Truck Driving Trainer. We also offer Independent Contractor opportunities with the ability to own your own truck in as little as two years. If you want an exciting career as a truck driver, C. R. England, Inc. is the place for you. Start your new career today! Click APPLY C.R. England does not currently accept applications from Alaska, Florida, Hawaii, Montana, North Dakota, or South Dakota.",Manufacturing – Change Career to - Truck Driver – Entry Level,Full Time,"Providence, RI",Transport and Storage - Materials,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-%E2%80%93-Change-Career-to-Truck-Driver-%E2%80%93-Entry-Level-No-Experience-Full-Time-w-Training-Job-Providence-RI-US-165910318.aspx?mescoid=5301045001001&jobPosition=17,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,2a6ffb7e42db01bf731a8e8bfcb557a8
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:22:20,No,jobs.monster.com,"IMKO Workforce Solutions Since 1972 IMKO Workforce Solutions has exciting new opportunities in your area. Farm Hands Trailer Mechanics Diesel Mechanics Supervisor Mechanics Please apply to tyler@imko.com or call 712-224-2480 ext. 16 to talk to Tyler and set up an appointment. 827 Gordon Drive, Sioux City, IA 51101 Located in the strip mall behind IHOP restaurant",New Opportunities - Multiple Positions Job in Sioux City,Full Time,"Sioux City, IA 51101",Staffing/Employment Agencies,http://jobview.local-jobs.monster.com/New-Opportunities-Multiple-Positions-Job-Sioux-City-IA-US-165275583.aspx?ch=yankton&mescoid=9901111000004&jobPosition=12,,Experienced (Non-Manager),2d8d2842c61ad34d8d880555052d45cf
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:22:21,No,jobs.monster.com,"Have you ever considered living the “Aloha” lifestyle?  If you are ready to move to one of the most beautiful places on the planet, we want to talk to you.  Sigs Collision Centers is the only multi-store collision repair company in the state of Hawaii.  We have experienced tremendous growth and need to expand our team.  We have multiple positions and are looking for candidates with senior level experience over one or more stores. The manager will be responsible for meeting or exceeding sales targets by offering superior customer service and managing workflow through the shop. You will oversee staff to ensure accurate estimates are written, customers are continually informed, and the files are updated and closed on time.  Successful managers actively participate in solving problems that impact the speed and quality of the repair. This position plays a key role in ensuring that Sigs’ Customer Satisfaction Index (CSI) ratings are remain at the top of our peer group.Qualifications:·         Minimum 2 years’ experience managing a collision repair shop with annual sales in excess of $4 million per year·         Demonstrated ability to push a high volume of work through shop and to reduce cycle time·         Thorough knowledge of automobile repair estimating, including relevant software programs (CCC One & Audatex)·         Excellent sales abilities and overall communication skills – demonstrated ability to relate well to diverse audiences·         Ability to effectively manage multiple projects simultaneously and independently in a fast-paced work environment·         Must maintain a valid state driver’s license in order to drive any customer or company vehicle·         iCAR Platinum preferred Candidates must have a proven track record of excellent customer relations and the ability to lead.  We are seeking individuals who want to be part of something special.  We are the largest & best collision repair organization in the state, and we are building the team to take us to the next level. We offer highly competitive pay with incentives.  We have a benefits package that includes medical, dental, supplemental benefits, discounts, and more.  We have paid vacations, holidays, and sick time.Submit your resume, cover letter, and salary requirements for consideration.  All inquiries will remain confidential.",Collision Repair General Manager Job in Honolulu,Full Time,"Honolulu, HI 96817",Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Collision-Repair-General-Manager-Job-Honolulu-HI-US-165912190.aspx?mescoid=4900852001001&jobPosition=7,Base pay plus aggressive incentive plan,Manager (Manager/Supervisor of Staff),4e934545c1af58f03d8f61e2d07302ac
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:22:23,No,jobs.monster.com,"About CBRE (NYSE: CBG): At CBRE, you are empowered to take your career path into your own hands. Enjoy workplace flexibility in a global organization with tremendous scale. Work in an inclusive and collaborative environment with supportive teammates. Come experience the employee advantage at CBRE. CBRE has a long-standing commitment to providing equal employment opportunity to all qualified applicants regardless of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, veteran status, political belief, or any other basis protected by applicable law. As a Fortune 500 worldwide leader in real estate services, CBRE’s more than 70,000 professionals provide exceptional outcomes for clients in 60+ countries. When it comes to real estate, CBRE sees potential everywhere. We turn scale into strength, expense into performance, and property into prosperity. Visit CBRE.com.JOB SUMMARYPlans, implements, coordinates and manages all mechanical operations, maintenance, communications, energy management, and manpower development programs for a facility, campus or portfolio of buildings.AS Scope: Typically supports a multi-property portfolio with multiple owners.ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIESManages the building's operational accounts and assists in development of operating and capital budgets.Assists in operations and maintenance issues, troubleshooting and problem solving as required.Recommends and implements improvements for preventive maintenance programs on an on-going basis and develop/maintain effective building-specific maintenance and safety procedure manuals.Coordinates maintenance efforts with outside contractors, tenant finish personnel and technicians. Oversees all building systems including fire/life safety, plumbing, HVAC and electrical issues and must remain current with latest HVAC technology trends.Maintains on-going communication with tenants, clients, owners, facility management team and vendors.May assist in solicitation and acquisition of new management contracts. Coordinates development and maintenance of as-built drawings.Responds to all emergency situations quickly (fire, evacuation, equipment failure etc.) and customer concerns.Implements and administers inventory control programs/purchase parts and supplies.Develops specifications and assists in solicitation and administration of maintenance/repair service contracts.Establishes and monitors programs to ensure compliance with applicable codes, requisitions, government agency and company directives as relates to building operations.Performs other duties as assigned.SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIESProvides formal supervision to individual employees within single functional or operational area. Approves subordinate's recommendations for staff recruitment, selection, promotion, advancement, corrective action and termination. Effectively recommends same for direct reports to next level management for review and approval. Plans and monitors appropriate staffing levels and utilization of labor, including overtime. Prepares and delivers performance appraisal for staff. Mentors and coaches team members to further develop competencies. Leads by example and models behaviors that are consistent with the company's values.SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIESProvides formal supervision to individual employees within single functional or operational area. Approves subordinate's recommendations for staff recruitment, selection, promotion, advancement, corrective action and termination. Effectively recommends same for direct reports to next level management for review and approval. Plans and monitors appropriate staffing levels and utilization of labor, including overtime. Prepares and delivers performance appraisal for staff. Mentors and coaches team members to further develop competencies. Leads by example and models behaviors that are consistent with the company's values.QUALIFICATIONSTo perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.EDUCATION and EXPERIENCEBachelor's degree (BA/BS) from four-year college or university and a minimum of four years experience and/or training. Or equivalent combination of education and experience. Knowledge and understanding of all applicable practices and techniques, laws, project controls and environmental regulations to include safety regulations.CERTIFICATES and/or LICENSESUniversal CFC certification required. Additional certification in three or more of the following: HVAC, electrical, mechanical, HVAC and refrigeration systems, process controls, mechanical power transmissions, painting, plumbing, carpentry or engine repair. Certifications/licenses as may be required by local or state jurisdictions.COMMUNICATION SKILLSExcellent written and verbal communication skills. Strong organizational and analytical skills. Ability to provide efficient, timely, reliable and courteous service to customers. Ability to effectively present information.Ability to respond effectively to sensitive issues.FINANCIAL KNOWLEDGERequires advanced knowledge of financial terms and principles. Ability to calculate intermediate figures such as percentages, discounts, and commissions. Conducts advanced financial analysis.REASONING ABILITYAbility to comprehend, analyze, and interpret complex documents. Ability to solve problems involving several options in situations. Requires advanced analytical and quantitative skills.OTHER SKILLS and/or ABILITIESPhysical requirements to include stooping, standing, climbing and frequent lifting of a minimum of 50 lbs. Must have the ability to operate an EMS and CMMS system. Intermediate skills with Microsoft Office Suite. Ability to handle multiple projects and make decisions.SCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITYDecisions made with thorough understanding of procedures, company policies, and business practices to achieve general results and deadlines. Responsible for setting work unit and/or project deadlines. Errors in judgment may cause short-term impact to department. Additional Information:",Chief Building Engineer Supervisor Job in Miami,Full Time Employee,"Miami, FL 33101",,http://jobview.monster.com/Chief-Building-Engineer-Supervisor-Job-Miami-FL-US-165853034.aspx?mescoid=1100041001001&jobPosition=13,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,c99ddf97062efb6d683b55284a4c5a56
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:22:24,No,jobs.monster.com,"Deli Express Production Facility in Eden Prairie is looking for an experienced second-shift Production Assemblers to work 4:00 pm to 12:30 am, Monday through Friday. The Assemblers make sandwiches on high speed production lines. Duties include placing bread, meat, cheese, packaging, supply runnings, etc. **$500 Hiring Bonus at 90 days****FREE Sandwiches while you work**REQUIREMENTS:Must be 18 years oldMust be able to speak and understand EnglishMust be able to work with all kinds of meats (including pork) and cheesesPrevious assembly or food experience a plusPrevious experience conducting performance reviews a plusAbility to stand and be on the production floor in approximately 30-40 degree temperature for up to 8 hours per day COMPANY BENEFITS:This is an hourly position starting at $12.00 per hour.Medical, Dental, Life, Disability Insurances.401k Plan with a company match after 1 year.Flexible Spending Accounts.Paid Time Off/Vacation.Paid Holidays. Please apply in person at Deli Express, 16101 West 78th Street, Eden Prairie, MN 55344. We are located on the corner of Highway 5 and Fuller Road. ORPlease apply online at www.deliexpress.com.Under Careers, click on “Job Opportunities” and “Apply Now.” Search for and click Production Assembler to register and submit a resume online.In order to maintain a fair and consistent staffing process, all applications must be submitted through in person for production positions. No mailed, emailed or faxed resumes or applications will be considered. No phone calls or agencies please. ",Production Line Assemblers - nd shift Job in Eden Prairie,Full Time Employee,"Eden Prairie, MN 55344",Manufacturing - OtherTransport and Storage - Materials Food and Beverage Production,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Line-Assemblers-2nd-shift-Job-Eden-Prairie-MN-US-165970742.aspx?mescoid=5100918001001&jobPosition=2,12.00 - 12.00 $ /hour,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,eec4c69e736728365110ca3e2dbb77cf
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:24:09,No,jobs.monster.com,"Our client is currently seeking a Laboratory Technician. Operation and maintenance of laboratory equipment and instrumentation to ensure accurate analysis.This job will have the following responsibilities:Analyzing incoming raw material, in process and finished product samples, input data into LabSoft and communicate vital analysis data to the concerned production areas. Test and evaluate standard analyses per standard protocol. Maintain quality control standards and instrumentation. Actively participate in the review, validation and training of procedures and instructions.Actively participates in the implementation and training for new equipment. Actively participates and supports and plant safety processes such as STARS, SPA, SSP, Safety Committees and housekeeping inspections. Have a sound knowledge of the laboratory equipment, instruments and procedures required for testing, recording and reporting data. Have a working knowledge of statistics and basic chemistry. Have sound knowledge in trouble-shooting of: equipment, instruments or testing problems.Work cooperatively with other technicians as well as personnel of other departments of the plants. Maintain expertise in each function. Follow laboratory procedures, work instructions and policies.Qualifications & Requirements:High School Degree. This position’s work schedule requires working a 12 hour rotating shift. Must be a multi-tasking individual, who can take ownership of their work. Must be technically strong with ability to work collaboratively with different plants and functions, as well as, be able to function independently. Must have knowledge in laboratory practices and analysis. Excellent communication skills and leadership abilities.  Preferred Skills, Education, and Experience: Previous polymer analysis experience in a chemical manufacturing plant.  Associates is a plus ",Laboratory Technician Job in Marcus Hook,"Full Time, Employee","Marcus Hook, PA",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Laboratory-Technician-Job-Marcus-Hook-PA-US-165981799.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=4,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,29f3ad8c82bf766edf449d40eef1efdf
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:46:15,No,jobs.monster.com,"JOB SUMMARY:The cargo tank mechanic will inspect, service, repair, and maintain trucks and equipment while ensuring and maintaining safety regulations. This includes repairs, inspections, and preventative maintenance on equipment as necessary to ensure proper operating condition.DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:1. Maintains service logs and records of maintenance on vehicles and motorized equipment using TMT software2. Keeps tools, equipment, and work areas clean, organized and in good working condition3. Performs tank and DOT inspections, such as HM183, on cargo tanks4. Perform repairs on MC-307, DOT-407, and DOT-412 tanks5. Occasional welding for repairs may be necessary6. Able to install, troubleshoot, and repair cargo tanks and accessories7. Performs preventative maintenance on equipment and maintains spill kits on trucks8. Additional duties as assignedEXPERIENCE AND SKILL REQUIREMENTS:• 3+ years experience with DOT or pressure tanks• High school diploma or equivalent required• Previous Mig & Tig welding experience required• Experience with HM183 inspections• Previous experience in fleet shop preferred• Post-secondary vocational education strongly preferred• Driver’s License required, Class A CDL preferred• Previous experience with TMT preferred",Cargo Tank Mechanic Job in Pasadena,Full Time,"Pasadena, TX 77507","Travel, Transportation and Tourism",http://jobview.monster.com/Cargo-Tank-Mechanic-Job-Pasadena-TX-US-164150613.aspx?mescoid=4900888001001&jobPosition=14,,Experienced (Non-Manager),c01e31fdadfbb618f7ce5ce347bd5ec9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:13:47:02,No,jobs.monster.com," Immediate Openings! 1st shift! Neenah! Job Description: Assembling products so must have excellent eye-hand coordination. They will be largely working with their hands, whether to directly manipulate components, use hand tools, which could be sharp, or use large mechanical equipment to cut, bond, etc.Individuals will be making, inspecting and/or testing KC products (diapers/feminine products). Employees will be working on various projects as assigned by the lead. You may use tools such as rotary blades, cutting shields, scissors and rulers and use machines including glue guns, bonding machines, sewing machines and scales. Assembler Job Duties:Able to stand or sit for long periods of time; often doing repetitive motionsMaintains safe and clean working environment by complying with procedures, rules, and guidelines.Documents actions by completing production and quality forms.Has basic understanding and use of Microsoft– Word, ExcelAble to read and use a ruler marked by Inches and MillimetersWorks well in group settings or alone.Ability to learn and work with hand-held and light machinery in the making of product components (scissors, rotary cutter, die-cutting, embossing, clicker, hot glue gun, etc.)Assembles components/materials to create, inspect and package products.Adaptability to work in a rapidly changing environment.Has good interpersonal skillsHas good written/oral communication skills.Good eye-hand coordinationAble to lift up to 50lbs-Some assembly jobs will require strength to lift heavy objects during the assembly process. Job RequirementsQualifications:Top candidates should be creative, have good hand/eye coordination and possess the ability to work independently. You must be able to stand / sit for long periods of time and lift up to 50 pounds. Sewing skills are helpful.High school diploma or equivalent Computer skills with ability to utilize Word and Excel programsDrug screen, background check requiredPositions are project based; can be long term, intermittent. Casual dress attire. Steel toed shoes are mandatory.Hours: Monday – Friday 6:00am – 2:30pm ",Lab Assistants / Production / Inspectors Job in Neenah,Full Time,"Neenah, WI 54956",Consumer Packaged Goods Manufacturing,http://jobview.monster.com/Lab-Assistants-Production-Inspectors-Job-Neenah-WI-US-165485501.aspx?mescoid=2900515001001&jobPosition=18,11.00 - 14.00 $ /hour,Entry Level,c11e9e7f1c8706ad0fb03896cc8d20f7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:14:57:29,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: TOOLING/MOLDING PROJECT MANAGER-SOUTH CAROLINAJob Description:A company located in Upstate South Carolina that specializes in the maintenance, repairs, and engineering changes to tooling in the plastics industry needs a Tooling/Molding Project Manager.Will be the primary point of contact for customers and the communications link from the manufacturing floor to the customer. Will manage and organize incoming customer data and information.Will provide quotes to customers and receive purchase orders from customers.Will transfer information and customer issues to the manufacturing floor so troubleshooting can begin.Will manage projects and provide information to maintain flow and keep them on schedule.Will visit customers to provide support with any issues.Requirements:MUST HAVE EXPERIENCE IN TOOLING, MOLDING AND WELDING.Must be a good communicator and self-motivated.Must be able to multitask and work in a fast paced environment.Must be efficient with Word, Excel, Powerpoint.Must have the ability to view 3D CAD Models to review part changes.Benefits:Starting salary $60k-$80k.Monthly car allowance provided.Instructions on how to Apply:Click on the apply button below.A recruiter will reach out to you within 24 hours to discuss next steps.",Tooling/Molding Project Manager-South Carolina Job in Greenville,Full Time,"Greenville, SC",,http://jobview.monster.com/Tooling-Molding-Project-Manager-South-Carolina-Job-Greenville-SC-US-164099574.aspx?mescoid=1300093001001&jobPosition=17,"60,000.00 - 80,000.00 $ /yearCar Allowance",Experienced (Non-Manager),85e6b9fc8e2470fd97c4331952adb7d7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:14:58:44,No,jobs.monster.com,"Position Summary:Is responsible for the hands on operation of automated blow molding equipment.Responsibilities:- Performs mechanical troubleshooting.- Makes adjustments and repairs on machinery in the designated work area.- Monitors and performs necessary setting adjustments, and records all changes.- Completes preventative maintenance requirements.- Has working knowledge of various product orders by following all material requirements and customer requests.- Performs quality control checks, and helps maintain customer requirements, according to specifications in bottle weights and various dimensions.- Follows correct housekeeping and safety procedures.- Attends all required training sessions and weekly team meetings.- Responsible for maintaining ISO standards.- Completes Work Orders and other related documentation in computer and log books, according to BOS Work Instructions.- Responsible for reporting food safety issues to personnel with authority to initiate action.- All other duties as assigned.Requirements:- Team oriented.- Self motivation and flexibility of job assignments.- Flexibility to work overtime as needed.- Blend of technical, interpersonal skills, and continuous learning through training.- Previous Experience in Plastics Technology, Electrical, Electronics, Electro-Mechanical or a similar technical area preferred. Background manufacturing experience will be considered.- High school diploma or GEDEssential Functions:- Regularly stand / walk up to 8 hours at a time.- Ability to bend, reach and move around facility.- Must be able to lift 50 lbs.https://loopapply.com/apply/62/E600BD61F199DBF18E2B005056984D64 ""> $('span#TrackingJobBody a').each(function (i, v) { if ($(v).attr('href')) { var href = $(v).attr('href').toLowerCase(); if (href.match(""^http"")) { switch (true) { case /facebook/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Facebook'); break; case /linkedin/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Linkedin'); break; case /twitter\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-Twitter'); break; case /plus\.google\.com/.test(href): $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'NonJob-GooglePlus'); break; case /youtube/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Social-Youtube'); break; case /http[s]?\:\/\/([a-z0-9\-\.]{1,}\.[a-z]{2,})[\/]?$/.test(href): $(v).attr('data-track', 'Client-Link-Homepage'); break; default: $(v).attr('mns_rt', 'jobcustomapplyonline'); break; } } } });",Process Tech - HDPE - D Shift Job in Medina,Full Time,"Medina, OH 44256",,http://jobview.monster.com/Process-Tech-HDPE-D-Shift-Job-Medina-OH-US-166028686.aspx?mescoid=1700218001001&jobPosition=8,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,04c6aa99abc71583e01474600c6a2bb7
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:14:59:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"With Staff Management | SMX, you'll get a weekly paycheck, learn new skills, meet new people, and work with a great management team in a clean and safe environment. We are currently hiring Manufacturing and Distribution Associates. Associates will operate molding and assembly equipment in order to produce and/or assemble parts to meet the specification of the customer or the next process while always striving to meet Arkansas Faucet Operations goals in Safety, Quality, Delivery, and Cost.Manufacturing and Distribution Associates Job Responsibilities:1. Operate production machines as they run plastic production/components/toilet seats and assembly of parts. 2. Perform all duties associated with running plastic production and faucets assembly production.This includes the following items; remove parts from molding machine if required, inspect parts according to quality control instruction sheets.3. Use measuring devises and gauges, package parts according to packaging instructions, and assemble sub assemblies according to assembly instructions and standard operating procedures. 4. Verify skid quantities and part identification with material support associate before allowing any production to be removed from the area. * Full & Part Time on All ShiftsManufacturing and Distribution Associates Requirements: * Background Check Required & Drug Test Required * Able to Lift 20 pounds & Must be at least 18 years old * Must have the ability to read and comprehend simple instructions and memos in English. * Must have the ability to write simple correspondence. * Must have the ability to add and subtract two-four digit numbers and to multiply and divide with 10''s and 100''s.Manufacturing and Distribution Associates Benefits: * Paid Training * Medical / Dental * Referral BonusRecruiting LocationPlease bring 2 forms of ID with you. One should be a government-issued photo ID like a Driver's License, Military card or Passport Kohler - Sheridan, AR-7064 2686 Highway 270E Sheridan, AR 72150 (870) 917-6252LIKE us on Facebook: Staff Management/ SMXTweet us #SMXJOBSNOWEOE",Manufacturing / Distribution Associates Job in Sheridan,Full Time,"Sheridan, AR 72150",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Manufacturing-Distribution-Associates-Job-Sheridan-AR-US-165891654.aspx?mescoid=4300739001001&jobPosition=10,,Entry Level,b582d8e51d976ef0509e9dfdd43ed9b5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:00:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Purpose:Expedites production by organizing and monitoring schedules.Duties:* Determines production priorities by studying master production schedule and customer requirements.* Organizes production schedule by studying work order specifications, current schedule, and availability of equipment, materials, and employees.* Publishes production schedule by identifying products, equipment, sequence, completion dates, etc.* Monitors production by collecting production logs; comparing progress to schedule.* Resolves scheduling problems by collecting and analyzing information; coordinating solutions.* Prepares reports by compiling and summarizing production and downtime data.* Maintains production data base by entering data.* Secures information by completing data base backups.* Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results as needed.Skills/Qualifications:Scheduling, Analyzing Information, Data Maintenance, Reporting Skills, Supply Management, Manufacturing Methods and Procedures, Manufacturing Quality, Quality Focus, Research Skills, Judgment, Independence",Production Scheduler Job in El Dorado,Full Time,"El Dorado, AR 71730",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Scheduler-Job-El-Dorado-AR-US-166080083.aspx?mescoid=4300738001001&jobPosition=14,"60,000.00 - 70,000.00 $ /year",Experienced (Non-Manager),da7cb4e9ac5a37750761dc31cb12c0c6
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:41,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chief Building EngineerLocation: Houston, Texas Job Type: Full TimeCareer Level: Experienced EngineerJob Description: A Texas based commercial property management firm, is seeking a Chief Building Engineer to join its staff in Houston.The Chief Building Engineer is responsible for supervising the building maintenance staff and vendors and performing work in four office buildings (approx. 400,000sqft). Duties include, but are not limited to, the installation, troubleshooting and repair, maintenance and improvement of all building structures and equipment, including HVAC, plumbing, electrical, and life safety, etc. The Chief Building Engineer reports to the Property Manager.Essential Job Responsibilities:•     Responsible for prompt and positive response to tenant work order requests and to ensureproblems are being resolved promptly to the mutual benefit of the tenant and the propertyCommunicate and assist specialty contractors to assure full compliance with standards established within the scope of work presentedPerform general maintenance duties consistent with the management of a multi-tenant office buildingPlan and supervise the implementation of all preventative maintenance and repair programs and operationsProvide hands on training, technical support and direction to the maintenance staff in all areas of electrical systems, mechanical systems, building operations and safety proceduresInspect equipment to insure that proper maintenance is being performed in accordance with manufacturer’s and company standardsManage, monitor and control building energy consumptionDevelop plans and procedures for controlling, labeling, inspecting and maintaining all capital and non-capital equipment within the building, including the recording of estimated life expectancyEnsure that general safety, fire prevention regulations, and safe working habits are promoted throughout the buildingSet and maintain a professional work environment with staff, and ensure high standards of customer serviceInteract and coordinate with suppliers and contractors to ensure compliance with building standards and regulationsOversee contractors performing capital and tenant improvement projects, andCollaborate with the management staff on all of the above dutiesMust have reliable transportation and be available for after hour emergency callsQualifications • Requires the ability to communicate effectively with people and present a positive, professional image including the ability to speak and understand English fluently • Willingness to follow directions and work well with fellow staff members and tenants• Ability to work independently and be self-motivated• Working knowledge of HVAC systems is required• Minimum 5 years maintenance experience is required• Working knowledge of EMS systems is required  ",Commercial Building Engineer Job in Houston,Full Time,"Houston, TX 77067",Real Estate/Property Management,http://jobview.monster.com/Commercial-Building-Engineer-Job-Houston-TX-US-164544752.aspx?mescoid=1700190001001&jobPosition=4,,Experienced (Non-Manager),59c2b95d3a1febbc7a4769d5336b4df5
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:43,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Title: MAINTENANCE TECHNICIANSJob Description:A manufacturer of automotive components in Athens, TN needs MAINTENANCE TECHNICIANS. Responsibilities:Will repair and troubleshoot high speed production equipment. Requirements:Must be skilled in mechanical and electrical functions. Must have experience with PLC's, hydraulics and pneumatics.Benefits:Must take a mechanical and electrical test and that you pass at a certain level.If you pass at the senior level, pay starts at $22.79 and moves to $23.49 after 90 days.If you pass at the entry level, pay starts at $20.38 and moves to $21.01 after 90 days.Some relocation assistance is available.Instructions on How to Apply:Click on the apply button belowA recruiter will reach out to you within 24 hours to discuss next steps.",Maintenance Technicians-Tennessee Job in Athens,Full Time,"Athens, TN",,http://jobview.monster.com/Maintenance-Technicians-Tennessee-Job-Athens-TN-US-144025016.aspx?mescoid=4900898001001&jobPosition=18,20.38 - 23.49 $ /hour,Experienced (Non-Manager),8bf8c6711df63d65d8700e8327fd4b16
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:49,No,jobs.monster.com," FULL TIME and YEAR ROUND opportunity with GREAT benefits!In this position, the individual will perform window and door maintenance and repair duties to support the window and door warranty issues of our customer base; works with Customer Service Coordinator(s) to coordinate projects to provide window and door service and maintenance.  This person will diagnose issues to ensure effective repair, perform product repairs and preventative maintenance, communicate and administer warranty policies and procedures, document and submit job reports daily, participate in training programs, offer jobsite consultation to contractors, homeowners and architects.  The territory for this position is Cape Cod/The Islands.  This position will be given a company vehicle and gas card.RequirementsOur ideal candidate will have a strong background in remodeling, or home improvement repair; We are looking for a well-organized individual, has a good work ethic and is dependable, demonstrates attention to detail, displays professional appearance, excellent customer service, and strong technology skills.",Window & Door Specialist Job in Hyannis,Full Time,"Hyannis, MA",,http://jobview.monster.com/Window-Door-Specialist-Job-Hyannis-MA-US-164035234.aspx?mescoid=9901112000004&jobPosition=18,,,8ead208f3a3bf1b095a36069922b4acf
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:51,No,jobs.monster.com,"The Judge Group is currently seeking a Package Development Engineer for a large consumer goods manufacturer in Middletown, NJ. The ideal candidate will have a degree in package engineering and have 5 years experience in a consumer goods manufacturing facility.Education:   Bachelors Degree in Package Engineering or Relevant Work Experience•Certifications: Institute of Packaging Professionals a plus5-7 years of package design experience required****",Package Development Engineer Job in Middletown,"Full Time, Employee","Middletown, NJ",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Package-Development-Engineer-Job-Middletown-NJ-US-165996574.aspx?mescoid=1500127001001&jobPosition=4,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,b91487b3c732b87cf10f54ef38df0673
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:52,No,jobs.monster.com,"Are you looking for a new and exciting opportunity to use your skills in a successful and growing company? Do you desire a fast-paced, casual work environment that is driven by employees who thrive on innovative thinking?  If you have a desire to work in an energetic, collaborative environment, then check out this opportunity at Proto Labs! About Proto Labs: Proto Labs (PRLB) is a leading online and technology enabled quick-turn manufacturer. Our technology, innovation and people have made us the world's fastest manufacturer of custom prototype and low-volume parts. Proto Labs revolutionized our industry by developing proprietary computing technologies and automated manufacturing processes that enable us to create ""Real Parts, Really Fast"".   Proto Labs Is: #4 on Forbes list of Best Small Public Companies in the United States 2nd fastest growing public company in Minnesota by the Twin Cities Business Journal Top 100 Best Places to Work in the Twin Cities by Star Tribune – 4 times!   Position Overview: The Mold Design and Analysis Supervisor will provide day to day leadership for the Analysis and Design groups including workload management, technical support, training, process development, and staff development.   Specific duties include: Assign work and tasks and set priorities for Analysis and Design staff. Be accountable for productivity and effectiveness of Analysis and Design functions Be the first source for resolving technical issues. Be the “go to” person for design problems and for developing solutions. Collaborate with Analysis and Design Manager and Software Development to improve processes and enhance software capabilities. Conduct annual performance reviews for Analysis and Design staff. Create and provide regular training to continuously develop staff and improve process efficiency and accuracy. Oversee and guide daily staff performance and provide praise or constructive criticism as appropriate. Assess resource (equipment and people) needs and assist Analysis and Design Manager with resource allocation and planning. Balance the objective of satisfying customer requirements with the potential of downstream risks to deliver acceptable parts on schedule. Assist the Molding Engineering and Software Development teams with efforts to expand Proto Labs envelope of capabilities. Make recommendations for process improvements within Analysis, Design and in other areas of the company; help implement approved process improvements. Identifying training requirements; assist in training employees, evaluate employee technical competence and identify competence gaps. Be a technical liaison to Proto Labs facilities worldwide. Design molds, analyze parts, toolpath parts, and approve quotes Assist Analysis and Design Manager in defining work standards and measures. Ensure team complies with all quality and safety standards within the department. Adhere to all company policies and operational procedures. Perform additional tasks as assigned. Proto Labs is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer: Minorities, Women, Veterans & Disabilities. Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. Qualifications Education Required Associates or better in Design and Technical Production or related field. Preferred Bachelors or better in Engineering. Experience Required Strong attention to detail Good written and oral communication skills. Ability to represent the Tech Ops team with respect and professionalism Able to work in a fast-paced, team-oriented work environment Able to gain and retain the respect of the Design, Analysis, Toolpathing, Sales, CSE, CQR, CS and Manufacturing staffs 2 years: Experience operating CAD software or at least 1 year experience operating Proto Labs Design and Analysis software (PMD, PMQ, FCD). Existing deep and broad understanding of Proto Labs analysis, design, and toolpathing processes, or the ability to quickly acquire same Preferred Previous experience supervising a technical staff a plus",Supervisor,Full Time Employee,"Plymouth, MN",Manufacturing - Other,http://jobview.monster.com/Supervisor-Mold-Design-Analysis-Job-Plymouth-MN-US-165978991.aspx?mescoid=1100055001001&jobPosition=4,,Manufacturing/Production/Operations,3bef2c4a7c83550e553be9cc53e43247
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:53,No,jobs.monster.com,"Production WorkerAmes, IA Pay Rate: $15.40/HR plus time and a half for overtimeThis position is a year length contract position. Possible Shift Start Times: 7:00am -3:30pm OR 9:00am -5:30pm ***Please indicate the shift that you would prefer*** Production duties: Bulk material handling Stage raw materials for production process Perform batch manufacturing Pump product into finished good container Comply with all Safety Regulations, including, batch ticket safety equipment specifications or any other safety issues that may arise. Maintain a safe work environment at all times. Implement 5s in work area Continually maintain plant and grounds for cleanliness and organization. Maintain a clean working environment Other duties assigned: Forklifts: Operation of forklifts Certification course required. Comply with all Safety Regulations Batch Tickets: Accurately follow instructions and record data on production tickets including batch sampling and other duties associated with batch formulation, such as weighing, addition, and mixing various ingredients. Position Qualifications: Required Education: High School diploma or GED required Required Work Experience: Progressive, positive work history, Computer Skills Required Skills or traits for the position: Strong written and oral communication skills Must be able to meet essential skills of the job per a skills-based assessment Reading for Information Applied Mathematics Observation Physical Requirements: Must be able to meet the essential functions of the job per a physical examination: Two hand lift of 50lbs. 60 to the floor Two hand lift of 50lbs. 36 to the floor Two hand push of 20lb. force X 20 repetitions. Two hand lift/carry of 40lbs. 6 to waist and carry 10ft Sustained squat  ",Production Worker Ames Job in Ames,Full Time,"Ames, IA",Chemicals/Petro-Chemicals,http://jobview.monster.com/Production-Worker-Ames-Job-Ames-IA-US-165969986.aspx?mescoid=5101030001001&jobPosition=4,15.40 - 15.40 $ /hourBenefits and Overtime,Experienced (Non-Manager),160b230699f7ebdae71a91d1afa3c2ea
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:54,No,jobs.monster.com,"PORTER NEEDED! Sunnyside Mitsubishiis seeking a full-timeService Porter. Qualified applicants must have a clean driving record, and pass a drug screen.  Candidates will be required to have a valid driver’s license and reliable transportation.  Job Duties Include:Park, pull-up service carsWash, vacuum guest vehiclesKeeping a clean and orderly lotShuttling cars Keeping lot cars cleanOther general duties as assigned Sunnyside Automotive offers the following benefits:Great centralized location ( I-71 & Pearl )Unlimited advancement opportunitiesPaid Time Off (PTO)401kMedical, Dental & Vision plan Drug-free workplace Applications are available at our receptionist desk or can beemailed torandras@sunnysideauto.com.  Sunnyside Mitsubishi – 7629 Pearl Rd, Middleburg Heights, OH   ",Service Porter Needed Job in Cleveland,Full Time,"Cleveland, OH 44130",Automotive and Parts Mfg,http://jobview.monster.com/Service-Porter-Needed-Job-Cleveland-OH-US-165254265.aspx?mescoid=3900654001001&jobPosition=2,,Entry Level,a85219c29d22741803ca615fc87c8d60
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:55,No,jobs.monster.com,"Chuck E. Cheese's (CEC) is currently seeking an Assistant Gameroom Technician to assist in managing the electrical and mechanical aspects of the gameroom area inclusive of the latest video games, skill games, kiddy rides, sky tubes, robotic shows, kitchen equipment, register systems, coin and ticket mechanisms. This role performs daily preventative maintenance and repair of any items that must be fixed. Minimum Qualifications:Be at least 18 years oldPossess a “fix it now” sense of urgency Willing to learn and grow with the company Have mechanical aptitude Technical skills, including rudimentary electronics knowledge is helpful Will take a technical assessment test AND of course, provides exceptional customer serviceCEC Entertainment is an equal opportunity employer and a drug-free environment. To apply for this position please click the APPLY to send your resume. ",Assistant Electronic Gameroom Technician Job in Boynton Beach,Full Time,"Boynton Beach, FL 33426",Restaurant/Food Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Assistant-Electronic-Gameroom-Technician-Job-Boynton-Beach-FL-US-165558460.aspx?mescoid=1700213001001&jobPosition=4,,Entry Level,a5a6c2ea3af310766d3eb933c7eb1b29
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:56,No,jobs.monster.com,"Title: HVAC Service TechnicianCompany: Pee Dee Comfort Solutions LLCLocation: Lamar, SC 29069Positions: Installer; Technician (HVAC/R)Industry: Residential/Light Commercial-------------------Perform basic troubleshooting and repairs on residential heating and air conditioning equipment. Must be clean-cut, well-spoken, and an have an over all professional attitude. Must be able to pass background and drug test as well as clean MVR. Must have your own basic hand tools. Must have functional alarm clock. Pay will be based on performance. Company cell phone provided, May be able to use company vehicle for back and forth to work under the right circumstances. Excellent opportunity for the right person with a company that is ready to grow.",HVAC Service Technician Job in Lamar  function wrap(EL,Full Time,Lamar 29069,All,http://jobview.monster.com/HVAC-Service-Technician-Job-Lamar-164873968.aspx?mescoid=4900884001001&jobPosition=6,,Experienced (Non-Manager),97a18badd715b1738b0e856120856118
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:57,No,jobs.monster.com,"TITLE: AAMCO General Technician REPORTS TO: AAMCO Franchisee GENERAL DESCRIPTION: To perform basic automobile inspection and maintenance on all makes and models of vehicles. To remove and reinstall transmissions and engines in a timely manner. . SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES: none for this position. Essential functions: Inspect, Diagnose and Repair automotive systems.Diagnose and repair brake, steering and suspension, exhaust, shocks and struts, fuel, ignition, electrical, air conditioning and heating,Transmission and Engine Installation.Ability to continuously learn new technical information and techniques in formal training sessions in order to stay abreast with rapidly changing automotive technology.Maintains an organized service department work space. TITLE: AAMCO General Technician REPORTS TO: AAMCO Franchisee GENERAL DESCRIPTION: To perform basic automobile inspection and maintenance on all makes and models of vehicles. To remove and reinstall transmissions and engines in a timely manner. . SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES: none for this position. Essential functions: Inspect, Diagnose and Repair automotive systems.Diagnose and repair brake, steering and suspension, exhaust, shocks and struts, fuel, ignition, electrical, air conditioning and heating,Transmission and Engine Installation.Ability to continuously learn new technical information and techniques in formal training sessions in order to stay abreast with rapidly changing automotive technology.Maintains an organized service department work space. QUALIFICATIONS: Education: ASE certifications in brakes, steering and suspension, A/C Experience: 3 -5 years' experience in maintenance, problem-solving and repair experience Skills/Knowledge: Must have a valid driver's license, master set of tools, good communication skills and a customer-focused attitude to complement a high level of motivation and energy. Having a scanner to diagnose is a plus. QUALIFICATIONS: Education: ASE certifications in brakes, steering and suspension, A/C Experience: 3 -5 years' experience in maintenance, problem-solving and repair experience Skills/Knowledge: Must have a valid driver's license, master set of tools, good communication skills and a customer-focused attitude to complement a high level of motivation and energy. Having a scanner to diagnose is a plus.",Automotive Technician Job in Sarasota,"Full Time, Employee","Sarasota, FL",Automotive and Parts Mfg;Automotive Sales and Repair Services,http://jobview.monster.com/Automotive-Technician-Job-Sarasota-FL-US-165533865.aspx?mescoid=4900868001001&jobPosition=11,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,a24ea07a33035a187083f843ec8010f9
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:58,No,jobs.monster.com,"Job Description:This Material Handler(LOU-4-16) Position Features:? Under General Supervision, Performs Manuals And C? Package And Ship All Outbound Products And Materia? Pick Material Ready To Ship And Check Goods Agains? Great Pay to $0KImmediate need for material handler(lou-4-16) seeking under general supervision, performs manuals and c, package and ship all outbound products and materia and pick material ready to ship and check goods agains. Perform bagging and tagging operations and label p, verify correctness of packaged shipments to packin and maintain shipping files in an orderly manner to ai will be keys to success in this growing, well-known, stable, family-oriented organization. Will be responsible for assemble and kits customer orders based on documen, may enter shipping and receiving transactions into and good verbal and written skills. good organizationa for Electronics, Components, and Semiconductor Mfg company. Great benefits. Apply for this great position as a material handler(lou-4-16) today! We are an equal employment opportunity employer and will consider all qualified candidates without regard to disability or protected veteran status. You can view all of our jobs online at http://www.at-tech.com/?sc=11&id=1028022 Job Experience:,, Lisa: 408-961-9645Email:lisado@at-tech.comLou",Material Handler(LOU--) - Under General Supervision,Temporary/Contract/Project,"Sunnyvale, CA 94085",Other/Not Classified,http://jobview.monster.com/Material-Handler-LOU-4-16-Under-General-Supervision-Performs-Manuals-C-Job-Sunnyvale-CA-US-166025427.aspx?mescoid=5301081001001&jobPosition=13,Up to $20.00,Experienced (Non-Manager),06b89d3f2f2d8bd1500092b7e4a7fc46
United States of America,US,05/May/2016:15:01:59,No,jobs.monster.com,"Summary:Attention Sheet Metal Mechanics: We’re looking for you! STS AeroStaff Services is looking for Sheet Metal Mechanics with 3+ years’ experience performing sheet metal work and components work on commercial aircraft for positions in Everett, WA.Note: STS never charges a placement fee, which means we work to find you work at no cost to you. How cool is that?Responsibilities & Qualifications: At least THREE years’ experience working on commercial aircraftForm and lay out sheet metal repairsRegarding composite materials: drilling round holes, filling the same with solid countersunk rivets, blind fasteners, and Hi-Loc’sAbility to read and understand Component Maintenance Manuals, SRM’s and OEM drawingsAvailability and willingness to work overtimeBenefits:STS offers direct deposits / electric payroll, an awesome medical insurance program, cash advances and the opportunity to refer a friend for compensation. So if you’re reading this post and thinking, “Hey, I know someone perfect for this job,” send them our way, and we’ll send you cash! At STS AeroStaff Services, we’re always searching for the very best to join our workforce. We know it takes great people to do great work, and if you’re interested in joining the STS Aviation Group family, we encourage you to apply on this page, call us at 1-800-359-4787.Thanks for taking the time to show interest in this incredible employment opportunity, and we look forward to hearing from you.  ",Sheet Metal Mechanic - Everett,Full Time Temporary/Contract/Project,"Everett, WA 98204",Aerospace and Defense,http://jobview.monster.com/Sheet-Metal-Mechanic-Everett-WA-Job-Everett-WA-US-165181938.aspx?mescoid=4700818001001&jobPosition=5,,Installation/Maintenance/Repair,4038eefc42398df03ae805671b9833b5
